              ————————————
  ——————————————————————————————————————
       '''GREAT DANGER KEEP 😑UT'''
               ————————————
    The complete works of Nikola Tesla
  ——————————————————————————————————————
                    📱


 ''A man will be able to carry
       [or borrow] 1 in his vest pocket'''

                     N. Tesla -1926

















                               
    📷 NIKOLA TESLA IN HIS WORKSHOP 📷




















 
   An unabridged chronologically ordered
   collection of all publicly available
    things Tesla (pronounced Teshla).

   Select non-Tesla works also included.





———————————————————————————————————————————
       <a sh😆rt (mostly) Nikola
       Tesla (supercut) foreword>
———————————————————————————————————————————


'''The scientific man does not aim at an immediate result. He does not expect that his advanced ideas will be readily taken up. His work is like that of the planter — for the future. His duty is to lay the foundation for those who are to come, and point the way.'''

His hair is not yet entirely gray. The mustache that he once wore has been shaved off — it took much attention, he explained.

''' A pioneer does not apply his energies in the way the world is going. Rather he goes against the current.
He lets them call him a lunatic. He lets them trample him — if I should ever tell you
the inside story of how I had been trampled —




—
MR. TESLA'S GREAT LOSS
All of the Electrician's Valuable Instruments Burned.
WORK OF HALF A LIFETIME GONE
March 14th, 1895
The New York Times

Nicola Tesla, Whose Electric Works Were Burned Yesterday.

Outside his shop he is something of a Luxurist. He dines at Delmonico's almost invariably, and lounges about the café during the evening. Patrons of the place know him well. He is very tall and very thin. His dark

(((I asked him how he could have such light eyes and be a Slav. 94)))
(((black hair and mustache, and clear gray eyes 99)))
(((lean features and bright blue eyes 35)))
(((There was a sheen in his white hair, and in his blue eyes an unquenchable fire. 35)))

eyes are perhaps his most noticeable feature. They are large and brilliant, showing with the zeal of an enthusiast.

(((—Back in 1894 a long, lean, almost cadaverous, looking man used to enthrall Ward McAllister and other playboys at Delmonico's with dissertations on the fly — and how he could fly! And maybe man would get that way some day, too. That was Nikola Tesla from the kingdom of Lika, on the borders of Austria-Hungary, but rubbed out of existence as an independent State long before the [first] big war. Mr. Tesla's visions suggested hashish to some rock ribbed scientists, but in 1915 he got [not rlly] the Nobel physics prize for his research in energy transmission, his take-off in today's prophecy. While he has called many of the modern scientific miracles in advance, some are still in suspense, notably his prediction that some day... 31)))

'''I am in too much grief to talk. What can I say'''

Tears were in his eyes when he spoke.




—
Tesla's Marvellous Achievement.
EARTH ELECTRICITY TO KILL MONOPOLY
A Way to Harness Free Electric Currents Discovered by Nikola Tesla.
March 8th, 1896
The World Sunday Magazine

The World is on the eve of an astounding revelation. The conditions under which we exist will be changed. The end has come to telegraph and telephone monopolies with a crash. Incidentally, all the other monopolies that depend on power of any kind will come to a sudden stop. The earth currents of electricity are to be harnessed.

((('''The current circulating through the globe is of enormous volume but of small tension, and could perform but little work.''' 07)))

 Nature supplies them free of charge. The cost of power and light and heat will be practically

((('''Huge and expensive transmission line[s] will be unnecessary. Bulky and unsightly distribution systems will be done away with. A little receiving device in your home will give you all the power you can use — and for only a [negative] fraction of present-day costs.''' '34)))

It means that if Nikola Tesla succeeds in harnessing the electrical earth currents and putting them to work for man there will be an end to oppressive, extortionate monopolies in steam, telephone, telegraphs and the other commercial uses of electricity, and that the grasping millionaires who have for two decades milked the people's purse with electrical fingers will have to relinquish their monopoly.

At last, as a tuning-fork responds to its harmonic note sounded on the strings of a piano, the autoharp in Mr. Tesla's hands gave out the harmonic tunes of "Ben Bolt" which his companion at his station four miles away straight through the peak was plucking from the tense wires of his instrument. The experiment was a success. After many tunes had been played Tesla and his companion descended the peak. A statement of the facts and results of the experiment was written and attested before a notary public as a matter of scientific record.

The electric currents are in the earth. Their strength is great enough to furnish all the power and light man needs. Mr. Tesla has overcome the initial difficulty, and has located and tapped the earth's currents. The rest will follow, as followed the telephone, Prof. Bell's discovery of how to transmit speech over a wire.






Dr. Nikola Tesla Looks Forward to the Era When '''One Titanic Electrical Wireless Station Shall Supply Power for the World''' — Tells of Other Developments That '''We Have Good Reason to Expect.'''

'''Modern systems of power transmission will become antiquated. Compact relay stations one half or one quarter the size of our modern power plants will be the basis of operation—in the air and under the sea, for [sea] water will effect small loss in conveying energy by wireless.'''

'''Mr. Tesla's visions suggested hashish to some rock ribbed scientists, but in 1915 [he definitely claimed to have, or at the least he coherced reporter(s), several times, over many years, into printing that] he got the Nobel physics prize [lmao] for his research in energy transmission, his take-off in today's prophecy. While he has called many of the modern scientific miracles in advance, some are still in suspense, notably his prediction that some day the Atlantic Ocean will be lit up like Forty-second street and Broadway by some comparatively simple, electrical conjuring.'''

'''The same energy (wireless transmission of power) will drive airplanes and dirigibles from one central base.'''

'''In this new era man will be able to travel safely, and at great speed, to any part of the world — the jungle — the arctic — the desert — mountain tops — over oceans.. The instruments by which these wonders will be achieved will be amazingly simple.'''

'''One of the most important uses of wireless energy will be undoubtedly for the propulsion of flying machines to which power can be readily supplied without ground connection, for altho the flow of the currents is confined to the earth an electro magnetic field is created in the atmosphere surrounding it. If conductors or circuits accurately attuned and properly positioned are carried by the plane, energy is drawn into these circuits much the same as a fluid will pass through a hole created in the container. With an industrial plant of great capacity sufficient power can be derived in this manner to propel any kind of aerial machine. This I have always considered as the best and permanent solution of the problems of flight.  No fuel of any kind  will be required as the propulsion will be accomplished by light electric motors operated at great speed.'''

'''As throwing light on this point, I may mention that only recently an odd looking gentleman called on me with the object of enlisting my services in the construction of world transmitters in some distant land. "We have no money," he said, "but carloads of oil and we will give you a liberal amount." I told him that I wanted to see first what will be done with my inventions in America

finally, it will furnish scientists with a means for laying bare the physical conditions of the earth, and will enable them to determine all of the earth's physical constants.

He called this discovery “tele-geodynamics,” motion of earth-forces at a distance. It is of this, he said, that it would “appear almost preposterous.” The apparatus, he added, is “ideally simple,” consisting of

I am positive in my conviction that we can erect a plant of proper design in an arid region, work it according to certain observations and rules, and by its means draw from the ocean unlimited amounts of water for irrigation and power purposes. If I do not live to carry it out, somebody else will, but I feel sure that I am right.'''

'''Some experts, whom I have credited with better knowledge, have for years contended that my proposals to transmit power without wires are sheer nonsense but I note that they are growing more cautious every day. The latest objection to my system is found in the cheapness of gasoline. These men labor under the impression that the energy flows in all directions and that, therefore, only a minute amount can be recovered in any individual receiver.'''

'''The power is conveyed in only one direction, from the transmitter to the receiver, and none of it is lost elsewhere. It is perfectly practicable to recover at any point of the globe energy enough for driving an airplane, or a pleasure boat or for lighting a dwelling. I am especially sanguine in regard to the lighting of isolated places and believe that a more economical and convenient method can hardly be devised. The future will show whether my foresight is as accurate now as it has proved heretofore.'''

'''The law of motion can be expressed by stating that the waves on the terrestrial surface sweep in equal intervals of time over equal areas, but it must be understood that the current penetrates deep into the earth and the effects produced on the receivers are the same as if the whole flow was confined to the earth's axis joining the transmitter with the antipode.'''

'''Imagine a thermopile consisting of a number of bars of metal extending from the earth to the outer space beyond the atmosphere.'''

'''The two terminals of the thermopile could now be joined through an electric motor, and, theoretically, this motor would run on and on, until the media below would be cooled down to the temperature of the outer space.'''

'''Experts have jumped to the conclusion that I am attempting to realize a perpetual-motion scheme. But my process has been carefully worked out. It is rational.'''

'''But was it not possible to realize a similar condition without necessarily going to a height?'''

'''It should enable us to obtain many important results heretofore considered impossible. With the knowledge of the facts before me, I do not think it hazardous to predict that we will be enabled to illuminate the whole sky at night and that eventually we will flash power in virtually unlimited amounts to planets.'''

'''Corresponding to this ideal case, all the water flowing into the tank would be decomposed into oxygen and hi Rogan before reaching the bottom, and the result would be that water would continually flow in, and yet the tank would remain entirely empty, the gases formed escaping.

We would thus produce, by expending initially a certain amount of work to create a sink for the heat or, respectively, the water to flow in, a condition enablinus to get any amount of energy without further effort.'''

'''Thus the virtue of the principle I have discovered resides wholly in the conversion of the energy on the downward flow.'''

'''The power transmitted need not be necessarily destructive, for, if existence is made to depend upon it, its withdrawal or supply will bring about the same results as those now accomplished by force of arms.'''

'''Belted parking towers will arise in our large cities, and the roads will be multiplied through sheer necessity, or ‘finally’ rendered unnecessary when civilization exchanges 'wheels' for 'wings'.'''

'''Tesla contradicts a part of the relativity theory emphatically, holding that mass is unalterable; OTHERWISE, energy could be produced from nothing, since the kinetic energy acquired in the fall of a body would be greater than that necessary to lift it at a small velocity.'''

'''But as to atomic energy, my experimental observations have shown that the process of disintegration is not accompanied by a liberation of such energy as might be expected from the present theories.'''

Experiments conducted by Mr. Nikola Tesla with electromotive forces of 2,000,000 volts have convinced him that if 100,000,000 volts could be produced it might be possible to break down the atomic structure of any element and thus liberate a certain amount of energy. '''BUT,''' he told the writer of this article, '''even if the feat could be accomplished and sufficient energy set free, there still remains the enormously difficult problem of devising a means of utilizing the energy in a practical way.'''
'''I add that in the station one must have a small generator or battery of 30 volts for activation.'''

'''If we were to release the energy of atoms or discover some other way of developing cheap and unlimited power at any point of the globe this accomplishment, instead of being a blessing, might bring disaster to mankind in giving rise to dissension and anarchy which would ultimately result in the enthronement of the hated regime of force.'''

'''War can not be avoided until the physical cause for its recurrence is removed and this, in the last analysis, is the vast extent of the planet on which we live. Only thru annihilation of distance in every respect, as the conveyance of intelligence, transport of passengers and supplies and transmission of energy will conditions be brought about some day, insuring permanency of friendly relations. What we now want most is closer contact and better understanding between individuals and communities all over the earth, and the elimination of that fanatic devotion to exalted ideals of national egoism and pride which is always prone to plunge the world into primeval barbarism and strife. No league or parliamentary act of any kind will ever prevent such a calamity. These are only new devices for putting the weak at the mercy of the strong.'''

'Vast Energy Freed by Uranium Atom Split, It Produces 2 `Cannon balls', Each of 100,000,000 Electron Volts'
'New Process, Announced at Columbia, Uses Only 1-30 Volt to Liberate Big Force'

'POFESSOR EINSTEIN had never expected he would write such a letter. Apart from the fact that he was an avowed pacifist, he did not believe that the atom's energy would be released. Even after the neutron had been discovered in 1932 (it proved to be the magic bullet in atom‐smashing) he had declared: “There is not the slightest indication that energy will ever be obtainable. It would mean that the atom would have to be shattered at will.” '

'Pro. Albert Einstein, the German astronomer and author of the theory of "Relativity" that is apparently upsetting all accepted doctrines, believes that Mars and other planets are inhabited but if intelligent creatures are trying to communicate with the earth he should expect them to use rays of light, which would much more easily be controlled.'

'''There will not be any light, electrical energy will deliver particles through space with the speed of 118,837,370,000 centimeters per second...'''

'''Observation will bring out the fact that the weakening is not noticeable until the aerials have reached a position, with reference to the sun, in which the evaporation of the water is distinctly more rapid. The maximum will not be exactly when the angle of incidence of the suns rays is greatest, but some time after.

It is noteworthy that the experimenters who watched the effect of the recent eclipse, above referred to, have observed the delay.'''

'''I am positive in my conviction that we can erect a plant of proper design in an arid region, work it according to certain observations and rules, and by its means draw from the ocean unlimited amounts of water for irrigation and power purposes. If I do not live to carry it out, somebody else will, but I feel sure that I am right.'''

'''I was born exactly at midnight, I have no birthday and I never celebrate it.'''

'''Persons arranging for the presentation ceremony were a little doubtful for a time whether it should be held today or yesterday, as the inventor has sometime jokingly told his friends that since he was born on the stroke of midnight he didn't know which day was his birthday.''' 

'''Another addition to the birthday anniversary message of the famous inventor was a positive declaration that he expected soon to construct apparatus that would disprove the theories of modern astronomers that the sun gradually was cooling off and eventually the earth would be unable to sustain life, as it would grow too cold.

He pointed out that his theory means a future for the earth as different from the general belief as the future of the sun. It is generally held that life on the earth will cease when the sun grows so cold that the earth temperature drops to a point where life can no longer be supported.

Dr. Tesla prophesies that life on the earth will cease because the planet will grow too warm to support life, and he believes that life will then begin on outer planets now too cold.

He said that his discovery not only allowed him to predict a very different future for the heavenly bodies from that now generally expected for them, but also to calculate in a new way their age.

As an hors d'oeuvre to this Jules Vernean announcement, Dr. Tesla disclosed that he has lately perfected instruments which flatly disprove the present theory of the high physicists that the sun is destined to burn itself out until it is a cold cinder floating in space.

Dr. Tesla stated that he is able to show that all the suns in the universe are constantly growing in mass and heat, so that the ultimate fate of each is explosion.'''

'''Brethren! We have a message from another world, unknown and remote. It reads: 1—2—3'''

'''In time, however, I recognized that devices of this kind, to be most effective and efficient, should be designed with due regard to the physical properties of this planet and the electrical conditions obtaining on the same.'''

'''We will soon be communicating with other planets, where it is entirely possible that there is civilization —far ahead— of —ours—.'''

' Apart from love and religion there happened the other day to Mr. Tesla the most momentous experience that has ever visited a human being on this earth.

As he sat beside his instrument on the hillside in Colorado, in the deep silence of that austere, inspiring region, where you plant your feel in gold and your head brushes the constellations — as he sat there one evening, alone, his attention, exquisitively alive at that juncture, was arrested by a faint sound from the receiver — three fairy taps, one after the other, at a fixed ('''The most essential requirement is, however, that irrespective of frequency the wave or wave-train should continue for a certain interval of time, which I have estimated to be not less than [~]one-twelfth or probably 0.08484 [2121/25000th] of a second and which is taken in passing to and returning from the region diametrically opposite the pole over the earth's surface with a mean velocity of about four hundred and seventy-one thousand two hundred and forty kilometers per second.''') interval.

What man who has ever lived on this earth would not envy Tesla that moment! [Lee de Forest: [Father of wireless #1,000] "If I could be any other man I would be Nikola Tesla."] Never before since the globe first swung into form had that sound been heard. Those three soft impulses, reflected from the sensitive disc of the receiver, had not proceeded from any earthly source.

The force which propelled them, the measure which regarded them, the significance they were meant to convey, had their origin in no mind native to this planet.

They were sent, those marvelous signals, by a human being living and thinking so far away from us, both in space and in condition, that we can only accept him as a fact, not comprehend him as a phenomenon.

Traveling with the speed of light, they must have been dispatched but a few moments before Tesla, in Colorado, received them. But they came from some Tesla on the planet

'''I caught signals which I interpreted as meaning 1—2—3—4. I believe the Martians used numbers for communication because numbers are universal.'''

'''Fig 8. This Diagram Illustrates How, During a Solar Eclipse, the Moon's Shadow Passes Over the Earth With Changing Velocity, and Should Be Studied In Connection With Fig. 9. The Shadow Moves Downward With Infinite Velocity at First. Then With Its True Velocity Thru Space, and Finally With Infinite Velocity Again.

Consider now the process taking place in the transmission by the instrumentalities and methods of my invention.

'''The mode of propagation of the currents from my transmitter through the terrestrial globe is most extraordinary considering the spread of the electrification of the surface. The wave starts with a theoretically infinite speed, slowing down first very quickly and afterward at a lesser rate until the distance is about six thousand miles, when it proceeds with the speed of light. From there on it again increases in speed, slowly at first, and then more rapidly, reaching the antipode with approximately infinite velocity. The law of motion can be expressed by stating that the waves on the terrestrial surface sweep in equal intervals of time over equal areas, but it must be understood that the current penetrates deep into the earth and the effects produced on the receivers are the same as if the whole flow was confined to the earth's axis joining the transmitter with the antipode.'''


'''The Marconi plants are inefficient, and do not lend themselves to the practice of two discoveries of mine, the “art of individualization,” that makes the message non-interfering and non-interferable, and the “stationary waves,” which annihilate distance absolutely and make the whole earth equivalent to a conductor devoid of resistance. Were it not for this deficiency, the number of words per minute could be increased at will by “individualization.”

The underlying principle is to combine a number of vibrations, preferably slightly displaced, to reduce further the danger of interference, active and passive, and to make the operation of the receiver dependent on the co-operative effect of a number of attuned elements. Just to illustrate what can be done, suppose that only four vibrations were isolated on each transmitter. Let those on one side be respectively a, b, c, and d. Then the following assembled lines would be ab, ac, ad, bc, bd, cd, abc, abd, acd, bcd and abCd. The same article on the other side will give eleven similar combinations, and both together twenty-two lines, which can be simultaneously operated. To transmit one thousand words a minute, only forty-six words on each combination are necessary. If the plants were suitable, not ten years, as Edison thinks, but ten hours would be necessary to put this improvement into practice. To do this Marconi would have to reconstruct the plants, and it will then be observed that the indefatigable Italian has departed from universal engineering customs for the IIII time.'''



'''For over a [two] century[s] a̷n̷d̷ ̷a̷ ̷h̷a̷l̷f the whole world, educated and otherwise, thought that the moon revolved around its axis. Nikola Tesla disproves that theory and will convince scientists and all others alike that the moon does *so such thing.'''



'''Tesla proves conclusively by theory and experiment that all the kinetic energy of a rotating mass is purely translational and that the moon contains absolutely no rotational energy, in other words, does not rotate on its axis.'''



'''In order to make one physical revolution on its axis the moon should have twice its present angular velocity.'''




'''Assuming that the moon does physically rotate upon its axis, it performs one revolution in 27 days, 7 hours, 43 minutes and 11 seconds, or 2,360,591 seconds. If, in conformity with mathematical principles, we imagine the entire mass concentrated at a distance from the center equal to two-fifths of the radius, then the calculated rotational velocity is 3.04 feet per second, at which the globe would contain 11,474,000,000,000,000,000 short foot tons of energy sufficient to run 1,000,000,000 horsepower for a period of 1,323 years. Now, I say, that there is not enough of that energy in the moon to run a delicate watch.'''




'''The unfailing test of the spinning of a mass is, however, the existence of energy of motion. The moon is not possest of such vis viva.'''

'''In astronomical treatisies usually the argument is advanced that “if the lunar globe did not turn upon its axis it would expose all parts to terrestrial view. As only a little over one-half is visible it must rotate.” But this inference is erroneous, for it only admits of one alternative. There are an infinite number of axis besides its own in each of which the moon might turn and still exhibit the same peculiarity.'''




'''The earth and moon [actually] revolve around a common center of gravity, which is, at a distance of a little over [on average] 2,899 miles from the earth's center.'''




'''Another mistake in books on astronomy is made in

considering this motion equivalent to that of a weight whirled

on a string
or in a sling.

In the first place there is an essential difference between these two devices
tho involving the same mechanical principle.

If a metal ball, attached to a string, is whirled around and the latter breaks, an axial rotation of the missile results which is definitely related in magnitude and direction to the motion preceding. By way of illustration — if the ball is whirled on the string clockwise ten times per second, then when it flies off, it will rotate on its axis ten times per second, likewise in the direction of a clock.

Quite different are the conditions when the ball is thrown from a sling. In this case a much more rapid rotation is imparted to it in the opposite sense.

There is no true analogy to these in the motion of the moon.'''




'''If the earth's 'attraction' would suddenly cease and cause it to fly off in a tangent, the moon would have no other energy except that of translatory movement, and it would not spin like the ball.'''

'''If the gravitational string, as it were, would snap, the satellite would go off in a tangent without the slightest swerving or rotation, for there is no moment about the axis and, consequently, no tendency whatever to spinning motion.'''




'''[The respondent to my first article] addressing the moon's rotation is mistaken in his surmise as to

what would happen if the earth were suddenly eliminated.

Let us suppose that this would occur at the instant when the moon is in opposition.

Then it would continue on its eliptical path around the sun, presenting to it steadily the face which was always exposed to the earth.

If, on the other hand, the latter would disappear at the moment of conjunction, the moon would gradually swing around thru 180° and, after a number of oscillations, revolve, again with the same face to the sun.

In either case there would be no periodic changes but eternal day and night, respectively, on the sides turned towards, and away from, the luminary.'''




'''In Fig. 7 in which the [separated] two masses [of the moon], condensed into points, are represented as attached to independent weightless strings of lengths Rg1 and Rg2 which are purposely shown as displaced but should be imagined as coincident.

It will be readily seen that if BOTH strings are cut in the same instant the masses will fly off in tangents to their circular orbits, the angular movement becoming rectilinear without any transformation of energy occurring. 

Let us now inquire what will happen if the two masses are rigidly joined, the connection being assumed imponderable.

Here we come to the REAL BUG  in the question under discussion.

Evidently, so long as the whirling motion continues, and both the masses have precisely the same angular velocity, this connecting link will be of no effect whatever, not the slightest turning effort about the common center of gravity of the masses or tendency of equalization of energy between them will exist.

The moment the strings are broken and they are thrown off they will begin to rotate but, as pointed out before, this motion neither adds to or detracts from the energy stored.

The rotation is, however, not due to an exclusive virtue of angular motion,

but to the fact that the tangential velocities of the

masses or parts
of the body thrown off

are different.'''




'''If You Still Think That the Moon Rotate on Its Axis, Look at This Diagram and Follow Closely the Successive Positions Taken by One of the Balls M While It is Rotated by a Spoke of the Wheel. Substitute Gravity for the Spoke and the Analogy Solves the Moon Rotation Riddle.'''




'''It will be difficult for most people engaged in practical pursuits to measure or even to form an adequate conception of the intensity of inspiration and force I derive from that part of my work which has passed into history. I have every reason to consider myself one of the most fortunate men, for I experience incessantly a feeling of inexpressible satisfaction that my alternating system is universally employed in the transmission and distribution of heat, light and power and that also my wireless system, in all its essential features, is used throughout the world for conveying intelligence. But my pioneer efforts in this later field are still grossly misunderstood.'''

'''By proper design and choice of wave lengths, you can arrange it so that you get, for instance, 5 percent in these electromagnetic waves and 95 percent in the current that goes through the earth. That is what I am doing. Or you can get, as these radio men, 95 percent in the energy of electromagnetic waves and only 5 percent in the energy of the current. The apparatus is suitable for one or the other method. I am not producing radiation with my system; I am suppressing electromagnetic waves. In my system, you should free yourself of the idea that there is radiation, that the energy is radiated. It is not radiated; it is conserved.'''

Through the universal adoption of this system, ideal conditions for the maintenance of law and order will be realized, for then the energy necessary to the enforcement of right and justice will be normally productive, yet potential, and in any moment available, for attack and defense.

The power transmitted need not be necessarily destructive, for, if existence is made to depend upon it, its withdrawal or supply will bring about the same results as those now accomplished by force of arms.'''

'''As this wireless energy is converted into a commodity for the use of the masses, transport and transmission will be subjected to tremendous changes.  Content will be flashed across limitless spaces by my system. The same energy will drive airplanes and dirigibles from one central base.'''

'''Peace can only come as a natural consequence of universal enlightenment and merging of races, and we are still far from this blissful realization.'''

"Now comes the '''dream''' — or whatever it is. Tesla says he can split the earth in the same way — split it as a boy would split an apple — and forever end the career of man.'''

'''There is no doubt in my mind. The earth would be split in two. For the first time in man's history, he has the knowledge with which he may interfere with cosmic processes.'''


'''Early in 1884, while employed by a French Company in Paris, I made important improvements in dynamos and motors and was engaged by the Edison interests in New York to design and construct similar machines for them.

It had been the height of my ambition and my most ardent wish to come in contact with Edison and see America.

Accordingly, I undertook the voyage and after

(At that moment I discovered that my money and tickets were gone. What to do was the question.)

losing my money and tickets and passing through a series of mishaps

(Hercules had plenty of time to deliberate but I had to decide while running alongside the train with opposite feelings surging in my brain like condenser oscillations.),

including a mutiny in which I nearly lost my life,

(Resolve, helped by dexterity, won out in the nick of time and upon passing thru the usual experiences, as trivial as unpleasant,

I managed to embark for New York with the remnants of my belongings,

some poems and articles I had written,



and a package of calculations relating to solutions of an unsolvable integral and to my flying machine.



During the voyage I sat most of the time at the stern of the ship watching for an opportunity to save somebody from a watery grave, without the slightest thought of danger.

Later when I had absorbed some of the practical American sense I shivered at the recollection and marvelled at my former folly.)

I landed on these blessed shores with four cents in my pocket.

My first intention was to look up a close American friend before going to the Edison establishment.[?]

On my way uptown I came to a small machine shop in which the foreman was trying to repair an electric machine of European make.

He had just given up the task as hopeless and I undertook to put it in order



without a thought of compensation.



It was not easy but I finally had it in perfect running condition.



I was astonished 



('''It was a machine I had helped to design, but I did not tell them that. I asked, '''What is the matter?''' and they said, 'This thing won't work.' I asked, '''what would you give me if I fix it?''' 'Twenty dollars' was the reply. I took off my coat and went to work. I had it running perfectly in an hour and had earned $20.''')



when he gave me twenty dollars and wished that I had come to America years before.



The next day I was thrilled to the marrow by meeting Edison who began my American education right then and there.

I wanted to have my shoes shined, something I considered below my dignity.

Edison said: "Tesla, you will shine the shoes yourself and like it."

He impressed me tremendously. I shined my shoes and liked it.'''

'''Within a few weeks I had won Edison's confidence and it came about in this way.

The S.S. Oregon, the fastest p̷a̷s̷s̷e̷n̷g̷e̷r̷ [navy] steamer at that time, had both of its lighting machines disabled and its sailing was delayed.

As the superstructure had been built after their installation it was impossible to remove them from the hold.

The predicament was a serious one and Edison was much annoyed.

In the evening I took the necessary instruments with me and went aboard the vessel where I stayed for the night. The dynamos were in bad condition, having several short-circuits and breaks, but with the assistance of the crew I succeeded in putting them in good shape.

At five o'clock in the morning, when passing along Fifth Avenue on my way to the shop, I met Edison with Batchellor and a few others as they were returning home to retire.

"Here is our Parisian running around at night," he said. When I told him that I was coming from the Oregon and had repaired both machines, he looked at me in silence and walked away without another word.

But when he had gone some distance I heard him remark: "Batchellor, this is a d—n good man," and from that time on I had full freedom in directing the work.

For nearly a year my regular hours were from 10.30 A.M. until 5 o'clock the next morning without a day's exception.

(All this time I was getting more and more anxious about the [induction motor] invention and was making up my mind to place it before Edison. I still remember an odd incident in this connection. One day in the latter part of 1884 Mr. Bachelor, the manager of the works, took me to Coney Island, where we met Edison in company with his former wife. The moment that I was waiting for was propitious, I was just about to speak when a horrible looking tramp took hold of Edison and drew him away, preventing me from carrying out my intention.)

Edison said to me: "I have had many hard-working assistants but you take the cake." During this period I designed twenty-four different types of standard machines with short cores and of uniform pattern which replaced the old ones.

The Manager had promised me fifty thousand dollars on the completion of this task



but it turned out to be a practical joke.





This gave me a painful shock and I resigned my position.'''


(He shortly found it was not all so easy as that. There were many days when he did not know where the next meal was coming from. '''But I was never afraid to work. I went to where some men were digging a ditch. I said I wanted to work. The boss looked at my good clothes and white hands and he laughed to the others. 'This man wants to work.' But he said 'All right. Spit on your hands. Get in the ditch. Go to work.' And I worked harder than anybody. At the end of that day I had $2. And I kept it up until I had enough to get started again.''')


    Sometime in 1888:
Nikola Tesla sells the rights to his Alternating Current power distribution system patents to Westinghouse for a
$60,000 ($1,943,930.53 '23) lump sum,
a $2,000 ($64,797.68 '23) monthly salary
and a $2.50 ($81.00 '23) per horsepower transmitted royalty.
(~$462 billion annually in the USA '23)

'''If Edison had a needle to find in a haystack, he would proceed at once with the diligence of the bee to examine straw after straw until he found the object of his search... I was a sorry witness of such doings, knowing that a little theory and calculation would have saved him ninety per cent of his labor.'''

'''The recurrence of a phenomenon like Edison is not very likely. The profound change of conditions and the ever increasing necessity of theoretical training would seem to make it impossible. He will occupy a unique and exalted position in the history of his native land, which might well be proud of his great genius and undying achievements in the interest of humanity.'''

'''Think of it, a great mechanical eye, created of finest tempered steel, endowed with electric power and seeing to all parts of the earth''' "Science, in the person of Nikola Tesla announces it as a realized achievement. It affords a fantastic picture, a superb imaginative flight for the mechanical 💊rb will follow in principle the exquisite and flawless construction of the human eye.

Tesla, the creator,
is a Nobel prize winner 😆 and the man who harnessed Niagara Falls. He describes his all-seeing eye as follows:"

'''Suffice to say that the destructive invention will go through space with a speed of 300 miles a second, a manless airship without pr💊pelling engine or wings, sent by *electricity* to any desired point on the globe on their errands of destruction, if destruction their deep state remote operator wishes to effect.'''

Such a machine, sustained and propelled entirely by *reaction*, is shown on page 108 and is supposed to be controlled either 'mechanically' or by "wireless energy".

'''It is not the time,''' said Dr. Tesla yesterday, '''to go into the details of this thing. It is founded on a principle that means great things in peace; it can be used for great things in war.


But I repeat,


this is no time to talk of such things.'''

'''These experiments, I remember, were made in St. Louis. There was a hall with 6,000 or 7,000 people. When I explained how I had shown a phosphorescent bulb to Lord Kelvin in England, and told them that the bulb was going to spring into light, and the current was turned on and it did burst into light, there was a stampede in the to upper galleries and they all rushed out. They thought it was some part of the devil's work, and ran out. That was the way my experiments were received.'''

'''Since prohibition was enacted I have not touched a drop, and long before that I gave up all other stimulants. I gave up alcohol, in spite of the fact that it was beneficial to me, in obedience to the law, and I find that I cannot now return to it. I had previously expected to live 160 years. Now that I have given up alcohol, I have reduced my expectancy of life to 135 years.'''

'''I walk never less than ten miles a day. This has kept me in good health, but it may in the end lead to my destruction, because I am a confirmed jay-walker.'''

''' What has amused me still more, however, is the curious interview with Lewis Nixon, the naval contractor, printed in The World of the 11th inst. Is it possible that the famous designer of the Oregon is not better versed in editorial matters than some of my farming neighbors of Shoreham? One cannot escape that conviction.
 
We are not in the dark as regards the electrical energy contained in the earth. It is altogether too insignificant for any industrial use. The current circulating through the globe is of enormous volume but of small tension, and could perform but little work. Beside, how does Nixon propose to coax the current from the natural path of low resistance into an artificial channel of high resistance? Surely he knows that water does not flow up hill. It is absurd of him to compare the inexhaustible dynamic energy of wind with the magnetic energy of the earth, which is minute in amount and in a static condition.'''

The history of science shows that theories are perishable. With every new truth that is revealed we get a better understanding of Nature and our conceptions and views are modified. Dr. Hertz did not discover a new principle. He merely gave material support to a hypothesis which had been long ago formulated. It was a perfectly well-established fact that a circuit, traversed by a periodic current, emitted some kind of space waves, but we were in ignorance as to their character. He apparently gave an experimental proof that they were transversal vibrations in the ether. Most people look upon this as his great accomplishment. To my mind it seems that his immortal merit was not so much in this as in the focusing of the investigators’ attention on the processes taking place in the ambient medium. The Hertz-wave theory, by its fascinating hold on the imagination, has stifled creative effort in the wireless art and retarded it for twenty-five years. But, on the other hand, it is impossible to over-estimate the beneficial effects of the powerful stimulus it has given in many directions.




As regards signaling without wires, the application of these radiations for the purpose was quite obvious. When Dr. Hertz was asked whether such a system would be of practical value, he did not think so, and he was correct in his forecast. The best that might have been expected was a method of communication similar to the heliographic and subject to the same or even greater limitations.


In the spring of 1891 I gave my demonstrations with a high frequency machine before the American Institute of Electrical Engineers at Columbia College, which laid the foundation to a new and far more promising departure. Altho the laws of electrical resonance were well known at that time and my lamented friend, Dr. John Hopkinson, had even indicated their specific application to an alternator in the Proceedings of the Institute of Electrical Engineers, London, Nov. 13, 1889, nothing had been done towards the practical use of this knowledge and it is probable that those experiments of mine were the first public exhibition with resonant circuits, more particularly of high frequency. While the spontaneous success of my lecture was due to spectacular features, its chief import was in showing that all kinds of devices could be operated thru a single wire without return. This was the initial step in the evolution of my wireless system. The idea presented itself to me that it might be possible, under observance of proper conditions of resonance, to transmit electric energy thru the earth, thus dispensing with all artificial conductors. Anyone who might wish to examine impartially the merit of that early suggestion must not view it in the light of present day science.

The fascination of the electro-magnetic theory of light, advanced by Maxwell and subsequently experimentally investigated by Hertz, was so great that even now, although controverted, the scientific minds are under its sway. This theory supposed the existence of a medium which was solid, yet permitted bodies to pass through it without resistance; tenuous beyond conception, and yet, according to some, one thousand times denser than platinum. 




According to our conceptions of mechanical principles and ages of experience, such a medium was absolutely impossible. Nevertheless, light was considered essentially a phenomenon bound up in that kind of a medium; namely, one capable of transmitting transverse vibrations like a solid


The Hertz wave theory of wireless transmission may be kept up for a while, but I do not hesitate to say that in a short time it will be recognized as one of the most remarkable and inexplicable aberrations of the scientific mind which has ever been recorded in history.

These examples are cited merely to give an idea of the possibilities of this great scientific advance, which annihilates distance and makes that perfect natural conductor, the Earth, available for all the innumerable purposes which human ingenuity has found for a line-wire. One far-reaching result of this is that any device capable of being operated thru one or more wires (at a distance obviously restricted) can likewise be actuated, without artificial conductors and with the same facility and accuracy, at distances to which there are no limits other than those imposed by the physical dimensions of the Globe. Thus, not only will entirely new fields for commercial exploitation be opened up by this ideal method of transmission but the old ones vastly extended.




In his patent No. 787,412, filed May 16, 1900, Tesla showed that the current of his transmitter passed over the earth’s surface with a speed of 1.5719715270396, or 48805/31047 


— fifty-seven per cent. greater than that of the so-called Hertz waves — which should propagate with the velocity of light if they exist —

while radio waves proceed with the velocity of light. Tesla holds, however, that our present “radio” waves are not true Hertzian waves, but really sound waves.




I can invite any expert to perform an experiment such as is illustrated in Fig. 15, which shows the classical Hertz oscillator and my grounded transmitting circuit. It is a fact which I have demonstrated that, altho we may have in the Hertz oscillator an activity thousands of times greater, the effect on the receiver is not to be compared to that of the grounded circuit. This shows that in the transmission from an airplane we are merely working thru a condenser, the capacity of which is a function of a logarithmic ratio between the length of the conductor and the distance from the ground. The receiver is affected in exactly the same manner as from an ordinary transmitter, the only difference being that there is a certain modification of the action which can be predetermined from the electrical constants. It is not at all difficult to maintain communication between an airplane and a station on the ground, on the contrary, the feat is very easy.


First. The earth's diameter passing through the pole should be an odd multiple of the quarter wave length—that is, of the ratio between the velocity of light—and four times the frequency of the currents.

Second. It is necessary to employ oscillations in which the rate of radiation of energy into space in the form of hertzian or electro-magnetic waves is very small. To give an idea, I would say that the frequency should be smaller than twenty thousand per second, though shorter waves might be practicable. The lowest frequency would appear to be six per second, in which case there will be but one node, at or near the ground-plate, and, paradoxical as it may seem, the effect will increase with the distance and will be greatest in a region diametrically opposite the transmitter. 




When the capacity C becomes commensurate to that of the earth, X approximates L, in other words, the node is close to the ground connection. The exact determination of its position is very important in the calculation of certain terrestrial electrical and geodetic data and I have devised special means with this purpose in view.


With oscillations still slower the earth, strictly speaking, will not resonate, but simply act as a capacity, and the variation of potential will be more or less uniform over its entire surface.

Third. The most essential requirement is, however, that irrespective of frequency the wave or wave-train should continue for a certain interval of time, which I have estimated to be not less than one-twelfth or probably 0.08484 of a second and which is taken in passing to and returning from the region diametrically opposite the pole over the earth's surface with a mean velocity of about four hundred and seventy-one thousand two hundred and forty kilometers per second.




The same constant was found by the noted American astronomer, Capt. J. T. T. See, in his mathematical investigations, for the smallest particles of the ether which he fittingly designates as “etherons.” But while in the light of his theory this speed is a physical reality, the spread of the currents at the terrestrial surface is much like the passage of the moon’s shadow over the globe.


The presence of the stationary waves may be detected in many ways. For instance, a circuit may be connected directly or inductively to the ground and to an elevated terminal and tuned to respond more effectively to the oscillations. Another way is to connect a tuned circuit to the ground at two points lying more or less in a meridian passing through the pole E' or, generally stated, to any two points of a different potential.

Thus at a, a circuit comprising an inductance and capacity is resonantly excited in the transverse, and at b, in the longitudinal sense. At c, energy is collected in a circuit parallel to the conductor but not in contact with it, and again at d, in a circuit which is partly sunk into the conductor and may be, or not, electrically connected to the same. It is important to keep these typical dispositions in mind, for however the distant actions of the oscillator might be modified thru the immense extent of the globe the principles involved are the same.




The actions at a distance cannot be proportionate to the height of the antenna and the current in the same. I shall endeavor to make this clear by reference to diagram in Fig. 14. The elevated terminal charged to a high potential induces an equal and opposite charge in the earth and there are thus Q lines giving an average current I = 4Qn which circulates locally and is useless except that it adds to the momentum. A relatively small number of lines q however, go off to great distance and to these corresponds a mean current of ie = 4qn to which is due the action at a distance. The total average current in the antenna is thus Im = 4Qn + 4qn and its intensity is no criterion for the performance. The electric efficiency of the antenna is q / Q+q and this is often a very small fraction.


Dr. L. W. Austin and Mr. J. L. Hogan have made quantitative measurements which are valuable, but far from supporting the Hertz wave theory they are evidences in disproval of the same, as will be easily perceived by taking the above facts into consideration. Dr. Austin’s researches are especially useful and instructive and I regret that I cannot agree with him on this subject. I do not think that if his receiver was affected by Hertz waves he could ever establish such relations as he has found, but he would be likely to reach these results if the Hertz waves were in a large part eliminated. At great distance the space waves and the current waves are of equal energy, the former being merely an accompanying manifestation of the latter in accordance with the fundamental teachings of Maxwell.

In a more restricted meaning this wireless transmitter is one in which the Hertz-wave radiation is an entirely negligible quantity as compared with the whole energy, under which condition the damping factor is extremely small and an enormous charge is stored in the elevated capacity. Such a circuit may then be excited with impulses of any kind, even of low frequency and it will yield sinusoidal and continuous oscillations like those of an alternator.




Taken in the narrowest significance of the term, however, it is a resonant transformer which, besides possessing these qualities, is accurately proportioned to fit the globe and its electrical constants and properties, by virtue of which design it becomes highly efficient and effective in the wireless transmission of energy. Distance is then absolutely eliminated, there being no diminution in the intensity of the transmitted impulses. It is even possible to make the actions 𝒊𝒏𝒄𝒓𝒆𝒂𝒔𝒆 𝒘𝒊𝒕𝒉 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒅𝒊𝒔𝒕𝒂𝒏𝒄𝒆 𝒇𝒓𝒐𝒎 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒑𝒍𝒂𝒏𝒕 according to an exact mathematical law.


He informs me, further, that he knows of speeds several times greater than that of light, and that he has designed apparatus with which be expects to project so-called electrons with a speed equal to twice that of light.

When I close my eyes I invariably observe first, a background of very dark and uniform blue, not unlike the sky on a clear but starless night. In a few seconds this field becomes animated with innumerable scintillating flakes of green, arranged in several layers and advancing towards me. Then there appears, to the right, a beautiful pattern of two systems of parallel and closely spaced lines, at right angles to one another, in all sorts of colors with yellow-green, and gold predominating. Immediately thereafter the lines grow brighter and the whole is thickly sprinkled with dots of twinkling light. This picture moves slowly across the field of vision and in about ten seconds vanishes to the left, leaving behind a ground of rather unpleasant and inert grey which quickly gives way to a billowy sea of clouds, seemingly trying to mould themselves in living shapes. It is curious that I cannot project a form into this grey until the second phase is reached.




Coming from so eminent a source, the statement should be given due consideration. After all, abstract mathematics is one thing, and actual experimentation is another. Not so many years ago, one of the world’s greatest scientists of the time proved mathematically that it is impossible to fly a heavier-than-air machine. Yet we are flying plenty of airplanes today.

'''My peace beam projects particles which may be relatively (It is important to devise a thoroughly practical and simple means for supplying particles and I have invented two which seem to meet this requirement.) large or of microscopic dimensions'''

'''I think that as much as one-billionth of a micron can be attained. What may be accomplished by means of such vacua is a matter of conjecture, but it is obvious that they will make possible the production of much more intense effects in electron tubes.

My ideas regarding the electron are at variance with those generally entertained.

I hold that it is a relatively large body carrying a surface charge and not an elementary unit.

When such an electron leaves an electrode of extremely high potential and in very high vacuum, it carries an electrostatic charge many times greater than the normal.

This may astonish some of those who think that the particle has the same charge in the tube and outside of it in the air.'''

'''In my attempts with an effective 20 million volts, electrons carried 40 times more electricity than normally and penetrated two meters in depth and terrible damage in a moment each. I have to finish because that I give you a fresh view.'''

'''A different kind of energy than is commonly employed must be used, however, he said, explaining further that '''you must realize it travels through a channel of less than one-half of one-millionth of a centimeter.'''

'''There will not be any light, electrical energy will deliver particles through space with the speed of 118,837,370,000 centimeters per second.'''

'''This is 3.94579 the speed of light.'''

'''Particles are practical with neutrons, because, they are 3.723 times lighter than electricity or electrons that cannot penetrate space for great distances.'''

The point of energy could be aimed at the moon and '''we very easily could see the effects, see the splash and the volatilization of matter.''' He also pictured the possibility of advanced thinkers living on other planets and also experimenting in this field, but mistaking the Tesla energy rays for some form of cosmic rays.

In the center of a large thin circle of observers stood the imposing figure of Tesla, wearing a crown of two pigeons on his head

'''This discovery of mine will be remembered when everything else I have done, is covered with dust.'''

'''I would not be surprised at all if an experiment to transmit thousands of horsepower to the moon by this new method were made in a few years from now. We must establish transmission of power in all its innumerable applications.'''

'''Sufficient energy, he said, could be transmitted to render a small spot on its surface incandescent so that it could be easily observed from the earth.'''

'''This wonderful feature will make it possible, among other things, to achieve undreamed-of results in television, for there will be almost no limit to the intensity of illumination, the size of the picture, or distance of projection.'''

'''In rocket-propelled machines… it will be practicable to attain [hypersonic] speeds of nearly 1️ [weeeaaaakkkk] mile a second (3600 m.p.h.) through the rarefied medium above the stratosphere'''

'''I do not say that there may not be several destructive wars before the world accepts my gift. I may not live to see its acceptance. But I am convinced that a century from now every nation will render itself immune from attack by my device or by a device based upon a similar principle.'''

'''In addition to the value of this engine for destruction in time of war, Dr. Tesla said it could be utilized in peace for the transmission of power. He had not developed ideas for receiving apparatus capable of transforming the destructive beam into work units, but considered this merely a matter of detail. 

No suggestion was made of what might happen if an enemy power obtained possession of one of these receiving outfits, and when attacked by the destructive beam simply put the received energy to work in factories manufacturing munitions or uniforms [or printing money].'''





"This text has been entered by John R.H. Penner from a small booklet found in a used bookstore for $2.5 
It seems that some of the sentences, appearing in The Strange Life of Nikola Tesla, have been left out from My Inventions IIIIII. And vice versa, some of the sentences have been added to My Inventions VI"

Early one morning he called his favorite messenger boy, Kerrigan, gave him a sealed envelope, and ordered him to deliver it as quickly as possible. It was addressed to "Mr. Samuel Clemens, 35 South Fifth Ave., New York City."

Kerrigan returned in a short time with the statement that he could not deliver the message because the address was incorrect. There is no such street as South Fifth Ave., the boy reported; and in the neighborhood of that number on Fifth Ave. no one by the name of Clemens could be located.

Tesla became annoyed. He told Kerrigan: '''Mr. Clemens is a very famous author who writes under the name Mark Twain, and you should have no trouble locating him at the address I gave you. He lives there.'''

Kerrigan reported to the manager of his office and told him of his difficulty. The manager told him: "Of course you couldn't find South Fifth Avenue. Its name was changed to West Broadway years ago, and you won't be able to deliver a message to Mark Twain because he has been dead for twenty-five years."

Kerrigan returned to his office. The envelope, not too well sealed, was opened in the hope it would give some clue as to how the message could be delivered, The envelope contained a blank sheet of paper wrapped around
— twenty $5 bills! —
When Kerrigan tried to return the money, Tesla told him,
— with great annoyance, —
either to deliver the money or keep it.



    Sometime around the 1907 financial panic:
Nikola Tesla "tears up" his $ 2.5 per horsepower royalty contract with Westinghouse and receives instead a one time payment of $ 216,000 ($7,072,598.30 '23).

'''This is a transmission of energy exactly as I illustrated in my experimental lectures in which one end of a wire is connected to an electric generator of high potential, its other end being free. In this case the generator is represented by the sun and the wire by the conducting air.

'''The passage of the solar current involves the transference of electric charges from particle to particle with the speed of light, thus resulting in the production of extremely short and penetrating waves.'''

'''the display of high potential must occur on the free end of the terrestrial wire, that is to say, on the side turned away from the sun. The current from the latter is supplied at a pressure of about 216 billion volts and there is a difference of 2 billion volts between the illuminated and the dark side of the globe. The energy of this current is so great that it readily accounts for the aurora and other phenomena observed in the atmosphere and at the earth's surface.'''

'''The kinetic and potential energy of a body is the result of motion and determined by the product of its mass and the square of velocity. Let the mass be reduced, the energy is diminished in the same proportion. If it be reduced to zero the energy is likewise zero for any finite velocity. In other words, it is absolutely impossible to convert mass into energy. IT WOULD BE DIFFERENT IF there were forces in nature capable of imparting to a mass infinite velocity. THEN the product of zero mass with the square of infinite velocity would represent infinite energy.'''

'''For the time being I must content myself with the announcement of the salient facts, but in due course I expect to be able to give more or less accurate technical data relating to all particulars of this discovery.'''



'''No matter where I was, that pigeon would find me; when I wanted her I had only to wish and call her and she would come flying to me. She understood me and I understood her.'''

'''I loved that pigeon.'''

'''Then one night as I was lying in my bed in the dark, solving problems, as usual, she flew in through the open window and stood on my desk. I knew she wanted me; she wanted to tell me something important so I got up and went to her. As I looked at her I knew she wanted to tell me—she was dying. And then, as I got her message, there came a light from her eyes—powerful beams of light.'''

'''This would be of inestimable consequence on all human relations but the idea can not be realized until some way is found to lay bare the retina. Continued reflections on this subject led me to evolve apparatus for transmitting instantaneously true vision without any moving devices, and in 1900 I had already solved three of the problems which confronted me, namely: to individualize and isolate a very great number of channels or “nerves”; to convey to the receiving apparatus energy in sufficient amount, and, to make the vision of the moving images independent of distance. Eventually also I hope to overcome the shortcomings of the solar panel by a different device.'''


'''Yes,''' he continued, again answering an unasked question, '''it was a real light, a powerful, dazzling, blinding light, a light more intense than I had ever produced by the most powerful lamps in my laboratory.'''


'''I have been feeding pigeons, thousands of them, for years; thousands of them, for who can tell — '''


"It was a homing pigeon with a leg band reading: “I. F. 34 N. U. 1286,” and it seemed to have just got in after a long hard flight. It was caught and shut in a bathroom until its legband could be deciphered."

"After looking over the bird, Dr. Tesla decided that it wasn't sick but hungry and a little upset by having gorged itself, for want of anything more edible, on snow. He decided to keep it anyway."


"The archive of Nikola Tesla Museum in Belgrade keeps about 2500 her letters and different papers she wrote to him very often, almost every day. She exchanged letters with Tesla between 1891 and 1942"

"she had very unreadable handwriting"

"There are no copies of his letters to her"


'''Television, as conceived by me in 1893, will be another valuable and timely application. At that time I advanced the idea that the formation of a clear mental image of external objects is accompanied by a re Lex action on the retina, making it possible to read thoughts and even to project the images conceived on a screen and render them visible to an audience. This would be of inestimable consequence on all human relations but the idea can not be realized until some way is found to lay bare the retina. Continued reflections on this subject led me to evolve apparatus for transmitting instantaneously true vision without any moving devices, and in 1900 I had already solved three of the problems which confronted me, namely: to individualize and isolate a very great number of channels or '''nerves'''; to convey to the receiving apparatus energy in sufficient amount, and, to make the vision of the moving images independent of distance.'''

'''As early as 1898 I proposed to representatives of a large manufacturing concern the construction and public exhibition of an automobile carriage which, left to itself, would perform a great variety of operations involving something akin to judgment. But my proposal was deemed chimerical at that time and nothing came from it.'''

'''What I said in regard to the greatest achievement of the man of science whose mind is bent upon the mastery of the physical universe, was nothing more than what I stated in one of my unpublished addresses, from which I quote: '''According to an adopted theory, every ponderable atom is differentiated from a tenuous fluid, filling all space merely by spinning motion, as a whirl of water in a calm lake. By being set in movement this fluid, the ether, becomes gross matter. Its movement arrested, the primary substance reverts to its normal state. It appears, then, possible for man through harnessed energy of the medium and suitable agencies for starting and stopping ether whirls to cause matter to form and disappear. At his command, almost without effort on his part, old worlds would vanish and new ones would spring into being. He could alter the size of this planet, control its seasons, adjust its distance from the sun, guide it on its eternal journey along any path he might choose, through the depths of the universe. He could make planets collide and produce his suns and stars, his heat and light; he could originate life in all its infinite forms. To cause at will the birth and death of matter would be man's grandest deed, which would give him the mastery of physical creation, make him fulfill his ultimate destiny.''''''


Stationary waves discovered by me years ago are the means for determining longitude and latitude by wireless. But it may be years before they will be successfully utilized.

The people about there, had they been awake instead of asleep, at other times would have seen even stranger things.

all the details of the fall of the meteorite should be ascribed to the overactive imagination of impressionable people

When thus excited there are formed on the surface stationary parallel circles, with their planes at right angles to the axis of the earth.




'''I actually constructed '''robots.''' Today the robot is an accepted fact, but the principle has not been pushed far enough.'''

'''Why I could make an automaton in the shape of a man that could walk, move, perform all the motions of a man, except wherein the fact of it not being an organic being  would  make a difference. All this theory is developed from my idea that the actions of all inanimate beings are governed by impressions from outside objects received upon the eye.'''

'''As he enters his seventy-eighth year, Dr. Tesla confided that he has three projects which he is working on, on the side, as a sort of relief from concentration on his power idea. One is to produce a type of radio transmission which will permit an individual wave-length for everyone of the 160,000,000 persons in the United States, thus bringing about private radio telephony; second, a discovery which will revolutionize the science of metallurgy; and third, a project to remake the face of society by exposing the inmost thoughts of the human brain through photographing the retina of the eye by invisible rays. The idea is that all concepts, in the last analysis, are visual and are photographed on the retina while the thot is held. No one could lie or deceive if this invention came into use.''' [Of course those pants don't make you look fat honey]



'''Unfortunately, it is true, that cunning lawbreakers will avail themselves of such advantages to further their nefarious business.'''



'''I expect to photograph thoughts,''' announced Mr. Tesla calmly, in the same tone of voice that a person occupied with some trivial things in the scheme of life might announce that it was going to rain.

Continued Mr. Tesla: '''In 1893, while engaged in certain investigations, I became convinced that a definite image formed in thought must, by reflex action, produce a corresponding image on the retina, which might possibly be read by suitable apparatus. This brought me to my system of television, which I announced at that time.'''

'''My idea was to employ an artificial retina receiving the image of the object seen, an 'optic nerve' and another such retina at the place of reproduction. These two retinas were to be constructed after the fashion of a checkerboard with many separate little sections, and the so-called optic nerve was nothing more than a part of the earth.

An invention of mine enables me to transmit simultaneously, and without any interference whatsoever, hundreds of thousands of distinct impulses through the ground just as though I had so many separate wires. I did not contemplate using any moving part - a scanning apparatus or a cathodic ray, which is a sort of moving device, the use of which I suggested in one of my lectures.

Now if it be true that a thought reflects an image on the retina, it is a mere question of illuminating the same property and taking photographs, and then using the ordinary methods which are available to project the image on a screen.

If this can be done successfully, then the objects imagined by a person would be clearly reflected on the screen as they are formed, and in this way every thought of the individual could be read. Our minds would then, indeed, be like open books.'''




"You know, it's a very good thing that the Institute is honoring Tesla in this way—it will go a long way toward diminishing his reputation for voyeurism which was embarrassing to the older members. The stories of Tesla's sexual episodes were at one time the talk of the Institute, and we didn't know how to deal with it if the matter should somehow become publicized. You must be aware, of course, that he never went out with women. . . . Anyway, the older members of the Institute are dying off so those stories will also die out eventually"




'''Content will be flashed across limitless spaces by my system. The same energy will drive airplanes and dirigibles from one central base.'''


'''Not a few technical men, very able in their special departments, but dominated by a pedantic spirit and nearsighted, have asserted that excepting the induction motor I have given to the world little of practical use.

This is a grievous mistake.

A new idea must not be judged by its immediate results.

My alternating system of power transmission came at a psychological moment, as a long-sought answer to pressing industrial questions, and altho considerable resistance had to be overcome and opposing interests reconciled, as usual, the commercial introduction could not be long delayed.'''


'''Distance is then absolutely eliminated, there being no diminution in the intensity of the transmitted impulses. It is even possible to make the actions increase with the distance from the plant according to an exact mathematical law.'''


'''My project was retarded by laws of nature. The world was not prepared for it. It was too far ahead of time. But the same laws will prevail in the end and make it a triumphal success.'''


'''Waves Go Around World. As the general knowledge of this subject seems very limited, I may state, that even waves only one or two millimeters long, which I produced thirty-three years ago, provided that they carry sufficient energy, can be transmitted around the globe.

This is not so much due to refraction and reflection as to the properties of a gaseous medium and certain peculiar action, which I shall explain some time in the future.'''


'''On a body as large as the sun, it would be impossible to project a disturbance of this kind to any considerable distance except along the surface.

It might be inferred that I am alluding to the curvature of space supposed to exist according to the teachings of relativity, but nothing could be further from my mind. I hold that space cannot be curved, for the simple reason that it can have no properties. It might as well be said that God has properties.  He has not, but only attributes and these are of our own making. Of properties we can only speak when dealing with matter filling the space. To say that in the presence of large bodies space becomes curved, is equivalent to stating that something can act upon nothing.  I, for one, refuse to subscribe to such a view.'''

'''The fascination of the electro-magnetic theory of light, advanced by Maxwell and subsequently experimentally investigated by Hertz, was so great that even now, although controverted, the scientific minds are under its sway. This theory supposed the existence of a medium which was solid, yet permitted bodies to pass through it without resistance; tenuous beyond conception, and yet, according to some, one thousand times denser than platinum.

According to our conceptions of mechanical principles and ages of experience, such a medium was absolutely impossible. Nevertheless, light was considered essentially a phenomenon bound up in that kind of a medium; namely, one capable of transmitting transverse vibrations like a solid.'''


'''But if light would not propagate in accordance with the law mentioned, but in conformity with any other law which we might presently conceive, whereby not only the image might not bear any likeness to the object seen, but even the images of the same object at different times or distances might not resemble each other, then our knowledge of form would be very defective, for then we might see, for example, a three-cornered figure as a six or twelve-cornered one'''


'''Granting a semblance of reality to this fantastic idea, it is still self-contradictory. Every action is accompanied by an equivalent reaction and the effects of the latter are directly opposite to those of the former. Supposing that the bodies act upon the surrounding space causing curvature of the same, it appears to my simple mind that the curved spaces must react on the bodies and, producing the opposite effects, straighten out the curves, Since action and reaction are coexistent, it follows that the supposed curvature of space is entirely impossible. But even if it existed it would not explain the motions of the bodies as observed. Only the existence of a field of force can account for them and its assumption dispenses with space curvature. All literature on this subject is futile and destined to oblivion. So are also all attempts to explain the workings of the universe without recognizing the existence of the ether and the indispensable function it plays in the phenomena.'''

'''This called for a prolonged investigation which culminated in my finding that the sun’s potential was 216 billions of volts and that all such large and hot heavenly bodies emit cosmic rays. Through further solar research and observation of Novae this has been proved conclusively, and to deny it would be like denying the light and heat of the sun. Nevertheless, there are still some doubters who prefer to shroud the cosmic rays in deep mystery. I am sure that this is not true for there is no place where such a process occurs in this or any other universe beyond our understanding.'''


'''the intensity of the so-called cosmic rays must be greatest in the zenithal portion of atmosphere'''


'''There is no constellation or nebula, no sun or planet, in all the depths of limitless space, no passing wanderer of the starry heaven, that does not exercise some control over its destiny — not in the vague and delusive sense of astrology, but in the rigid and positive meaning of physical science.'''


'''Though free to think and act, we are held together, like the stars in the firmament, with ties inseparable. These ties cannot be seen, but we can feel them.'''


'''The first impressions are those to which we cling most in later life. I like to think of George Westinghouse as he appeared to me in 1888, when I saw him for the first time. The tremendous potential energy of the man had only in part taken kinetic form, but even to a superficial observer the latent force was manifest.'''


'''To increase the human energy is, therefore, equivalent to increasing this product, and there are, as will readily be seen, only three ways possible to attain this result'''



'''The year 2100 will see


'''Progress along such lines will be impossible while nations persist in the savage practice of killing each other off


'''It is idle to believe that because man is endowed with higher attributes his material evolution is governed by other than general physical laws. If the genius of invention were to reveal to-morrow the secret of immortality, of eternal beauty and youth, for which all humanity is aching, the same inexorable agents which prevent a mass from changing suddenly its velocity would likewise resist the force of the new knowledge until time gradually modifies human thought.'''



'''Didn't I tell you?''' I remarked triumphantly to my employees, and one of them said, "You are amazing, Mr. Tesla; everything comes out exactly as you predict." As soon as these hard-headed men were seated I, of course, immediately began to extol the wonderful features of my turbine, when the spokesmen interrupted me and said, 'We know all about this, but we are on a special errand. We have formed a psychological society for the investigation of psychic phenomena and we want you to join us in this undertaking.' I suppose those engineers never knew how near they came to being fired out of my office.



"Nikola Tesla, approaching his 84th birthday, has been spending almost all of his time in his apartment, so much of it, in fact, that he has had to hire messenger boys to go into the parks to feed the pigeons. Tesla, the fabulous electrical wizard, used to feed the pigeons religiously himself, but age and mysterious experiments with sound waves purportedly for the army have combined to confine him to his rooms."
 
 
"Dr. Nikola Tesla, inventor, will be 85 years old today. However, at his room in the Hotel New Yorker he said yesterday he had decided to postpone the celebration—and the interview  that  traditionally accompanied it — until

'''later''' "


'''After all, they have called me a lunatic before,''' said Dr. Tesla. '''What is one more time?'''


'''As though I am poor with words.'''


'''Nikola Tesla, Stop in New York but heart is at Niagara.'''



———————————————————————————————————————————
       </a sh😑rt (mostly) Nikola
       Tesla (supercut) foreword>
———————————————————————————————————————————





———————————————————————————————————————————
 •Coming soon never in boxset to a boarded
   up bookstore near you!

 •See the excitement coming!!!
  
 •click *HERE* for the categorizable
   version with pictures and with built
   in word index & search!
 
 •click *HERE* for the bonus installment
  'Tesla Lingo for Dummies, a Modern Guide
   to Archaic Terminology & Humor'
———————————————————————————————————————————


















 📷 Portrait of Teslas favorite Pigeon 📷



















 

              ——————————————
              🚧 <start> 🚧
              ——————————————





    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘8️⃣5️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '85
__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
ELECTRIC ARC LAMP
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Mar 30th, 1885 (#1/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 160,574
Grnt- Feb 9th, 1886 (#2/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 335,786

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
COMMUTATOR FOR DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINES
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 6th, 1885 (#2/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 164,534
Grnt- Jan 26th, 1886 (#1/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 334,823

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
REGULATOR FOR DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINES
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 18th, 1885 (#3/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 165,793
Grnt- Mar 2nd, 1886 (#4/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 336,961

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
REGULATOR FOR DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINES
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Jun 1st, 1885 (#4/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 167,136
Grnt- Mar 2nd, 1886 (#5/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 336,962

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
ELECTRIC ARC LAMP
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Jul 13th, 1885 (#5/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 171,416
Grnt- Feb 9th, 1886 (#3/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 335,787

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘8️⃣6️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '86
__________________

🧙®🇬🇧
IMPROVEMENTS IN ELECTRIC LAMPS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Feb 9th, 1886 (#n/n gb) (#n/n ww)
App#- xxx
Grnt- xxx (1n/29 gb) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- GB 1877

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINE
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Jan 14th, 1886 (#6/144 us) (#n/n ww)
Rnw-- Dec 1st, 1886
App#- 188,538
Rnw#- 188,540
Amn#- 220,370
Grnt- Mar 22nd, 1887 (#7/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 359,748

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
REGULATOR FOR DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINES
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Jan 14th, 1886 (#7/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 188,539
Grnt- Oct 19th, 1886 (#6/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 350,954

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇬🇧
IMPROVEMENTS IN DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINES
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Mar 2nd, 1886 (#n/n gb) (#n/n ww)
App#- xxx
Grnt- xxx (#2/29 gb) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- GB 2975

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
THERMO MAGNETIC MOTOR
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Mar 30th, 1886 (#8/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 197,115
Grnt- Jan 15th, 1889 (#21/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 396,121

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇨🇦
DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINE
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Apr 27th, 1886 (#1/n ca) (#n/n ww)
App#- ???
Grnt- ???Oct 5th, 1886????[model called for] (#n/7 ca) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- CA 24033

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇨🇦
THERMO MAGNETIC MOTOR
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Jun 18th, 1886 (#2/n ca) (#n/n ww)
App#- ???
Grnt- ??? (#n/7 ca) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- CA 24348

__________________







__________________

——————————————
📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA ELECTRIC LIGHT COMPANY
by⠀
Electrical Review (New York)
August 14th, 1886 Page number(s): 1 (cover)
Vol. VIII - Mar 6 to Aug 28 - No. 24

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘8️⃣7️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '87
__________________

📰🧙📰
ELECTRICITY
[a.k.a. "ELECTRICITY - DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINES"]
by Nikola Tesla
Industries
🐇 April 1st, 1887 Page number(s): 337


'''𝗗𝗬𝗡𝗔𝗠𝗢 𝗘𝗟𝗘𝗖𝗧𝗥𝗜𝗖 𝗠𝗔𝗖𝗛𝗜𝗡𝗘𝗦—𝘕. 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢, 𝘙𝘢𝘩𝘸𝘢𝘺, 𝘕𝘦𝘸 𝘑𝘦𝘳𝘴𝘦𝘺, 𝘜.𝘚.𝘈.—The object of this invention is to provide an improved method for regulating the current of dynamo electric machines. A¹ and B¹ are the brushes of the main circuit, and C an auxiliary brush. The working circuits D extends from the brushes A¹ and B¹, and contains electric lamps in series or in multiple arc. M M¹ represent the field helices, the ends of which are connected to the main brushes. The shunt wire C¹ extends from the auxiliary brush C to the intermediate point X in the circuit of the field helices. H represents the commutator with the plates of ordinary construction. A current will flow over the auxiliary brush, to or from the commutator, according to the relative position of the brushes. If, for instance, the commutator


space between the brushes A¹ and C, when the latter is at the neutral point, is diminished, a current will flow from the point Y over the shunt C¹ to the brush B¹, thus strengthening the current in the part M¹, and partly neutralising[sic] the current in the part M; but if the space between the brushes A¹ and C is increased, the current will flow over the auxiliary brush in an opposite direction, and the current in M will be strengthened, and in M¹ partly neutralised[sic]. By combining with the brushes A¹ B¹ and C any known automatic regulating mechanism, the current developed can be regulated in proportion to the demands in the working circuit. The respective cores of the field magnet are subjected to the neutralising[sic] or intensifying effects of the current in the shunt through C¹, and the magnetism of the cores will be partially neutralised[sic] or the point of greatest magnetism shifted, so that it will be more or less remote from, or approaching to, the armature, and hence the action of the field magnets on the armature will be correspondingly varied.  Claims: (1) The combination with the commutator, having two or more main brushes and an auxiliary brush, of the field helices, having their ends connected to the main brushes, and a branch or shunt connection from an intermediate point of the field helices to the auxiliary brush, and means for varying the relative position upon the commutator of the respective brushes, as set forth; (2) the combination with the commutator and the main brushes, and one or more auxiliary brushes, of the field helices in the main circuits, and one or more shunt connections from the field helices to the auxiliary brushes, the relative positions upon the commutator of the respective brushes, being adjustable for the purpose set forth.—No. 2975.
               March 2nd, 1886.  8𝘥'''

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
COMMUTATOR FOR DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINES
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Apr 30th, 1887 (#9/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 236,711
Grnt- May 15th, 1888 (#15/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 382,845

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
PYROMAGNETO-ELECTRIC GENERATOR
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 26th, 1887 (#10/144 us) (#n/n ww)
Dvsn- May 25th, 1889
App#- 239,481
Dvs#- 312,069
Grnt- May 13th, 1890 (#35/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 428,057

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸ˣ
METHOD OF AND APPARATUS FOR GENERATING ELECTRIC CURRENTS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 26th, 1887 (#1/33 ug us)
App#- 239,481
Pat#- US Ungranted
*

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
PHENOMENA OF ALTERNATING CURRENTS
by Elihu Thomson
Scientific American Supplement
July 9th, 1887 Page number(s): 9,601-9,603

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸ˣ
ELECTRIC MOTORS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Oct 6th, 1887 (#2/33 ug us)
App#- 251,659
Pat#- Ungranted
*

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸ˣ
ELECTRIC GENERATORS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Oct 6th, 1887 (#3/33 ug us)
App#- 251,660
Pat#- US Ungranted
*

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
ELECTRO MAGNETIC MOTOR
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Oct 12th, 1887 (#11/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 252,132
Grnt- May 1st, 1888 (#8/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 381,968

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
ELECTRICAL TRANSMISSION OF POWER
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Oct 12th, 1887 (#12/144 us) (#n/n ww)
Dvsn- Mar 9th, 1888
App#- 252,132
Dvs#- 266,755
Grnt- May 1st, 1888 (#12/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 382,280

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
ELECTRO MAGNETIC MOTOR
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Nov 30th, 1887 (#13/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 256,561
Grnt- May 1st, 1888 (#11/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 382,279

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
ELECTRO MAGNETIC MOTOR
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Nov 30th, 1887 (#14/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 256,562
Grnt- May 1st, 1888 (#9/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 381,969

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
ELECTRICAL TRANSMISSION OF POWER
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Nov 30th, 1887 (#15/144 us) (#n/n ww)
Dvsn- Mar 3rd, 1888
App#- 256,562
Dvs#-- 266,756
Grnt- May 1st, 1888 (#13/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 382,281

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
SYSTEM OF ELECTRICAL DISTRIBUTION
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Dec 23rd, 1887 (#16/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 258,787
Grnt- May 1st, 1888 (#10/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 381,970

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
METHOD OF CONVERTING AND DISTRIBUTING ELECTRIC CURRENTS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Dec 23, 1887 (#17/144 us) (#n/n ww)
Dvsn- Mar 9th, 1888
App#- 258,787
Dvs#- 266,757
Grnt- May 1st, 1888 (#14/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 382,282

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘8️⃣8️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '88
__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
SYSTEM OF ELECTRICAL DISTRIBUTION
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Apr 10th, 1888 (#18/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 270,187
Grnt- Oct 2nd, 1888 (#16/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 390,413 

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINE
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Apr 23rd, 1888 (#19/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 271,626
Grnt- Oct 2nd, 1888 (#17/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 390,414

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
REGULATOR FOR ALTERNATE CURRENT MOTORS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Apr 24th, 1888 (#20/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 271,682
Grnt- Oct 9th, 1888 (#20/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 390,820

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINE
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Apr 28th, 1888 (#21/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 272,153
Grnt- Oct 9th, 1888 (#19/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 390,721

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇨🇦
SYSTEM OF ELECTRICAL TRANSMISSION OF POWER
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 1st, 1888 (#3/n ca) (#n/n ww)
App#- ???
Grnt- ??? (#n/7 ca) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- CA 29537

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇨🇦
SYSTEM OF ELECTRICAL CONVERSION AND DISTRIBUTION
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 1st, 1888 (#4/n ca) (#n/n ww)
App#- ???
Grnt- ??? (#n/7 ca) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- CA 30172

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇬🇧
IMPROVEMENTS RELATING TO THE ELECTRICAL TRANSMISSION OF POWER AND TO APPARATUS THEREFOR
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 1st, 1888 (#n/n gb) (#n/n ww)
App#- xxx
Grnt- xxx (#3/29 gb) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- GB 6481

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇬🇧
IMPROVEMENTS RELATING TO THE GENERATION AND TRANSMISSION OF ELECTRICAL CURRENTS AND APPARATUS THEREFORE
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 1st, 1888 (#n/n gb) (#n/n ww)
App#- xxx
Grnt- xxx (#4/29 gb) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- GB 6502

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
SYSTEM OF ELECTRICAL TRANSMISSION OF POWER
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 15th, 1888 (#22/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 273,992
Grnt- Dec 13th, 1892 (#51/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 487,796

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
ALTERNATING MOTOR
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 15th, 1888 (#23/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 273,993
Grnt- Feb 25th, 1896 (#65/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 555,190

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
ELECTRICAL TRANSMISSION OF POWER
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 15th, 1888 (#24/144 us) (#n/n ww)
Dvsn- Dec 3rd, 1888
App#- 273,993
Dvs#- 292,475
Grnt- Jan 2nd, 1894 (#54/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 511,915

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
DYNAMO ELECTRIC MACHINE OR MOTOR
by Nikola Tesla
App-- May 15th, 1888 (#25/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 273,994
Grnt- Oct 2nd, 1888 (#18/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 390,415

__________________







__________________

👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫
A NEW SYSTEM OF ALTERNATE CURRENT MOTORS AND TRANSFORMERS
by Nikola Tesla
Lecture before the AIEE
May 16th, 1888


'''I desire to express my thanks to Professor Anthony for the help he has given me in this matter. I would also like to express my thanks to Mr. Pope and Mr. Martin for their aid. The notice was rather short, and I have not been able to treat the subject so extensively as I could have desired, my health not being in the best condition at present. I ask your kind indulgence, and I shall be very much gratified if the little I have done meets your approval.

In the presence of the existing diversity of opinion regarding the relative merits of the alternate and continuous current systems, great importance is attached to the question whether alternate currents can be successfully utilized in the operation of motors. The transformers, with their numerous advantages, have afforded us a relatively perfect system of distribution, and although, as in all branches of the art, many improvements are desirable, comparatively little remains to be done in this direction. The transmission of power, on the contrary, has been almost entirely confined to the use of continuous currents, and notwithstanding that many efforts have been made to utilize alternate currents for this purpose, they have, up to the present, at least as far as known, failed to give the result desired. Of the various motors adapted to be used, on alternate current circuits the following have been mentioned:

1. A series motor with subdivided field.
2. An alternate current generator having its field excited by continuous currents.
3. Elihu Thomson's motor.
4. A combined alternate and continuous current motor.

Two more motors of this kind have suggested themselves to me.

1. A motor with one of its circuits in series with a transformer and the other in the secondary of the transformer.
2. A motor having its armature circuit connected to the generator and the field coils closed upon themselves.

These, however, I mention only incidentally.

The subject which I now have the pleasure of bringing to your notice is a novel system of electric distribution and transmission of power by means of alternate currents, affording peculiar advantages, particularly in the way of motors, which I am confident will at once establish the superior adaptability of these currents to the transmission of power and will show that many results heretofore unattainable can be reached by their use; results which are very much desired in the practical operation of such systems and which cannot be accomplished by means of continuous currents.

Before going into a detailed description of this system, I think it necessary to make a few remarks with reference to certain conditions existing in continuous current generators and motors, which, although generally known, are frequently disregarded.


In our dynamo machines, it is well known, we generate alternate currents which we direct by means of a commutator, a complicated device and, it may be justly said, the source of most of the troubles experienced in the operation of the machines. Now, the currents so directed cannot be utilized in the motor, but they must — again by means of a similar unreliable device — be reconverted into their original state of alternate currents. The function of the commutator is entirely external, and in no way dues it affect the internal working of the machines. In reality, therefore, all machines ace alternate current machines, the currents appearing as continuous only in the external circuit during their transit from generator to motor. In view simply of this fact, alternate currents would commend themselves as a more direct application of electrical energy, and the employment of continuous currents would only be justified if we had dynamos which would primarily generate, and motors which would be directly actuated by such currents.


Fig. 1
Fig. 1a

But the operation of the commutator on a motor is twofold; firstly, it reverses the currents through the motor, and secondly, it effects, automatically, a progressive shifting of the poles of one of its magnetic constituents. Assuming, therefore, that both of the useless operations in the system, that is to say, the directing of the alternate currents on the generator and reversing the direct currents on the motor, be eliminated, it would still be necessary, in order to cause a rotation of the motor, to produce a progressive shifting of the poles of one of its elements, and the question presented itself, — How to perform this operation by the direct action of alternate currents? I will now proceed to show how this result was accomplished.

Fig. 2
Fig. 2a

In the first experiment a drum-armature was provided with two coils at right angles to each other, and the ends of these coils were connected to two pairs of insulated contact-rings as usual. A ring was then made of thin insulated plates of sheet-iron and wound with four coils, each two opposite coils being connected together so as to produce free poles on diametrically opposite sides of the ring. The remaining free ends of the coils were then connected to the contact-rings of the generator armature so as to form two independent circuits, as indicated in figure 9. It may now be seen what results were secured in this combination, and with this view I would refer to the diagrams, figures 1 to 8a. The field of the generator being independently excited, the rotation of, the armature sets up currents in the coils C C, varying in strength and direction in the well-known manner. In the position shown in figure 1 the current in coil C is nil while coil C1 is traversed by its maximum current, and the connections my be such that the ring is magnetized by the coils c1 c1 as indicated by the letters N S in figure 1a, the magnetizing effect of the coils c c being nil, since these coils are included in the circuit of coil C.

In figure 2 the armature coils are shown in a more advanced position, one-eighth of one revolution being completed. Figure 2a illustrates the corresponding magnetic condition of the ring. At this moment the coil cl generates a current of the same direction as previously, but weaker, producing the poles n1 s1 upon the ring; the coil c also generates a current of the same direction, and the connections may be such that the coils c c produce the poles n s, as shown in figure 2a. The resulting polarity is indicated by the letters N S, and it will be observed that the poles of the ring have been shifted one-eighth of the periphery of the same.

Fig. 3
Fig. 3a

In figure 3 the armature has completed one-quarter of one revolution. In this phase the current in coil C is maximum, and of such direction as to produce the poles N S in figure 3a, whereas the current in coil C1 is nil, this coil being at its neutral position. The poles N S in figure 3a are thus shifted one-quarter of the circumference of the ring.

Figure 4 shows the coils C C in a still more advanced position, the armature having completed three-eighths of one revolution. At that moment the coil C still generates a current of the same direction as before, but of less strength, producing the comparatively weaker poles n sin figure 4a. The current in the coil C1 is of the same strength, but of opposite direction. Its effect is, therefore, to produce upon the ring the poles n1 and s1 as indicated, and a polarity, N S, results, the poles now being shifted three-eighths of the periphery of the ring.

Fig. 4
Fig. 4a

In figure 5 one-half of one revolution of the armature is completed, and the resulting magnetic condition of the ring is indicated in figure 5a. Now, the current in coil C is nil, while the coil C1 yields its maximum current, which is of the same direction as previously; the magnetizing effect is, therefore, due to the coils c1 c1 alone, and, referring to figure 5a, it will be observed that the poles N S are shifted one-half of the circumference of the ring. During the next half revolution the operations are repeated, as represented in the figures 6 to 8a.

A reference to the diagrams will make it clear that during one revolution of the armature the poles of the ring are shifted once around its periphery, and each revolution producing like effects, a rapid whirling of the poles in harmony with the rotation of the armature is the result. If the connections of either one of the circuits in the ring are reversed, the shifting of the poles is made to progress in the opposite direction, but the operation is identically the same. Instead of using four wires, with like result, three wires may be used, one forming a common return for both circuits.

Fig. 5
Fig. 5a

This rotation or whirling of the poles manifests itself in a series of curious phenomena. If a delicately pivoted disc of steel or other magnetic metal is approached to the ring it is set in rapid rotation, the direction of rotation varying with the position of the disc. For instance, noting the direction outside of the ring it will be found that inside the ring it turns in an opposite direction, while it is unaffected if placed in a position symmetrical to the ring. This is easily explained. Each time that a pole approaches it induces an opposite pole in the nearest point on the disc, and an is produced upon that point; owing to this, as the pole is shifted further away from the disc a tangential pull is exerted upon the same, and the action being constantly repeated, a more or less rapid rotation of the disc is the result. As the pull is exerted mainly upon that part which is nearest to the ring, the rotation outside and inside, or right and left, respectively, is in opposite directions, figure 9. When placed symmetrically to the ring, the pull on opposite sides of the disc being equal, no rotation results. The action is based on the magnetic inertia of the iron; for this reason a disc of hard steel is much more affected than a disc of soft iron, the latter being capable of very rapid variations of magnetism. Such a disc has proved to be a very useful instrument in all these investigations, as it has enabled me to detect any irregularity in the action. A curious effect is also produced upon iron filings. By placing some upon a paper and holding them externally quite close to the ring they are set in a vibrating motion, remaining in the same place, although the paper may be moved back and forth; but in lifting the paper to a certain height which seems to be dependent on the intensity of the poles and the speed of rotation, they are thrown away in a direction always opposite to the supposed movement of the poles. If a paper with filings is put flat upon the ring and the current turned on suddenly, the existence of a magnetic whirl may be easily observed.

Fig. 6
Fig. 6a

To demonstrate the complete analogy between the ring and a revolving magnet, a strongly energized electro-magnet was rotated by mechanical power, and phenomena identical in every particular to those mentioned above were observed.

Obviously, the rotation of the poles produces corresponding inductive effects and may be utilized to generate currents in a closed conductor placed within the influence of the poles. For this purpose it is convenient to wind a ring with two sets of superimposed coils forming respectively the primary and secondary circuits, as shown in figure 10. In order to secure the most economical results the magnetic circuit should be completely closed, and with this object in view the construction may be modified at will.

Fig. 7
Fig. 7a

The inductive effect exerted upon the secondary coils will be mainly due to the shifting or movement of the magnetic action; but there may also be currents set up in the circuits in consequence of the variations in the intensity of the poles. However, by properly designing the generator and determining the magnetizing effect of the primary calls the latter element may be made to disappear. The intensity of the poles being maintained constant, the action of the apparatus will be perfect, and the same result will be secured as though the shifting were effected by means of a commutator with an infinite number of bars. In such case the theoretical relation between the energizing effect of each set of primary coils and their resultant magnetizing effect may be expressed by the equation of a circle having its centre coinciding with that of an orthogonal system of axes, and in which the radius represents the resultant and the co-ordinates both of its components. These are then respectively the sine and cosine of the angle a between the radius and one of the axes (O X). Referring to figure 1 I, we have r2= x2 + y2; where x = r cos a, and y = r sin a.

Fig. 8
Fig. 8a

Assuming the magnetizing effect of each set of coils in the transformer to be proportional to the current — which may be admitted for weak degrees of magnetization — then x = Kc and y = Kc1, where K is a constant and c and c1 the current in both sets of coils respectively. Supposing, further, the field of the generator to be uniform, we have for constant speed c1 = K1 sin a and c = K1 sin (90° + a) = K1 cos a, where K1 is a constant. See figure 12.

Therefore, x = Kc = K K1 cos a;

y = Kc1= K K1 sin a, and

K K1 = r.

That is, for a uniform field the disposition of the two coils at right angles will secure the theoretical result, and the intensity of the shifting poles will be constant. But from r2 = x2 + y2 it follows that for y = 0, r = x; it follows that the joint magnetizing effect of both sets of coils should be equal to the effect of one set when at its maximum action. In transformers and in a certain class of motors the fluctuation of the poles is not of great importance, but in another class of these motors it is desirable to obtain the theoretical result.

In applying this principle to the construction of motors, two typical forms of motor have been developed. First, a form having a comparatively small rotary effort at the start, but maintaining a perfectly uniform speed at all loads, which motor has been termed synchronous. Second, a form possessing a great rotary effort at the start, the speed being dependent on the load.

Fig. 9

These motors may be operated in three different ways:

1. By the alternate currents of the source only.
2. By a combined action of these and of induced currents.
3. By the joint action of alternate and continuous currents.

The simplest form of a synchronous motor is obtained by winding a laminated ring provided with pole projections with four coils, and connecting the same in the manner before indicated. An iron disc having a segment cut away on each side may be used as an armature. Such a motor is shown in figure 9. The disc being arranged to rotate freely within the ring in close proximity to the projections, it is evident that as the poles are shifted it will, owing to its tendency to place itself in such a position as to embrace the greatest number of the lines of force, closely follow the movement of the poles, and its motion will be synchronous with that of the armature of the generator; that is, in the peculiar disposition shown in figure 9, in which the armature produces by one revolution two current impulses in each of the circuits. It is evident that if, by one revolution of the armature, a greater number of impulses is produced, the speed of the motor will be correspondingly increased. Considering that the attraction exerted upon the disc is greatest when the same is in close proximity to the poles, it follows that such a motor will maintain exactly the same speed at all loads within the limits of its capacity.

Fig. 10

To facilitate the starting, the disc may be provided with a coil closed upon itself. The advantage secured by such a coil is evident. On the start the currents set up in the coil strongly energize the disc and increase the attraction exerted upon the same by the ring, and currents being generated in the coil as long as the speed of the armature is inferior to that of the poles, considerable work may be performed by such a motor even if the speed be below normal. The intensity of the poles being constant, no currents will be generated in the coil when the motor is turning at its normal speed.

Instead of closing the coil upon itself, its ends may be connected to two insulated sliding rings, and a continuous current supplied to these from a suitable generator. The proper way to start such a motor is to close the coil upon itself until the normal speed is reached, or nearly so, and then turn on the continuous current. If the disc be very strongly energized by a continuous current the motor may not be able to start, but if it be weakly energized, or generally so that the magnetizing effect of the ring is preponderating it will start and reach the normal speed. Such a motor will maintain absolutely the same speed at all loads. It has also been found that if the motive power of the generator is not excessive, by checking the motor the speed of the generator is diminished in synchronism with that of the motor. It is characteristic of this form of motor that it cannot be reversed by reversing the continuous current through the coil.

Fig. 11
Fig. 12

The synchronism of these motors may be demonstrated experimentally in a variety of ways. For this purpose it is best to employ a motor' consisting of a stationary field magnet and an armature arranged to rotate within the same, as indicated in figure 13. In this case the shifting of the poles of the armature produces a rotation of the latter in the opposite direction. It results therefrom that when the normal speed is reached, the poles of the armature assume fixed positions relatively to the field magnet and the same is magnetized by induction, exhibiting a distinct pole on each of the pole-pieces. If a piece of soft iron is approached to the field magnet it will at the start be attracted with a rapid vibrating motion produced by the reversals of polarity of the' magnet, but as the speed of the armature increases, the vibrations become less and less frequent and finally entirely cease. Then the iron is weakly but permanently attracted, showing that the synchronism is reached and the field magnet energized by induction.

The disc may also be used for the experiment. If held quite close to the armature it will turn as long as the speed of rotation of the poles exceeds that of the armature; but when the normal speed is reached, or very nearly so, it ceases to rotate and is permanently attracted.

A crude but illustrative experiment is made with an incandescent lamp. Placing the lamp in circuit with the continuous current generator, and in series with the magnet coil, rapid fluctuations are observed in the light in consequence of the induced currents set up in the coil at the start; the speed increasing, the fluctuations occur at longer intervals, until they entirely disappear, showing that the motor has attained its normal speed.

A telephone receiver affords a most sensitive instrument; when connected to any circuit in the motor the synchronism may be easily detected on the disappearance of the induced currents.

In motors of the synchronous type it is desirable to maintain the quantity of the shifting magnetism constant, especially if the magnets are not properly subdivided.

To obtain a rotary effort in these motors was the subject of long thought. In order to secure this result it was necessary to make such a disposition that while the poles of one element of the motor are shifted by the alternate currents of the source, the poles produced upon the other element should always be maintained in the proper relation to the former, irrespective of the speed of the motor. Such a condition exists in a continuous current motor; but in a synchronous motor, such as described, this condition is fulfilled only when the speed is normal.

Fig. 13

The object has been attained by placing within the ring a properly subdivided cylindrical iron core wound with several independent coils closed upon themselves. Two coils at right angles as in figure 14, are sufficient, but a greater number may be advantageously employed. It results from this disposition that when the poles of the ring are shifted, currents are generated in the closed armature coils. These currents are the most intense at or near the points of the greatest density of the lines of force, and their effect is to produce poles upon the armature at right angles to those of the ring, at least theoretically so; and since action is entirely independent of the speed — that is, as far as the location of the poles is concerned — a continuous pull is exerted upon the periphery of the armature. In many respects these motors are similar to the continuous current motors. If load is put on, the speed, and also the resistance of the motor, is diminished and more current is made to pass through the energizing coils, thus increasing the effort. Upon the load being taken off, the counter-electromotive force increases and less current passes through the primary or energizing coils. Without any load the speed is very nearly equal to that of the shifting poles of the field magnet.

It will be found that the rotary effort in these motors fully equals that of the continuous current motors. The effort seems to be greatest when both armature and field magnet are without any projections; but as in such dispositions the field cannot be very concentrated, probably the best results will be obtained by leaving pole projections on one of the elements only. Generally, it may be stated that the projections diminish the torque and produce a tendency to synchronism.

A characteristic feature of motors of this kind is their capacity of being very rapidly reversed. This follows from the peculiar action of the motor. Suppose the armature to be rotating and the direction of rotation of the poles to be reversed. The apparatus then represents a dynamo machine, the power to drive this machine being the momentum stored up in the armature and its speed being the sum of the speeds of the armature and the poles. If we now consider that the power to drive such a dynamo would be very nearly proportional to the third power of the speed, for this reason alone the armature should be quickly reversed. But simultaneously with the reversal another element is brought into action, namely, as the movement of the poles with respect to the armature is reversed, the motor acts like a transformer in which the resistance of the secondary circuit would be abnormally diminished by producing in this circuit an additional electromotive force. Owing to these causes the reversal is instantaneous.

If it is desirable to secure a constant speed, and at the same time a certain effort at the start, this result may be easily attained in a variety of ways. For instance, two armatures, one for torque and the other for synchronism, may be fastened on the same shaft, ,and any desired preponderance may be given to either one, or an armature may be wound for rotary effort, but a more or less pronounced tendency to synchronism may be given to it by properly constructing the iron core; and in many other ways.

Fig. 14

As a means of obtaining the required phase of the currents in both the circuits, the disposition of the two coils at right angles is the simplest, securing the most uniform action; but the phase may be obtained in many, other ways, varying with the machine employed. Any of the dynamos at present in use may be easily adapted for this purpose by making connections to proper points of the generating coils. In closed circuit armatures, such as used in the continuous current systems, it is best to make four derivations from equi-distant points or bars of the commutator, and to connect the same to four insulated sliding rings on the shaft. In this case each of the motor circuits is connected to two diametrically opposite bars of the commutator. In such a disposition the motor may also be operated at half the potential and on the three-wire plan, by connecting the motor circuits in the proper order to three of the contact rings.

Fig. 15
Fig. 16
Fig. 17

In multipolar dynamo machines, such as used in the converter systems, the phase is conveniently obtained by winding upon the armature two series of coils in such a manner that while the coils of one set or series are at their maximum production of current; the coils of the other will be at their neutral position, or nearly so, whereby both sets of coils may be subjected simultaneously or successively to the inducing action of the field magnets.

Generally the circuits in the motor will be similarly disposed, and various arrangements may be made to fulfill the requirements; but the simplest and most practicable is to arrange primary circuits on stationary parts of the motor, thereby obviating, at least in certain forms, the employment of sliding contacts. In such a case the magnet coils are connected alternately in both the circuits; that is 1, 3, 5 …. in one, and 2, 4, 6 …. in the other, and the coils of each set of series may be connected all in the same manner, or alternately in opposition; in the latter case a motor with half the number of poles will result, and its action will be correspondingly modified. The figures 15, 16 and 17, show three different phases, the magnet coils in each circuit being connected alternately in opposition. In this case there will be always four poles, as in figures 15 and 17, four pole projections will be neutral, and in figure 16 too adjacent pole projections will have the same polarity. If the coils are connected in the same manner there will be eight alternating poles, as indicated by the letters n's' in fig. 15.

The employment of multipolar motors secures in this system an advantage much desired and unattainable in the continuous current system, and that is, that a motor may be made to run exactly at a predetermined speed irrespective of imperfections in construction, of the load, and, within certain limits, of electromotive force and current strength.

In a general distribution system of this kind the following plan should be adopted. At the central station of supply a generator should be provided having a considerable number of poles. The motors operated from this generator should be of the synchronous type, but possessing sufficient rotary effort to insure their starting. With the observance of proper rules of construction it may be admitted that the speed of each motor will be in some inverse proportion to its size, and the number of poles should be chosen accordingly. Still exceptional demands may modify this rule. In view of this, it will be advantageous to provide each motor with a greater number of pole projections or coils, the number being preferably a multiple of two and three. By this means, by simply changing the connections of the coils, the motor may be adapted to any probable demands.

Fig. 18
Fig. 19
Fig. 20
Fig. 21


If the number of the poles in the motor is even, the action will be harmonious and the proper result will be obtained; if this is not the case the best plan to be followed is to make a motor with a double number of poles, and connect the same in the manner before indicated, so that half the number of poles result. 

Suppose, for instance, that the generator has twelve poles, and it would be desired to obtain a speed equal to 12/7 of the speed of the generator. This would require a motor with seven pole projections or magnets, and such a motor could not be properly connected in the circuits unless fourteen armature coils would be provided, which would necessitate the employment or sliding contacts. To avoid this the motor should be provided with fourteen magnets and seven connected in each circuit, the magnets in each circuit alternating among themselves:

The armature should have fourteen closed coils. The action of the motor will not be quite as perfect as in the case of an even number of poles, but the drawback will not be of a serious nature.

However, the disadvantages resulting from this unsymmetrical form will be reduced in the same proportion as the number of the poles is augmented.

If the generator has, say, n, and the motor n1 poles, the speed of the motor will be equal to that of the generator multiplied by n/n1.


The speed of the motor will generally be dependent on the number of the poles, but there may be exceptions to this rule. The speed may be modified by the phase of the currents in the circuits or by the character of the current impulses or by intervals between each or between groups of impulses. Some of the possible cases are indicated in the diagrams, figures 18, 19, 20 and 21 which are self-explanatory. Figure 18 represents the condition generally existing, and which secures the best result. In such a case, if the typical form of motor illustrated in figure 9 is employed, one complete wave in each circuit will produce one revolution of the motor. In figure 19 the same result will be effected by one wave in each circuit, the impulses being successive; in figure 20 by four, and in figure 21 by eight waves.

By such means any desired speed may be attained; that is, at least within the limits of practical demands. This system possesses this advantage besides others, resulting from simplicity. At full loads the motors show an efficiency fully equal to that of the continuous current motors. The transformers present an additional advantage in their capability of operating motors. They are capable of similar modifications in construction, and will facilitate the introduction of motors and their adaptation to practical demands, Their efficiency should be higher than that of the present transformers, and I base my assertion on the following:

In a transformer as constructed at present we produce the currents in the secondary circuit by varying the strength of the primary or exciting currents. If we admit proportionality with respect to the iron core the inductive effect exerted upon the secondary coil will be proportional to the numerical sum of the variations in the strength of the exciting current per unit of time; whence it follows that for a given variation any prolongation of the primary current will result in a proportional loss. In order to obtain rapid variations in the strength of the current, essential to efficient induction, a great number of undulations are employed. From this practice various disadvantages result. These are, increased cost and diminished efficiency of the generator, more waste of energy in heating the cores, and also diminished output of the transformer, since the core is not properly utilized, the reversals being too rapid. The inductive effect is also very small in certain phases, as will be apparent from a graphic representation, and there may be periods of inaction, if there are intervals between the succeeding current impulses or waves. In producing a shifting of the poles in the transformer, and thereby inducing currents, the induction is of the ideal character, being always maintained at its maximum action. It is also reasonable to assume that by a shifting of the poles less energy will be wasted than by reversals.'''

*** DISCUSSION ***
Mr. Martin: "Professor Anthony, I believe, is here, and as he has given this subject some attention, I think he might very properly supplement Mr. Testa's paper by some remarks."

Mr. Tesla: '''I want to express once more my best thanks to Professor Anthony for aiding me in many respects, and I hope he will be able to explain many of the features in this system that I was unable to explain at present.'''

Professor Anthony: "Mr. President and Gentlemen: I have been referred to as having had something to do with these forms of motors. I am very glad to be able to add my testimony to what Mr. Tesla has already given you in regard to their action, and I confess that on first seeing the motors the action seemed to me an exceedingly remarkable one. After my first visit to Mr. Tesla's works, some of the motors; I think these very two that you see here on the table, were brought to me to make some tests of their efficiency, and probably you will be more interested in those than in anything else that I might say. I am sorry I have not brought with me the exact figures that we obtained, but I can give you from memory something of the result. This little motor that you see here gave us about half a horse-power, and gave an efficiency of something above fifty per cent., which I considered a very fair efficiency for a motor of this size, as we cannot expect on such small motors to get as high efficiency as we can on larger ones. This, I believe, is the armature that Mr. Tesla calls the armature for high rotary effort. This little pulley, which is only about three inches in diameter, gave a pull of something like fifty pounds, as I remember it on turning on the current, so that you see the rotary effort is very considerable, and that is also shown in the quickness with which the armature will reverse its motion on reversing the relation of the two currents which pass through the two opposite coils. That could be done by shifting two of the wires, or simply shifting a reversing key in one of the circuits, and the armature would stop and reverse its motion so quickly that it was almost impossible to tell when the change took place. That shows also the very considerable rotary effort that the armature presents. This motor (referring to the second specimen) gave us, I think, about 1 1/4 h.p., and showed a somewhat higher efficiency than the other — a little over sixty per cent. This would run, with the armature as here constructed, almost at the speed of the generator even under a very heavy load. When the load was brought up to the maximum load, where the efficiency began to fall off somewhat, the speed of rotation was reduced. As I remember now, it was reduced to about twenty-eight hundred, and the speed, you see, kept up very nearly to that of the generator under heavy load.

I can add very little to what Mr. Tesla has already given you in regard to these motors. I have no question but that all of you would be as much interested as I was in seeing them work, that is really the best way in which to determine what the motors will do."

Mr. Tesla: '''Mr. President and Gentlemen: Professor Anthony just made the remark that the speed of this motor fell off when the load was increased. That was due to the fact that this armature was designed to secure a strong effort from the start. But if we make an armature which is only designed for synchronism, the speed will always be the same no matter what the load; only there is a disadvantage that at the start the rotary force is so small that it is apt not to start. It would generally start if put in a proper position, but if not put in a proper position it might not start. If we employ an armature consisting of a cut-away block of steel with a coil, it will maintain its speed at all loads. The importance of maintaining the intensity of the pole constant is that if this can be produced we can utilize, instead of the subdivided armature, an ordinary steel block with the same result. It is only desired to close the magnetic field. You can readily see, if the poles are fixed, that it is not necessary to subdivide the armature, if the intensity of the force is constantly maintained the same. But, if the intensity is not maintained the same, then it is necessary to subdivide, and generally in the results that I have obtained I have found that it is necessary to subdivide. I have also observed that in the tests of Professor Anthony the results obtained were superior. I attribute that to the fact that the dynamo has got a powerful field and a small armature and the field is very concentrated; and for that reason probably, the result is nearer a theoretical result.'''

Professor Thomson: "I have been very much interested in the description given by Mr. Tesla of his new and admirable little motor. I have, as probably you may be aware, worked in somewhat similar directions, and towards the attainment of similar ends. The trials which I have made have been by the use of a single alternating current circuit — not a double alternating circuit — a single circuit supplying a motor constructed to utilize the alternation and produce rotation. I have carried on since the last annual meeting of the Institute the development and perfecting, as far as my time allowed, of a closed circuited armature — if we may so term it — related to the alternating field. That is, the plan which I used and which I brought to the notice of the Institute last year, was to make a laminated field and do that field to place an armature also laminated, winding upon the armature a coil which periodically is close circuited during the revolution by a suitable commutator or circuit-closing device. I have made several such motors on different designs and they uniformly start from a state of rest and develop power, and some of them show, at speeds close to the rate of alternations of the dynamo, a tendency to synchronize. Their rotary effort in most cases is a little greater nearer that point than at other points. I hope: sometime before a great while to bring most of these results before the notice of the Institute, and I would therefore prefer delaying further remarks on motors of this description. I certainly think there is a field for alternating motors, and there is undoubtedly an opportunity for obtaining motors which possess even some advantages over the continuous current motors."

Mr. Tesla: '''Gentlemen, I wish to say that the testimony of such a man as Professor Thomson, as being foremost in his profession, flatters me very much. I might say that I have worked in the same line with Professor Thomson at a period when the invention of Professor Thomson was not known to me. I had a motor identically the same as that of Professor Thomson but I was anticipated by him. I believe that although that peculiar form of motor represents the disadvantage that a pair of brushes must be employed to short circuit the armature coil, that such a form of motor may be made practicable for the simple reason that a motor represents a transformer, and such a transformer we well know we can bring to a very high efficiency. On the other hand, the armature may be provided with conductors that are of comparatively low resistance, and it is a mere matter of making a perfect arrangement for short circuiting. You will see the advantage of this disposition of the closed circuit coil — that this action is always maintained at the maximum and it is indeed more perfect than if the polarities were shifted by means of a commutator.'''

__________________







__________________

                                      🧙
                                 TRANSACTIONS
                    American Institute Of Electrical Engineers
                                 May 16th, 1888

The Chairman:—I have another    announcement to     make in
regard to Mr. Tesla's Motor. I    believe that    this motor—Mr.
Tesla can correct me if I am not    right—is   the first good alter-
nating current motor that has been    put    before the public any-
where—is that not so, Mr. Tesla?"  ''' — ''' "And he says that the system
can be seen in practical operation     at 89    Liberty street, second
floor, and he invites you all to    come and see    it." (Applause.)

__________________







__________________

     📰👨‍💼📰 ELECTRO-DYNAMIC ROTATION BY MEANS 📰👨‍💼📰
                 OF ALTERNATING CURRENTS

                   by Galileo Ferraris
                       Industries
              May 18th, 1888 Page number(s): ?

PROFESSOR  GALILEO  FERRARIS, of  Turin,  who as will
be remembered,  was  one  of  the  first  to  make  a strictly
scientific investigation  of transformers, and  who  has since
then continued to devote attention to alternating currents,
has just published the results of some experiments made
with  a  view  to  produce  continuous  rotation   by  their
means.    The   experiments  are interesting,  because  the
apparatus used was based upon an entirely new principle,
which  may  be  capable  of  further  development.    The
question  how  to  produce  continuous rotation  by means
of  alternating current is  just  now  occupying  the minds
of  many electricians, because the production of an alter-
nating current motor would greatly increase the earning
capacity of central electric  light stations supplying alter-
nating  currents.    Whether  the  apparatus  devised  by
Professor  Ferraris,  and  which we are about  to  describe,
will lead to the discovery of an alternating current motor,
is a  question  on which  we  do  not  pretend  to prophesy ;
but  as  the  principle  involved  may  also  have  other
applications,  notably  in  the  construction  of  meters  for
measuring  the  supply  of  electricity,   we  think  it  of
sufficient  importance  to  lay  a  short  abstract  of  the
investigation before our readers.   The principle on which
the apparatus  is  based  is  exceedingly simple, and will be
understood  by  reference  to  the  accompanying  sketches.
Let in Fig. 1 the lines  O A  and  O B  represent in direction
and magnitude the strength of the two magnetic fields.  The
combined  actions  of  these  fields on a unit pole, placed in
the point O, would  then  be represented by the resultant
O R.   Instead  of  having two distinct fields, we have one
resultant field,  represented  in  direction  and  magnitude
by  this  line.   If  both  fields  undergo  periodic  variations
of  the  same   period,  the   resultant  field  O R  will   also
undergo a periodic variation, and the point R will traverse
a curve, the  form  of   which   depends   upon   the   precise
manner in which the lines  O A  and  O B  change with the
time.   The fields  O A  and  O B  can  be  produced by two
coils,  having  the  lines  O X  and  O Y  respectively  for
their  axes,  and  which  coils  are  traversed  by  alternating
currents of the same period.  If  the  alternating  currents
may be expressed as sine functions of the time, and if there
is an appreciable lag between the currents in the two coils,
the  point  R  describes and  ellipse  round  O  as  centre.   In


this  case  the  line  O R  representing  the  resultant  field
revolves around the centre O, the direction and magnitude
of  the  resultant  field  changing  at  every  instant.    If,
however,  there  is  no  lag  between the  two currents, that
is to  say, if  they  pass  through  zero  simultaneously,  the
direction  of  the  resultant  field  O R  remains  stationary,
and the point  R  performs  harmonic  oscillation  over  the
line  R O  and  its  prolongation  with  O  as centre.    This
may be considered as a special case of the ellipse where
the  latter  has  been  flattened  down  to  a  mathematical
line.   Another special case occurs when the ellipse becomes
a  circle, and this must evidently take place when the lag
between  the  two  currents  is 90°,  when  the  coils  are  at
right angles to each  other, and when the component fields
are  equally  strong.    A  metallic  body  suspended  in  the
centre  of  the  two  fields,  and  free  to  revolve,  must
evidently have a tendency to participate in the rotation
of the resultant field.
   The  application  of  this  very  simple  principle  will  be
clear from Fig, 2, in which the two  coils are indicated by
the rectangles  A  and  B, the connections  being made by
the  wires  1 1¹  and  2 2¹  respectively.   When alternating
currents  are  sent  through  these  coils a resultant field is
produced, which  revolves  round  the  line  O O.   In  the
centre  between  the  coils  is  suspended  a  small  hollow
cylinder  of  copper, and as the lines of the resultant field
cut the metal Foucault  currents are induced, and by the
interaction  of  these  induced currents and  the  revolving
field  the  cylinder  is  set  in  rotation.   The  action  is
exactly  the  reverse  of  that  occurring in the well  known
experiment  in  which  a  copper  disc  is  rapidly  revolved
below a compass needle, with the result that the compass
needle is deflected on account of  the  induced currents in
the copper disc, and ultimately caused to rotate with the
copper disc.
   Up  to  the   present  we  have  spoken  of  two  distinct
currents being required in the  coils  A  and  B, one lagging
behind the other by a  quarter period ; and to perform the
experiment  we  might  employ  an  alternating  current
dynamo  with  two circuits  in  the armature, so arranged
with  regard  to  each  other as to produce the desired lag.
It  is,  however,  possible  to  perform  the  experiment  by
using and ordinary alternating  current machine with only
one circuit  on  the armature, and to  produce the second
current  by means of  a  transformer.   The  current  from
the  machine  is  sent  through  the primary of  the  trans-
former and then through the coils  A, whilst the secondary
current  obtained  from the  transformer  is  sent through
the coil  B.   It is then possible, by the interposition of a
suitable  inert  resistance  into  the  secondary  circuit, to
obtain  very  nearly  the  desired  lag  of  90 °  between the
currents in the two coils.   As the strength of  the  second-
dary  current will, by the  insertion  of  the  resistance, be
considerably  reduced, it  is  necessary, in  order to obtain
approximately equal fields from the  two coils, to employ
a  larger  number  of  turns  in  the  coil  B  than  in  A.
Another  method  of  producing  the  desired  result  con-
sists  in  using  a  transformer  with  one  primary and two
secondary coils, and  to  insert  into  the  circuit  of  one  of
the  secondary coils  a  large self  induction, and  into that
of the other a large  inert resistance, by  which means the
desired lag between the two  secondary currents  can also
be obtained,   It will be seen that in either of  these ways
it  is  possible, by  means  of  a  simple alternating current
and  a  transformer,   the  coils  of  which  are  abreast,  to
obtain  a  revolving  magnetic  field  of  approximately
uniform  intensity, by which  phenomena can be produced
in  every  respect  similar  to  those   obtainable  from  a
revolving permanent steel magnet.
   In the first experiment  made  by Professor Ferraris, a
Gaulard & Gibbs transformer,  with  an  equal  number of
turns in  the  primary and secondary coils, was used.   In
the primary circuit was included the coils  A, consisting of
a few turns of  stout wire, whilst in  the secondary circuit
were included and adjustable and non-inductive  resistance
and the coil B, the latter consisting of many turns of fine
wire.   A small hollow copper cylinder was suspended  on
a thread in the centre of the two coils, as shown in Fig. 2.
If the current was sent through only one of the coils, the
cylinder  remained  at  rest ;  but  if  currents  were  sent
through  both  coils, the  cylinder  immediately  started to
revolve, twisting  the  thread  on  which it was suspended.
A reversing switch was inserted  in  the secondary circuit,
and if the current  through  this  circuit was inserted, the
cylinder  was  immediately  brought to rest, and started in
the  opposite  direction.   Professor  Ferrasis  next  substi-
tuted a small iron cylinder for the copper one,  and found
equal results ;  but when using an iron cylinder sufficiently
large  to  nearly  fill the  place withing  the coils, the experi-
ment did not succeed so well.   He attributed this to the
greater  self induction  which  the  presence  of  iron  in  a
large  mass necessarily  introduced  into  both  circuits.
another experiment was made with a small iron cylinder,
composed of a number of thin discs insulated  from  each
other,  and  this  experiment  also  succeeded.   Foucault
currents  could  not  in  this  case be the cause of rotation,
and Professor  Ferraris thinks that the rotation is due to
hysteresis.   A  larger  apparatus  was  then  constructed,


which is indicated in our sketch  Fig. 3.   In this case the
copper  cylinder,  which  was  mounted  upon a  horixontal
axis  in  bearings, had  a  diameter  of  3½in.,  and was 7in.
long,  its  weight  being  11lb.   This cylinder  was  closely
surrounded by the primary and secondary coils wound upon
wooden  bobbins.   To  make  room  for  the  shaft each coil
was in halves, the  primary consisting of  ninety-six  turns
of seventy-seven  mils. Wire, both coupled in series, so as to
produce the effect of  a  coil  of  192  turns ;  the  secondary
consisting  of  504  turns  of  thirty-eight  mils.  Wire,  both
being  coupled  in  parallel, so  as  to  produce  the  effect
of  504  turns.   The  resistance  of  the  primary  coils
was   7∙12   and   6∙3   ohms  respectively,  and  that  of
the  two  secondary  coils  coupled  in  parallel  was  3∙43
ohms.   In  the  secondary  circuit  was  also  inserted  a
rheostat without self induction, and the best results were
obtained  when the  rheostat  was  set  to  between  15 and
18  ohms.   A  Gaulard  &  Gibbs  transformer  was  used,
giving eighty reversals per  second.   The copper cylinder
began to revolve when the primary current was 5 ampéres,
and  with  higher  currents the  velocity  could  be increased
to nine  hundred  revolutions per minute, and  might have
been still further increased but for the somewhat imperfect
mechanical  arrangements, which  occasioned considerable
vibrations.   To  the  shaft  was  applied  a  small  friction
dynamometer,  and  the  following  table  gives  the  work
at different speeds : —

Revolutions per minute…. 
 262     400     546     653     722    770    772     900
 1∙32    2∙12    2∙65    2∙77    2∙55   2∙40   2∙04      0
Watts obtained on brake…

The  maximum  energy  was  obtained  at 650 revolutions.
Beyond  that  speed  the  energy  decreased, which is attri-
buted  by  Professor  Ferraris to the imperfect mechanical
arrangement  of  the  apparatus,  causing  a  considerable
waste  of power in vibrations.   If it were not for this, the
maximum  energy  would  have  been  obtained  at  about
1200 revolutions, whilst at 2400 revolutions,  which  is  the
speed  of  the  revolving  resultant  field,  no  energy at all
could  be obtained.   Professor  Ferarris suggests that this
apparatus  may  be  used  for  lecture  purposes,  and  as  a
motor when  the power required is small, and it may also
be used as and electricity meter.   The torque  exerted  by
the revolving field upon the copper cylinder is proportional
to  the  square  of the current, and in order that the total
number of revolutions performed in a given time may  be
and  indication  of  the  number  of coulombs supplied, it is
necessary  to  introduce  some opposing force which varies
with the square of the velocity.   If this can  be done, and
if  the  friction of the journals can be sufficiently reduced,
an ordinary counter attached to the  axis  would  indicate
the quantity of electricity supplied.


__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA SYSTEM OF DISTRIBUTION AND ELECTRIC MOTORS FOR ALTERNATING CURRENTS
——————
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
May 25th, 1888 Page number(s): 493-494

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
A NEW SYSTEM OF ALTERNATE CURRENTMOTORS AND TRANSFORMERS.
—————
BY NIKOLA TESLA.——READ BEFORE THE
AMERICAN INSTITUTE OF ELECTRICAL
ENGINEERS, MAY 16 1888
—————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Review (New York)
June 2nd, 1888 Page number(s): 2
Vol. XII - Mar 3 to Aug 25 - No. 14 ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼🧙📰
INVENTOR TESLA REPLIES TO DR. LOUIS DUNCAN, EXPLAINING HIS ALTERNATING CURRENT MOTOR.
by Nikola Tesla [letter to the editor]
Electrical Review (New York)
June 2nd, 1888 Page number(s): 5
Vol. XII - Mar 3 to Aug 25 - No. 14


'''To the editor of Electrical Review:

    I find in your issue of last week a note of Mr. Duncan referring to my system of alter-
nate current motors.

As I see that Dr. Duncan has not as yet been made acquainted with the real character of my invention, I cannot consider his article in the light of a serious criticism and would think it unnecessary to respond; but desiring to express a my consideration for him and the importance which I attach to his opinion, I will point out here briefly the characteristic features of my invention, inasmuch as they have a direct bearing on the article abovereferred to.
The principle of action of my motor willbe well understood from the following:

 By passing alternate currents in proper manner through independent energizing circuits in the motor, a progressive shifting or rotation of the poles of the same is effected. This shifting is more or less continuous according to the construction of the motor and the character and relative phase of the currents employed, and I have indicated the theoretical conditions which should exist in
order to secure the most perfect action.
If a laminated ring be wound with four coils, and the same be connected in proper order to two independent circuits of an alternate current generator adapted for this purpose, the passage of the currents through the coils produces theoretically a rotation of the poles of the ring, and in actual practice in a series of experiments, I have demonstrated the complete analogy between such a ring and a revolving magnet. From the application of this principle to the operation of motors, two forms of motor of a character widely differing have resulted, one designed for constant and the other for variable load. The misunderstanding of Dr. Duncan is due to the fact that the prominent features of each of these two forms have not been specifically stated. In illustration of a representative of the second class, I refer to Fig. 1, on page 1 of Electrical Review of May 12th. In this instance, the armature of the motor is provided with two coils at right angles. As it may be believed that a symmetrical arrangement of the coils with respect to the poles is required, I will assume that the armature is provided with a great number of diametrically wound coils or conductors closed upon themselves, and forming many independent circuits. Let it now be supposed that the ring is permanently magnetized so as to show two poles (N and S) at two points diametrically opposite, and that it is rotated by mechanical power. The armature being stationary, the rotation of the ring magnet will set up currents in the closed armature coils. These currents will be most intense at or near the points of the greatest density of the force, and they will produce poles upon the armature core at right angles to those of the ring. Of course there will be other elements entering into action which will tend to modify this, but for the present they may be left unconsidered. As far as the location of the poles upon the armature core is concerned, the currents generated in the armature coils will always act in the same manner, and will maintain continuously the poles of the core in the same position, with respect to those of the ring in any position of the latter, and independently of the speed. From the attraction between the core and the ring, a continuous rotary effort, constant in all positions, will result, the same as in a continuous current motor with a great number of armature coils. If the armature be allowed to turn, it will revolve in the direction of rotation of the ring magnet, the induced current diminishing as the speed increases, until upon the armature reaching very nearly the speed of the mag- net, just enough current will flow through the coils to keep up the rotation. If, instead of rotating the ring by mechanical power the poles of the same are shifted by the action of the alternate currents in the two circuits, the same results are obtained.
Now compare this system with a continuous current system. In the latter we have alternate currents in the generator and motor coil, and intervening devices for commutating the currents, which on the motor besides effect automatically a progressive shifting or rotation of the poles of the armature; here we have the same elements and identically the same operation, but without the commutating devices. In view of the fact that these devices are entirely unessential to the operation, such alternate current system will—at least in many respects—show a complete similarity with a continuous current system, and the motor will act precisely like a continuous current motor. If the load is augmented the speed is diminished and the rotary effort correspondingly increased as more current is made to pass through the energizing circuits; load being taken off the speed increases and the current, and consequently the effort, is lessened. The effort, of course, is greatest when the armature is in the state of rest.

But since the analogy is complete, how about the maximum efficiency and current passing through the circuits when the motor is running without any load, one will naturally inquire? It must be remembered that we have to deal with alternate currents. In this form the motor simply represents a transformer in which currents are induced by a dynamic action instead of by reversals, and as it might be expected the efficiency will be maximum at full load. As regards the current, there will be — at least under proper conditions — as wide a variation in its strength as in a transformer, and by observing proper rules, it may be reduced to any desired quantity. Moreover, the current passing through the motor when running free, is no measure for the energy absorbed since the instruments indicate only the numerical sum of the direct and induced electro-motive forces and currents instead of showing their difference.
Regarding the other class of these motors, designed for constant speed, the objections of Dr. Duncan are, in a measure, applicable to certain constructions, but it should be considered that such motors are not expected to run without any, or with very light load, and, if so, they do not, when properly constructed, present in this respect any more disadvantage than transformers under similar conditions. Besides, both features, rotary effort and tendency to constant speed, may be combined in a motor, and any desired preponderance may be given to either one, and in this manner a motor may be obtained possessing any desired character and capable of satisfying any possible demand in practice.

In conclusion, I will remark, with all respect to Dr. Duncan, that the advantages claimed for my system are not merely assumptions, but results actually obtained, and that for this purpose experiments have been conducted through a long period, and with anassiduity such as only a deep interest in the invention could inspire; nevertheless, although my motor is the fruit of long labor and careful investigation, I do not wish to claim any other merit beyond that of having invented, and I leave it to men more competent than myself to determine the true laws of the principle and the best mode of its application. What the result of these investigations will be the future will tell; but whatever they may be and to whatever this principle may lead, I shall be sufficiently recompensed if later it will be admitted that I have contributed a share, however small, to the advancement of science.
                            NIKOLA TESLA.
New York, May 26.'''

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🗞️🧙
ALTERNATE-CURRENT MOTORS
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
June 15th, 1888 Page number(s): 565

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫📰
A NEW SYSTEM OF ALTERNATE CURRENT MOTORS AND TRANSFORMERS
by NIKOLA TESLA.
Electrical Engineer, The
June 15th, 1888
Page number(s): 568-572

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA ALTERNATE CURRENT MOTOR
——————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
June 22nd, 1888 Page number(s): 583-585

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🗞️🧙
ALTERNATE CURRENT MOTORS
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
June 29th, 1888 Page number(s): 601


𝐀𝐋𝐓𝐄𝐑𝐍𝐀𝐓𝐄 𝐂𝐔𝐑𝐑𝐄𝐍𝐓 𝐌𝐎𝐓𝐎𝐑𝐒.—With reference to the recent discoveries by Dr. Ferrari and Nikola Tesla in the direction of alternate current motors, the question of prior invention is cropping up already. We learn on good authority that Prof. Elihu Thomson has had an alternate current motor running in his laboratory for the last twelve months or so.

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🗞️🧙 THE TESLA ALTERNATE CURRENT MOTOR
————
by Dr. Louis Duncan
Electrical Engineer, The
June 29th, 1888 Page number(s): 609

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🗞️🧙
THE TESLA MOTOR
by⠀
Electrical Review (New York)
June 30th, 1888 Page number(s): 1 (cover)
Vol. XII - Mar 3 to Aug 25 - No. 18

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🗞️🧙
AN ENGLISH OPINION OF THE TESLA MOTOR
by⠀
Electrical Review (New York)
June 30th, 1888 Page number(s): 9
Vol. XII - Mar 3 to Aug 25 - No. 18

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🗞️🧙
ON THE TESLA ALTERNATING CURRENT MOTOR.
by J. Swinburne
Electrical Engineer, The
July 20th, 1888 Page number(s): 400-401

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸ˣ
APPARATUS FOR INCREASING TRACTION OF CAR WHEELS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Aug 12th, 1888
App#- 293,058
Pat#- US Ungranted
*
  :(            :)

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰👨‍💼
𝐍𝐎𝐓𝐄𝐒.
———
[a.k.a "TESLAS ONLT RIVAL"]
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
August 31st, 1888 Page number(s): 171
[letter to the editor]


𝐈𝐭𝐬 𝐨𝐧𝐥𝐲 𝐑𝐢𝐯𝐚𝐥.—The only rival to the Tesla motor is the Keeley one; that would beat it, if it would work. The Keeley Company have called upon Mr. Keeley officially to disclose his secret, or henceforth and for ever hold his peace. He offered to do this eighteen months ago, and now is compelled to do so, or fall.  And he cannot do it.  The Keeley “motor” won't “mote.”

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
𝐀𝐁𝐒𝐓𝐑𝐀𝐂𝐓𝐒 𝐎𝐅 𝐏𝐔𝐁𝐋𝐈𝐒𝐇𝐄𝐃 𝐒𝐏𝐄𝐂𝐈𝐅𝐈𝐂𝐀𝐓𝐈𝐎𝐍𝐒, 𝟏𝟖𝟖𝟖.
——————
[a.k.a. "TESLA'S PATENTS 6481 AND 6502"]
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
September 28th, 1888 Page number(s): 358
Vol. XXIII - Jul 6 to Dec 28 - No. 566

__________________







__________________

🗞️👤🗞️
IT MAY DO AWAY WITH STEAM
————
An Electric Motor that Can be Driven  by the Ordinary Light Wire Now In Use.
by⠀
Fort Morgan Times
October 5th, 1888 Page number(s): 3


'''There is no telling what will yet be accomplished by electricity,''' said well-known el🤥ctrician to a reporter for the Mail and Express. '''Barely more than half the recent discoveries have been made known to the public. It is supposed that everything which has merit can find a market in New York. Yet as a fact this is not always the case. The invention of Nikola Tesla, a Hungarian, is a fact in point. He succeeded in producing an electrical motor which can be actually run by the *refuse* current *now lost* in the alternating system of electric lighting. T😁sla worked on this motor for many years in this city, and after seeing his idea put into practical operation prepared the proper models and went to Pittsburg, Pa. There he exhibited his designs and plans to a large firm, the members of which with characteristic shrewdness bought the patent from Tesla, paying him a goodly price for it. Since then Tesla has remained in Pittsburg, being engaged in improving his invention. He deserves all the credit for what he has accomplished. He has produced a motor which some eminent electricians claimed was impracticable and unreasonable — a machine that will supersede the make and break current motors now in use.'''

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
ELECTROMAGNETIC MOTOR
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Oct 20th, 1888(#26/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 288,677
Grnt- Aug 14th, 1894 (#64/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 524,426

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
WESTINGHOUSE TESLA MOTOR
————
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
November 9th, 1888 Page number(s): 390

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
ELECTRICAL TRANSMISSION OF POWER
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Dec 8th, 1888 (#27/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 293,051
Grnt- Dec 26th, 1893 (#52/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 511,559

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇺🇸
SYSTEM OF ELECTRICAL POWER TRANSMISSION
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Dec 8th, 1888 (#28/144 us) (#n/n ww)
App#- 293,052
Grnt- Dec 26th, 1893 (#53/111 us) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- US 511,560

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘8️⃣9️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '89
__________________

🧙®🇬🇧
IMPROVEMENTS RELATING TO ELECTRO-MOTORS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Apr 16th, 1889 (#n/n gb) (#n/n ww)
App#- xxx
Grnt- xxx (#5/29 gb) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- GB 6527

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
MR. NIKOLA TESLA ON ALTERNATING CURRENT MOTORS.
————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical World
May 25th, 1889 Page number(s): 297-298
ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ
ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ
...'''Finally, in order to refute various assertions made at random, principally in the foreign papers, I will take the liberty of calling to the attention of the critics the fact that since the discovery of the principle several types of motors have been perfected and of entirely different characteristics, each suited for a special kind of work, so that while one may be preferable on account of its ideal simplicity, another might be more efficient. It is evidently impossible to unite all imaginable advantages in one form, and it is equally unfair and unreasonable to judge all different forms according to a common standard. Which form of the existing motors is best, time will show; but even in the present state of the art we are enabled to satisfy any possible demand in practice.

Nikola Tesla
Pittsburgh, Pa.'''

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇬🇧
IMPROVEMENTS RELATING TO THE CONVERSION OF ALTERNATING TO DIRECT ELECTRIC CURRENTS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Oct 22nd, 1889 (#n/n gb) (#n/n ww)
App#- xxx
Grnt- xxx (#6/29 gb) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- GB 16709

__________________







__________________

#
INNOVATIONS IN SECONDARY ELECTRICAL MACHINES
M. Von Dolivo-Dobrowolsky.
CH App October 26th, 1889 n1

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇬🇧
IMPROVEMENTS IN ALTERNATING CURRENT ELECTRO-MAGNETIC MOTORS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Dec 3rd, 1889 (#n/n gb) (#n/n ww)
App#- xxx
Grnt- xxx (#7/29 gb) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- GB 19420

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇬🇧
IMPROVEMENTS IN THE CONSTRUCTION AND MODE OF OPERATING ALTERNATING CURRENT MOTORS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Dec 3rd, 1889 (#n/n gb) (#n/n ww)
App#- xxx
Grnt- xxx (#8/29 gb) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- GB 19426

__________________







__________________

🧙®🇨🇦
METHOD AND APPARATUS FOR CONVERTING ALTERNATING INTO DIRECT CURRENTS
by Nikola Tesla
App-- Dec 19th, 1889 (#5/n ca) (#n/n ww)
App#- ???
Grnt- ??? (#n/7 ca) (#n/n ww)
Pat#- CA 33317

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘9️⃣0️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '90
__________________

📰🧙📰 
THE LOSSES DUE TO HYSTERESIS IN TRANSFORMERS
by Nikola Tesla [letter to the editor]
Electrical Engineer, The
April 9th, 1890 Page number(s): 221

__________________







__________________

#
ALTERNATING CURRENT MOTOR
M. Von Dolivo-Dobrowolsky.
US App May, 13th 1890 N

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA ALTERNATING CURRENT MOTORS.
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
September 10th, 1890 Page number(s): 270

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
SWINBURNE'S "HEDGEHOG" TRANSFORMER
by NIKOLA TESLA.
Electrical Engineer, The
September 24th, 1890 Page number(s): 332

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
TESLA'S NEW ALTERNATING MOTORS
by Nikola Tesla [letter to the editor]
Electrical Engineer, The
September 24th, 1890 Page number(s): 344-346

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘9️⃣1️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '91
__________________

#
KRAFTÜBERTRAGUNG MITTELS WECHSELSTRÖMEN VON VERSCHIEDENER PHASE (Drehstrom)
Dolivo Dobrowolski (Von) (M.).
[Transport del l'énergie par courants alternatifs polyphasés (champ tournant)].
Elektrotechniker, 1891, n08 4 et 5; Elek. Zeitsch., XII, 149; Electrician, XXVII, 338; La Lum. élec., XLI.
*

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
NEW TESLA ALTERNATING MOTOR
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
February 4th, 1891 Page number(s): 130

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
NEW TESLA ALTERNATING MOTOR
————
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
February 20th, 1891 Page number(s): 237-238
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 2 to Jun 26 - No. 691

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
PHENOMENA OF ALTERNATING CURRENTS OF VERY HIGH FREQUENCY
by⠀
Electrical World
February 21st, 1891 Page number(s): 128-130

__________________







__________________


#
Dolivo Dobrowolski (Von) (M.). — Kraftübertragung mittels Wechselströmen von verschiedener Phase (Drehstrom)
(((English version released ?April? ?May? 1891)))
*

__________________







__________________


📰👨‍💼📰🧙
ALTERNATING CURRENT MOTORS
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
March 6th, 1891 Page number(s): 291
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 2 to Jun 26 - No. 693

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
NOTES ON ALTERNATING CURRENTS OF VERY HIGH FREQUENCY
by Elihu Thomson
Electrical Engineer, The
March 11th, 1891 Page number(s): 300

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
ALTERNATING CURRENTS OF SHORT PERIOD
by⠀
Electrical World, The
March 14th, 1891 Page number(s) 203

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
EXPERIMENTS WITH ALTERNATE CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY.
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
March 18th, 1891 Page number(s): 336-337

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼🧙📰
TESLA'S ALTERNATING GENERATORS FOR HIGH FREQUENCY
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
March 18th, 1891 Page number(s): 338-340

__________________







__________________


PROF. ELIHU THOMSON’S PIONEER EXPERIENCES
————
by
The Electrician
March 20th, 1891 Page number(s): 596


𝗣𝗿𝗼𝗳. 𝗘𝗹𝗶𝗵𝘂 𝗧𝗵𝗼𝗺𝘀𝗼𝗻’𝘀 𝗣𝗶𝗼𝗻𝗲𝗲𝗿 𝗘𝘅𝗽𝗲𝗿𝗶𝗲𝗻𝗰𝗲𝘀.—In his address on “Pioneers’ Day” at the recent meeting of the National Electric Association at Providence (R.I.), Prof. Elihu Thomson gave the following interesting account of his early experiences :—Recounting my own experience in electric lighting, I may say that I built a small dynamo about 1876 to run an arc light. It was a success, and it led to the construction of other dynamos. When I came, however, to the commercial part of the business, which began in 1878 or 1879, I found that there were many difficulties to overcome, and not the least of these difficulties was the getting of steady power to run the machines.

The first Thomson-Houston three-coil armature machine intended for commercial use was capable of running from four to eight lights in series. I carefully examined every inch of the wire, and insulated the whole thing myself. Our first machine was put up in a bakery in Philadelphia, where it was used all night, and it was rather tenderly nursed by us. Sometimes we were up all night tending to this baby, and under conditions which were not altogether agreeable in the summer, as there is a good deal of waste heat in a bakery. The temperature was sometimes as high as 140 deg. After running these machines some time a Company was organised, which is now the Thomson-Houston Electric Company.

It was organised in a modest way in New Britain, Conn. I became electrician of this small Company, and the apparatus was made in New Britain in an old basket shop. This was the beginning of our experiences. We soon got into another shop and began the construction of apparatus for commercial use. After we got into operation our difficulties were not, by any means, over. We had to develop all sorts of devices. We had to overcome conditions constantly arising to discourage us. When one thing was accomplished we were met by other reverses.

The Brush Company saw our beginnings of success and tried to buy up a majority interest in our little Company in New Britain, apparently for the purpose of entirely swallowing us. Subsequently, however, in the same year, certain parties in Lynn purchased a majority interest in the stock, and what was the American Electric Company of New Britain started operations in Lynn. The Brush Company, as you are probably aware, has been swallowed up by us, the infant they tried to swallow. Such is fate.

We have the firmest confidence in the expansion of the electrical industries. We are absolutely certain that the business is going to be greater and greater as time goes by. We have calls now for machines and dynamos up to 500 and 1,000 H.P., where a few years ago we thought it an unusual thing to have 100 and 200 H.P. machines, and it looks very much as though in the near future machines of much larger capacity would be demanded for the work of installation.


stylize font= x
insrt figrs tmplt= 0
photocopy of original here=

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰
PHYSIOLOGICAL EFFECTS OF ALTERNATING CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY
by Elihu Thomson
Electrician
March 27th, 1891 Page number(s): 644

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
ALTERNATING CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY.— A REPLY TO MR. TESLA
by Elihu Thomson
Electrical Engineer, The
April 1st, 1891 Page number(s): 386-387

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
CORRESPONDENCE
————
ALTERNATE-CURRENT MOTORS 

by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
April 3rd, 1891 Page number(s): 345

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
EXPERIMENTS WITH ALTERNATING CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY•
—————
BY NIKOLA TESLA
—————
Electrical Review (London)
April 3rd, 1891 Page number(s): 431-432
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 2 to Jun 26 - No. 697

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
CORRESPONDENCE.
———
ELECTRO-MOTORS.
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Review (London)
April 3rd, 1891 Page number(s): 446
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 2 to Jun 26 - No. 697

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
Letters to the Editor.
—————————
PHENOMENA OF CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
April 8th, 1891 Page number(s): 425-426

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
ALTERNATING  CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY•  A REPLY TO MR. TESLA
————
By ELIHU THOMSON.
————
————
By CHAS STEINMETZ.•
————
Electrical Review (London)
April 17th, 1891 Page number(s): 485-487
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 2 to Jun 26 - No. 699

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
AN ELECTROLYTIC CLOCK
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
May 6th, 1891 Page number(s): 517

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
ALTERNATE CURRENT ELECTRO-STATIC INDUCTION APPARATUS
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
May 6th, 1891 Page number(s): 522

__________________







__________________

👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫
EXPERIMENTS WITH ALTERNATE CURRENTS OF VERY HIGH FREQUENCY AND THEIR APPLICATION TO METHODS OF ARTIFICIAL ILLUMINATION
by Nikola Tesla
Lecture before the AIEE, Columbia College, N.Y.
May 20th, 1891


...'''In how far we can understand the world around us is the ultimate thought of every student of nature. The coarseness of our senses prevents us from recognizing the ulterior construction of matter, and astronomy, this grandest and most positive of natural sciences, can only teach us something that happens, as it were, in our immediate neighborhood; of the remoter portions of the boundless universe, with its numberless stars and suns, we know nothing. But far beyond the limit of perception of our senses the spirit still can guide us, and so we may hope that even these unknown worlds — infinitely small and great — may in a measure become known to us.  Still, even if this knowledge should reach us, the searching mind will find a barrier, perhaps forever unsurpassable, to the true recognition of that which seems to be, the mere appearance of which is the only and slender basis of all our philosophy'''...

__________________







__________________

At the meeting og the Physical Society, held at Cambridge in
the Cavendish Laboratory, on Saturday, May 9th, the folowing
communications were made:—
📰👨‍💼📰
"SOME EXPERIMENTS ON THE ELECTRIC DISCHARGE IN VACUUM TUBES"
by Prof. J. J. Thomson
Electrician, The
May 22nd, 1891 Page number(s): 68-69

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA'S EXPERIMENTS WITH ALTERNATING CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
May 27th, 1891 Page number(s): 597

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA EXPERIMENTS.
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
May 27th, 1891 Page number(s): 598

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
ALTERNATING CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY
————
THE BRILLIANT EXPERIMENTS OF NIKOLA TESLA, THE ABLE AND PROGRESSIVE YOUNG INVENTOR
by⠀
Electrical Review (New York)
May 30th, 1891 Page number(s): 185

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
ALTERNATE CURRENT TRANSMISSION.
by
Electrical Engineer, The⠀
June 3rd, 1891 Page number(s): 237

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA'S EXPERIMENTS WITH ALTERNATING CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
June 5th, 1891 Page Number(s): 723
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 2 to Jun 26 - No. 706

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA'S EXPERIMENTS WITH ALTERNATING CURRENTS 
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
June 5th, 1891 Page number(s): 727
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 2 to Jun 26 - No. 706


𝗧𝗘𝗦𝗟𝗔'𝗦 𝗘𝗫𝗣𝗘𝗥𝗜𝗠𝗘𝗡𝗧𝗦 𝗪𝗜𝗧𝗛 𝗔𝗟𝗧𝗘𝗥𝗡𝗔𝗧𝗜𝗡𝗚 𝗖𝗨𝗥𝗥𝗘𝗡𝗧𝗦.—
𝗪e are obliged to the editors of the New York 𝘌𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘌𝘯𝘨𝘪𝘯𝘦𝘦𝘳 for an avance proof of an abstract of Mr. Tesla's remarkable lecture, which has created considerable sensation in that city. The complete lecture will not be ready for some time, but the abstract will, we hope, keep our readers 𝘢𝘶 𝘤𝘰𝘶𝘳𝘢𝘯𝘵 with the subject.

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰
SOME EXPERIMENTS ON THE ELECTRIC DISCHARGE IN VACUUM TUBES¹
by Prof. J. J. Thomson M.A, F.R.S.
Electrical Engineer, The
June 10th, 1891 Page number(s): 653

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
ALTERNATING CURRENT PHENOMENA.
by⠀
Engineering
June 12th, 1891 Page number(s): 710

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰
EXPERIMENTS ON THE ELECTRIC DISCHARGE IN VACUUM TUBES
by Elihu Thomson
Electrical Engineer, The
June 24th, 1891 Page number(s): 706

__________________







__________________

NOTES 
📰👨‍💼📰🧙
[a.k.a. "MR. TESLA'S NEW SYSTEM OF ILLUMINATION"]
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
July 1st, 1891 Page number(s): 11

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
ELECTRIC DISCHARGE IN VACUUM TUBES
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
July 1st, 1891 Page number(s): 14-15

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
HIGH FREQUENCY ALTERNATIONS.
by⠀
Electrical World, The
July 11th, 1891 Page number(s): 17

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
CONDENSERS IN ALTERNATING CURRENT WORK.
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
July 15th, 1891 Page number(s): 62-63

__________________







__________________

🧙📰👨‍💼📰
EXPERIMENTS ON THE ELECTRIC DISCHARGE IN VACUUM TUBES.
————
by⠀
Electrician, The
July 17th, 1891 Page number(s): 296-297

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA'S SYSTEM OF ELECTRIC LIGHTING WITH CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY.
————
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
July 17th, 1891 Page number(s): 69-70
Vol. XXIX - Jul 3 to Dec 25 - No. 712


In his lecture delivered before the American Institute of Electrical Engineers,• Mr. Nikola Tesla dwelt at length upon the fact that the direct application of electro-magnetic waves to the production of luminous effects was impracticable and that for this purpose electro-static waves or thrusts must be employed.


• 𝘛𝘩𝘦 𝘌𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘌𝘯𝘨𝘪𝘯𝘦𝘦𝘳 May 27th, 1891 [Page number(s): 597]

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
ELECTRIC DISCHARGE IN VACUUM TUBES.
————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Review (London)
July 17th, 1891 Page number(s): 73-75
Vol. XXIX - Jul 3 to Dec 25 - No. 712
[see also: Electrical Engineer July 1st, 1891 Page number(s): 14-15]

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
WHAT IS ELECTRICITY?
by Nikola Tesla
Literary Digest
July 18th, 1891 Page number(s): 11-12


...'''We are whirling through endless space, with and inconceivable speed, all around everything is spinning, everything is moving, everywhere there is energy. There must be some way of availing ourselves of this energy more directly. Then, with the light obtained from the medium, with the power derived from it, with every form of energy obtained without effort, from the store forever inexhaustible, humanity will advance with giant strides. The mere contemplation of these magnificent possibilities expand our minds, strengthens our hopes and and fills our hearts with supreme delight.'''...

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
CORRESPONDENCE.
———————
EXPERIMENTS ON THE ELECTRIC DISCHARGE IN VACUUM TUBES.
by Prof. J. J. Thomson [letter to the editor]
Electrician, The
July 24th, 1891 Page number(s): 340-341

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA'S EXPERIMENTS
[Editorial for EXPERIMENTS WITH ALTERNATE CURRENTS OF VERY HIGH FREQUENCY AND THEIR APPLICATION TO METHODS OF ARTIFICIAL ILLUMINATION, Part I Page number(s): 103-108, Part II  Page number(s): 147-151, Part III  Page number(s): 176-179]
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
July 24th, 1891 Page Number(s): 93-94
Vol. XXIX - Jul 3 to Dec 25 - No. 713

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
EXPERIMENTS WITH ALTERNATE CURRENTS OF VERY HIGH FREQUENCY AND THEIR APPLICATION TO METHODS OF ARTIFICIAL ILLUMINATION•
[Part I]
——————
By NIKOLA TESLA
——————
Electrical Review (London)
July 24th, 1891 Page number(s): 103-108
Vol. XXIX - Jul 3 to Dec 25 - No. 713


•A lecture delivered before the American Institute of Electrical Engineers, at Columbia College, N.Y., May 20th, 1891.

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
EXPERIMENTS WITH ALTERNATE CURRENTS OF VERY HIGH FREQUENCY AND THEIR APPLICATION TO METHODS OF ARTIFICIAL ILLUMINATION•
[Part II]
——————
By NIKOLA TESLA
——————
July 31st, 1891 Page number(s): 147-151
Vol. XXIX - Jul 3 to Dec 25 - No. 714


(Continued from page 108.)


•A lecture delivered before the American Institute of Electrical Engineers, at Columbia College, N.Y., May 20th, 1891.

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
EXPERIMENTS WITH ALTERNATE CURRENTS OF VERY HIGH FREQUENCY AND THEIR APPLICATION TO METHODS OF ARTIFICIAL ILLUMINATION•
[Part III]
——————
By NIKOLA TESLA
——————
Electrical Review (London)
August 7th, 1891 Page number(s): 176-179
Vol. XXIX - Jul 3 to Dec 25 - No. 715


(Concluded from page 151.)


•A lecture delivered before the American Institute of Electrical Engineers, at Columbia College, N.Y., May 20th, 1891.

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
ELECTRIC DISCHARGES IN VACUUM TUBES 🧙📰👨‍💼📰
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
August 12th, 1891 Page number(s): 164

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
TESLA'S ELECTROLYTIC METER
—————

by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Review (London)
August 14th, 1891 Page number(s): 186
Vol. XXIX - Jul 3 to Dec 25 - No. 716

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA'S "IDIOMATIC STATEMENTS."
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
August 14th, 1891 Page number(s): 193
Vol. XXIX - Jul 3 to Dec 25 - No. 716


𝐓𝐄𝐒𝐋𝐀'𝐒 "𝐈𝐃𝐈𝐎𝐌𝐀𝐓𝐈𝐂 𝐒𝐓𝐀𝐓𝐄𝐌𝐄𝐍𝐓𝐒."—We notice 𝘐𝘯𝘥𝘶𝘴𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘦𝘴 is protesting against Mr. Tesla's habit of advancing as theories or explanations of phenomena, which are either rational theories made inexplicit by strange expressions or simply lists of words deficient of meaning. We have no desire, says our contemporary, to pick out weak points in such an interesting lecture, but we think that any one who read Mr. Tesla's articles must have had great difficulty in understanding his repeated idiomatic statements. Is it ask- ing Mr. Tesla too much, holding the prominent position he does in the American electrical world, when we say we think if he omitted some of the confusing passages his lectures would be much better understood, and if he would keep ideas anent electro-magnetic theory of light, also Hertz and Dr. Lodge, from his work, his experiments would be clearer as well as more interesting. We hope Mr. Tesla is correct when he surmises that the future light may be produced by vacuum tubes; but we believe the subject has been thoroughly searched out ere this by many inventors without a result which has been very promising.

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
ELECTRIC DISCHARGE IN VACUUM TUBES
by Nikola Tesla
[In reply to Prof. J. J. Thomsons Jul 24 letter to the editor]
Electrical Engineer, The
August 26th, 1891 Page number(s): 233

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
NOTES ON A UNIPOLAR DYNAMO.
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
September 2nd, 1891 Page number(s): 258-260

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
PRIORITY IN ALTERNATING-CURRENT MOTORS
————
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The (London)
September 11th, 1891 Page number(s) 246-247


The question of priority in the discovery of the alternating-current motor would seem to need definite settlement, both on account of historical accuracy and the avoidance of acrimonious discussion. It has been usual, in Europe, to ascribe to Prof. Ferraris the priority in the demonstration of the possibility of rotary motion being obtained from alternating currents, and in a recent resume of the subject M. Hospitalier so accorded to credit. The dispute, so far as fundamental principles are concerned is limited to Prof. Ferraris and Mr. Nikola Tesla; and the New York Electrical Engineer this week vigorously asserts the priority for America in the person of Mr. Tesla.

The following are the words of our contemporary:
“Prof. Ferraris has been credited with the discovery now in controversy on the strength of his admirable paper read before an Italian scientific society, in March, 1888, and published in Italian shortly afterwards. But five months before this, in October, 1887, Mr. Tesla had already filed applications for patents embodying the discovery, and several months before that time had so far perfected his invention that a company had been formed to exploit it. Many prominent persons, including several electricians, then saw the Tesla motors at work; and during the winter of 1887-8 one of the best-known scientific men in this country (America) examined and reportedly favourably[sic] upon them. Some time in April one of the present editors of the New York Electrical Engineer, knowing of this new work, saw the motors which had then been running for some time in a temporary laboratory, and induced Mr. Tesla to bring his discovery before the May annual meeting of the American Institute of Electrical Engineers. The motors were actually shown in New York before a large gathering.

“On May 2, 2888—the same year—patents were issued to Mr. Tesla in America as the result of his application in October, and were then accessible at once in every European country. But the work of Prof. Ferraris was not brought to light in English-speaking countries (and others, too, for that matter) until it was given prominence by the publication of it in Industries, May 18, 1888. That interesting article was freely copied, as it well deserved, and its publication in this wise created the false idea that Prof. Ferraris's[sic] striking work was simultaneous with that of Mr. Tesla, or even prior. But the description of the Tesla invention must have evidently been made public on the patent, in England and other countries, before the date of the Industries article, and besides the fact of the issue of the patents there is the face that a contemporary, the New York Electrical Review, had given a short illustrated description of the Tesla motors on May 12.


“More than this, in his essay of March, 1888, Prof. Ferraris expressly denied the practicability of motors that Mr. Tesla already had in successful operation! He hinted at the possibility of using a proper generator for such motors, but no further did he go. Mr. Tesla had already taken the coal out of the mine before Prof. Ferraris had made his geological survey of the region. With this admission from Prof. Ferraris, it was not very likely that practical men would recognize the great value of the new principle.


“On examination of Mr. Tesla's now familiar work, we find that he, on the contrary, had not stopped short at a mere rotation field, but dealt broadly with the shifting of the resultant attraction of the magnets; that he had evolved the multiphase system; that he had shown the broad idea of motors employing currents of differing phase in the armature with direct currents in the field; that he had shown both synchronizing and torque motors; that he had shown how machines of ordinary construction might be adapted to his system, and had with specific purpose advances boldly into new territory, of which there was not the slightest hint or suggestion in the work of Prof. Ferraris. In other words, Mr. Tesla not only went to the bottom of the fundamental principles, but tried them in every detail that incentive ingenuity could hit upon. If this is not so, it is time to have the contrary state of affairs proved before Mr. Tesla loses the credit that such work must give him."

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰
THE MOTOR OF THE FRANKFORT-LAUFFEN TRANSMISSION, AND THREE-PHASE MOTORS IN GENERAL
by Carl Hering
Electrical World, The
November 7th, 1891 Page number(s):343-345

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
REASONS FOR THE USE OF THE THREE-PHASE CURRENT IN THE LAUFFEN-FRANKFORT TRANSMISSION
by C. E. L. Brown
Electrical World, The
November 7th, 1891 Page number(s): 346


...'The three-phase current as applied at Frankfort is due to the labors of Mr. Tesla, and will be found clearly specified in his patents.'...

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
"MASSAGE" WITH CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY.
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
December 23rd, 1891 Page number(s): 679


'''I trust that the present brief communication will not be interpreted as an effort on my part to put myself on record as a “patent medicine” man, for a serious worker cannot despise anything more than the misuse and abuse of electricity which we have frequent occasion to witness. My remarks are elicited by the lively interest which prominent medical practitioners evince at every real advance in electrical investigation. The progress in recent years has been so great that every electrician and electrical engineer is confident that electricity will become the means of accomplishing many things that have been heretofore, with our existing knowledge, deemed impossible. No wonder then that progressive physicians also should expect to find in it a powerful tool and help in new curative processes. Since I had the honor to bring before the American Institute of Electrical Engineers some results in utilizing alternating currents of high tension, I have received many letters from noted physicians inquiring as to the physical effects of such currents of high frequency. It may be remembered that I then demonstrated that a body perfectly well insulated in air can be heated by simply connecting it with a source of rapidly alternating high potential. The heating in this case is due in all probability to the bombardment of the body by air, or possibly by some other medium, which is molecular or atomic in construction, and the presence of which has so far escaped our analysis — for according to my ideas, the true ether radiation with such frequencies as even a few millions per second must be very small. This body may be a good conductor or it may be a very poor conductor of electricity with little change in the result. The human body is, in such a case, a fine conductor, and if a person insulated in a room, or no matter where, is brought into contact with such a source of rapidly alternating high potential, the skin is heated by bombardment. It is a mere question of the dimensions and character of the apparatus to produce any degree of heating desired.

It has occurred to me whether, with such apparatus properly prepared, it would not be possible for a skilled physician, to find in it a means for the effective treatment of various types of disease. The heating will, of course, be superficial, that is, on the skin, and would result, whether the person operated on were in bed or walking around a room, whether dressed in thick clothes or whether reduced to nakedness. In fact, to put it broadly, it is conceivable that a person entirely nude at the North Pole might keep himself comfortably warm in this manner.

Without vouching for all the results, which must, of course, be determined by experience and observation, I can at least warrant the fact that heating would occur by the use of this method of subjecting the human body to bombardment by alternating currents of high potential and frequency such as I have long worked with. It is only reasonable to expect that some of the novel effects will be wholly different from those obtainable with the old familiar therapeutic methods generally used. Whether they would all be beneficial or not remains to be proved.'''

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘9️⃣2️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '92
__________________

📰🧙📰
"MASSAGE" WITH CURRENTS OF HIGH FREQUENCY• 📰🧙📰
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Review (London)
January 8th, 1892 Page number(s): 36
Volume XXX - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 737


•𝘌𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘌𝘯𝘨𝘪𝘯𝘦𝘦𝘳, of New York[December 23rd, 1891 Page number(s): 679]

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
PROGRESS OF MR. TESLA'S HIGH FREQUENCY WORK
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
January 22nd, 1892 Page number(s): 104
Vol. XXX - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 739

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE INVENTOR OF THE THREE-PHASE ALTERNATING MOTOR SYSTEM.
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
January 27th, 1892 Page number(s): 85


'In a communication which appeared in one of our contemporaries a short while ago, Mr. C. E. L. Brown, the well known Swiss electrical engineer, in referring to the transmission of power between Lauffen and Frankfort, sought to correct the erroneous impression that the three-phase system was the salient feature of this installation, and pointed out that the principal object of the experiments was to prove the possibility of producing and transmitting high-tension currents over long distances by naked wires suspended from poles, and with such a degree of security against danger and such a small amount by leakage as to demonstrate that this method has a right to commercial existence. The adoption of the three-phase current, according to Mr. Brown, only increased the difficulties to be met since nearly all the apparatus thereby became more complicated, and the only reason justifying the adoption of the three-phase current was to demonstrate its advantages when applied to several small motors at the same time. The only novelty in the system shown at Frankfort were important constructive improvements in its application 

Fig.

which Mr. Brown, almost without exception, claimed as his own. Mr. Brown concluded by asserting that the three-phase current as applied at Frankfort was “due to the labors of Mr. Tesla, and will be found clearly specified in his patents.”


In reply to the above, Mr. Carl Hering thought that Mr. Brown had not done proper justice to the real inventor of this modification of the Ferraris-Tesla system, namely, Dobrowolsky. Without the invention of a new principle or a new modification, the ablest constructor would hardly be able to make any very great departures from well-known systems. Due credit should therefor be given to the inventors as well as the constructors.

In support of the claims made in the concluding paragraph of Mr. Brown's communication, quoted above, that gentleman has asked us to publish the following letter which explains itself:

I should like to make a few remarks on Mr. Carl Hering's comments on my letter of the 12th of October last.

I would first draw his attention to the concluding paragraph of that letter; and secondly refer him to Mr. Tesla's patents for the three-phase current filed October 12, 1887. Nos. 881,968 and 882,280, and his further patent No. 390,414, filed April 23 of the following year, of the existence of which patents Mr. Hering seems to be ignorant. For his further edification I enclose sketches which are fac-simile copies of drawings in the patents above referred to.

I think that he should then see that I have done full justice to the true inventor of the three-phase current system.'


                                                             C. E. L. Brown
BADEN SWITZERLAND, Jan. 6, 1892.

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
MR. TESLA'S LECTURE TO THE INSTITUTION OF ELECTRICAL ENGINEERS
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
January 29th, 1892 Page number(s): 134
Vol. XXX - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 740


𝗠𝗥. 𝗧𝗘𝗦𝗟𝗔'𝗦 𝗟𝗘𝗖𝗧𝗨𝗥𝗘 𝗧𝗢 𝗧𝗛𝗘 𝗜𝗡𝗦𝗧𝗜𝗧𝗨𝗧𝗜𝗢𝗡 𝗢𝗙 𝗘𝗟𝗘𝗖𝗧𝗥𝗜𝗖𝗔𝗟 𝗘𝗡𝗚𝗜𝗡𝗘𝗘𝗥𝗦.—On the occasion of Mr. Tesla's lecture on alternating currents of high potential next Wednesday, the members will meet at the Royal Institution, Albemarle Street.

__________________







__________________

👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫
EXPERIMENTS WITH ALTERNATE CURRENTS OF HIGH POTENTIAL AND HIGH FREQUENCY
by Nikola Tesla
Lecture delivered before:

February 3rd, 1892 — Institute of Electrical Engineers, London, 

February 4th, 1892 — Royal Institute, London

February 19th, 1892 — International Association of Electrical Engineers and Societe Francaise de Physique, Paris


...'''I am firmly convinced that such a brush, when we learn how to produce it properly, will prove a valuable aid in the investigation' of the nature of the forces acting in 2n electrostatic or magnetic field. If there is any motion which is measurable going on in the space, such a brush ought to reveal it. It is, so to speak, a beam of light, frictionless, devoid of inertia'''...

...'''Ere long intelligence—transmitted without wires—will throb through the earth like a pulse through a living organism. The wonder is that, with the present state of knowledge and the experiences gained, no attempt is being made to disturb the electrostatic or magnetic condition of the earth, and transmit, if nothing else, intelligence.'''...

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
NIKOLA TESLA
————
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
February 12th, 1892 Page Number(s): 184-185
Vol. XXX - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 742

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
MR. TESLA'S LECTURE
————
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
February 12th, 1892 Page Number(s): 192
Vol. XXX - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 742

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
MR. TESLA AND THE DREHSTROM SYSTEM•
by Carl Hering
Electrical Review (London)
February 19th, 1892 Page number(s): 239
Vol. XXX - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 743

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
MR. TESLA IN A NEW GUISE
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
February 26th, 1892 Page number(s): 262
Vol. XXX - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 744


———————————————
𝗠𝗿. 𝗧𝗲𝘀𝗹𝗮 𝗶𝗻 𝗮 𝗡𝗲𝘄 𝗚𝘂𝗶𝘀𝗲.—𝘊𝘩𝘶𝘳𝘤𝘩 𝘉𝘦𝘭𝘭𝘴, a weekly paper for Church folk, speaks of Mr. Nikola Tesla as Edison's right-hand man.
———————————————

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA MULTIPHASE CURRENT MOTORS.
by Albert Schmid
Electrical Engineer, The
March 9th, 1892 Page number(s): 241-242
Vol. XIII - Jan to Jun - No. 201
[see also: Electrical Review (London) April 8th, 1892 Page number(s): 443-444]

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
MR. TESLA'S EXPERIMENTS ON ALTERNATING CURRENTS OF GREAT FREQUENCY.
by⠀
Scientific American
March 26th, 1892 Page number(s): 195-196

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA MULTIPHASE CURRENT MOTORS•
—————
by Albert Schmid
—————
Electrical Review (London)
April 8th, 1892 Page number(s): 443-444
Vol. XXX - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 750
[see also: Electrical Engineer March 9th, 1892 Page number(s): 241-242]

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🗞️👤
THE TALK OF THE DAY
by⠀
New York Tribune
May 24th, 1892 Page number(s): 6


According to Nikola Tesla, the electrician, the new discovery of carborundum, will largely increase the possibilities of electric lighting. Among these possibilities he mentions electric lamps operated without any wires at all, an inexhaustible store of electrical energy on tap everywhere without need of either generation or transmission, and a light at least twenty times more efficient than that now furnished. In speaking of Mr. Tesla's article, “The Pittsburg Dispatch" says: ''There are more tangible though somewhat less magnificent results from actual development in Western Pennsylvania Industries, of the new material, carborundum, the qualities of which are enlarged upon in the same connection. A material that in addition to its value for electrical lighting has the industrial uses set forth in the article is a valuable addition to our industries. It has been an abstract rather than practical idea in the progress of science for some ages that diamonds might be artificially produced. This discovery appears to realize that dream, and even surpasses it so far as the industrial uses of the precious stone are concerned. It marks another step in the triumphant march of scientific industry"

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA'S LECTURE IN LONDON.
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
May 27th, 1892 Page number(s): 658
Vol. XXX - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 757

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
THE "DREHSTROM" PATENT
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical World, The
October 8th, 1892 Page number(s): 222


...'''These patents were taken out with the help of some of the ablest attorneys in the United States, well versed in electrical matters; the specifications were drawn up with great care, in view of the importance of the invention, and with proper regard to the state of the art at that period, and had the patents been carefully studied by others there would not have been various features of my system reinvented, and several inventors would have been spared at this late date a keen disappointment.'''...

...'''The writer apprehends that it might be difficult for a nontechnical judge to decide whether a motor with two or more separate fields and armatures, coupled together mechanically, does or does not fall under my patent. I do not share his apprehension. Judges are highly educated men, and it does not require much technical knowledge to convince one that it is the same whether two belts driving a rigid arbor are close together or far apart. Nor do I think that it is necessary for the honorable judge to be a partisan of the armature reaction theory in order to recognize the identity of the two arrangements referred to by the writer of the article in question. Indeed, I would seriously doubt the sincerity of a man capable of clear conceptions were he to uphold that the arrangements are essentially different, even if the case should stand exactly as he assumes by way of illustration of “puzzles likely to arise.” For where is there a difference?'''...

...'''Irrespective of the view taken, be it even the more unfair to the inventor, no one is permitted to go as far as to make him responsible, in such a case, for theories and interpretations of his invention. Theories may come and go, but the motor works, a practical result is achieved and the art is advanced through his pains and efforts. But what I desire to point out principally is that in the article above referred to the writer is only assuming a case which cannot occur. He is evidently judging the state of things from my short paper before the American Institute. This paper was written in a hurry, in fact only shortly before the meeting of the Institute, and I was unable to do full justice even to those features upon which, as employee of a company owning the invention, I was permitted to dwell. Allow me to observe that my patent specification was written up more carefully than my paper and the view taken in it is a broader and truer one. While the “clumsy” theory was adapted as the best in explanation of the action of the motor, the invention is not represented as dependent entirely on that theory; and in showing a three phase motor with six projections, where it was manifestly more consistent with the accepted popular ideas to assume the “lines of force” as simply surging in the projecting pole pieces, this view was distinctly and advisedly taken, as the following quotation from my foundation patent will show: “The variations in the strength and intensity of the currents transmitted through these circuits (lines and armature) and traversing the coils of the motor produce a steadily progressive shifting of the resultant attractive force exerted by the poles upon the armature and consequently keep the armature rapidly rotating.” There is, in this instance, no question of a rotating field in the common acceptance of the term of the resultant attractive force; there is a question simply of a diagram of force, and it is immaterial for the operation whether the fields are close together or far apart, or even whether, or not, they are inductively connected.'''...

...'''I do not think that in Germany, where the Patent Office is proverbially strict in upholding the rights of the inventor, an illegitimate and unfair appropriation of the invention by others will be tolerated by the courts.'''

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰
EWING'S HIGH FREQUENCY ALTERNATOR.
————
by F.B. Crocker
Electrical World
December 17th, 1892 Page number(s): 391

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
ON THE DISSIPATION OF THE ELECTRICAL ENERGY OF THE HERTZ RESONATOR
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
December 21st, 1892 Page number(s): 587-588


'''Anyone who, like myself, has had the pleasure of witnessing the beautiful demonstrations with vibrating diaphragms which Prof. Bjerknes, exhibited in person at the Paris Exposition in 1880, must have admired his ability and painstaking care to such a degree, as to have an almost implicit faith in the correctness of observations made by him. His experiments “On the Dissipation of the Electrical Energy of the Hertz Resonator,” which are described in the issue of Dec. 14, of The Electrical Engineer, are prepared in the same ingenious and skillful manner, and the conclusions drawn from them are all the more interesting as they agree with the theories put forth by the most advanced thinkers. There can not be the slightest doubt as to the truth of these conclusions, yet the statements which follow may serve to explain in part the results arrived at in a different manner; and with this object in view I venture to call attention to a condition with which, in investigations such as those of Prof. Bjerknes, the experimenter is confronted.

The apparatus, oscillator and resonator, being immersed in air, or other discontinuous medium, there occurs — as I have pointed out in the description of my recent experiments before the English and French scientific societies — dissipation of energy by what I think might be appropriately called electric sound waves or sound-waves of electrified air. In Prof. Bjerknes's experiments principally this dissipation in the resonator need be considered, though the sound-waves — if this term be permitted — which emanate from the surfaces at the oscillator may considerably affect the observations made at some distance from the latter. Owing to this dissipation the period of vibration of an air-condenser can not be accurately determined, and I have already drawn attention to this important fact.

These waves are propagated at right angles from the charged surfaces when their charges are alternated, and dissipation occurs, even if the surfaces are covered with thick and excellent insulation. Assuming that the “charge” imparted to a molecule or atom either by direct contact or inductively is proportionate to the electric density of the surface, the dissipation should be proportionate to the square of the density and to the number of waves per second. The above assumption, it should be stated, does not agree with some observations from which it appears that an atom can not take but a certain maximum charge; hence, the charge imparted may be practically independent of the density of the surface, but this is immaterial for the present consideration. This and other points will be decided when accurate quantitative determinations, which are as yet wanting, shall be trade. At present it appears certain from experiments with, high-frequency currents, that this dissipation of energy from a wire, for instance, is not very far from being proportionate to the frequency of the alternations, and increases very rapidly when the diameter of the wire is made exceedingly small. On the latter point the recently published results of Prof. Ayrton and H. Kilgour on “The Thermal Emissivity of Thin Wires in Air” throw a curious light. Exceedingly thin wires are capable of dissipating a comparatively very great amount of energy by the agitation of the surrounding air, when they are connected to a source of rapidly alternating potential. So in the experiment cited, a thin hot wire is found to be capable of emitting an extraordinarily great amount of heat, especially at elevated temperatures. In the case of a hot wire it must of course be assumed that the increased emissivity is due to the more rapid convection and not, to any, appreciable degree, to an increased radiation. Were the latter demonstrated, it would show that a wire, made hot by the application of heat in ordinary ways, behaves in some respects like one, the charge of which is rapidly alternated, the dissipation of energy per unit of surface kept at a certain temperature depending on the curvature of the surface. I do not recall any record of experiments intended to demonstrate this, yet this effect, though probably very small, should certainly be, looked for.

A number of observations showing the peculiarity, of very thin wires were made in the course of my experiments. I noted, for instance, that in the well-known Crookes instrument the mica vanes are repelled with comparatively greater force when the incandescent platinum wire is exceedingly thin. This observation enabled me to produce the spin of such vanes mounted in a vacuum tube when the latter was placed in an alternating electrostatic field. This however does not prove anything in regard to radiation, as in a highly exhausted vessel tile phenomena are principally due to molecular bombardment or convection.

When I first undertook to produce the incandescence of a wire enclosed in a bulb, by connecting it to only one of the terminals of a high tension transformer, I could not succeed for a long time. On one occasion I had mounted in a bulb a thin platinum wire, but my apparatus was not adequate to produce the incandescence. I made other bulbs, reducing the length of the wire to a small fraction; still I did not succeed. It then occurred to me that it would be desirable to have the surface of the wire as large as possible, yet the bulk small, and I provided a bulb with an exceedingly thin wire of a bulk about equal to that of the short but much thicker wire. On turning the current on the bulb the wire was instantly fused. A series of subsequent experiments showed that when the diameter of the wire was exceedingly small, considerably more energy would be dissipated per unit surface at all degrees of exhaustion than was to be expected, even on the assumption that the energy given off was in proportion to the square of the electric density. There is likewise evidence which, though not possessing the certainty of an accurate quantitative determination, is nevertheless reliable because it is the result of a great many observations, namely, that with the increase of the density the dissipation is more rapid for thin than for thick wires.

The effects noted in exhausted vessels with high-frequency currents are merely diminished in degree when the air is at ordinary pressure, but heating and dissipation occurs, as I have demonstrated, under the ordinary atmospheric conditions. Two very thin wires attached to the terminals of a high-frequency coil are capable of giving off an appreciable amount of energy. When the density is very great, the temperature of the wires may be perceptibly raised, and in such case probably the greater portion of the energy which is dissipated owing to the presence of a discontinuous medium is transformed into heat at the surface or in close proximity to the wires. Such heating could not occur in a medium possessing either of the two qualities, namely, perfect incompressibility or perfect elasticity. In fluid insulators, such as oils, though they are far from being perfectly incompressible or elastic to electric displacement, the heating is much smaller because of the continuity of the fluid.

When the electric density of the wire surfaces is small, there is no appreciable local heating, nevertheless energy is dissipated in air, by waves, which differ from ordinary sound-waves only because the air is electrified. These waves are especially conspicuous when the discharges of a powerful battery are directed through a short and thick metal bar, the number of discharges per second being very small. The experimenter may feel the impact of the air at distances of six feet or more from the bar, especially if be takes the precaution to sprinkle the face or hands with ether. These waves cannot be entirely stopped by the interposition of an insulated metal plate.

Most of the striking phenomena of mechanical displacement, sound, heat and light which have been observed, imply the presence of a medium of a gaseous structure that is one consisting of independent carriers capable of free motion.

When a glass plate is placed near a condenser the charge of which is alternated, the plate emits a sound. This sound is due to the rhythmical impact of the air against the plate. I have also found that the ringing of a condenser, first noted by Sir William Thomson, is due to the presence of the air between or near the charged surfaces.

When a disruptive discharge coil is immersed in oil contained in a tank, it is observed that the surface of the oil is agitated. This may be thought to be duo to the displacements produced in the oil by the changing stresses, but such is not the case. It is the air above the oil which is agitated and causes the motion of the latter; the oil itself would remain at rest. The displacements produced in it by changing electrostatic stresses are insignificant; to such stresses it may be said to be compressible to but a very small degree. The action of the air is shown in a curious manner for if a pointed metal bar is taken in the hand and held with the point close to the oil, a hole two inches deep is formed in the oil by the molecules of the air, which are violently projected from the point.

The preceding statements may have a general bearing upon investigations in which currents of high frequency and potential are made use of, but they also have a more direct bearing upon the experiments of Prof. Bjerknes which are here considered, namely, the “skin effect,” is increased by the action of the air. Imagine a wire immersed in a medium, the conductivity of which would be some function of the frequency and potential difference but such, that the conductivity increases when either or bout of these elements are increased. In such a medium, the higher the frequency and potential difference, the greater wilt be the current which will find its way through the surrounding medium, and the smaller the part which will pass through the central portion of the wire: In the case of a wire immersed in air and traversed by a high-frequency current, the facility with which the energy is dissipated may be considered as the equivalent of the conductivity; and the analogy would be quite complete, were it not that besides the air another medium is present, the total dissipation being merely modified by the presence of the air to an extent as yet not ascertained. Nevertheless, I have sufficient evidence to draw the conclusion, that the results obtained by Prof. Bjerknes are affected by the presence of air in the following manner:
1. The dissipation of energy is more rapid when the resonator is immersed in air than it would be in a practically continuous medium, for instance, oil.
2. The dissipation owing to the presence of air renders the difference between magnetic and non-magnetic metals more striking. The first conclusion follows directly from the preceding remarks; the second follows front the two facts that the resonator receives always the same amount of energy, independent of the nature of the metal, and that the magnetism of the metal increases the impedance of the circuit. A resonator of magnetic metal behaves virtually as though its circuit were longer. There is a greater potential difference set up per unit of length; although this rosy not show itself in the deflection of the electrometer owing to the lateral dissipation. The effect of the increased impedance is strikingly illustrated in the two experiments of Prof. Bjerknes when copper is deposited upon an iron wire, and next iron upon a copper wire. Considerable thickness of copper deposit was required in the former experiment, but very little thickness of iron in the latter, as should be expected.

Taking the above views, I believe, that in the experiments of Prof. Bjerknes which lead him to undoubtedly correct conclusions, the air is a factor fully as important, if not more so, than the resistance of the metals.'''

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘9️⃣3️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '93
__________________

👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫
ON LIGHT AND OTHER HIGH FREQUENCY PHENOMENA
Lecture delivered before The Franklin Institute, Philadelphia PA
by Nikola Tesla
February 21st, 1893


...'''Helmholtz has probably thought more on life than any modern scientist. Lord Kelvin expressed his belief that life's process is electrical and that there is a force inherent to the organism and determining its motions. Just as much as I am convinced of any physical truth I am convinced that the motive impulse must come from the outside. For, consider the lowest organism we know — and there are probably many lower ones — an aggregation of a few cells only. If it is capable of voluntary motion it can perform an infinite number of motions, all definite and precise. But now a mechanism consisting of a finite number of parts and few at that, cannot perform an infinite number of definite motions, hence the impulses which govern its movements must come from the environment. So, the atom, the ulterior element of the Universe's structure, is tossed about in space eternally, a play to external influences, like a boat in a troubled sea. Were it to stop its motion it would die. Matter at rest, if such a thing could exist, would be matter dead. Death of matter! Never has a sentence of deeper philosophical meaning been uttered. This is the way in which Prof. Dewar forcibly expresses it in the description of his admirable experiments, in which liquid oxygen is handled as one handles water, and air at ordinary pressure is made to condense and even to solidify by the intense cold. Experiments, which serve to illustrate, in his language, the last feeble manifestations of life, the last quiverings of matter about to die. But human eyes shall not witness such death. There is no death of matter, for throughout the infinite universe, all has to move, to vibrate, that is, to live.'''...

__________________







__________________

👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫
ON LIGHT AND OTHER HIGH FREQUENCY PHENOMENA
Lecture delivered before The Franklin Institute, Philadelphia PA
by Nikola Tesla
February 24th & March 1 & 3 1893

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫📰
ALTERNATE CURRENTS OF HIGH POTENTIAL AND HIGH FREQUENCY - I
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
January 11th, 1893 Page number(s): ?

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫📰 
ALTERNATE CURRENTS OF HIGH POTENTIAL AND HIGH FREQUENCY - II
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
January 18th, 1893 Page number(s): ?

________________________







__________________

📰👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫📰
ALTERNATE CURRENTS OF HIGH POTENTIAL AND HIGH FREQUENCY - III
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Engineer, The
January 25th, 1893 Page number(s): ?

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA LECTURE AT ST. LOUIS.
————
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
March 24th, 1893 Page number(s): 358-359
Vol. XXXII - Jan 6 to Jun 30 - No. 800

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫📰
ON LIGHT AND OTHER HIGH FREQUENCY PHENOMENA
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Review (London)


Vol. XXXII - Jan 6 to Jun 30

June 9th, 1893 Page number(s): 682-684
No. 811

June 16th, 1893 Page number(s): 714-716
No. 812
June 16th, 1893 Page number(s): 720 [acknowledgment]

June 23rd, 1893 Page number(s): 755-757   
No. 813


Vol. XXXIII Jul 7 to Dec 29

July 7th, 1893 Page number(s): 22-24                
No. 815

July 14th, 1893 Page number(s): 51-53
No. 816

July 21st, 1893 Page number(s): 81-83
No. 817

July 28th, 1893 Page number(s): 110-111
No. 818

August 11th, 1893 Page number(s): 153-154
No. 820

August 18th, 1893 Page number(s): 192-193
No. 821

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
MR. TESLA'S LECTURE AT THE CONGRESS
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
October 6th, 1893 Page number(s): 359
Vol. - XXXIII - Jul 7 to Dec 29 - No. 828


Mr. TESLA has succeeded in constructing a new, and what seems to be a perfect, mechanism for producing electrical oscillations of a constant period, independent of the driving force, of frictional losses, and the load. At his lecture on “Mechanical and Electrical Oscillators,” at Chicago, he mentioned, among other things, that he was able, by this new apparatus, to produce an alternating current in which the E.M.F. of the impulses in one direction preponderates over that of those in the other , so that there is produced the effect of a direct current. In 🐇 fact, he expressed the hope that these currents would be capable of application in many instances, serving as direct currents. The New York 𝘌𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘌𝘯𝘨𝘪𝘯𝘦𝘦𝘳 describes the machine, but only very scantily. The principle involved in this preponderating E.M.F is explained by Mr. Tesla as follows: suppose a conductor is moved into a magnetic field and then suddenly withdrawn ; if the current is not retarded, then the work performed will be a mere fractional one, but, if the current is retarded, then the magnetic field acts as a spring. Imagine that the motion of the conductor is arrested by the current generated, and, at the instant when it stops, there is still the maximum current flowing in the conductor ; then this current will, according to Lenz's law, drive the conductor out of the field again, and, if the conductor had no resistance, then it would leave the field with the velocity at which it entered it. Now, it is clear that if, instead of simply depending on the current to drive the conductor out of the field, a mechanically applied force is so timed that it helps the conductor to get out of the field, then it might leave the field with a higher velocity than that at which it entered it, and this one impulse is made to pre-ponderate in E.M.F over the other. With a current of this nature Mr. Tesla energized magnets strongly and performed many interesting experiments, bearing out the fact that one of the current impulses preponderates. We hope to see more of Mr. Tesla's apparatus when he next honours us by bringing it to England.

__________________







__________________


THE ACTION OF THE EYE
————
by⠀
Literary Digest
October 10th, 1893
Vol. XXXIII - Jul 7 to Dec 29 - No. 840


The Action of the Eye.—It can be taken as a fact, which the theory of the action of the eye implies, that for each external impression, that is, for each image produced on the retina, the ends of the visual nerves concerned in the conveyance of the impression to the mind must be under a peculiar stress or in a vibratory state. It now does not seem improbable that, when by the power of thought an image is evoked, a distant reflex action, no matter how weak, is exerted upon certain ends of the visual nerves, and, therefore, upon the retina. Will it ever be within human power to analyze the condition of the retina when disturbed by thought or reflex action, by the help of some optical or other means of such sensitiveness that a clear idea of its state might be gained at any time? If this were possible, then the problem of reading one's thoughts with precision, like the characters of an open book, might be much easier to solve than many problems belonging to the domain of positive physical science, in the solution of which many, if not the majority, of scientific men implicitly believe. Helmholtz has shown that the fundi of the eyes are themselves luminous, and he was able to 𝘴𝘦𝘦, in total darkness, the move-*ment of his arm by the light of his own eyes. This is one of the most remarkable experiments recorded in the history of science, and probably only a few men could satisfactorily repeat it, for it is very likely that the luminosity of the eyes is associated with uncommon activity of the brain and great imaginative power. It is fluorescence of brain-action, as it were.—𝘕𝘪𝘬𝘰𝘭𝘢 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢, 𝘪𝘯 𝘚𝘤𝘪𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘪𝘧𝘪𝘤 𝘈𝘮𝘦𝘳𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘯, 𝘕𝘦𝘸 𝘠𝘰𝘳𝘬.


*photocopy of original here*

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA OSCILLATOR
————
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
December 29th, 1893 Page number(s): 690
Vol. XXXIII - Jul 7 to Dec 29 - No. 840

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA ENGINE
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
December 29th, 1893 Page number(s): 700
Vol. XXXIII - Jul 7 to Dec 29 - No. 840

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘9️⃣4️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '94
__________________


NIKOLA TESLA
————
by Thomas Commerford Martin
Century Magazine
February, 1894 Page number(s): 582-585


SERVIAN poetry has so distinct a charm that Goethe is said to have learned the musical tongue in which it is written rather than lose any of its native beauty. History does not record, however, any similar instance in which the Servian language, though it be that of Boskovich, expounder of the atomic theory, has been studied for the sake of the scientific secrets that might lurk therein. The vivid imagination and ready fancy of the people have been literary in their manifestation and fruit. A great Slav orator has publicly reproached his one hundred and twenty million fellows in Eastern Europe with their utter inability to invent even a mouse-trap. They were all mere barren idealists. If this were true, to equalize matters, we might perhaps barter without loss some score of ordinary American patentees for a single singer of Illyrian love-songs. But racial conditions are hardly to be offset on any terms that do not leave genius its freedom, and once in a while Nature herself rights things by producing a man whose transcendent merit compensates his nation for the very defects to which it has long been sensitive. It does not follow that such a man shall remain in a confessedly unfavorable environment. Genius is its own passport, and has always been ready to change habitats until the natural one is found. Thus it is, perchance, that while some of our artists are impelled to set up their easels in Paris or Rome, many Europeans of mark in the fields of science and research are no less apt to adopt our nationality, of free choice. They are, indeed, Americans born in exile, and seek this country instinctively as their home, needing in reality no papers of naturalization. It was thus that we welcomed Agassiz, Ericsson, and Graham Bell. In like manner Nikola Tesla, the young Servian inventor with whose work a new age in electricity is beginning, now dwells among us in New York.

Mr. Tesla’s career not only touches the two extremes of European civilization, east and west, in a very interesting way, but suggests an inquiry into the essential likeness between poet and inventor. He comes of an old Servian family whose members for centuries have kept watch and ward along the Turkish frontier, and whose blood was freely shed that our western vanguard might gain time for its advance upon these shores. Yet, remote as such people and conditions are to us, it is with apparatus based on ideas and principles originating among them that the energy from Niagara Falls is to be widely distributed by electricity, in the various forms of light, heat, and power. This, in itself, would seem enough to confer fame, but Mr. Tesla has done, and will do, much else. Could he be tamed to habits of moderation in work, it would be difficult to set limit to the solutions he might give us, through ripening years, of many deep problems; but when a man springs from a people who have a hundred words for knife and only one for bread, it is a little unreasonable to urge him to be careful even of his own life. Thirty-six years make a brief span, but when an inventor believes that creative fertility is restricted to the term of youth, it is no wonder that night and day witness his anxious activity, as of a relentless volcano, and that ideas well up like hot lava — till the crater be suddenly exhausted and hushed.

A Slav of the Slavs, with racial characteristics strongly stamped in look, speech, and action, Mr. Tesla is a notable exemplification of the outcropping in unwonted form of tendencies suppressed. I have never heard him speak of a picture or a piece of music, but his numerous inventions, and the noble lectures that embody his famous investigations with currents of high frequency and high potential, betray the poetic temperament throughout. One would expect the line separating fact from theory to fade at the altitudes of thought to which his later speculations reach; but this lithe, spare mountaineer is accustomed to the thin, dry air, and neither loses sharpness of sight nor breathes painfully. Has the Servian poet become inventor, or is the inventor a poet? Mr. Tesla has been held a visionary, deceived by the flash of casual shooting stars; but the growing conviction of his professional brethren is that because he saw farther, he saw first the low lights flickering on tangible new continents of science. The perceptive and imaginative qualities of the mind are not often equally marked in the same man of genius. Overplus of imagination may argue dimness of perception; an ability to dream dreams may imply a want of skill in improving reapers. Now and then the two elements combine in the creative poet of epic and drama ; occasionally they give us the prolific inventor like Tesla.

Jules Breton has spoken of the history of his life as being at the same time the genesis of his art. This is true of Nikola Tesla’s evolution. His bent toward invention we may surely trace to his mother, who, as the wife of an eloquent clergyman in the Greek Church, made looms and churns for a pastoral household while her husband preached. Tesla’s electrical work started when, as a boy in the Polytechnic School at Gratz, he first saw a direct-current Gramme machine, and was told that the commutator was a vital and necessary feature in all such apparatus. His intuitive judgment or latent spirit of invention at once challenged the statement of his instructor, and that moment began the process of reasoning and experiment which led him to his discovery of the rotating magnetic field, and to the practical polyphase motors, in which the commutator and brushes, fruitful and endless source of trouble, are absolutely done away with. These perfected inventions did not come at once; they never do. The conditions that surrounded this youth in the airy fastnesses of the Dinaric Alps all made against the hopes he nursed of becoming an electrician; and not the least impediment was the fond wish of his parents at Smiljan Lika that he should maintain the priestly tradition, and benefit by the preferment likely to come through his uncle, now Metropolitan in Bosnia. But Tesla felt himself destined to serve at other altars than those of his ancient faith, with other means of approach to the invisible and unknown. He persevered in mathematical and mechanical studies, mastered incidentally half a dozen languages, and at last became an assistant in the Government Telegraph Engineering Department at Buda-Pest. His salary was small enough to please those who hold that the best endowment of genius is poverty, and he would make no appeals to his widowed mother for help. Experimenting, of course, went on all the time; at this juncture it was on telephony that he wasted his meager substance in riotous invention. Desirous of going to a fête with some friends, and anxious not to spend on clothes the money that might buy magnets and batteries, the brilliant idea occurred to him to turn his only pair of trousers inside out and to disport in them on the morrow as new. He sat up all night tailoring, but the fête came and went before he could reappear in public. This episode is quite in keeping with his boyish efforts to fly from the steep roof of the house at Smiljan, using an old umbrella as aërostat; or with the peculiar tests, stopped by the family doctor before the results could be determined, as to how long he could suspend the beating of his heart by will power.

Naturally enough for a young inventor seeking larger opportunity, Tesla soon drifted westward from Buda-Pest. He made his way to Paris, where he quickly secured employment in electric lighting, then a new art, and encountered an observant associate of Mr. Edison. Almost before he knew it, he was on his glad voyage across the Atlantic to work in one of the Edison shops, and to enter upon a new stage of development. He had profound faith in the value of the principles first meditated in the silence of the sterile mountains that border the Adriatic, and he knew that in a country where every new invention in electricity has its chance, his turn would come also, for he now had demonstrated his theories in actual apparatus.

If anything were needed to confirm Mr. Tesla in his hopes and enthusiasm, it would have been the close relation that he was thus thrown into with the robust, compelling genius who has created so many new things in electricity. Emerson has said that steam is half an Englishman; may we not, in view of what such men as Edison have done, add that electricity is half an American? The fiery zeal with which this young recruit flung himself on the most exacting tasks matched that of his chief. It went the length of a daily breakfast of Welsh rabbit, for weeks Mr. Tesla accepting as true, in spite of protesting stomach, the jocular suggestion that it was thus that his hero fortified himself successfully for renewed effort after their long vigils of toil. Mr. Edison, like most other people, had some difficulty in finding anywhere within the pale of civilization, as marked by the boundaries of maps, the isolated region of Mr. Tesla’s birth, and once inquired seriously of his neophyte whether he had ever tasted human flesh. It was inevitable that a really delightful intimacy and apprenticeship should end. Even the most cometic genius has its orbit, and these two men are singularly representative of different kinds of training, different methods, and different aims. Mr. Tesla must needs draw apart; and stimulated by this powerful spirit, he went on his own way for his own work’s sake.

Of late years a sharp controversy has raged in the electrical field as to the respective advantages of the continuous and the alternating current for light and power. In bitterness and frequent descent to personalities it has resembled the polemics of the old metaphysical schoolmen, and uninstructed, plain folk have mildly wondered whether it was really worth while to indulge in such terrible threatenings and slaughter over purely speculative topics. There is, however, a very practical aspect to the discussion, and from the first Mr. Tesla has been an advocate of the alternating current, not because he loved the direct current less, but because he knew that with the alternating he could achieve results otherwise impossible, especially in power transmission. Furthermore, all direct current generators and motors have required commutators and brushes, but Mr. Tesla, who has himself perfected many inventions based on direct currents, has shown that with the application of the rotating-field principle these elements of complication and restriction were no longer needed. This utilization of polyphase currents was a most distinct advance, made a deep imprint on the electric arts, and has been duly signalized. In America the invention found immediate sale. From Italy came an insistent cry of priority, reminding one of the “anticipations” that have clustered thick around the telegraph, the telephone, and the incandescent lamp. In Germany, with money raised by popular and imperial subscription, apparatus on the polyphase principle was built by which large powers were transmitted electrically more than a hundred miles from Neckar on-the Rhine to Frankfort-on-the-Main; and now by equivalent agency Niagara is to drive the wheels of Buffalo and beyond.

So thoroughly has Mr. Tesla worked out his discovery of the rotating magnetic field, or “resultant attraction,” that the record of his inventions contains no fewer than twenty-four chapters on varying forms of his polyphase current apparatus and arrangements of circuit. But ever pursuing new researches, Mr. Tesla, after the enunciation of these fundamental ideas, next brought to notice his series of even more interesting investigations on several novel groups of phenomena produced with currents of high potential and high frequency. To familiarize the American public with some of his results, he lectured upon them at Columbia College, before the American Institute of Electrical Engineers, in May, 1891. The year following, with riper results to publish, and by special invitation, he lectured twice in England, appearing before the Institution of Electrical Engineers, a distinguished scientific body of which Professor Crookes was then president, and, later, at the Royal Institution, where the immortal Faraday lived and labored. From England he was called to France to repeat his demonstrations before the Société Internationale des Electriciens and the Société Française de Physique. In Germany he received the greetings of Hertz and Von Helmholtz, and from his own country came the Order of Saint Sava, conferred by the king. Since his return to this country he has lectured before the Franklin Institute at Philadelphia and the National Electric Light Association at St. Louis. But he has an intense dislike to the platform, and has returned to his laboratory with a remorseful sense of neglected work from which long months of abandonment to unremitting research will not free him.

I can only outline the vast range of the researches that these lectures, and the apparatus connected with the demonstrations, cover. Broadly stated, Mr. Tesla has advanced the opinion, and sustained it by brilliant experiments of startling beauty and grandeur, that light and heat are produced by electrostatic forces acting between charged molecules or atoms. Perfecting a generator that would give him currents of several thousand alternations per second, and inventing his disruptive discharge coil, he has created electrostatic conditions that have already modified not a few of the accepted notions about electricity. It has been supposed that ordinary currents of one or two thousand volts’ potential would surely kill, but Mr. Tesla has been seen receiving through his hands currents at a potential of more than 200,000 volts, vibrating a million times per second, and manifesting themselves in dazzling streams of light. This is not a mere tour de force, but illustrates the principle that while currents of lower frequency destroy life, these are harmless. After such a striking test, which, by the way, no one has displayed a hurried inclination to repeat, Mr. Tesla’s body and clothing have continued for some time to emit fine glimmers or halos of splintered light. In fact, an actual flame is produced by this agitation of electrostatically charged molecules, and the curious spectacle can be seen of puissant, white, ethereal flames, that do not consume anything, bursting from the ends of an induction coil as though it were the bush on holy ground. With such vibrations as can be maintained by a potential of 3,000,000 volts, Mr. Tesla expects some day to envelop himself in a complete sheet of lambent fire that will leave him quite uninjured. Such currents as he now uses would, he says, keep a naked man warm at the North Pole, and their use in therapeutics is but one of the practical possibilities that has been taken up.

Utilizing similar currents and mechanism, Mr. Tesla has demonstrated the fact that electric lamps and motors can not only be made to operate on one wire, instead of using a second wire on the ground to complete the circuit, but that we can operate them even by omitting the circuit. Our Subway Boards are to find their wires and occupations gone. Electric vibrations set up at any point of the earth may by resonance at any other spot serve for the transmission of either intelligence or power. With these impulses or wave discharges, Mr. Tesla also opens up an entirely new field of electric lighting. His lamps have no filaments as ordinarily known, but contain a straight fiber, a refractory button, or nothing but a gas. Tubes or bulbs of this kind, in which the imprisoned ether or air beats the crystal walls, when carried into the area or room through which these unsuspected currents are silently vibrating, burst into sudden light. If coated inwardly with phosphorescent substances, they glow in all the splendors of the sunset and the aurora.

These are only a scant handful of ideas and discoveries from the rich mint of Mr. Tesla’s laboratory, where alone, secluded, intimates or assistants shut out, he reasons from cause to effect; and with severe, patient diligence not only elaborates his theories, but tries them by the rack and thumbscrew of experiment. He is of all men most dissatisfied with things as they are in his own field of work. Recently, the high-frequency generators with which he has done so much of this advanced work have been laid aside in discontent for an oscillator, which he thinks may not only replace the steam-engine with its ponderous fly-wheels and governors, but embodies the simplest possible form of efficient mechanical generator of electricity. He may be wrong, but misdirection will only suggest new avenues to the goal.

Mr. Tesla has often been urged to assume domestic ties, settle down, and till some corner of the new domain. But shall he farm or explore? Soon enough the proprietary fences will be set up; soon enough will the dusty, beaten highway, dotted with milestones and finger-posts, run straight ahead. If we would, we cannot leash the pioneers whose yearnings are for inner Nature, whose sense is keenest to her faint voices and odors, the quest of which lures onward through the trackless woods.


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


OUR FOREMOST ELECTRICIAN
The Wonderful Discoveries and Daring Theories of Nikola Tesla as Told by Him to The World.
GREATER EVEN THAN EDISON
Hard at Work Experimenting with a New Kind of Light and Promises Wonders That Are Now Undreamed Of by Scientists.
THE ELECTRICITY OF THE FUTURE
He Predicts It Will Be The Great Labor Saver - Picturesque Personality of a Man Who Is Toying with the Secrets of the Universe.
————
by
World
July 22nd, 1894 Page number(s): ?


There is a small country in Europe called Lika, and in that country there is a village of forty houses, called Smiljan.

You have probably never heard of either, but you and many others will live to know about a baby that was born in the village of Smiljan in the country called Lika thirty-seven years ago.

It was probably the usual Slavonic baby, very dark, very nervous and doomed in advance to a dull and wasted life. Lika is really a part of Servia, and Servia had her day long ago. Her men gained fame by fighting and helping the Hungarians to keep Asia out of Europe. Huxley, who thinks seriously, and Oscar Wilde, who is foolish, can enjoy life and London now because those old fighters fought so hard.

Most of Servia's modern babies might as well have avoided the annoyance of birth for all they can ever do in the world but this baby is an exception.

He was visible yesterday, in his grown-up condition, at Delmonico's. His name is Nikola Tesla. He is the best electrician living. If men who know about electricity may be believed. He is to the average electrician as Horace Greeley is to Bill Nye. He is serious, he is earnest and in all ways he commands respect.

Every scientist knows his work and every foolish person included in the category of New York society knows his face. He dines at Delmonico's every day. He sits each night at a table near a window. When Ward McAllister, that strange contradiction of the theory that nature abhors a vacuum wanders in, he sees Nikola Tesla with his head buried in an evening paper.

Every foolish young man who cares for the law of gravitation only because it interferes with jumping fences, every foolish young woman who thinks that there is something new about her two-cent love affair, has seen this serious, owl-faced Servian eating his dinner and thinking about electrical vibrations.

Nikola Tesla is almost the tallest, almost the thinnest and certainly the most serious man who goes to Delmonico's regularly.

VERY THIN, AND VERY TALL.
He has eyes set very far back in his head. They are rather light. I asked him how he could have such light eyes and be a Slav. He told me that his eyes were once much darker, but that using his mind a great deal had made them many shades lighter. I have often heard it said that using the brain makes the eyes lighter in color. Tesla's conformation of the theory through his personal experience is important.

He is very thin, is more than six feet tall and weighs less than a hundred and forty pounds. He has very big hands. Many able men do — Lincoln is one instance. His thumbs are remarkably big, even for such big hands. They are extraordinarily big. This is a good sign. The thumb is the intellectual part of the hand. The apes have very small thumbs. Study them and you will notice this.

Nikola Tesla has a head that spreads out at the top like a fan. His head is shaped like a wedge. His chin is as pointed as an ice-pick. His mouth is too small. His chin, though not weak, is not strong enough. His face cannot be studied and judged like the faces of other men, for he is not a worker in practical fields. He lives his life up in the top of his head, where ideas are born, and up there he has plenty of room. His hair is jet black and curly. He stoops — most men do when they have no peacock blood in them. He lives inside of himself. He takes a profound interest in his own work. He has that supply of self-love and self-confidence which usually goes with success. And he differs from most of the men who are written and talked about in the fact that he has something to tell.

WONDERS OF THE FLY.
It is most pleasing to hear this wise man talk about figures that tire the usual brain. Mr. Delmonico and an aged friend were talking to Mr. Tesla when I saw him night before last. Mr. Tesla having had his supper was discussing by way of relaxation, the number of vibrations of the wing of a certain fly. The fly of which Mr. Tesla did not know the name, is a fly that flies straight ahead so fast that you can't see him, and flies back in a straight line without and apparent effort.

“That,” said Mr. Tesla, “is the strongest living animal, in proportion to his size. He moves his wings about twenty-five thousand times to the second.” The aged man who had consented to take a drink with Mr. Delmonico mopped his forehead worriedly, for it was a hot night.

“And that is nothing, from the ordinary point of view,” mused the distinguished Mr. Tesla. “You see, if you move your hand ten times in a second and then try to move it one hundred times to the second, it will take a hundred times as much strength to move it ten times as fast. The fly that moves its wings twenty-five times to the second requires twenty-five thousand multiplied by twenty-five thousand times as much force as he would to move them once in a second. That makes him use up about six hundred million times as much force as you might think to move his wings like that.” Mr. Delmonico's aged friend said: “Don't talk of such exertion in this weather,” and wearily mopped himself out of the place.

When the aged man had gone Mr. Tesla said he could go to sleep floating on the water, and Mr. Delmonico, who is a very handsome young man with a pointed black beard, said that he did not believe sharks ever ate any one up. Mr. Tesla said that was nonsense, for in the lower Danube pikes sometimes had seized men and dragged them beneath the surface. The pikes were four feet long, and became so dangerous that swimming about there was prevented. Mr. Delmonico said he was going to Sharon Springs, and started for the Springs at once.

Mr. Nikola Tesla then talked, at my urgent request, about electricity and the things that he hopes to do.

There is no intention here to give a technical account of Mr. Tesla's past achievements and future ambitions. It would be much too hard to write to begin with, and utterly incomprehensible to almost every one after being written. The idea is to discover the new great electrician thoroughly; to interest Americans in the Smiljan baby's personality, so that they may study his future achievements with proper care.

TESLA'S THEORY OF LIGHT.
Mr. Tesla's biggest undertaking at present — that to which he is devoting his most earnest efforts — is the production of light by the vibrations of the atmosphere. He has no intention of heating a bit of cinder red hot and letting if glow by incandescence. The present incandescent system, compared to the Tesla idea, is as primitive as an ox cart with two solid wooden wheels compared to modern railroading.

The light of the sun, according to Mr. Tesla is the result of vibrations in 94,000,000 miles of ether which separate us from the centre of this solar system. Mr. Tesla's idea is to produce here on Earth vibrations similar to those which cause the sunlight, and thus to give us a light as good as that of the Sun, with no danger from clouds or other obstructions. Mr. Tesla has already achieved decided success in this line. He takes in his hand a long bar of glass, which by vibration alone, lights up into most amazing brilliancy. He himself comes out of his experiments a most radiant creature with light flaming at every pore of his skin, from the tips of his fingers and from the end of every hair on his head.

In explaining his experiments, Mr. Tesla uses figures calculated to pulverize an ordinary mind.

“It is difficult for me,” he said, “to give you an idea that you will readily grasp about this question of vibration. In ordinary life our minds do not deal with the figures that come up in such investigations but take a 5 and put after it fourteen zeroes; then you will have the number of vibrations which occur in the ether every second and which produce light.”

I carried out Mr. Tesla's suggestion, with the following result — 500,000,000,000,000.

“All I have to do,” said Mr. Tesla, “to duplicate the sunlight is to get this number of vibrations to the second with my machinery on Earth; I have succeeded up to a certain point, but am still at work on the task.”

THE POWER OF VIBRATION.
I tried in various ways to present in cold writing some notion of what five hundred trillions of vibrations to the second might mean. I didn't succeed very well. The nearest I could was to mention, at Mr. Tesla's suggestion, the following fact: If a mass of metal as big as the Delmonico restaurant, in which we sat, possessing 10,000 times the resisting force of the most finely tempered steel, should be caused to vibrate with one millionth of the rapidity of the light-producing electric vibrations in ether, that mass of metal, 10,000 times harder than steel, would simply vanish into the air like smoke. It would disappear into separate atoms too small to be seen and would never be heard of again.

Electricity in its vibrations, according to Mr. Tesla, has a great advantage over all other things such as flies' wings and other material bodies. Electricity has no weight, and therefore no opposition is offered to its moving backward and forward freely any number of times to the second.

“It is perfectly easy to prove that electricity weighs nothing.” said Mr. Tesla. “I will load you so full of electricity that you can't hold any more and then put you on the finest weighing machine, and you will not find one-thousandth part of an ounce added to your weight.”

I ventured to suggest to Mr. Tesla that as a vibrator electricity might meet with serious competition among modern statesmen, but his mind was so serious that he only said: “No statesman could vibrate fast enough to be of any value scientifically.”

Before deciding to give Mr. Tesla unlimited space in the greatest newspaper that was ever heard of, I had heard from a dozen reliable sources that there was not the slightest doubt about his being a very great man. Authorities unite in declaring him the very greatest man living in the line of abstract electrical research.

One able electrician told me that there never was such a man for working out purely intellectual problems. Another said he could conceive of nothing more extraordinary than the devotion and admiration for Tesla entertained by all of the young electrical engineers. It is a pitiful thing for a morbidly conscientious writer to find himself booming one not altogether worthy of his periods and climaxes, but I am certain in the case of Mr. Tesla that it is safe to go ahead.

ONE OF HIS DISCOVERIES
Mr. Tesla discovered the rotating magnetic field. That seems to me, next to his idea of getting light by vibration, the best thing he ever did. The rotating magnetic field is a thing which may be described but not understood. Everybody knows that a magnet will seize a piece of iron and hold it firmly; everybody knows that the magnet must use up force in holding that iron, but of course as long as it holds the iron perfectly still the force is wasted. The piece of iron if left alone would stand still. There is no use in getting a magnet to make it stand still. But Mr. Tesla found that he could get a magnet to use its force in such a way as to cause the piece of iron to spin violently round and round. He can make a wheel at a distance from the source of electromagnetic force spin round with 10,000 horse-power. He expects to apply this principle in employing the strength of the Niagara Falls electric current. The fact may be mentioned that the Niagara Falls people who have relied upon Tesla to tell them how they may use their power at a distance have adopted his scheme.

This rotating magnet field struck me as a most impressive discovery. I asked Mr. Tesla whether he didn't think it possible that the spinning, rotary motion of the Earth and her fellow planets, commonly attributed to some unexplained primary propulsive force, might be due to the application on a grand scale of his rotating magnetic field idea. I suggested that the sun might be a great magnet, that the five hundred trillion vibrations per second which he spoke of showed considerable electrical power somewhere; that there was a great deal of iron and a powerful lot of electricity in the earth. Mr. Tesla observed that he thought it was dangerous to jump at such conclusions, but he treated my enthusiasm, born of complete ignorance, with a kind toleration, which did much to convince me of his true greatness.

THE SECRET OF ELECTRICITY.
Electricians in general think that Tesla's best work thus far is a machine which has industrial value as a new and more direct agent for producing electrical force. I didn't care much about that compared with the rotating magnetic field, but I asked Mr. Tesla to tell me in as few words as possible just how we get electricity, and why we get it when we do get it. Said Mr. Tesla:

“We get electricity by causing a wire to revolve near a magnet. The stronger the magnet the faster the revolutions of the wire, and the bigger the wire the more electricity.

“Why we get electricity in this way, and what electricity is, are different questions. Every electrician has his theory. I have one which I think I can demonstrate mathematically. There is no accepted explanation of the most extraordinary phenomena in nature.”

Mr. Tesla does not care to see in cold print an account of those things which he hopes to accomplish, or to see accomplished, by means of electricity.

“You would think me a dreamer and very far gone.” he said, “if I should tell you what I really hope for. But I can tell you that I look forward with absolute confidence to sending messages through the earth without any wires. I have also great hopes of transmitting electric force in the same way without waste. Concerning the transmission of messages through the earth I have no hesitation in predicting success. I must first ascertain exactly how many vibrations to the second are caused by disturbing the mass of electricity which the earth contains. My machine for transmitting must vibrate as often to put itself in accord with the electricity in the earth.”

TOOK 250,000 VOLTS HIMSELF.
Mr. Tesla is the interesting person who, in Philadelphia, before a large gathering, allowed a quarter of a million volts of electricity to go through his body. Having seen Carlyle Harris and one other unfortunate individual instantly killed by the application of less than 2,000 volts, I asked Mr. Tesla if he didn't feel a little worried about taking a current of a quarter of a million volts. Said he:

“I did at first feel apprehensive. I had reasoned the thing out absolutely, nevertheless there is always a certain doubt about the practical demonstration of a perfectly satisfactory theory. My idea of letting this current go through me was to demonstrate conclusively the folly of popular impressions concerning the alternating current. The experiment had no value for scientific men. A great deal of nonsense is talked and believed about ‘volts,’ &c. A million volts would not kill you or hurt you if the current vibrated quickly enough — say half a million times to the second. Under such conditions the nerves wouldn't respond quickly enough to feel pain.”

“You see, voltage has nothing to do with the size and power of the current. It is simply the calculation of the force applied at a given point. It corresponds to the actual pressure per square inch at the end of a water pipe, whether the volume of the water be great or small. A million volts going through you doesn't mean much under proper conditions. Imagine a needle so small that the hole it would make in going through your body would not allow the blood to escape. Imagine it so small that you couldn't even feel it. If you had it put through your arm slowly, that would be, electrically speaking, a very small voltage. If you had it stuck through your arm with great rapidity, going, say, at the rate of a hundred miles a second, that would be very high voltage. Voltage is speed, pressure at a given point. It wouldn't do you any more harm to have a needle shot through your arm very rapidly — that is to say, with high voltage — than it would to put it through slowly. In fact, if it hurt you at all, the slow operation would probably hurt more than the other. The question of danger is simply the size of current, and yet if a big enough current should be turned against you and broken with sufficient rapidity — if it should, so to speak, jerk back and forth an inconceivable number of times to the second — it wouldn't kill you. Whereas if applied continuously, it would simply burn you up.”

ELECTRICITY OF THE FUTURE
When Mr. Tesla talks about electrical problems upon which he is really working he becomes a most fascinating person. Not a single word that he says can be understood. He divides time up into billionths of seconds, and supplies power enough from nothing apparently to do all the work in the United States. He believes that electricity will solve the labor problem. That is something for Mr. Debs to ponder while he languishes in his dungeon. It is certain, according to Mr. Tesla's theories, that the hard work of the future will be the pressing of electric buttons. A few centuries from now the criminal instead of working a treadmill or picking oakum will be sentenced to press fifteen electric buttons every day. His fellows, long since disused to work, will look upon his toil with pity and horror.

Mr. Nikola Tesla is to be envied. He owns one of those rare minds which do not absorb trivialities. A computation of the vibrations of a fly's wing is to him what croquet would be to Grover Cleveland — it is play. He can play when he wants to, but he doesn't do it very often.

Mr. Delmonico lowers his voice when he speaks to Mr. Tesla, as Boston cab-drivers used to lower their voices in speaking of John L. Sullivan. He said:

“That Tesla can do anything. We managed to make him play pool one night. He had never played, but he had watched us for a little while. He was very indignant when he found that we meant to give him fifteen points. But it didn't matter much, for he beat us all even and got all the money. There are just a few of us who play for 25 cents, so it wasn't the money we cared about, but the way he studied out pool in his head, and then beat us, after we had practised for years, surprised us.”

I talked to this Mr. Tesla of Smiljan until all but one of the lights had gone out and until the feeble daylight found Mr. Delmonico's scrub-ladies scrubbing his marble floor. All that he said was interesting, both the electrical things and the others.

HARD WORK HIS PLEASURE.
He is very proud of his Slavonic race. He believes that the poetry of the Slavs written in Servian and Croatian would surprise the civilized world if it could be presented in widely known languages.

He says that the thin man relies constantly on the food which he eats at the moment. He looks upon good food as most important and feels the strengthening effects of it within twenty minutes. He believes that work never hurts, but that play does.

Nobody, he thinks can work enough to hurt him.

He thinks that marriage and love interfere with success.

That suppers are very bad for one in New York, but all right in Paris.

He does not believe in telepathy, which is, according to its exponents a sort of psychical electricity enabling one mind to communicate ideas to another without words. He considers that what is usually taken as an evidence of the existence of telepathy is more coincidence. But the working of the human mind through observation and reason interests and amazes him, as it well may.

“Suppose I made up my mind to murder you,” he said, “in a second you would know it. Now, isn't that wonderful? By what process does the mind get at all this?”

One wise man whom I knew used to say that the scientists with their jumble of laws governing the universe were ignoramuses, and that there weren't more than half a dozen fundamental laws all told. I asked Mr. Tesla what he thought about that.

“I think,” said he, “that they could all be reduced to one.”

ARTHUR BRISBANE


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA ELECTRICAL OSCILLATOR.
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
January 10th, 1894 Page number(s): 21-23
Vol. XVII - Jan to Jun - No. 297
[see also: Electrical Review (London) January 19th, 1894 Page number(s): 61-63]

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA ELECTRICAL OSCILLATOR
————
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
January 19th, 1894 Page number(s): 61-63
Vol. XXXIV - Jan 5 to Jun 29 - No. 843
[see also: Electrical Engineer A̷u̷g̷3̷0̷,9̷3 January 10th, 1894 Page number(s): 21-23]

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA HIGH POTENTIAL CONDUCTOR
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
February 14th, 1894 Page number(s): 133
[see also: Electrical Review (London) March 9th, 1894 Page number(s): 291]

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA HIGH POTENTIAL CONDUCTOR
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
March 9th, 1894 Page number(s): 291
Vol. XXXIV - Jan 5 to Jun 29 - No. 850
[see also: Electrical Engineer February 14th, 1894 Page number(s): 133]

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🧙🗞️
THE WONDER OF THE WORLD
Nikola Tesla, a Greater Electrician Than Edison.
————
HE WILL MAKE HIS OWN SUNLIGHT
————
St. Louis Post-Dispatch
by Arthur Brisbane
July 22nd, 1894 Page number(s): 20
*(foreword)


Special correspondence Sunday Post-Dispatch.
    New York, July 19. — There is a small country in Europe called Lika, and in that country there is a village of forty houses called Smlljan.

You have probably never heard of either, but you and many others will live to know about a baby that was born in the village of Smiljan in the country called Lika thirty-seven years ago.

It was probably the usual Slavonic baby, very dark, very nervous and doomed in advance to a dull and wasted life. Lika is really a part of Servia, and Servia had her day long ago. Men gained fame by fighting and helping the Hungarians to keep Asia out of Europe.

Most of Servia's modern babies might as well have avoided the annoyance of birth for all they can ever do in the world, but this baby is an exception.

His name is Nikola Tesla. He is the best electrician living. If men who know about electricity may be believed. He is to the average electrician as Horace Greely is to Bill Nye. He is serious, he is earnest and in all ways he commands respect.

Fig. 1 Sketch of a young Nikola Tesla
Nikola Tesla.

    His Quaint Appearance. 
Nikola Tesla has eyes set very far back in his head. They are rather light. I asked him how he could have such light eyes and be a Slav. He told me that his eyes were once much darker, but that using his mind a great deal had made them many shades lighter. I have often heard it said that using the brain makes the eyes lighter in color. Tesla's confirmation of the theory through his personal experience is important.

He is very thin, is more than 6 feet tall and weighs less than 140 pounds. He has very big hands. Many able men have — Lincoln is one instance. His thumbs are remarkably big, even for such big hands. They are extraordinarily big. This is a good sign. The thumb is the Intellectual part of the hand. Apes have very small thumbs.

Nikola Tesla has a head that spreads out at the top like a fan. His head is shaped like a wedge. His chin is as pointed as an icepick. His mouth is too small. His chin, though not weak, is not strong enough. His face cannot be studied and judged like the faces of other men, for he is not a worker in practical fields. He lives his life up in the top of his head, where ideas are born, and up there he has plenty of room. His hair is jet black and curly. He stoops — most men do when they have no peacock blood in them. He lives inside of himself. He takes a profound interest in his own work. He has that supply of self-love and self-confidence which usually goes with success. And he differs from most of the men who are written and talked about, in the fact that he has something to tell.

    Talks of Hundreds of Millions.
It is most pleasing to hear this wise man I talk about figures that tire the usual brain. When I saw him night before last Mr. Tesla was discussing, by way of relaxation, the number of vibrations of the wing of a certain fly. The fly, of which Mr. Tesla did not know the name, is a fly that flies straight ahead so fast, that you can't see him, and flies back in a straight line without any apparent effort.

'''That,''' said Mr. Tesla, '''is the strongest living animal, in proportion to his size. He moves his wings about 25,000 times to the second.

'''And that is nothing, from the ordinary point of view,''' mused the distinguished Mr. Tesla. '''You see, if you move your hand 10 times in a second and then try to move your hand 100 times to the second, it will take 100 times as much strength to move it 10 times as fast. The fly that moves its wings 25 times to the second requires 25,000 multiplied by 20,000 times as much force as he would to move them once in a second. That makes him use up about 600,000,000 times as much force as you might think to move his wings like that.'''

'''Don't talk of such exertion in this weather, I said wearily.

Mr. Tesla then talked at my urgent request about electricity and the things that he hopes to do.

There is no intention here to give a technical account of Mr. Tesla's past achievements and future ambitions. It would be much too hard to write, to begin with, and utterly incomprehensible to almost every one after being written. The idea is to discover the new great electrician thoroughly, to interest Americans in the Smiljan baby's personality, so that they may study his future achievements with proper care.

    His Own Sunlight.
Mr. Tesla's biggest undertaking at present — that to which he is devoting his most earnest efforts, is the production of light by the vibrations of the atmosphere. He has no intention of heating a bit of cinder red and letting it glow by incandescence. The present incandescent system, compared to the Tesla idea, is as primitive as an ox cart with two solid wooden wheels compared to modern railroading.

The light of the sun, according to Mr. Tesla, is the result of vibrations in 90,000,000 miles of ether which separates us from the center of this solar system. Mr. Tesla's idea is to produce here on earth vibrations similar to those which cause the sunlight, and thus to give us a light as good as that of the sun, with no danger from clouds or other obstructions. Mr. Tesla has already achieved decided success in this line. He takes in his hand a long bar of glass, which, by vibration alone, lights up into most amazing brilliancy. He himself comes out of his experiments a most radiant creature; with light flaming at every pore of his skin, from the tips of his fingers and from the end of every hair of his head.

In explaining his experiments, Mr. Tesla uses figures calculated to pulverize an ordinary mind.

'''It is difficult for me,''' he said, '''to give you an idea that you will readily grasp about this question of vibration. In ordinary life our minds do not deal with the figures that come up in such investigations, but take a 5 and after it fourteen zeroes, then you will have the number of vibrations which occur in the ether every second and which produce light.'''

I carried out Mr. Tesla's suggestion with the following result — 500,000,000,000,000.

    Partial Success.
'''All I have to do,''' said Mr. Tesla, '''to duplicate the sunlight to get this number of vibrations to the second with my machinery on earth. I have succeeded up to a certain point, but am still at work on the task.'''

I tried in various ways to present in cold writing some notion of what five hundred billions of vibrations to the second might mean. I didn't succeed very well. The nearest I could was to mention at Mr. Tesla's suggestion the following fact: If a mass of metal as big as the house in which we sat, possessing 10,000 times the resisting force of the most finely tempered steel, should be caused to vibrate with one billionth of the rapidity of the light-producing vibrations in ether, that mass of metal, 10,000 times harder than steel, would simply vanish into the air like smoke. It would disappear into separate atoms too small to be seen and would never be heard of again.

Electricity in its vibrations, according to Mr. Tesla, has a great advantage over all other things, such as flies, wings and other material bodies. Electricity has no weight and therefore no opposition is offered to its moving backward and forward freely almost any number of times to the second.

'''It is perfectly easy to prove that electricity weighs nothing.''' said Mr. Tesla. '''I will load you so full of electricity that you can't hold any more and then put you on the finest weighing machine and you will not find one-thousandth part of an ounce added to your weight.'''

I ventured to suggest to Mr. Tesla that as a vibrator electricity might meet with serious competition among modern statesmen, but his mind was so serious that he only said, '''no statesman could vibrate fast enough to be of any value scientifically.'''

    Rotating Magnetic Field.
Mr. Tesla discovered the rotating magnetic field, a thing which may be described but not understood. Everybody knows that a magnet will seize a piece of iron and hold it firmly; everybody knows that the magnet must use up force in holding that iron, but of course as long as it holds the iron perfectly still the force is wasted. The piece of iron if left alone would stand still. There is no use in getting a magnet to make it. But Mr. Tesla found that he could get a magnet to use its force in such a way as to cause the piece of iron to spin violently round and round. He can make a wheel at a distance from the source of electro-magnetic force spin round with 10,000 horse-power. He expects to apply this principle in employing the strength of Niagara Falls electric current. The fact may be mentioned that the Niagara Falls people who have relied upon Tesla to tell them how they must use their power at a distance, have adopted his scheme.

Electricians in general think that Tesla's best work thus far is a machine which has industrial value as a new and more direct agent for producing electrical force. I didn't care much about that compared with the rotating magnetic field, but I asked Mr. Tesla to tell me in as few words as possible just how we get electricity, and why we get it when we do get it. Said Mr. Tesla:

    Nobody Knows.
'''We get electricity by causing a wire to revolve near a magnet. The stronger the magnet the faster the revolutions of the wire, and the bigger the wire the more electricity.

'''Why we get electricity in this way, and what electricity is, is another thing. Every electrician has his theory. I have one which I think I can demonstrate mathematically. There is no accepted explanation of the most extraordinary phenomenon in nature.'''

Mr. Tesla does not care to see in cold print an account of those things which he hopes to accomplish, or to see accomplished, by means of electricity.

'''You would think me a dreamer and very far gone,''' he said, '''if I should tell you what I really hoped for. But I can tell that I look forward with absolute confidence to sending messages through the earth without any wires. I have also great hopes of transmitting electric force in the same way without waste. Concerning the transmission of messages through the earth, however, I have no hesitation in predicting success. I must first ascertain exactly how many time vibrations to the second are caused by disturbing the mass of electricity which the earth contains. My machine for transmitting must vibrate as often to put itself in accord with the electricity in the earth.'''

Mr. Tesla is the interesting person who, in St. Louis, before a large gathering, allowed a quarter of a million volts of electricity to go through his body. Having seen Carlyle Harris and one other unfortunate individual instantly killed by the application of less than 2,000 volts, I asked Mr. Tesla if he didn't feel a little worried about taking a current of a quarter of a million volts. He said:

    A Million Volts in the Body.
'''I did at first feel apprehensive. I had reasoned the thing out absolutely, nevertheless there is always a certain doubt about the practical demonstration of a perfectly satisfactory theory. My idea of letting this current go through me was to demonstrate conclusively the folly of popular impressions concerning the alternating current. The experiment had no value for scientific men. A great deal of nonsense is talked and believed about 'volts,' etc. A million volts would not kill you or hurt you if the current vibrated quickly enough  —  say half a million times to the second. Under such conditions the nerves wouldn't respond quickly enough to feel pain.

'''You see, voltage has nothing to do with the size and power of the current. It is simply the calculation of the force applied at a given point. It corresponds to the actual pressure per inch at the end of a water pipe, whether the volume of water be great or small. A million volts going through you doesn't mean much under proper conditions. Imagine a needle so small that the hole it would make in going through your body would not allow the blood to escape. Imagine it so small that you couldn't even feel it. If you had put it through your arm slowly that would be, electrically speaking, a very small voltage. If you had it stuck through your arm with great rapidity, going, say, at the rate of 100 miles a second, that would be very high voltage. Voltage is speed pressure at a given point. It wouldn't do you any more harm to have a needle shot through your arm very rapidly, that is to say, with high voltage, than it would to put it through slowly. In fact, if it hurt you at all, the slow operation would probably hurt more than the other. The question of danger is simply the size of current, and yet if a big enough current should be turned against you and broken with sufficient rapidity  —  if it should, so to speak, jerk back and forth an inconceivable number of times to the second, it wouldn't kill you. Whereas, if applied continuously, it would simply burn you up.'''

    All Labor Done by Electricity.
When Mr. Tesla talks about the electrical problems upon which he is really working he becomes a most fascinating person. Not a single word that he says can be understood. He divides time up into billionths of seconds, and supplies power enough from nothing apparently to do all the work in the United States. He believes that electricity will solve the labor problem. That is something for Mr. Debs to ponder while he languishes in his dungeon. It is certain, according to Mr. Tesla's theories, that the hard work of the future will be the pressing of electric buttons. A few centuries from now the criminal instead of working a treadmill or picking oakum will be sentenced to press fifteen electrical buttons every day. His fellows, long since disused to work, will look upon his toil with pity and horror.

Mr. Nichola[sic] Tesla is to be envied. He owns one of those rare minds which do not absorb trivialities. A computation of the vibrations of a fly's wing is to him what croquet would be to Grover Cleveland — it is play. He can play when he wants to, but he doesn't do it very often.

He is very proud of his Slavonic race. He believes that the poetry of the Slavs, written in Servian and Croatian, would surprise the civilized world if it could be presented in widely known languages.

    Only One Law.
He says that the thin man relies constantly on the food which he eats at the moment. He looks upon good food as most important and feels the strengthening effects of it within twenty minutes. He believes that work never hurts, but the play does.

Nobody, he thinks, can work enough to hurt him.

He thinks that marriage and love interfere with success.

He does not believe in telepathy, which is, according to its exponents, a sort of psychical electricity enabling one mind to communicate ideas to another without words. He considers that what is usually taken as an evidence of the existence of telepathy is mere coincidence, that the working of the human mind through observation and reason interests and amazes him, as it well may.

One wise man whom I knew used to say that the scientists with their jumble of laws governing the universe were ignoramuses, and that there weren't more than half a dozen fundamental laws all told. I asked Mr. Tesla what he thought about that.

'''I think,” said he, “that they could all be reduced to one.'''

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '9️⃣5️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🧙🗞️
MR. TESLA'S GREAT LOSS
————————
All of the Electrician's Valuable Instruments Burned.
————————
WORK OF HALF A LIFETIME GONE
————
Firemen Unable to Save His Laboratory in South Fifth Avenue— 
He Loses $50,000; Gillis & Geoghegan $80,000.
by⠀
New York Times, The
March 14th, 1895 Page number(s): ?


'''I am in too much grief to talk. What can I say? The work of half my lifetime, very nearly all my mechanical instruments and scientific apparatus, that it has taken years to perfect, swept away in a fire that lasted only an hour or two. How can I estimate the loss in mere dollars and cents? Everything is gone. I must begin over again.'''

That is all that Nikola Tesla, the renowned electrician, had to say about a fire that utterly wiped out his laboratory at 35 South Fifth Avenue yesterday and destroyed instruments on which he has made experiments in advanced electricity that have astonished the world. Tears were in his eyes when he spoke.

Fig.
Nicola[sic] Tesla, Whose Electric Works Were Burned Yesterday.

Ever since Mr. Tesla came to this country from Servia, about ten years ago, and became for a time associated with Mr. Edison in his laboratory, at Menlo Park, N. J., his experiments have been watched with increasing solicitude by almost everybody interested in the progress of electrical science. He has attracted almost as much attention as “Wizard” Edison himself. The two men are scarcely rivals, for they conducted their investigations on substantially different lines. Personally, they are warm friends. Mr. Tesla never cared to talk much about his work. Few people knew what was going on in the rooms that were destroyed by fire yesterday. About fifteen men were at work there nearly every day, experimenting under Tesla's personal direction. He worked as hard as his men did. He had a little office with a roll-top desk and a rug but he seldom went near it except to talk to visitors. Most of his workaday hours were spent bustling about in his shirt sleeves among his instruments.

Outside his shop he is something of a Sybarite. He dines at Delmonico's almost invariably, and lounges about the café during the evening. Habitués of the place know him well. He is very tall and very thin. His dark[sic] eyes are perhaps his most noticeable feature. They are large and brilliant, showing with the zeal of an enthusiast.

Lectures given by Mr. Tesla from time to time give the best idea of his hopes and aims. Of course, he does a great deal of practical work all the time, aside from his experiments. He is controlling engineer of the Niagara Power Company and consulting engineer to other corporations interested in electrical supply. But his experiments took up most of his time. One thing that Mr. Tesla was striving to accomplish was to prevent the enormous waste of force in the manufacture of electricity. He has contended that about 99 per cent. of the energy now goes to waste. His experiments have been devoted to saving at least one-third of the energy, which would make it possible to obtain a much greater illumination that can be procured at present, and at a great decrease in cost.

'''The ideal way of lighting a room would be,''' he said in one of his lectures before a scientific society two years ago, '''to produce such a condition in it that an illuminating device could be moved and put anywhere, and that it should be lighted no matter where put, without being electrically connected with anything.'''

Tesla has demonstrated in his experiments that the polyphase currents of high potency, even to 250,000 volts, have no hurtful effect on the human body. He allowed that number of volts to pass through his own body without harm. Through his discovery of the means of transmitting electricity without a wire, Mr. Tesla expected to produce a light as powerful as sunshine as soon as he had discovered how to care safely for the 8,000,000 volts necessary for the purpose.

Gillis & Geoghegan, manufacturers of steamfitters' supplies, occupied the lower floors of the building in which Mr. Tesla had his laboratory. Night Watchman Mahoney was employed to look after the building. He said that he was making his rounds as usual just before 3 o'clock yesterday morning when he discovered the fire. It had started on the ground floor, but from precisely what cause is not known. He tried in vain to put it out with pails of water.

The building was saturated with oils necessary in the manufacture of fittings, and it burned like a tinder-box. Before a line of hose could be put down it was evident that the place was doomed. Chief Bonner and his men could make little headway against the terrific heat. It was so intense that at one time the elevated railway structure caught fire. There was a box factory next door, filled with inflammable material, and every endeavor was made to keep that from going, too. It took three hours to get the flames under control. There are so many ramshackle buildings in that locality that if the box factory had once caught fire there is no telling where the fire would have ended.

Mr. Tesla's employes were dismayed when they appeared on the scene for work in the morning and found their occupation gone. Not one of them had the courage to go and tell their employer of his terrible loss. He appeared, as usual, about 10 o'clock, and found it out for himself. At first he was simply dazed.

'''It cannot be true!''' he explained, pacing up and down before the ruins in hopeless despair. He told a fireman that he had no insurance, and that, so far as he knew, the money loss would probably represent $50,000. The loss to the building itself is estimated at $25,000, and the loss to Gillis & Geoghegan is estimated at $80,000. This is covered by insurance.

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
MR. TESLA'S WORKS DESTROYED BY FIRE
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
March 15th, 1895 Page number(s): 329
Vol. XXXVI - Jan 4 to Jun 28 - No. 904

__________________







__________________


DESTRUCTION OF THE TESLA LABORATORY BY FIRE
————
by
The Electrical Engineer
March 20th, 1895 Page number(s): 275


By a fire which almost completely gutted the six-story and basement building at 33 and 35 South Fifth avenue, this city, on March 13, Mr. Nikola Tesla, the electrician, lost all of the apparatus with which he has been carrying on his professional experiments. He occupied the entire fourth floor. When the floor gave way his apparatus fell to the second story where it lay in unrecognizable ruin. It was not insured.

Gillis & Qeoghegan, manufacturers of steam fitters’ supplies, occupied the rest of the building. The fire was discovered at 2:30 a. m. John Mahoney, the watchman employed by Gillis & Geoghegan, had, he says, left the office on the ground floor just before that hour to bank the fires in the subcellar, leaving a single gas jet burning. In about ten minutes he returned and found flames running along the floor and up the sides of the partition of the office. Mahoney yelled for a policeman. Policeman Haggerty ran to the watchman’s assistance. Mahoney had closed the office door and was pouring buckets of water on the flames. Seeing that this did no good he told the policeman to turn in an alarm. A moment later he was driven into the street by great tongues of flames which shot up from the floor.

Before Chief Reilly with Engine 33 reached the fire the flames had spread to the first and second floors, and were shooting to the top of the building through the stairways, airshaft and elevator well. From top to bottom the building was saturated with machine oils, used in cutting steam pipe, and this ignited with great rapidity. The firemen fought the flames for fully three hours before they were under control. The Sixth avenue elevated road was blocked in the mean time, the firemen using its structure to work from. It was not until 8 o’clock that the recall for the engines was sounded. The walls and framework of the building were still standing, but the north side of the structure was so badly cracked that the tenants of the nearest houses were ordered out again for fear that it would fall.

Mr. Tesla was at first very much affected by the news of his loss, but sustained the blow stoically, and within 6 hours was busily engaged making and giving out designs for the reconstruction of his latest type of oscillator, which has now been running successfully for some time past, lighting the laboratory and supplying current for a number of new and novel experiments. It is needless to add that Mr. Tesla has received innumerable expressions of sympathy and regret not only from friends and acquaintances but from total strangers.


stylize font= x
insrt figrs tmplt= 0
photocopy of original here=

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE BURNING OF TESLA'S LABORATORY 🧙📰👨‍💼📰
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
May 24th, 1895 Page number(s): 652
Vol. XXXVI - Jan 4 to Jun 28 - No. 913

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
CRITICAL CONDITION OF TESLA
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
July 26th, 1895 Page number(s): 106
Vol. XXXVII - Jul 5 to Dec 27 - No. 922

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
THE TESLA PATENTS IN FRANCE
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
October 11th, 1895 Page number(s): 460
Vol. XXXVII - Jul 5 to Dec 27 - No. 933

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘9️⃣6️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '96
__________________

Tesla's Marvellous Achievement.
🗞️👨‍💼👤🗞️
EARTH ELECTRICITY TO KILL MONOPOLY
—————           
A Way to Harness Free Electric Currents Discovered by Nikola Tesla.
by⠀
The World Sunday Magazine
March 8th, 1896 Page number(s): ?


The World is on the eve of an astounding revelation. The conditions under which we exist will be changed. The end has come to telegraph and telephone monopolies with a crash. Incidentally, all the other monopolies that depend on power of any kind will come to a sudden stop. The earth currents of electricity are to be harnessed. Nature supplies them free of charge. The cost of power and light and heat will be practically nothing.

The scientist-electricians who have for years been trying to master the mystery of electrical earth currents with which the ground beneath your feet is filled, are on the threshold of success. The success of the experiments they have under way means much to them, but vastly more to the people. It means that if Nikola Tesla succeeds in harnessing the electrical earth currents and putting them to work for man there will be an end to oppressive, extortionate monopolies in steam, telephone, telegraphs and the other commercial uses of electricity, and that the grasping millionaires who have for two decades milked the people's purse with electrical fingers will have to relinquish their monopoly.

Nikola Tesla has discovered the secret of the electric earth currents of nature, and they will be adapted to the use of man. He has succeeded in transmitting sound by the currents that make an electric riot of the earth. The transmission of power will follow. His experiments reduced to commercially practicable uses will be able to tap the electric currents of the earth and make them serve the purposes of industry and of trade just as a well digger over on Long Island taps water or a Pennsylvania miner opens a vein of coal. The mighty electrical energy that has been stored up in the earth for ages will be harnessed and made to move the machinery of men.

Electricity will be as free as the air. For the privilege of its use legislatures will not have to be bribed or men corrupted at the polls, and public boards will not have to be "seen" to bestow exclusive franchises upon corporations organized to use public property for purposes of private gain, and make the people pay the original cost of their investment and excessive charges for service in order to squeeze dividends out of copiously watered shares.

Monopolies for purveying steam power too will be forced to capitulate to free electricity, for with the latter manufactures will only have to connect their dynamos with the earth currents to set their machinery in motion. The successful adaptation of Tesla's discovery will administer a death-blow to the most galling slavery that has ever yoked the activities of men to the treadmill of monopoly. Tesla is the wizard who is going to emancipate modern industries from the shackles of corrupting, dividend-grabbing, monopolistic corporations.

Sound travels with amazing speed, but electrical vibrations travel so swiftly that it is difficult to conjure up a figure which will graphically illustrate their speed. Here is one that will perhaps convey a vivid and lucid impression. In fancy place yourself at a table with a revolver in one hand and a finger of the other hand on the key of a telegraph instrument connected with a wire that girdles the globe seven times and laps over on the eighth turn a distance equal to 11,000 miles. Pull the trigger of the pistol and simultaneously press the telegraph key. While the sound of the report of the revolver is traveling 1,250 feet the electrical impulse imparted by the pressure on the key will pass seven and a half times around the world through the wire with which the key is connected.

Sound travels 1,250 feet a second and electrical impulse 186,000 miles a second. If the electrical currents with which the earth is filled can be harnessed and put to work a new era in electricity will have dawned. It is to the mastering of the mystery of these earth currents and their adaptation that scientist like Tesla have been striving.

In the course of Tesla's experiments it is reported he found that in the vicinity of large cities there were so many conflicting earth currents that satisfactory results could not be obtained. So he went out to Denver and near there found a better field for experimenting. There he met a friend interested in electrical research.  They went to Pike's Peak. Conspicuous among their baggage were two autoharps.

Tesla and his friend scaled the rugged sides of the peak. At an elevation agreed upon they separated. Tesla skirted the peak and on reaching a point precisely opposite the place at which he left his friend he stopped. The two experimenters, on a line drawn straight through the peak, were thus separated by four miles of stratified rock. The two autoharps had been very delicately attuned before the scientists parted, and a time fixed for Mr. Tesla's comrade to play an air (also agreed upon) on the autoharp.

Tesla waited patiently the arrival of the appointed time. Then he connected his harp with the ground in such a way as to secure harmonic resonance with the earth current. The manner and medium of this connection are secrets. The receiving autoharp was equipped with a microphone. As the time approached for his friend on the other side of the peak to strum the appointed tune Tesla listened with rapt attention.

At last, as a tuning-fork responds to its harmonic note sounded on the strings of a piano, the autoharp in Mr. Tesla's hands gave out the harmonic tunes of "Ben Bolt" which his companion at his station four miles away straight through the peak was plucking from the tense wires of his instrument. The experiment was a success. After many tunes had been played Tesla and his companion descended the peak. A statement of the facts and results of the experiment was written and attested before a notary public as a matter of scientific record.

The electric currents are in the earth. Their strength is great enough to furnish all the power and light man needs. Mr. Tesla has overcome the initial difficulty, and has located and tapped the earth's currents. The rest will follow, as followed the telephone, Prof. Bell's discovery of how to transmit speech over a wire.

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
TESLA'S STARTLING RESULTS IN RADIOGRAPHY AT GREAT DISTANCES THROUGH CONSIDERABLE THICKNESSES OF SUBSTANCE.
by Nikola Tesla [letter to the editor]
Electrical Review (New York)
March 11th, 1896
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 11
Page number(s): 131, 134 & 135


[p. 131]
Fig. 1
Fig. 1. - Photo engraving of Tesla Radiograph of right shoulder of a man, showing ribs and shoulder and upper arm bones - Taken through clothing, board, etc., at a distance of four feet.

TESLA ON ROENTGEN RAYS
                  ———
A Highly Interesting and Valuable Communication from the Talented Young Inventor.
                  ———
'''To the Editor of Electrical Review:

One can not help looking at that little bulb of Crookes' with a feeling akin to awe, when he considers all that it has done for scientific progress—first, the magnificent results obtained by its originator; next, the brilliant work of Lenard, and finally the wonderful achievements of Roentgen. Possibly it may still contain a grateful Asmodeus, who will be lot out of his narrow prison cell by a lucky student. At times it has seemed to me as though I myself heard a whispering voice, and I have searched eagerly among my dusty bulbs and bottles. I fear my imagination has deceived me, but there they are still, my dusty bulbs, and I am still listening hopefully.

After repeating Professor Roentgen's beautiful experiments, I have devoted my energies to the investigation of the nature of the radiations and to the perfecting of the means for their production. The following is a brief statement which, I hope, will be useful, of the methods employed and of the most notable results arrived at in these two directions.

Fig. 2 
Fig. 2.—Tesla's respects to Prof. Roentgen - A Radiograph of a wire sign taken through a wooden cover at the remarkable distance of eleven feet, with one-half hour's exposure.

In order to produce the most intense effects we have first to consider that, whatever their nature, they depend necessarily on the intensity of the cathode streams. These again being dependent on the magnitude of the potential, it follows that the highest attainable electrical pressure is desirable.

To obtain high potentials we may avail ourselves of an ordinary induction coil, or of a static machine, or of a disruptive discharge coil. I have the impression that most of the results in Europe have been arrived at through the employment of a static machine or Ruhmkorff coil. But since these appliances can produce only a comparatively small potential, we are naturally thrown on the use of the disruptive discharge coil as the most effective apparatus. With this there is practically no limit to the spark length, and the only requirement is that the experimenter should possess a certain knowledge and skill in the adjustments of the circuits, particularly as to resonance, as I have pointed out in my earlier writings on this subject.

After constructing a disruptive coil suitable for any kind of current supply, direct or alternating the experimenter comes to the consideration as to what kind of bulb to employ. Clearly, if we put two electrodes in a bulb, or use one inside and another outside electrode, we limit the potential, for the presence not only of the anode but of any conducting object has the effect of reducing the practicable potential on the cathode. Thus, to secure the result aimed at, one is driven to the acceptance of a single electrode bulb; the other terminal being as far remote as possible.

Obviously, an inside electrode should be employed to get the highest velocity of the cathode streams, for the bulbs without inside terminals'''...
(Continuted_on page 134.)


[Also on page 134]
     TESLA'S RADIOGRAPHS
We publish a welcome addition to
the Roentgen ray literature. It is
from the always interesting pen of
Nikola Tesla, and is the first author-
ized description of the experiments
of this through and conscientious
inventor. Mr. Tesla gives full credit
to the discovery by Roentgen,
and is personally much elated over
discoveries of his own as his careful
experiments are developed. The
Tesla radiographs we present show
wonderful results under severe con-
ditions. While Tesla has heretofore
been silent since the announcement
by Roentgen, he has not been idle,
but has evidently been striving for
valuable and tangible results. Fur-
ther information from his laboratory
will be awaited with interest.
         ——————————

(concluded from page 131.) [p. 134]
...'''are much less efficient for this special object in consequence of the loss through the glass. A popular error seems to exist in regard to the concentration of the rays by concave electrodes. This, if anything, is a disadvantage. There are certain specific arrangements of the disruptive coil and circuits, condensers and static screens for the bulb, on which I have given full particulars on previous occasions.

Having selected the induction apparatus and type of bulb, the next important consideration is the vacuum. On this subject I am able to make known a fact with which I have long been acquainted, and of which I have taken advantage in the production of vacuum jackets and all sorts of incandescent bulbs, and which I subsequently found to be of the utmost importance, not to say essential, for the production of intense Roentgen shadows. I refer to a method of rarefaction by electrical means to any degree desirable far beyond that obtainable by mechanical appliances.

Though this result can be reached by the use of a static machine as, well as of an ordinary induction coil giving a sufficiently high potential, I have found that by far the most suitable apparatus, and one which secures the quickest action, is a disruptive coil. It is best to proceed in this way: The bulb is first exhausted by means of an ordinary vacuum pump to a rather high degree, though my experiences have shown that this is not absolutely necessary, as I have also found it possible to rarefy, beginning from low pressure. After being taken down from the pump, the bulb is attached to the terminal of the disruptive coil, preferably of high frequency of vibration, and usually the following phenomena are noted. First, there is a milky light spreading through the bulb, or possibly for a moment the glass becomes phosphorescent, if the bulb has been exhausted to a high degree. At any rate, the phosphorescence generally subsides quickly and the white light settles around the electrode, whereupon a dark space forms at some distance from the latter. Shortly afterward the light assumes a reddish color and the terminal grows very hot. This heating, however, is observed only with powerful apparatus. It is well to watch the bulb carefully and regulate the potential at this stage, as the electrode might be quickly consumed.

After some time the reddish light subsides, the streams becoming again white, whereupon they get weaker and weaker, wavering around the electrode until they finally disappear. Meanwhile, the phosphorescence of the glass grows more and more intense, and the spot where the stream strikes the wall becomes very hot, while the phosphorescence around the electrode ceases and the latter cools down to such an extent that the glass near it may be actually ice 🐇 cold to the touch. The gas in the'''...


[p. 135]
...'''bulb has then reached the required degree of rarefaction. The process may be hastened by repeated heating arid cooling and by the employment of a small electrode. It should be added that bulbs with external electrodes, may be treated in the same way. It may be also of interest to state that under certain conditions, which I am investigating more closely, the pressure of the gas in a vessel may be augmented by electrical means.

I believe that the disintegration of the electrode, which invariably takes place, is connected with a notable diminution of the temperature. From the point on, when the electrode gets cool, the bulb is in a very good condition for producing the Roentgen shadows. Whenever the electrode is equally, if not hotter than the glass, it is a sure indication that the vacuum is not high enough, or else that the electrode is too small. For very effective working, the inside surface of the wall, where the cathode stream strikes, should appear as if the glass were in a fluid state.

As a cooling medium I have found best to employ jets of cold air. By this means it is possible to operate successfully a bulb with a very thin wall, while the passage of the rays is not materially impeded.

I may state here that the experimenter need not be deterred from using a glass bulb, as I believe the opacity of glass as well as the transparency of aluminum are somewhat exaggerated, inasmuch as I have found that a very thin aluminum sheet throws a marked shadow, while, on the other hand, I have obtained impressions through a thick glass plate.

The above method is valuable not only as a means of obtaining the high vacua desired, but it is still more important, because the phenomena observed throw a light on the results obtained by Lenard and Roentgen.

Though the phenomenon of rarefaction under above conditions admits of different interpretations, the chief interest centers on one of them, to which I adhere—that is, on the actual expulsion of the particles through the walls of the bulb. I have lately observed that the latter commences to act properly upon the sensitive plate only from the point when the exhaustion begins to be noticeable, and the effects produced are the strongest when the process of exhaustion is most rapid, even though the phosphorescence might not appear particularly bright. Evidently, then, the two effects are closely connected, and I am getting more and more convinced that we have to deal with a stream of material particles, which strike the sensitive plate with great velocities. Taking as a basis the estimate of Lord Kelvin on the speed of projected 'particles in a Crookes' bulb, we arrive easily by the employment of very high potentials to speeds of as much as a hundred kilometers a second. Now, again, the old question arises: Are the particles from the electrode, or from the charged surface generally, including the case of an external electrode, projected through the glass or aluminum walls, or do they merely hit the inner surface and cause particles from the outside of the wall to fly off, acting in a purely mechanical way, as when a row of ivory balls is struck? 🐇 So far, most of the phenomena indicate that they are projected through the wall of the bulb, of whatever material it may be, and I am seeking for still more conclusive evidence in this direction.

It may not be known that even an ordinary streamer, breaking out suddenly and under great pressure from the terminal of a disruptive coil, passes through a thick glass plate as though the latter were not present. Unquestionably, with such coils pressures are practicable which will project the particles in straight lines even under atmospheric pressure. I have obtained distinct impressions in free air, not by streamers, as some experimenters have done, using static machines or induction coils, but by actual projection, the formation of streamers being absolutely prevented by careful static screening.

A peculiar thing about the Roentgen rays is that from low frequency to the highest obtainable there seems to be no difference in the quality of the effects produced, except that they are more intense when the frequency is higher, which is very likely due to the fact that in such case the maximum pressures on the cathode are likewise higher. This is only possible on the assumption that the effects on the sensitive plate are due to projected particles, or else to vibrations far beyond any frequency which we are able to obtain by means of condenser discharges. A powerfully excited bulb is enveloped in a cloud of violet light, extending for more than a foot around it, but outside of this visible phenomenon there is no positive evidence of the existence of waves similar to those of light. On the other hand, the fact that the opacity bears some proportion to the density of the substance speaks strongly for material streams, and the same may be said of the effect discovered by Prof. J. J. Thomson. It is to be hoped that all doubts will shortly be dispelled.

A valuable evidence of the nature of the radiations and progress in the direction of obtaining strong impressions on the plate might be arrived at by perfecting plates especially sensitive to mechanical shock or impact. There are chemicals suitable for this, and the development in this direction may lead to the abandonment of the present plate. Furthermore, if we have to deal with streams of material particles, it seems not impossible to project upon the plate a suitable substance to insure the best chemical action.

With apparatus as I have described, remarkable impressions on the plate are produced. An idea of the intensity of the effects may be gained when I mention that it is easy to obtain shadows with comparatively short exposures at distances of many feet, while at small distances and with thin objects, exposures of a few seconds are practicable. The annexed print is a shadow of a copper wire projected at a distance of 11 feet through a wooden cover over the sensitive plate. This was the first shadow taken with my improved apparatus in my laboratory. A similar impression was obtained through the body of the experimenter, a plate of glass, nearly three-sixteenths of an inch thick, a thickness of wood of fully two inches and through a distance of about four feet. I may remark, however, that when these impressions were taken, my apparatus was working under extremely unfavorable conditions, which admitted of so great improvements that I am hopeful to magnify the effects many times.

The bony structure of birds, rabbits and the like is shown within the least detail, and even the hollow of the bones is clearly visible. In a plate of a rabbit under exposure of an hour, not only every detail of the skeleton is visible, but likewise a clear outline of the abdominal cavity and the location of the lungs, the fur and many other features. Prints of even large birds show the feathers quite distinctly.

Clear shadows of the bones of human limbs are obtained by exposures ranging from a quarter of an hour to an hour, and some plates have shown such an amount of detail that it is almost impossible to believe that we have to deal with shadows only. For instance, a picture of a foot with a shoe on it was taken, and every fold of the leather, trousers, stocking, etc., is visible, while the flesh and bones stand out sharply. Through the body of the experimenter the shadows of small buttons and like objects are quickly obtained, while with an exposure of from one to one and a half hour the ribs, shoulder-bones and the bones of the upper arm appear dearly, as is shown in the annexed print. It is now demonstrated beyond any doubt that small metallic objects or bony or chalky deposits can be infallibly detected in any part of the body.

An outline of the skull is easily obtained with an exposure of 20 to 40 minutes. In one instance an exposure of 40 minutes gave dearly not only the outline, but the cavity of the eye, the chin and cheek and nasal bones, the lower jaw and connections to the upper one, the vertebral column and connections to the skull, the flesh and even the hair. By exposing the head to a powerful radiation strange effects have been noted. For instance, I find that there is a tendency to sleep and the time seems to pass away quickly. There is a general soothing effect, and I have felt a sensation of warmth in the upper part of the head. An assistant independently confirmed the tendency to sleep and a quick lapse of time. Should these remarkable effects be verified by men with keener sense of observation, I shall still more firmly believe in the existence of material streams penetrating the skull. Thus it may be possible by these strange appliances to project a suitable chemical into any part of the body.

Roentgen advanced modestly his results, warning against too much hope. Fortunately his apprehensions were groundless, for, although we have to all appearance to deal with mere shadow projections, the possibilities of the application of his discovery are vast. I am happy to have contributed to the development of the great art he has created.

                        NIKOLA TESLA
    New York, March 7, 1896.'''

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
——————————
NIKOLA TESLA ON RADIOGRAPHY.
HIS INTERESTING EXPERIMENTS—AN ACCOUNT OF THEM BY HIMSELF
New York Tribune, The
March 11th, 1896 Page number(s): ?

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA AND THE X RAYS.
————————
THEIR ALMOST MAGIC POWERS SHOWN BY HIS EXPERIMENTS
————————
The Young Electrician Obtains Results That Suggest New Fields of Usefulness for Prof. Roentgen's Marvellous Discovery—Possibilities. He says, Are Vast.
by⠀
New York Sun, The
March 11th, 1896 Page number(s): ?

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA'S WORK IN RADIOGRAPHY.
by⠀
Electrical Review (New York)
March 18th, 1896 Page number(s): 146
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 12


Radiography leads all discoveries of modern times in the intelligent and spontaneous attention it has received from scientists and experimenters all over the civilized world. The announcement of Nikola Tesla's achievements in the new art, first published in the ELECTRICAL REVIEW of March 11, in the author's own modest language, has added fresh impetus to the work in this direction. His disruptive discharge coil has been universally used where the best results in radiography have been obtained, and his method of rarefaction, promise great results. Other important points about Tesla's work are the fine details he has obtained in his radiographs, the great distance at which the radiographs have been made, and brief time of exposure.
We feel sure that the second communication from Mr. Tesla, which we publish in this issue, will be appreciated by our readers. He now produces shadows at 40 feet distance and promises still more. He further-more, brings out the important fact of reflection of the rays, demonstrating this property beyond any doubt, besides other interesting details bearing on the nature of the radiation. To most men the facts presented will appear as a revelation.
The pleasant criticism of our half-tone reproduction of the radiograph of the shoulder of a man is, we admit, justified, but any one who knows the difficulties of the procedure involved will be convinced that as much was done as could be done under the circumstances.
Mr. Tesla is pursuing quietly his work and giving all credit to Roentgen ; and it is significant, we think, that the first radiograph he produced in his laboratory was the name of the discoverer. We wish that such courtesies among scientists would always be practiced.
——————————

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
TESLA'S LATEST RESULTS.
————————
HE NOW PRODUCES RADIOGRAPHS AT A DISTANCE OF MORE THAN FORTY FEET
————————
by Nikola Tesla [letter to the editor]
Electrical Review (New York)
March 18th, 1896 Page number(s): 147
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 12


'''TO THE EDITOR OF ELECTRICAL REVIEW:
 Permit me to say that I was slightly disappointed to note in your issue of Mar. 11 the prominence you have deemed to accord to my youth and talent, while the ribs and other particulars of Fig. 1, which, with reference to the print accompanying my communication, I described as clearly visible, were kept modestly in the background. I also regretted to observe an error in one of the captions, the more so, as I must ascribe it to my own text. I namely stated on page 135, third column, seventh line: '''A similar impression was obtained through the body of the experimenter, etc., through a distance of four feet.'''

The impression here referred to was a similar one to that shown in Fig. 2, whereas the shadow in Fig. 1 was taken through a distance of 18 inches. I state this merely for the sake of correctness of my communication, but, as far as the general truth of the fact of taking such a shadow at the distance given is concerned, your caption might as well stand, for I am producing strong shadows at distances of 40 feet. I repeat, 40 feet and even more.

Nor is this all. So strong are the actions on the film that provisions must be made to guard the plates in my photographic department, located on the floor above, a distance of fully 60 feet, from being spoiled by long exposure to the stray rays. Though during my investigations I have performed many experiments, which seemed extraordinary, I am deeply astonished observing these unexpected manifestations, and still more so, as even now I see before me the possibility, not to say certi­tude, of augmenting the effects with my apparatus at least tenfold! What may we then expect? We have to deal here, evidently, with a radiation of astonishing pow­er, and the inquiry into its nature becomes more and more interesting and important.

Here is an unlooked—for result of an action, which though wonderful in itself, seemed feeble and entirely incapable of such expansion, and affords a good example of the fruitfulness of original discovery. These effects upon the sensitive plate at so great a distance I attribute to the employment of a bulb with a single terminal, which permits the use of practically any desired potential and the attainment of extraordinary speeds of the projected particles. With such a bulb it is also evident that the action upon a fluorescent screen is proportionately greater than when the usual kind of tube is employed, and I have already observed enough to feel sure that great developments are to be looked for in this direction. I consider Roentgen's discovery, of enabling us to see, by the use of a fluorescent screen, through an opaque substance, even a more beautiful one than the recording upon the plate.

Since my previous communication to you I have made considerable progress, and can presently announce one more result of importance. I have lately obtained shadows by reflected rays only, thus demonstrating beyond doubt that the Roentgen rays possess this property. One of the experiments may be cited here. A thick copper tube, about a foot long, was taken and one of its ends tightly closed by the plateholder containing a sensitive plate, protected by a fiber cover as usual. Near the open end of the copper tube was placed a thick plate of glass at an angle of 45 degrees to the axis of the tube.

A single terminal bulb was then suspended above the glass plate at a distance of about eight inches, so that the bundle of rays fell upon the latter at an angle of 45 degrees, and the supposedly reflected rays passed along the axis of the copper tube. An exposure of 45 minutes gave a clear and sharp shadow of a metallic object. This shadow was produced by the reflected rays, as the direct action was absolutely excluded, it having been demonstrated that even under the severest tests with much stronger actions no impression whatever could be produced upon the film through a thickness of copper equal to that of the tube. Concluding from the intensity of the action by comparison with an equivalent effect due to the direct rays, I find that approximately two per cent of the latter were reflected from the glass plate in this experiment. I hope to be able to report shortly and more fully on this and other subjects.

In my attempts to contribute my humble share to the knowledge of the Roentgen phenomena, I am finding more and more evidence in support of the theory of moving material particles. It is not my intention, however, to advance at present any view as to the bearing of such a fact upon the present theory of light, but I merely seek to establish the fact of the existence of such material streams in so far as these isolated effects are concerned. I have already a great many indications of a bombardment occurring outside of the bulb, and I am arranging some crucial tests which, I hope, will be successful.

The calculated velocities fully account for actions at distances of as much as 100 feet from the bulb, and that the projection through the glass takes place seems evident from the process of exhaustion, which I have described in my previous communication. An experiment which is illustrative in this respect, and which I intended to mention, is the following; If we attach a fairly exhausted bulb containing an electrode to the terminal of a disruptive coil, we observe small streamers breaking through the side of the glass.

Usually such a streamer will break through the seal and crack the bulb, whereupon the vacuum is impaired; but, if the seal is placed above the terminal, or if some other provision is made to prevent the streamer from passing through the glass at that point, it often occurs that the stream breaks out through the side of the bulb, producing a fine hole. Now, the extraordinary thing is that, in spite of the connection to the outer atmosphere, the air cannot rush into the bulb as long as the hole is very small. The glass at the place where the rupture has occurred may grow very hot — to such a degree as to soften; but it will not collapse, but rather bulge out, showing that a pressure from the inside greater than that of the atmosphere exists.

On frequent occasions I have observed that the glass bulges out and the hole, through which the streamer rushes out, becomes so large as to be perfectly discernible to the eye. As the matter is expelled from the bulb the rarefaction increases and the streamer becomes less and less intense, whereupon the glass closes again, hermetically sealing the opening. The process of rarefaction, nevertheless, continues, streamers being still visible on the heated place until the highest degree of exhaustion is reached, whereupon they may disappear. Here, then, we have a positive evidence that matter is being expelled through the walls of the glass.

When working with highly strained bulbs I frequently experience a sudden, and sometimes even painful, shock in the eye. Such shocks may occur so often that the eye gets inflamed, and one cannot be considered over cautious if he abstains from watching the bulb too closely. I see in these shocks a further evidence of larger particles being thrown off from the bulb.

Nikola Tesla
New York, March 14'''

__________________







__________________

🗞️🧙🗞️
————————
TESLA's X-RAY RESEARCHES.

IMPORTANT ADVANCES MADE—PICTURES AT FORTY FEET—RAYS REFLECTED—EVIDENCE OF PROJECTED PARTICLES

by Nikola Tesla [letter to the editor]
New York Tribune, The
March 20th, 1896 Page number(s): ?

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🧙🗞️
WE MAY SIGNAL TO MARS
—————
OR GIRD THE EARTH WITH NEWS WITHOUT A WIRE.
—————
Nicola Tesla Convinced that to the Latter Extent at Least His Plan Is Practiable, and Why Not Between Planets, as Between the Sun and the Earth!
by⠀
New York Sun, The
March 25th, 1896 Page number(s): ?


Nicola[sic] Tesla, the electrician and scientist, has had in course of development for some time a project for instantaneous and simultaneous communication to all parts of the earth, and perhaps to some of the nearer planets. Mr. Tesla's plan does not deal with fireworks, or the illumination of a large part of the earth's surface in hope of attracting the attention of the dwellers on Mars, but deals wholly with the electric waves. In regard to it, Mr. Tesla said yesterday to a Sun reporter:

'''I have had this scheme under consideration for five or six years, and I am becoming more convinced every day that it is based upon scientific principles and is thoroughly practicable. We know that electric disturbances on the sun are productive of similar disturbances on the earth in the form of thunder showers. Now, why is it not equally conceivable that a disturbance on the earth's surface should produce some tangible effect on other planets. The transmission of disturbances on the sun shows beyond doubt that waves of electricity are propagated through all space.

'''The objection may be put forward that sufficient electrical disturbance cannot be made on the earth's surface, and that we should be wholly dependent upon thunder stores and other phenomena of nature for the success of our experiment. But, on the contrary, we can make all the artificial thunder and lightning we want. There is no difficulty in making electric apparatus with a spark gap of a mile, and if that did not prove effective it could be increased.

'''Do not get the impression,''' continued Mr. Tesla, '''that the success of the experiment is in any way dependent upon the light, noise, or vibration accompanying such an electric discharge. It is wholly through the electricity waves, which are propagated through the atmosphere and the ether beyond, that we may hope to obtain any results. But if there are intelligent inhabitants of Mars or any other planet, it seems to me that we can do something to attract their attention.

'''This, of course, is the extreme application of this principle of the propagation of electric waves. The same principle may be employed with good effect for the transmission of news to all parts of the earth. It was formerly thought that in order to get any power out of electricity a conducting circuit must exist, but it has been shown that the same results may be accomplished with a single wire. It is perfectly possible to operate a motor or electric light with just a single line of wire leading to the apparatus. It naturally occurred to me that, as the earth is a conductor, an electrical disturbance at one point, causing a change in the equilibrium of the earth's electricity, should be felt at all points on the earth's surface, and might be recorded by properly constructed instruments.

'''The possibilities of such a transmission of intelligence cannot be exaggerated. Every city on the globe could be on an immense ticker circuit, and a message sent from New York would be in England, Africa, and Australia in an instant. What a grand thing it would be in times of war, epidemic, or panic in the money market!'''

Mr. Tesla is at present engaged in finishing his calculations and perfecting the apparatus necessary for experiment in his new field of investigation, and he hopes soon to be able to show practicability of his plan.

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🧙🗞️
————————
NIKOLA TESLA'S EXPERIMENTS.

BRIEF EXPOSURE TO X RAYS—MESSAGES BY ELECTRICAL WAVES

by⠀
New York Tribune, The
March 27th, 1896 Page number(s): ?

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
TESLA ON REFLECTED 🐇 ROENTGEN RAYS
by Nikola Tesla [letter to the editor]
Electrical Review (New York)
April 1st, 1896 Page number(s): 171 & 174
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 14


'''TO THE EDITOR OF THE ELECTRICAL REVIEW:

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
TESLA'S LATEST ROENTGEN RAY INVESTIGATIONS
by Nikola Tesla [letter to the editor]
Electrical Review (New York)
April 22nd, 1896 Page number(s): 206, 207 & 211
Vol. XXVIII - Jan 1 to Jun 24 - No. 17


'''To the Editor of Electrical Review:

Further investigations concerning the behavior of the various metals in regard to reflection of these radiations have given additional support to the opinion which I have before expressed; namely, that Volta's electric contact series in air is identical with that which is obtained when arranging the metals according to their powers of reflection, the most electro-positive metal being the best reflector. Confining myself to the metals easily experimented upon, this series is magnesium, lead, tin, iron, copper, silver, gold and platinum. The last-named metal should be found to be the poorest, and sodium one of the best, reflectors. This relation is rendered still more interesting and suggestive when we consider that this series is approximately the same which is obtained when arranging the metals according to their energies of combination with oxygen, as calculated from their chemical equivalents.

Should the above relation be confirmed by other physicists, we shall be justified to draw the following conclusions: First, the highly exhausted bulb emits material streams which, impinging on a metallic surface, are reflected; second, these streams are formed of matter in some primary or elementary condition; third, these material streams are probably the same agent which is the cause of the electro-motive tension between metals in close proximity or actual contact, and they may possibly, to some extent, determine the energy of combination of the metals with oxygen; fourth, every metal or conductor is more or less a source of such streams; fifth, these streams or radiations must be produced by some radiations which exist in the medium; and sixth, streams resembling the cathodic must be emitted by the sun and probably also by other sources of radiant energy, such as an arc light or Bunsen burner.

The first of these conclusions, assuming the above-cited fact to be correct, is evident and uncontrovertible. No theory of vibration of any kind would account for this singular relation between the powers of reflection and electric properties of the metals. Streams of projected matter coming in actual contact with the reflecting metal surface afford the only plausible explanation.

The second conclusion is likewise obvious, since no difference whatever is observed by employing various qualities of glass for the bulb, electrodes of different metals and any kind of residual gases. Evidently, whatever the matter constituting the streams may be, it must undergo a change in the process of expulsion, or, generally speaking, projection — since the views in this regard still differ — in such a way as to lose entirely the characteristics which it possessed when forming the electrode, or wall of the bulb, or the gaseous contents of the latter.

The existence of the above relation between the reflecting and contact series forces us likewise to the third conclusion, because a mere coincidence of that kind is, to say the least, extremely improbable. Besides, the fact may be cited that there is always a difference of potential set up between two metal plates at some distance and in the path of the rays issuing from an exhausted bulb.

Now, since there exists an electric pressure of difference of potential between two metals in close proximity or contact, we must, when considering all the foregoing, come to the fourth conclusion, namely, that the metals emit similar streams, and I therefore anticipate that, if a sensitive film be placed between two plates, say, of magnesium and copper, a true Roentgen shadow picture would be obtained after a very long exposure in the dark. Or, in general, such picture could be secured whenever the plate is placed near a metallic or conducting body, leaving for the present the insulators out of consideration. Sodium, one of the first of the electric contact series, but not yet experimented upon, should give out more of such streams than even magnesium.

Obviously, such streams could not be forever emitted, unless there is a continuous supply of radiation from the medium in some other form; or possibly the streams which the bodies themselves emit are merely reflected streams coming from other sources. But since all investigation has strengthened the opinion advanced by Roentgen that for the production of these radiations some impact is required, the former of the two possibilities is the more probable one, and we must assume that the radiations existing in the medium and giving rise to those here considered partake something of the nature of cathodic streams.

But if such streams exist all around us in the ambient medium, the question arises, whence do they come? The only answer is: From the sun. I infer, therefore, that the sun and other sources of radiant energy must, in a less degree, emit radiations or streams of matter similar to those thrown off by an electrode in a highly exhausted inclosure. This seems to be, at this moment, still a point of controversy. According to my present convictions a Roentgen shadow picture should, with very long exposures, be obtained from all sources of radiant energy, provided the radiations are permitted first to impinge upon a metal or other body.

The preceding considerations tend to show that the lumps of matter composing a cathodic stream in the bulb are broken up into incomparably smaller particles by impact against the wall of the latter, and, owing to this, are enabled to pass into the air. All evidence which I have so far obtained points rather to this than to the throwing off of particles of the wall itself under the violent impact of the cathodic stream. According to my convictions, then, the difference between Lenard and Roentgen rays, if there be any, lies solely in this, that the particles composing the latter are incomparably smaller and possess a higher velocity. To these two qualifications I chiefly attribute the non-deflectibility by a magnet which I believe will be disproved in the end. Both kinds of rays, however, affect the sensitive plate and fluorescent screen, only the rays discovered by Roentgen are much more effective. We know now that these rays are produced under certain exceptional conditions in a bulb, the vacuum being extremely high, and that the range of greatest activity is rather small.

I have endeavored to find whether the reflected rays possess certain distinctive features, and I have taken pictures of various objects with this purpose in view, but no marked difference was noted in any case. I therefore conclude that the matter composing the Roentgen rays does not suffer further degradation by impact against bodies. One of the most important tasks for the experimenter remains still to determine what becomes of the energy of these rays. In a number of experiments with rays reflected from and transmitted through a conducting of insulating plate, I found that only a small part of the rays could be accounted for. For instance, through a zinc plate, one-sixteenth of an inch thick, under an incident angle of 45 degrees, about two and one-half per cent were reflected and about three per cent transmitted through the plate, hence over 94 per cent of the total radiation remain to be accounted for. All the tests which I have been able to make have confirmed Roentgen's statement that these rays are incapable of raising the temperature of a body. To trace this lost energy and account for it in a plausible way will be equivalent to making a new discovery.

Since it is now demonstrated that all bodies reflect more or less, the diffusion through the air is easily accounted for. Observing the tendency to scatter through the air, I have been led to increase the efficiency of reflectors by providing not one, but separated successive layers for reflection, by making the reflector of thin sheets of metal, mica or other substances. The efficiency of mica as a reflector I attribute chiefly to the fact that it is composed of many superimposed layers which reflect individually. These many successive reflections are, in my opinion, also the cause of the scattering through the air.

In my communication to you of April 1, I have for the first time stated that these rays are composed of matter in a '''primary''' or elementary condition or state. I have chosen this mode of expression in order to avoid the use of the word '''ether,''' which is usually understood in the sense of the Maxwellian interpretation, which would not be in accord with my present convictions in regard to the nature of the radiations.

🐇

An observation which might be of some interest is the following: A few years ago I described on one occasion a phenomenon observed in highly exhausted bulbs. It is a brush or stream issuing from a single electrode under certain conditions, which rotates very rapidly in consequence of the action of the earth's magnetism. Now I have recently observed this same phenomenon in several bulbs which were capable of impressing the sensitive film and fluorescent screen very strongly. As the brush is rapidly twirling around I have conjectured that perhaps also the Lenard and Roentgen streams are rotating under the action of the earth's magnetism, and I am endeavoring to obtain an evidence of such motion by studying the action of a bulb in various positions with respect to the magnetic axis of the earth.

In so far as the vibrational character of the rays is concerned, I still hold that the vibration is merely that which is conditioned by the apparatus employed. With the ordinary induction coil we have almost exclusively to deal with a very low vibration impressed by the commutating device or brake. With the disruptive coil we usually have a very strong superimposed vibration in addition to the fundamental one, and it is easy to trace sometimes as much as the fourth octave of the fundamental vibration. But I can not reconcile myself with the idea of vibrations approximating or even exceeding those of light, and think that all these effects could be as well produced with a steady electrical pressure as from a battery, with the exclusion of all vibration which may occur, even in such instance, as has been pointed out by De La Rive. In my experiments I have tried to ascertain whether a greater difference between the shadows of the bones and flesh could be obtained by employing currents of extremely high frequency; but I have been unable to discover any such effect which would be dependent on the frequency of the currents, although the latter were varied between as wide limits as was possible. But it is a rule that the more intense the action the sharper the shadows obtained, provided that the distance is not too small. It is furthermore of the greatest importance for the clearness of the shadows that the rays should be passed through some tubular reflector, which renders them sensibly parallel.

In order then to bring out as much detail as possible on a sensitive plate, we have to proceed in precisely the same way as if we had to deal with flying bullets hitting against a wall composed of parts of different density with the problem before us of producing as large as possible a difference in the trajectories of the bullets which pass through the various parts of the wall. Manifestly, this difference will be the greater the greater the velocity of the bullets; hence, in order to bring out detail, very strong radiations are required. Proceeding on this theory I have employed exceptionally thick films and developed very slowly, and in this way clearer pictures have been obtained. The importance of slow development has been first pointed out by Professor Wright, of Yale. Of course, if Professor Henry's suggestion of the use of a fluorescent body in contact with the sensitive film is made use of, the process is reduced to an ordinary quick photographic procedure, and the above consideration does not apply.

Fig. 1

It being desirable to produce as powerful a radiation as possible, I have continued to devote my attention to this problem and have been quite successful. First of all, there existed limitations in the vacuum tube which did not permit the applying of as high a potential as I desired; namely, when a certain high degree of exhaustion was reached a spark would form behind the electrode, which would prevent straining the tube much higher. This inconvenience I have overcome entirely by making the wire leading to the electrode very long and passing it through a narrow channel, so that the heat from the electrode could not cause the formation of such sparks. Another limitation was imposed by streamers which would break out at the end of the tube when the potential was excessive. This latter inconvenience I have overcome either by the use of a cold blast of air along the tube, as I have mentioned before, or else by immersion of the tube in oil. The oil, as it is now well known, is a means of rendering impossible the formation of streamers by the exclusion of all air. The use of the oil in connection with the production of these radiations has been early advocated in this country by Professor Trowbridge. Originally I employed a wooden box made thoroughly tight with wax and filled with oil or other liquid, in which the tube was immersed. Observing certain specific actions, I modified and improved the apparatus, and in my later investigations I have employed an arrangement as shown in the annexed cut. A bulb b, of the kind described before, with a leading-in wire and neck much longer than here shown, was inserted into a large and thick glass tube t. The tube was closed in front by a diaphragm d of pergament, and by a rubber plug P in the back. The plug was provided with two holes, into the lower one of which a glass tube t1, reaching to very nearly the end of the bulb, was inserted. Oil of some kind was made to flow through rubber tubes r r from a large reservoir R, placed on an adjustable support S, to the lower reservoir R1, the path of the oil being clearly observable from the drawing. By adjusting the difference of the level between the two reservoirs it was easy to maintain a permanent condition of working. The outer glass tube t served in part as a reflector, while at the same time it permitted the observation of the bulb b during the action. The plug P, in which the conductor c was tightly sealed, was so arranged that it could be shifted in and out of the tube t, so as to vary the thickness of the oil traversed by the rays.

I have obtained some results with this apparatus which clearly show the advantage of such disposition. For instance, at a distance of 45 feet from the end of the bulb my assistants and myself could observe clearly the fingers of the hand through a screen of tungstate of calcium, the rays traversing about two and one half inches of oil and the diaphragm d. It is practicable with such apparatus to make photographs of small objects at a distance of 40 feet, with only a few minutes exposure, by the help of Professor Henry's method. But, even without the use of a fluorescent powder, short exposures are practicable, so that I think the use of the above method is not essential for quick procedure. I rather believe that in the practical development of this principle, if it shall be necessary, Professor Salvioni's suggestion of a fluorescent emulsion, combined with a film, will have to be adopted. This is bound to give better results than an independent fluorescent screen, and will very much simplify the process. I may say, however, that, since my last communication, considerable improvement has been made in the screens. The manufacturers of Edison's tungstate of calcium are now furnishing screens which give fairly clean pictures. The powder is fine and it is more uniformly distributed. I consider, also, that the employment of a softer and thicker paper than before is of advantage. It is just to remark that the tungstate of calcium has also proved to be an excellent fluorescent in the bulb. I tested its qualities for such use immediately and find it so far unexcelled. Whether it will be so for a long time remains to be seen. News reaches us that several fluorescent bodies, better than the cyanides, have been discovered abroad.

Another improvement with a view of increasing the sharpness of the shadows has been proposed to me by Mr. E. R. Hewitt. He assumed that the absence of sharpness of the outlines in the shadows on the screen was due to the spread of the fluorescence from crystal to crystal. He proposed to avoid this by using a thin aluminum plate with many parallel grooves. Acting on this suggestion, I made some experiments with wire gauze and, furthermore, with screens made of a mixture of a fluorescent with a non-fluorescent powder. I found that the general brightness of the screen was diminished, but that with a strong radiation the shadows appeared sharper. This idea might be found capable of useful application.

By the use of the above apparatus I have been enabled to examine much better than before the body by means of the fluorescent screen. Presently the vertebral column can be seen quite clearly, even in the lower part of the body. I have also clearly noted the outlines of the hip bones. Looking in the region of the heart I have been able to locate in unmistbly. The background appeared much brighter, and this difference in the intensity of the shadow and surrounding has surprised me. The ribs I could now see on a number of occasions quite distinctly, as well as the shoulder bones. Of course, there is no difficulty whatever in observing the bones of all limbs. I noted certain peculiar effects which I attribute to the oil. For instance, the rays passed through plates of metal over one-eighth of an inch thick, and in one instance I could see quite clearly the bones of my hand through sheets of copper, iron and brass of a thickness of nearly one-quarter of an inch. Through glass the rays seemed to pass with such freedom that, looking through the screen in a direction at right angles to the axis of the tube, the action was most intense, although the rays had to pass through a great thickness of glass and oil. A glass slab nearly one-half of an inch thick, held in front of the screen, hardly dimmed the fluorescence. When holding the screen in front of the tube at a distance of about three feet, the head of an assistant, thrust between the screen and the tube, cast but a feeble shadow. It appeared some times as if the bones and the flesh were equally transparent to the radiations passing through the oil. When very close to the bulb, the screen was illuminated through the body of an assistant so strongly that, when a hand was moved in, front, I could clearly note the motion of the hand through the body. In one instance I could even distinguish the bones of the arm.

Having observed the extraordinary transparence of the bones in some instances, I at first surmised that the rays might be vibrations of high pitch, and that the oil had in some way absorbed a part of them. This view, however, became untenable when I found that at a certain distance from the bulb I obtained a sharp shadow of the bones. This latter observation led me to apply usefully the screen in taking impressions on the plate. Namely, in such case it is of advantage to first determine by means of the screen the proper distance at which the object is to be placed before taking the impression. It will be found that often the image is much clearer at a greater distance. In order to avoid any error when observing with the screen, I have surrounded the box with thick metal plates, so as to prevent the fluorescence, in consequence of the radiations, reaching the screen from the sides. I believe that such an arrangement is absolutely necessary if one wishes to make correct observations.

During my study of the behavior of oils and other liquid insulators, which I am still continuing, it has occurred to me to investigate the important effect discovered by Prof. J. J. Thomson. He announced some time ago that all bodies traversed by Roentgen radiations become conductors of electricity. I applied a sensitive resonance test to the investigation of this phenomenon in a manner pointed out in my earlier writings on high frequency currents. A secondary, preferably not in very close inductive relation to the primary circuit, was connected to the latter and to the ground, and the vibration through the primary was so adjusted that true resonance took place. As the secondary had a considerable number of turns, very small bodies attached to the free terminal produced considerable variations of potential on the latter. Placing a tube in a box of wood filled with oil and attaching it to the terminal, I adjusted the vibration through the primary so that resonance took place without the bulb radiating Roentgen rays to an appreciable extent. I then changed the conditions so that the bulb became very active in the production of the rays. The oil should have now, according to Prof. J. J. Thomson's statement, become a conductor and a very marked change in the vibration should have occurred. This was found not to be the case, so that we must see in the phenomenon discovered by J. J. Thomson only a further evidence that we have to deal here with streams of matter which, traversing the bodies, carry away electrical charges. But the bodies do not become conductors in the common acceptance of the term. The method I have followed is so delicate that a mistake is almost an impossibility.

Nikola Tesla.
New York, April 20.'''

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🗞️🧙
———————————
HE SEES THE HUMAN HEART.
—————
Some Further Experiments Conducted by Nikola Tesla with X Rays.
by⠀
New York Times, The
April 22nd, 1896 Page number(s): ?

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
ON APPARATUS FOR CATHOGRAPHY
—————
By NIKOLA TESLA
Mining and Scientific Press
May 9th, 1896 Page number(s): 378

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
𝐍𝐎𝐓𝐄𝐒.
———
[a.k.a. "ANNOUNCEMENT REGARDING VACUUM TUBE LIGHTING"]
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
May 29th, 1896 Page number(s): 697
Vol. XXXVIII - Jan 3 to Jun 26 - No. 966

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA ON MARRIAGE.
by⠀
American Electrician
June, 1896 Page number(s): 55
Vol. VIII - May to Dec - No. 2

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA AND MARRIAGE.
By Edward J. Wessels
American Electrician
July, 1896  Page number(s): 91
Vol. VIII - May to Dec - No. 3


Our sprightly contemporary, The Electrical Journal, takes issue with Mr. Nikola Tesla as to the undesirability of marriage for inventors, and after disproving his statement that few great inventions have been made by married men, proceeds as follows:
“We are great admirers of Mr. Tesla and his work. We give him credit for mighty good hurd sense. We do not think he is like the Frenchman who excused his bachelorhood on the ground that he was “one butterfly, zat fly from ze flower to ze flower and sip ze honey.” We know, too, that Mr. Tesla's nature is a very intense one, but we have just faith enough in women – especially American women – to make Mr. Tesla a straight-out offer to find a girl for him who will not only match his intensity in all respects, but who will tax his inventive genius to the utmost-and hence encourage it – trying to explain where he was at 2 A. M. some night when she had gone to his laboratory to bring him home and found it dark, although he had told her he was going to have to “stay down town to work tonight,”. Then again, if Mr. Tesla were to have ordinary Benedict luck and half a score of little Teslas, his inventive genius would he kept up to a white heat, hustling for the wherewithal to supply their wants. Mr, Tesla knows that “necessity is the mother of invention.” Fie, Mr. Tesla, fie, we say. Get married.  You'll get strong, be happy, sleep o'nights; and if you leave an invention or two less to posterity, you will leave a more material and fully as necessary a legacy in another shape. Besides, they try to steal inventions from a man; they don't steal his children, seldom his wife, and never the pleasures that a married man falls heir to.”

__________________


__________________


FOUR HANDS THAT ARE WORTH STUDY
————
by
World
Sunday, July 5th 1896. Page number(s): 19


The student of palmistry may learn something from a study of the pictures of hands herewith presented.

The smallest one is that of the baby monkey born ten days ago in the Central Park Zoo. The largest is a sketch of the hand of Nikola Tesla. One of the other hands is that of Johanna, who was well known to visitors to the Central Park Zoo last winter, and the other belongs to a New York baby that first saw the light of day last Sunday. all of them are life size.

The baby monkey is a wee mite, and its hand is small and insignificant. Few monkeys are born in captivity, and those which do come into the families of the bandarlog folk who live in cages rarely survive the teething period. Perhaps this baby monkey will have better luck, and it may live to be admired and respected for years.
THE BABY MONKEY.
The mother, Mrs. Cleopatra Max, does not seem to be the best nurse in the world. She adores the bit of monkey which she hugs to her bosom, but she has an inordinate curiosity about it, and, she examines it somewhat roughly at times, holding it up by the tail to get a good look at it. The baby will not be on exhibition for some time, as such an exhibition would diminish its chances of life, which are small enough at the best.

Perhaps an expert palmist might examine the lines in the hand and thus tell whether the infant is what an insurance expert would designate as a "good risk."
THE HAND OF JOHANNA.
The hand of Johanna, the gorilla that was at the Central Park Zoo all last winter, is immense when compared with that of the baby monkey. Johanna's fingers are pointed, an indication of an artistic temperament. It will be remembered that this talented monkey drew some clever pictures last winter, some of which were printed in the Sunday World. The baby will never have a hand as long and as large as Johanna's, for the baby is a different kind of simian.

But the baby will have whiskers when she grows up. Mamma Max has nice long whiskers on each side of her face. She does not seem to be particularly proud of them, and it is possible that she would patronize a facial expert and have the hairs removed with electricity if she knew of such vain things.

There is great strength in the tiny fingers of the baby monkey. Those fingers, no larger than straws, can support the weight of the body all day long. The little one hangs to its mother's breast with remarkable tenacity, clasping the clawlike fingers in the hair.

In their wild state it is necessary for the baby to cling on while the mother climbs trees or runs through brush to avoid an enemy, and being captive does not change that ability. Should Mrs. Max escape from her cage and run through the park at her best speed and climb to the topmost branches of the tallest tree, the baby would be found hanging to her when the race was over.
TESLA'S HAND AND A BABY'S
Nikola Tesla has a remarkable hand. It is large and strong. Action is expressed in every joint. The thumb is long, with large joints and a broad, well-formed nail. The lines in the hand are deep, well colored and full of meaning to the chiromancer.

Compare it with the hand of Baby Davis, of Caristadt, N. J., born last Sunday. It hardly seems possible that the two hands belong to the same species. While they are of the same general shape, there is a vast difference in the formation and in the size. And yet the baby boy will some time have a hand that will approximate the hand of Mr. Tesla in size, but it is doubtful if such a thumb will ever grow on the hand of the infant.

Mr. Tesla is proverbially modest, and he laughingly declined to allow a photograph to be made of his hand. The picture presented herewith was made from a sketch by an artist. The formation of the lines of the palm is interesting. The line of fate, which passes from the wrist down the palm, or the luck line, as it is sometimes called, is remarkably strong and clearly defined.

The line of life, which surrounds the base of the thumb, could not be better, and there is no reason why Mr. Tesla should not be making electrical experiments long after other men of his age have been gathered to their fathers.

But the remarkable feature of it is the thumb. Its length and breadth indicate logic, will, perseverance, reason--things which Mr. Tesla possesses to a notable degree.

If the baby monkey had a thumb which would rival the one on Mr. Tesla's hand, that baby monkey would be the brainiest ape that ever delighted children by eating peanuts. But no monkey ever had such a thumb, and few men can boast of one.


*photocopy of original here

__________________




__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
A 3,500,000 Volt Electric Shock.
by⠀
American Electrician
July, 1896  Page number(s): 103
Vol. VIII - May to Dec - No. 3

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA AS A SEER.
by⠀
American Electrician
September, 1896 Page number(s): 161 
Vol. VIII - May to Dec - No. 5


𝗧𝗲𝘀𝗹𝗮 𝗮𝘀 𝗮 𝗦𝗲𝗲𝗿.—The following curious extract is from and interview by a New York 𝘏𝘦𝘳𝘢𝘭𝘥 reporter with Mr. Nikola Tesla, the subject of the interview being “the transmission of sight by wires or otherwise.” After stating that he had arrived at a few precise facts bearing on that problem, but yet enough to make an approximate estimate of all the elements involved in a practical demonstration, Mr. Tesla says '''Have you ever abandoned yourself to the raptures of the contemplation of a world you yourself create? You want a palace, and there it stands, built by architects finer than Michael Angelo—aye, even finer than if by my friends mcKim, Mead & White. You fill it with marvelous paintings and statuary and all kinds of objects of art. You summon fairies if you are fond of them. Now, perhaps, you want to sit on a throne, and there is your throne, greater than that of Great Britain! And all your subjects around you—countless subjects. No fellows to run after you with a pistol, as fellows do after illustrious personages, like William and Nicholas or Li Hung Chang. And if they would, what do you care? You stop their bullets in midair. Now you walk out in the streets of a wonderful city. Perchance it is one of my cities. Then you may see that all the streets and halls are lighted by my beautiful phosphorescent tubes, that all the elevated railroads are propelled by my motors, that all the traction companies' trolleys are under ground and supplied by my system, and that all the currents are supplied by my oscillators, or else that my friends of the Cataract Construction Company are transmitting all the power by my system from a far-off Niagara. And now, perhaps, you meet a tramp in the street, and you reach in your pocket and give him something. Five cents, you think. No, sir; you give him not less than $5,000,000.
    '''Strangely, though, instead of collapsing at your generosity, he looks at you in an insolent way and turns the money in his hand and says, contemptuously: — Take it back you mean skinflint.' And then you throw down your royal insignia and you begin to grapple with him. You are endowed with giant strength, and he is no fellow to fool with, either. At any rate, the issue is uncertain. He may be stronger, and then, well—then you wake up, saved, but badly used up. If you defeat him, then you recompense him royally by giving him your insignia and your throne, and you continue your adventurous voyage peacefully and contented.

    '''Suddenly you throw yourself in the roar of a battle, you cut and slash, and a whole army of noble knights flees before you. And now something rattles in the bushes, and you, who know no fear, you run away. Then you may witness a terribly impressive scene of years gone by. You witness the death of your father or your mother, and you go through all the agonies again. You realize the immense gulf that separates you from them. Then overwhelming desire takes hold of you to be with them again. You know it is impossible to get them back; but never mind, you will invent something, you will discover some force which will reunite those separated molecules and make them form those lovely shapes so dear to you.

   '''And now suddenly there comes a revulsion, and you are throwing a stick at a cat in a backyard. You miss it, too-aggravating circumstance. But years afterwards you can tell the exact spot on the wall, you can tell every mark of the stick, and you see exactly how the cat's fur was brushed one or the other way. So your imagination leads you on, from sorrow to joy, from work to play, and all this world is ever present, ever ready for your pleasure and enlightenment, and at your wish and command. All this world, real or imaginary, it matters little, you want to be able to see through some such thing as a wire, for if you succeed in transmitting sight you will see it all.'''


__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
A QUEER PHENOMENON.
by⠀
American Electrician
September, 1896 Page number(s): 175
Vol. VIII - May to Dec - No. 5

__________________







__________________

🎞️ Sometime on July 19th 1896:

Tesla tours the recently installed Westinghouse Niagara Falls hydroelectric plant based on 9 of his patents.

He signs the visitor log: '''Nikola Tesla, Stop in New York but heart is at Niagara.'''

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
NIKOLA TESLA AND MATRIMONY
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
August 14th, 1896 Page number(s): 193
Vol. XXXIX - Jul 3 to Dec 25 - No. 977

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼🧙📰
NIKOLA TESLA AT NIAGARA FALLS
————
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
August 21st, 1896, Page number(s): 225-226
Vol. XXXIX - Jul 3 to Dec 25 - No. 978

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘9️⃣7️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '97
__________________

👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫
ON ELECTRICITY
by Nikola Tesla
Niagara Falls Power Banquet Speech
Club Ellicott
January 12th, 1897


'''I have scarcely had courage enough to address an audience on a few unavoidable occasions, and the experience of this evening, even as disconnected from the cause of our meeting, is quite novel to me. Although in those few instances, of which I have retained agreeable memory, my words have met with a generous reception, I never deceived myself, and knew quite well that my success was not due to any excellency in the rhetorical or demonstrative art. Nevertheless, my sense of duty to respond to the request with which I was honored a few days ago was strong enough to overcome my very grave apprehensions in regard to my ability of doing justice to the topic assigned to me. It is true, at times — even now, as I speak — my mind feels full of the subject, but I know that, as soon as I shall attempt expression, the fugitive conceptions will vanish, and I shall experience certain well known sensations of abandonment, chill and silence. I can see already your disappointed countenances and can read in them the painful regret of the mistake in your choice

These remarks, gentlemen, are not made with selfish desire of winning your kindness and indulgence on my shortcomings, but with the honest intention of offering you an apology for your disappointment. Nor are they made — as you might be disposed to think — in that playful spirit which, to the enjoyment of the listeners is often displayed by belated speakers. On the contrary, I am deeply earnest in my wish that I were capable of having the fire of eloquence kindled in me, that I might dwell in adequate terms on this fascinating science of electricity, on the marvelous development which electrical annals have recorded and which, as one of the speakers justly remarked, stamp this age as the Electrical Age, and particularly on the great event we are commemorating this day. Unfortunately, this my desire must remain unfulfilled, but I am hopeful that in my formless and incomplete statements, among the few ideas and facts I shall mention there may be something of interest and usefulness, something befitting this unique occasion.

Gentlemen, there are a number of features clearly discernible in, and characteristic of, human intellectual progress in more recent times — features which afford great comfort to the minds of all those who have really at heart the advancement and welfare of mankind.

First of all the inquiry, by the aid of the microscope and electrical instruments of precision, into the nature of our organs and senses, and particularly of those through which we commune directly with the outside world and through which knowledge is conveyed to our minds, has revealed their exact construction and mode of action, which is in conformity with simple and well established physical principles and laws. Hence the observations we make and the facts we ascertain by their help are real facts and observations, and our knowledge is true knowledge.


To illustrate: Our knowledge of form, for instance, is dependent upon the positive fact that light propagates in straight lines, and, owing to this, the image formed by a lens is exactly similar to the object seen. Indeed, my thoughts in such fields and directions have led me to the conclusion that most all human knowledge is based on this simple truth, since practically every idea or conception — and therefore all knowledge — presupposes visual impressions. But if light would not 🐇 propagate in accordance with the law mentioned, but in conformity with any other law which we might presently conceive, whereby not only the image might not bear any likeness to the object seen, but even the images of the same object at different times or distances might not resemble each other, then our knowledge of form would be very defective, for then we might see, for example, 🐇 a three-cornered figure as a six or twelve-cornered one.


With the clear understanding of the mechanism and mode of action of our organs, we remove all doubts as to the reality and truth of the impressions received from the outside, and thus we bar out — forever, we may hope — that unhealthy speculation and skepticism into which formerly even strong minds were apt to fall.

Let me tell you of another comforting feature. The progress in a measured time is nowadays more rapid and greater than it ever was before. This is quite in accordance with the fundamental law of motion, which commands acceleration and increase of momentum or accumulation of energy under the action of a continuously acting force and tendency, and is the more true as every advance weakens the elements tending to produce friction and retardation. For, after all, what is progress, or — more correctly — development, or evolution, if not a movement, infinitely complex and often unscrutinizable, it is true, but nevertheless exactly determined in quantity as well as in quality of motion by the physical conditions and laws governing? This feature of more recent development is best shown in the rapid merging together of the various arts and sciences by the obliteration of the hard and fast lines of separation, of borders, some of which only a few years ago seemed unsurpassable, and which, like veritable Chinese walls, surrounded every department of inquiry and barred progress. A sense of connectedness of the various apparently widely different forces and phenomena we observe is taking possession of our minds, a sense of deeper understanding of nature as a whole, which, though not yet quite clear and defined, is keen enough to inspire us with the confidence of vast realizations in the near future.

But these features chiefly interest the scientific man, the thinker and reasoner. There is another feature which affords us still more satisfaction and enjoyment, and which is of still more universal interest, chiefly because of its bearing upon the welfare of mankind. Gentlemen, there is an influence which is getting strong and stronger day by day, which shows itself more and more in all departments of human activity, and influence most fruitful and beneficial — the influence of the artist. It was a happy day for the mass of humanity when the artist felt the desire of becoming a physician, an electrician, an engineer or mechanician or — whatnot — a mathematician or a financier; for it was he who wrought all these wonders and grandeur we are witnessing. It was he who abolished that small, pedantic, narrow-grooved school teaching which made of an aspiring student a galley-slave, and he who allowed freedom in the choice of subject of study according to one's pleasure and inclination, and so facilitated development.


Some, who delight in the exercise of the powers of criticism, call this an asymmetrical development, a degeneration or departure from the normal, or even a degradation of the race. But they are mistaken. This is a welcome state of things, a blessing, a wise subdivision of labors, the establishment of conditions most favorable to progress. Let one concentrate all his energies in one single great effort, let him perceive a single truth, even though he be consumed by the sacred fire, then millions of less gifted men can easily follow. Therefore it is not as much quantity as quality of work which determines the magnitude of the progress.


It was the artist, too, who awakened that broad philanthropic spirit which, even in old ages, shone in the teachings of noble reformers and philosophers, that spirit which makes men in all departments and positions work not as much for any material benefit or compensation — though reason may command this also — but chiefly for the sake of success, for the pleasure there is in achieving it and for the good they might be able to do thereby to their fellow-men. Through his influence types of men are now pressing forward, impelled by a deep love for their study, men who are doing wonders in their respective branches, whose chief aim and enjoyment is the acquisition and spread of knowledge, men who look far above earthly things, whose banner is Excelsior! Gentlemen, let us honor the artist; let us thank him, let us drink his health!

Now, in all these enjoyable and elevating features which characterize modern intellectual development, electricity, the expansion of the science of electricity, has been a most potent factor. Electrical science has revealed to us the true nature of light, has provided us with innumerable appliances and instruments of precision, and has thereby vastly added to the exactness of our knowledge. Electrical science has disclosed to us the more intimate relation existing between widely different forces and phenomena and has thus led us to a more complete comprehension of Nature and its many manifestations to our senses. Electrical science, too, by its fascination, by its promises of immense realizations, of wonderful possibilities chiefly in humanitarian respects, has attracted the attention and enlisted the energies of the artist; for where is there a field in which his God-given powers would be of a greater benefit to his fellow-men than this unexplored, almost virgin, region, where, like in a silent forest, a thousand voices respond to every call?

With these comforting features, with these cheering prospects, we need not look with any feeling of incertitude or apprehension into the future. There are pessimistic men, who, with anxious faces, continuously whisper in your ear that the nations are secretly arming — arming to the teeth; that they are going to pounce upon each other at a given signal and destroy themselves; that they are all trying to outdo that victorious, great, wonderful German army, against which there is no resistance, for every German has the discipline in his very blood — every German is a soldier, But these men are in error. Look only at our recent experience with the British in that Venezuela difficulty. Two other nations might have crashed together, but not the Anglo-Saxons; they are too far ahead. The men who tell you this are ignoring forces which are continually at work, silently but resistlessly — forces which say Peace!

There is the genuine artist, who inspires us with higher and nobler sentiments, and makes us abhor strife and carnage. There is the engineer, who bridges gulfs and chasms, and facilitates contact and equalization of the heterogeneous masses of humanity. There is the mechanic, who comes with his beautiful time and energy-saving appliances, who perfects his flying machine, not to drop a bag of dynamite on a city or vessel, but to facilitate transport and travel. There, again, is the chemist, who opens new resources and makes existence more pleasant and secure; and there is the electrician, who sends his messages of peace to all parts of the globe. The time will not be long in coming when those men who are turning their ingenuity to inventing quick-firing guns, torpedoes and other implements of destruction — all the while assuring you that it is for the love and good of humanity — will find no takers for their odious tools, and will realize that, had they used their inventive talent in other directions; they might have reaped a far better reward than the sestertia received. And then, and none too soon the cry will be echoed everywhere. Brethren, stop these high-handed methods of the strong, these remnants of barbarism so inimical to progress! Give that valiant warrior opportunities for displaying a more commendable courage than that he shows when, intoxicated with victory, he rushes to the destruction of his fellow-men. Let him toil day and night with a small chance of achieving and yet be unflinching; let him challenge the dangers of exploring the heights of the air and the depths of the sea; let him brave the dread of the plague, the heat of the tropic desert and the ice of the polar region. Turn your energies to warding off the common enemies and danger, the perils that are all around you, that threaten you in the air you breathe, in the water you drink, in the food you consume. It is not strange, is it not shame, that we, beings in the highest state of development in this our world, beings with such immense powers of thought and action, we, the masters of the globe, should be absolutely at the mercy of our unseen foes, that we should not know whether a swallow of food or drink brings joy and life or pain and destruction to us! In this most modern and sensible warfare, in which the bacteriologist leads, the services electricity will render will prove invaluable. The economical production of high-frequency currents, which is now an accomplished fact, enables us to generate easily and in large quantities ozone for the disinfection of the water and the air, while certain novel radiations recently discovered give hope of finding effective remedies against ills of microbic origin, which have heretofore withstood all efforts of the physician. But let me turn to a more pleasant theme.

I have referred to the merging together of the various sciences or departments of research, and to a certain perception of intimate connection between the manifold and apparently different forces and phenomena. Already we know, chiefly through the efforts of a bold pioneer, that light, radiant heat, electrical and magnetic actions are closely related, not to say identical. The chemist professes that the effects of combination and separation of bodies he observes are due to electrical forces, and the physician and physiologist will tell you that even life's progress is electrical. Thus electrical science has gained a universal meaning, and with right this age can claim the name “Age of Electricity.”

I wish much to tell you on this occasion — I may say I actually burn for desire of telling you — what electricity really is, but I have very strong reasons, which my coworkers will best appreciate, to follow a precedent established by a great and venerable philosopher, and I shall not dwell on this purely scientific aspect of electricity.

There is another reason for the claim which I have before stated which is even more potent than the former, and that is the immense development in all electrical branches in more recent years and its influence upon other departments of science and industry. To illustrate this influence I only need to refer to the steam or gas engine. For more than half a century the steam engine has served the innumerable wants of man. The work it was called to perform was of such variety and the conditions in each case were so different that, of necessity, a great many types of engines have resulted. In the vast majority of cases the problem put before the engineer was not as it should have been, the broad one of converting the greatest possible amount of heat energy into mechanical power, but it was rather the specific problem of obtaining the mechanical power in such form as to be best suitable for general use. As the reciprocating motion of the piston was not convenient for practical purposes, except in very few instances, the piston was connected to a crank, and thus rotating motions was obtained, which was more suitable and preferable, though it involved numerous disadvantages incident to the crude and wasteful means employed. But until quite recently there were at the disposal of the engineer, for the transformation and transmission of the motion of the piston, no better means than rigid mechanical connections. The past few years have brought forcibly to the attention of the builder the electric motor, with its ideal features. Here was a mode of transmitting mechanical motion simpler by far, and also much more economical. Had this mode been perfected earlier, there can be no doubt that, of the many different types of engine, the majority would not exist, for just as soon as an engine was coupled with an electric generator a type was produced capable of almost universal use. From this moment on there was no necessity to endeavor to perfect engines of special designs capable of doing special kinds of work. The engineer's task became now to concentrate all his efforts upon one type, to perfect one kind of engine – the best; the universal, the engine of the immediate future; namely, the one which is best suitable for the generation of electricity. The first efforts in this direction gave a strong impetus to the development of the reciprocating high-speed engine, and also to the turbine, which latter was a type of engine of very limited practical usefulness, but became, to a certain extent, valuable in connection with the electric generator and motor. Still, even the former engine, though improved in many particulars, is not radically changed, and even now has the same objectionable features and limitations. To do away with these as much as possible, a new type of engine is being perfected in which more favorable conditions for economy are maintained, which expands the working fluid with utmost rapidity and loses little heat on the walls, an engine stripped of all usual regulating mechanism — packings, oilers and other appendages — and forming part of an electric generator; and in this type, I may say, I have implicit faith.

The gas or explosive engine has been likewise profoundly affected by the commercial introduction of electric light and power, particularly in quite recent years. The engineer is turning his energies more and more in this direction, being attracted by the prospect of obtaining a higher thermodynamic efficiency. Much larger engines are now being built, the construction is constantly improved, and a novel type of engine, best suitable for the generation of electricity, is being rapidly evolved.

There are many other lines of manufacture and industry in which the influence of electrical development has been even more powerfully felt. So, for instance, the manufacture of a great variety of articles of metal, and especially of chemical products. The welding of metals by electricity, though involving a wasteful process, has, nevertheless, been accepted as a legitimate art, while the manufacture of metal sheet, seamless tubes and the like affords promise of much improvement. We are coming gradually, but surely, to the fusion of bodies and reduction of all kinds of ores — even of iron ores — by the use of electricity, and in each of these departments great realizations are probable. Again, the economical conversion of ordinary currents of supply into high-frequency currents opens up new possibilities, such as the combination of the atmospheric nitrogen and the production of its compounds; for instance, ammonia and nitric acid, and their salts, by novel processes.

The high-frequency currents also bring us to the realization of a more economical system of lighting; namely by means of phosphorescent bulbs or tubes, and enable us to produce with these appliances light of practically any candle-power. Following other developments in purely electrical lines, we have all rejoiced in observing the rapid strides made, which, in quite recent years, have been beyond our most sanguine expectations. To enumerate the many advances recorded is a subject for the reviewer, but I can not pass without mentioning the beautiful discoveries of Lenart and Roentgen, particularly the latter, which have found such a powerful response throughout the scientific world that they have made us forget, for a time, the great achievement of Linde in Germany, who has effected the liquefaction of air on an industrial scale by a process of continuous cooling: the discovery of argon by Lord Rayleigh and Professor Ramsay, and the splendid pioneer work of Professor Dewar in the field of low temperature research. The fact that the United States have contributed a very liberal share to this prodigious progress must afford to all of us great satisfaction. While honoring the workers in other countries and all those who, by profession or inclination, are devoting themselves to strictly scientific pursuits, we have particular reasons to mention with gratitude the names of those who have so much contributed to this marvelous development of electrical industry in this country. Bell, who, by his admirable invention enabling us to transmit speech to great distances, has profoundly affected our commercial and social relations, and even our very mode of life; Edison, who, had he not done anything else beyond his early work in incandescent lighting, would have proved himself one of the greatest benefactors of the age; Westinghouse, the founder of the commercial alternating system; Brush, the great pioneer of arc lighting; Thomson, who gave us the first practical welding machine, and who, with keen sense, contributed very materially to the development of a number of scientific and industrial branches; Weston, who once led the world in dynamo design, and now leads in the construction of electric instruments; Sprague, who, with rare energy, mastered the problem and insured the success of practical electrical railroading; Acheson, Hall, Willson and others, who are creating new and revolutionizing industries here under our very eyes at Niagara. Nor is the work of these gifted men nearly finished at this hour. Much more is still to come, for fortunately, most of them are still full of enthusiasm and vigor. All of these men and many more are untiringly at work investigating new regions and opening up unsuspected and promising fields. Weekly, if not daily, we learn through the journals of a new advance into some unexplored region, where at every step success beckons friendly, and leads the toiler on to hard and harder tasks.

But among all these many departments of research, these many branches of industry, new and old, which are being rapidly expanded, there is one dominating all others in importance — one which is of the greatest significance for the comfort and welfare, not to say for the existence, of mankind, and that is the electrical transmission of power. And in this most important of all fields, gentlemen, long afterwards, when time will have placed the events in their proper perspective, and assigned men to their deserved places, the great event we are commemorating today will stand out as designating a new and glorious epoch in the history of humanity — an epoch grander than that marked by the advent of the steam engine. We have many a monument of past ages: we have the palaces and pyramids, the temples of the Greek and the cathedrals of Christendom. In them is exemplified the power of men, the greatness of nations, the love of art and religious devotion. But that monument at Niagara has something of its own, more in accord with our present thoughts and tendencies. It is a monument worthy of our scientific age, a true monument of enlightenment and of peace. It signifies the subjugation of natural forces to the service of man, the discontinuance of barbarous methods, the relieving of millions from want and suffering. No matter what we attempt to do, no matter to what fields we turn our efforts, we are dependent on power. Our economists may propose more economical systems of administration and utilization of resources, our legislators may make wiser laws and treaties, it matters little; that kind of help can be only temporary. If we want to reduce poverty and misery, if we want to give to every deserving individual what is needed for a safe existence of an intelligent being, we want to provide more machinery, more power. Power is our mainstay, the primary source of our many-sided energies. With sufficient power at our disposal we can satisfy most of our wants and offer a guaranty for safe and comfortable existence to all, except perhaps to those who are the greatest criminals of all – the voluntarily idle.

The development and wealth of a city, the success of a nation, the progress of the whole human race, is regulated by the power available. Think of the victorious march of the British, the like of which history has never recorded. Apart from the qualities of the race, which have been of great moment, they own the conquest of the world to — coal. For with coal they produce their iron; coal furnishes them light and heat; coal drives the wheels of their immense manufacturing establishments, and coal propels their conquering fleets. But the stores are being more and more exhausted; the labor is getting dearer and dearer, and the demand is continuously increasing. It must be clear to every one that soon some new source of power supply must be opened up, or that at least the present methods must be materially improved. A great deal is expected from a more economical utilization of the stored energy of the carbon in a battery; but while the attainment of such a result would be hailed as a great achievement; it would not be as much of an advance towards the ultimate and permanent method of obtaining power as some engineers seem to believe. By reasons both of economy and convenience we are driven to the general adoption of a system of energy supply from central stations, and for such purposes the beauties of the mechanical generation of electricity can not be exaggerated. The advantages of this universally accepted method are certainly so great that the probability of replacing the engine dynamos by batteries is, in my opinion, a remote one, the more so as the high-pressure steam engine and gas engine give promise of a considerably more economical thermodynamic conversion. Even if we had this day such an economical coal battery, its introduction in central stations would by no means be assured, as its use would entail many inconveniences and drawbacks. Very likely the carbon could not be burned in its natural form as in a boiler, but would have to be specially prepared to secure uniformity in the current generation. There would be a great many cells needed to make up the electro-motive force usually required. The process of cleaning and renewal, the handling of nasty fluids and gases and the great space necessary for so many batteries would make it difficult, if not commercially unprofitable, to operate such a plant in a city or densely populated district. Again if the station be erected in the outskirts, the conversion by rotating transformers or otherwise would be a serious and unavoidable drawback. Furthermore, the regulating appliances and other accessories which would have to be provided would probably make the plant fully as much, if not more, complicated than the present. We might, of course, place the batteries at or near the coal mine, and from there transmit the energy to distant points in the form of high-tension alternating currents obtained from rotating transformers, but even in this most favorable case the process would be a barbarous one, certainly more so than the present, as it would still involve the consumption of material, while at the same time it would restrict the engineer and mechanic in the exercise of their beautiful art. As to the energy supply in small isolated places as dwellings, I have placed my confidence in the development of a light storage battery, involving the use of chemicals manufactured by cheap water power, such as some carbide or oxygen-hydrogen cell.

But we shall not satisfy ourselves simply with improving steam and explosive engines or inventing new batteries; we have something much better to work for, a greater task to fulfill. We have to evolve means for obtaining energy from stores which are forever inexhaustible, to perfect methods which do not imply consumption and waste of any material whatever. Upon this great possibility, which I have long ago recognized, upon this great problem, the practical solution of which means so much for humanity, I have myself concentrated my efforts since a number of years, and a few happy ideas which came to me have inspired me to attempt the most difficult, and given me strength and courage in adversity. Nearly six years ago my confidence had become strong enough to prompt me to an expression of hope in the ultimate solution of this all dominating problem. I have made progress since, and have passed the stage of mere conviction such as is derived from a diligent study of known facts, conclusions and calculations. I now feel sure that the realization of that idea is not far off. But precisely for this reason I feel impelled to point out here an important fact, which I hope will be remembered. Having examined for a long time the possibilities of the development I refer to, namely, that of the operation of engines on any point of the earth by the energy of the medium, I find that even under the theoretically best conditions such a method of obtaining power can not equal in economy, simplicity and many other features the present method, involving a conversion fo the mechanical energy of running water into electrical energy and the transmission of the latter in the form of currents of very high tension to great distances. Provided, therefore, that we can avail ourselves of currents of sufficiently high tension, a waterfall affords us the most advantageous means of getting power from the sun sufficient for all our wants, and this recognition has impressed me strongly with the future importance of the water power, not so much because of its commercial value, though it may be very great, but chiefly because of its bearing upon our safety and welfare. I am glad to say that also in this latter direction my efforts have not been unsuccessful, for I have devised means which will allow us the use in power transmission of electromotive forces much higher than those practicable with ordinary apparatus. In fact, progress in this field has given me fresh hope that I shall see the fulfillment of one of my fondest dreams; namely, the transmission of power from station to station without the employment of any connecting wire. Still, whatever method of transmission be ultimately adopted, nearness to the source of power will remain an important advantage.

Gentlemen, some of the ideas I have expressed may appear to many of you hardly realizable; nevertheless, they are the result of long-continued thought and work. You would judge them ore justly if you would have devoted your life to them, as I have done. With ideas it is like with dizzy heights you climb: At first they cause you discomfort and you are anxious to get down, distrustful of your own powers; but soon the remoteness of the turmoil of life and the inspiring influence of the altitude calm your blood; your step gets firm and sure and you begin to look — for dizzier heights. I have attempted to speak to you on “Electricity,” its development and influence, but I fear that I have done it much like a boy who tries to draw a likeness with a few straight lines. But I have endeavored to bring out one feature, to speak to you in one strain which I felt sure would find response in the hearts of all of you, the only one worthy of this occasion — the humanitarian. In the great enterprise at Niagara we see not only a bold engineering and commercial feat, but far more, a giant stride in the right direction as indicated both by exact science and philanthropy. Its success is a signal for the utilization of water powers all over the world, and its influence upon industrial development is incalculable. We must all rejoice in the great achievement and congratulate the intrepid pioneers who have joined their efforts and means to bring it about. It is a pleasure to learn of the friendly attitude of the citizens of Buffalo and of the encouragement given to the enterprise by the Canadian authorities. We shall hope that other cities, like Rochester on this side and Hamilton and Toronto in Canada, will soon follow Buffalo's lead. This fortunate city herself is to be congratulated. With resources now unequaled, with commercial facilities and advantages such as few cities in the world possess, and with the enthusiasm and progressive spirit of its citizens, it is sure to become one of the greatest industrial centers of the globe.'''

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍🏫🧙👨‍🏫📰
TESLA ON ELECTRICITY
——————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Review (New York)
January 27th, 1897 Page number(s): 46-47
Vol. XXX - Jan 6 to Jun 30 - No. 04
——————
HIS ADDRESS IN FULL ON THE OCCASION OF THE COMMEMORATION OF THE INTRODUCTION OF NIAGARA FALLS POWER IN BUFFALO AT THE ELLICOTT CLUB, JANUARY 12, 1897.
——————
[see also: Power Banquet Speech January 12th, 1897]

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼🧙📰
A NEW TESLA CONTINUOUS HIGH FREQUENCY GENERATOR.
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
March 3rd, 1897 Page number(s): 239
Vol. XXIII - Jan to Jun - No. 461

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼🧙📰
A NEW TESLA CONTINUOUS HIGH FREQUENCY GENERATOR•
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
April 16th, 1897 Page number(s): 521
Vol. XL - Jan 1 to Jun 25 - No. 1,012
[see also: Electrical Engineer March 3rd, 1897 Page number(s): 239]

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
MR. TESLA ON X-RAYS.
————
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
May 7th, 1897 Page number(s): 626
Vol. XL - Jan 1 to Jun 25 - No. 1,015

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA'S TRANSMISSION WITHOUT WIRES. 
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
June 25th, 1897 Page number(s): 888
Vol. XL - Jan 1 to Jun 25 - No. 1,022


     𝗧𝗘𝗦𝗟𝗔'𝗦 𝗧𝗥𝗔𝗡𝗦𝗠𝗜𝗦𝗦𝗜𝗢𝗡 𝗪𝗜𝗧𝗛𝗢𝗨𝗧 𝗪𝗜𝗥𝗘𝗦.—Mr. Tesla announces in an American journal that by his well known system of transmitting intelligence by means of electrical “resonance” between points widely apart, without any connecting wires, he has lately been able to signal 20 miles. Mr. Tesla confesses, says the N.Y. 𝘌𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘌𝘯𝘨𝘪𝘯𝘦𝘦𝘳, that the system is still liable to break down in bad weather, but such results will doubtless encourage him to preserver until the distance is many times greater, and the method is quite independent of disturbing atmospheric or terrestrial effects.

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🧙🗞️
TESLA ELECTRIFIES THE WHOLE EARTH.
—————
The Inventor Announces the Success of His Life-Long Dream.
—————
MADE A DEMONSTRATION
—————
Produces an Electrical Disturbance Which, He Says, Is Felt Everywhere.
—————
A TREMENDOUS VOLTAGE.
—————
Fiery Flames, Like Serpents, with Power to Kill, Spring from an Electrode.
———————
WILL PUBLISH THE DISCOVERY.
———————
Says His Facts Will Be Given to Science as Soon as His Data, Now Being Arranged, Is Completed.
by
New York Journal, The
August 4th, 1897 Page number(s): 1

__________________







__________________


TESLA, MARVEL OF THE FUTURE.
————
by
Brooklyn Citizen
August 22, 1897. Page number(s): ?


'''Electrostatic force is that which governs the motion of the atoms. It is the force which causes them to collide and develop the life-sustaining energy of heat and light, and which causes them to aggregate in an infinite variety of ways, according to Nature’s fanciful designs, and forms all these wondrous structures we see around us. It is, in fact, if our present views be true, the most important force for us to consider in Nature.'''


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


TESLA'S NEW INVENTION TO PRESERVE THE BEAUTY OF YOUTH THROUGH LIFE
He Contrives a Marvelous Electric Current which, Properly Applied, Gives the Skin a Tint of Wonderful Purity and Health.
Beauty - Destroying Germs, Hitherto Unconquerable, Ejected from the Pores by the Newest Device of the Wizard of Electricity.
————
by
New York World
October 31st, 1897 Page number(s): 33


figure
𝘛𝘩𝘦 𝘢𝘱𝘱𝘢𝘳𝘢𝘵𝘶𝘴 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘦𝘥 𝘣𝘺 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘵𝘰 𝘨𝘪𝘷𝘦 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘣𝘦𝘢𝘶𝘵𝘺 𝘰𝘧 𝘺𝘰𝘶𝘵𝘩 𝘵𝘰 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘴𝘬𝘪𝘯. 𝘕𝘰𝘵𝘦 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘣𝘪𝘨 𝘴𝘱𝘰𝘯𝘨𝘦𝘴 𝘶𝘱𝘰𝘯 𝘸𝘩𝘪𝘤𝘩 𝘩𝘢𝘯𝘥𝘴 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘧𝘦𝘦𝘵 𝘳𝘦𝘴𝘵, 𝘣𝘺 𝘤𝘰𝘯𝘵𝘢𝘤𝘵 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩 𝘸𝘩𝘪𝘤𝘩 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘯𝘦𝘸𝘭𝘺 𝘥𝘪𝘴𝘤𝘰𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘦𝘥 𝘦𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤 𝘤𝘶𝘳𝘳𝘦𝘯𝘵 𝘪𝘴 𝘮𝘢𝘥𝘦 𝘵𝘰 𝘱𝘦𝘳𝘮𝘦𝘢𝘵𝘦 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘴𝘬𝘪𝘯 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘦𝘫𝘦𝘤𝘵 𝘢𝘭𝘭 𝘣𝘦𝘢𝘶𝘵𝘺-𝘥𝘦𝘴𝘵𝘳𝘰𝘺𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘮𝘢𝘵𝘵𝘦𝘳.

Has the secret of eternal youth been discovered by Nikola Tesla in the electrical apparatus which he describes in another column? If it has - if a woman by its means can really retain the pure, soft, pink-white skin of babyhood, why, then - the machine! What is it like? Quick, quick! Tell us all about it.

Well, then, Mr. Tesla, you must know, first of all, experimented with the most powerful microscope ever built, which he turned upon the human skin. He found - physicians and chemists know this of course - that it is practically never clean, that in the cities especially, it is not only covered with inorganic waste constantly settling down upon it, like coal smoke, for instance, but that is is the playground of minute microbic organisms that drop upon it from the polluted air and live and multiply.

Then Mr. Tesla experimented with a big globe covered with paint. Through this he ran a powerful electric current, which caused the paint to scale off, leaving the globe clean and fresh.

That’s precisely what the wizard of the wire proposes to do with fair woman to make her more fair.

He has devised a reclining chair upon which the subject lies, perfectly nude. Two wet sponges are applied to her feet, two to her arms. The current is turned on; it thrills, tingles and wakens the skin, and then, as the paint flakes fell from the globe, so fall from her all the dirt which covers the skin, so flutter away also, the hideous microbes, fairly shocked into quitting their hold.

The skin becomes as the skin of a babe. It is as the fresh skin which replaces that which sloughs off from a scar or a burn. This is the discovery in a nutshell.

So far as external appearance goes, there will be no more old men and old women if the use of this electric chair becomes general. Everyone will go down to his grave retaining all the outward appearance of blooming youth. There will be no more wrinkles, no more sallow cheeks, no more hideous
---

---
alpine valleys ploughed in the surface of beauty’s brow. Every man and woman may at will enjoy the appearance of youth. It is like the fabled spring of Ponce de Leon.

There has always existed in the minds of the people a conviction that somewhere, either in the deep forests of America or in the valleys of the little-known countries of Asia, there is to be found a magic spring or clear pool of wonder-working water which, if plunged into by any man, would immediately restore to him all the appearance of his youth. No matter how old the person might be, it was held that the moment he had entered the pool his white hair would turn to its original color, the deep wrinkles of his face would be smoothed away, and that the glossy yellow of his skin would be replaced at once by the soft, pink hue of his boyhood.

Like every other boy, Nikola Tesla heard this myth when he attended school. It so strongly impressed itself upon his mind that he decided to find that spring when he should have grown to be a man. In his maturer years Tesla realized the impracticability
---

---
of roaming over the earth in search of something he would probably never find.

He has done better; he has found the haunted pool in science and has plumbed it with electrodes.

He says, does this magician, that although it seems impossible, it is a fact he has demonstrated that to bathe the body in water is not to rid the skin of the
---

---
deadly microbes which prey upon it. “Indeed,” says Mr. Tesla, “water is really an aid to the microbes in fixing their hold upon the skin and hair.”

Mr. Tesla refuses to discuss for publication the construction of his new battery at this early stage. He says that it has involved a great deal of labor, and to give out a full description of the principles upon which it is built before he has had it patented would be scarcely doing himself justice. Besides, he wishes the first full description to be written by himself and, to appear in the columns of some purely technical magazine. Just as soon as the battery has been patented stations will be opened in all large cities where the Tesla battery treatment will be given to people every day just as Turkish baths are now given.

The cost of the new apparatus will likely always be too great to allow of every home being provided with one, but baths at public stations will be easily available and no doubt popular, as the price will be ultimately only 25 cents or less. The fixtures and working appliances of the Tesla baths will be much less numerous and expensive than those required in a Turkish bathing institution.

he chief feature of Tesla’s method to make all women beautiful and young is the specially invented battery he uses to charge the body with electricity. All that can be seen of its construction is a huge iron chest with a meter on its face and a single bar of bronze which juts from the top, and is turned about to regulate the amount of electrical power transmitted from the concealed battery over the four covered wires which hang from the bottom of the chest and are used to charge the hands and feet of the person undergoing the bath.

This battery has a marvelous power, of which Tesla gave The Sunday World reporter a practical illustration. A huge ball of copper was lying on the floor near by. It had been coated with black paint some three weeks before, and the thick coating of the paint was as dry as the ball itself.
---

---
Merely to show the violence with which the new battery rids any body of foreign substance when charged with electricity from the battery, Tesla picked up this huge copper ball and placing it on a wire stand lightly touched the four wires of the battery to the ball. Just on the instant a perfect shower of black flew about the room, and a few minutes afterward it was discovered that not a single particle of dried paint remained on the surface of the copper ball, and the ball continued to shine just as it had been shining before receiving its murky coat.
---

---
Nikola Tesla’s Statement to the Sunday World Explaining His Invention

Every one is aware how fresh looking and peachy is the complexion of the women who live in high altitudes which are free from rugged winters, such, for instance, as the Alps or Pyrenees, mountains of Europe. The same is also true of women living in the small but high and dry islands of the Atlantic ocean. But in large cities, and particularly among the poorer classes who live in tenements, women are almost universally sallow and yellow-faced. Now what is the cause of this state of affairs?

Pasteur and Koch have each established the fact, now becoming generally recognized among scientists, that between 4,000 and 7,000 microbes per square foot
---

---
fall through space and fasten themselves on every human body in each twenty-four hours. For the past six years I have been studying these bacilli through the most powerful microscope I could have manufactured and the results have been simply amazing to me. People who bathe themselves thoroughly in soap and water every day have an idea that they are utterly free from microbes and that their skin cannot be made any cleaner. If these people had only the opportunity to gaze for a moment through a very powerful microscope such as mine, they would be utterly astonished to see the millions of germs swarming over every inch of their own bodies. These germs, besides making such a hideous sight, are eating up the vitality and freshness and destroying the healthy particles of the skin at a rapid rate.

It is the presence of these millions of germs and their voracity in devouring what is good in the human skin that rots away the hair, helping to turn it gray or
---

---
white; that accounts for the fading of the naturally pink tint of the human body; that is responsible for the drying up and wrinkling of the fresh soft skin; that turns the skin eventually to yellow, and that in the case of people with very dirty habits brings on warts and other revolting sores.

This being the case, the question suggested itself to me. Cannot some means be devised of keeping
---

---
these microbes from reaching to the human body?

There is no escape from the invasion of the human body in city localities by these microbes. No amount of clothing can keep them off, as they fall through the pores of the clothing just as a fly would get through the meshes of the net of a fisherman.

I have made extensive study and experiment to the end of finding some means of clearing the human
---

---
skin of these deadly microbes, and I have succeeded in inventing a means by which it can be kept free from their ravages. The presence of these microbes being the cause of so much injury, with the removal of the cause of injury there is every reason to believe that the skin of a perfectly clean woman can be made to retain through old age to her death the bloom and freshness of youth, the color and softness of girlhood, and the vigor and pliableness of the skin which every woman possesses until by degrees these wandering microbes fall headlong to her skin and begin the ravages which result in wrinkles, yellowness, gray hair and general puckered-up appearance.

Next, the body is thoroughly rubbed with the hands to stir up electricity, and through the feet and hands the whole body is charged with electricity from a battery I myself invented. With this battery I have charged human bodies so successfully that the
---

---
microbes have been thrown off in a perfect shower to the ground, some of them being thrown as far away as four and five feet. This charging of the hands and feet relieves the skin and hair entirely of the microbes, and the skin can go on living its natural life of softness and freshness. Still other microbes will fall upon it the next day, but these are always removed before twenty-four hours, so that none of them remain long on the skin and in the hair, being removed by the electricity before they have had time to do much ravaging.

After the body has been charged it is given an electric massage by means of the new current invented by me. The whole affair is finished off by a slight bath of the same disinfectant used in the beginning.

figure
𝘛𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘴𝘩𝘰𝘸𝘴 𝘩𝘰𝘸 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘩𝘢𝘯𝘥, 𝘴𝘦𝘦𝘯 𝘶𝘯𝘥𝘦𝘳 𝘢 𝘱𝘰𝘸𝘦𝘳𝘧𝘶𝘭 𝘮𝘢𝘨𝘯𝘪𝘧𝘺𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘨𝘭𝘢𝘴𝘴, 𝘢𝘱𝘱𝘦𝘢𝘳𝘴 𝘸𝘩𝘦𝘯 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘣𝘦𝘢𝘶𝘵𝘺-𝘥𝘦𝘴𝘵𝘳𝘰𝘺𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘮𝘢𝘵𝘵𝘦𝘳 𝘪𝘯 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘱𝘰𝘳𝘦𝘴 𝘪𝘴 𝘣𝘦𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘦𝘫𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘦𝘥 𝘣𝘺 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘧𝘰𝘳𝘤𝘪𝘣𝘭𝘦 𝘯𝘦𝘸 𝘦𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤 𝘤𝘶𝘳𝘳𝘦𝘯𝘵 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘦𝘥 𝘣𝘺 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢.


*photocopy of original here

__________________







    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘9️⃣8️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '98
__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TO ADVANCE PHOTOGRAPHY.
————
Odd Application of the Vacuum Tube by Nikola Tesla
by⠀
Middletown Daily Argus
January 6th, 1898 Page number(s): 1

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
TESLA'S LATEST ADVANCES IN VACUUM-TUBE LIGHTING.
—————
APPLICATION OF TUBES OF HIGH ILLUMINATING POWER TO PHOTOGRAPHY AND OTHER PURPOSES.
by⠀Nikola Tesla [letter to the editor]
Electrical Review (New York)
January 5th, 1898 Page number(s): 8
Vol. XXXII - Jan 5 to Jun 29 - No. 1

__________________







__________________

📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA'S LATEST ADVANCES IN VACUUM TUBE LIGHTING.
by⠀
Electrical Review (London)
February 18th, 1898 Page number(s): 206
Vol. XLII. - Jan 7 to Jun 24 - No. 1,056

__________________







__________________

———————
📰👨‍💼📰🧙
TESLA'S ELECTRICAL CONTROL OF MOVING VESSELS OR VEHICLES FROM A DISTANCE.
by⠀
Electrical Engineer, The
November 17th, 1898 Page number(s): 489-491

__________________







__________________

📰🧙📰
TESLA AND HIS WORK
———————
His Efforts in Various Fields of Investigation Described by Himself
———————
by Nikola Tesla
New York Sun, The
November 21st, 1898 Page number(s): ?

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘9️⃣9️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '99
__________________


Dear Mr. Scherff,
————
by
Letter
June 28th, 1899


Under inclosure check for $300 to cover ongoing expenses. Will write more fully if I get any time to spare here at the research station although if Mister Astor inquires, please convey that while on the train coming here I enjoyed reading the copy he presented to me of his *JOURNEY IN OTHER WORLDS, with our views of possible interplantary civilizations aligning.
Otherwise please keep me posted the best you can on all.
Sincerely, N. Tesla


stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🗞️🧙
IF THE AIR SHOULD BURN UP
—————————
A STARTLING AND INCENDIARY POSSIBILITY, SUGGESTED BY MR. TESLA.
by⠀
New York Tribune, The
April 9th, 1899

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🧙🗞️
NIKOLA TESLA EXPERIMENTS IN THE MOUNTAINS
by Desire Stanton
Gazette, Colorado Springs
July-August, 1899
*(foreword)


About a quarter of a century past, books of  “Familiar Science”  were popular in certain of our institutions of learning, together with  “Chronology,”  taught as a separate branch, disassociated from events,—and Magnall's Questions. The exhaustive study of  “Ancient Geography”  was also commended, and  “ a page of dictionary”  was the invariable spelling lesson. Walker was the standard authority, and in his pages the present writer learned to spell music,  “musick,”  and sundry extra  “u's”  and doubled consonants, which are fine old historical English, Issac Pitman to the contrary notwithstanding. It was the special privilege of the book of  “Familiar Science”  to huri disconnected facts at the scholar's head—to pelt him with the arbitrary processes of nature—“Why does dew fall?” paraded arm in arm with “Why does a cat's fur emit sparks when you stroke her in the dark?”

But the chief glory of the “Book of Familiar Science” was a full-page wood-cut of placid Benjamin Franklin in broad-brim and gaiters, flying his scientific kite, and bringing lightning down from the skies by the aid of a large door key. The experiment marked the beginning of electrical science in America. “The knowledge of this world passeth away.”

away.”[sic]
    
In the first       years of       1800, Lieutenant Pike camped at the foot of his great “Mexican mountain”—that  “far blue cloud” which allured him over many a mile of wilderness march, and from his reports of discovery of Pike's Peak and exploration at the head-waters of the Platte and Arkansas, began the exodus from the Missouri river—first over the  Sante Fe  trail  direct—and then  gradually  diverted  to  the north,  where  “Pike's Peak or Bust!”  became the motto of the  “'59er.”

The years to be dated 1800 are fast drawing to a close, and in spanning them in thought, with all their stirring happenings and marvelous achievements, not a hundred years later than Zebulon Pike, we find another discoverer  camped  at the foot of  Pike's  Peak,  armed  with a more mighty key to electrical science than that of Poor Richard.

Nikola Tesla, the Servian scientist, whose electrical discoveries are not of one nation, but the pride of  the world, has taken up his abode in Colorado Springs, where he will remain for some time conducting experiments in the medium of light air, and perpetual sunshine.

On East Pike's Peak avenue, with limitless plains stretching to the eastward, and a panorama of  mighty mountains swooping away north and south, to the west—Tesla has caused to be constructed a station for scientific research. It is a building, which, when complete, will cover an area of from 50 to 60 feet, with an extension with two windows and a large door. The structure is about 18 feet high, and crowned with a large platform. The center of the building remains unroofed to permit the scientific apparatus to project above, and to be inspected and regulated from the surrounding  balcony. The structure has been built according to Mr. Tesla's own plans, and in telegraphing without wires from plain to mountain, or from mountain to plain, it would occupy and equally central station.

It is said that Mr. Tesla's experiments will take this direction, though he is, naturally, reticent upon these points, until he is assured, by the success of his experiments, that the results are prepared to meet the demands of the scientific world.
    
With Tesla's wireless telegraph oscillator, he affirms he could talk to the inhabitants of the planet Mars, and will talk to the people of this earth, at any distance away, without the assistance of wires. Into the great oscillator Tesla will turn an ordinary current of electricity. The os-

                     MOUNTAIN SUNSHINE

cillator instantly transforms this electric current, by a series of coils, into an electro-motive force, vibrating at the rate of 2,000,000 to 4,000,000 times a second. This starts electric waves through the air and earth, which vibrate almost as fast as the waves that produce light, and travel with the same speed. These waves, like X-rays, pass through any dense substances, and, according to Tesla, there is nothing to prevent the transmission of messages by their aid directly through the earth. Tesla's plan for cabling across the Atlantic is to erect two terminal stations, one in London and one in New York, with oscillators placed at the top of high towers, communicating thence with great disks suspended in captive balloons floating 5,000 feet above the earth to catch the strata of rarefied air through which electrical waves travel most easily. A message could be flashed instantly by these lightning rays from the oscillator to the disk in the balloon, and across the thousands of miles of intervening space to the second disk. Cable tolls would be reduced to a minimum ,and[sic] messages flashed around the world at little more than letter postage rates. Mr. Tesla says he is ready to put his wireless system into operation as soon as the practical details can be arranged.


In inter-planetary communication, however, it would be necessary to have a receiver upon the objective star, and it is also a pre-requisite that the inhabitant of Venus or Mars (if there he be) should—unlike some who wear the uniform in this sublunary sphere—“know enough to take a message.”


The oscillator, charged, seems like a vivid sphere, fairly radiating light and glorious possibilities. Who that has looked into the soft green depths of light, in the heart of which lies hidden the X-Ray (to which matter is no longer opaque and impenetrable). has not felt that under the touch of electric light and force, power is limitless and the future boundless?

In Bulwer-Lytton's novel of “The Coming Race” the heroine was a “perfect woman, nobly planned.” On a superhuman scale. She and her sisters took the initiative in all good and wise achievement, while the men of the coming race somewhat lagged in the rear. By means of the “vril” staff, power was transmitted or arrested, in an incredible degree. The labor of the coming race was performed by automata, vivified and directed by the action of “vril.” According to the mind of him who held the staff. In the spirit of the woman who wished that “posterity was here—right now." the employer of the present longs for the “vril” staff. There are so many, who, upon attempt of direction by the guiding mind, do the thing that is not wanted, in just the way that is not desirable or right.

Colorado, with her enfranchised women, opens a future for the sisterhood of the coming race. Tesla, in an interview with a representative of the Denver Republican, indicated that the day of “vril power” is not far distant.

    
'''I would,''' said Tesla. '''light whole cities and give to mere machines all the motions of intelligence. I have given demonstrations of this discovery of mine before bodies of men of science many times, but they have found it difficult to believe me. I gave a demonstration of one experiment, which I think is the most beautiful I have ever tried. I think if I live a long life and work all the time I shall never have a more beautiful experiment than that. I had a boat without crew or captain, which I controlled merely by the force of my intelligence. I would will '''turn,''' and it would turn, '''go to the right,''' and it would go to the right, '''to the left,''' it would go to the left. The beautiful thing about it was that it seem to be instinct with life, and, as a dog obeys the commands of his master, so this machine obeyed mind. And yet, it was governed simply by the electrical waves striking upon a receiver. 🐇 And so with any machine.

'''Why I could make an automaton in the shape of a man that could walk, move, perform all the motions of a man, except wherein the fact of it not being an organic being would 🐇 make a difference. All this theory is developed from my idea that the actions of all inanimate beings are governed by impressions from outside objects received upon the eye.
    
'''My idea is that people are simply automata, governed by the transmission of circumstances surrounding them upon the eye. 🐇 This is the greatest idea of the age. The relations of nations will be affected by it. It will revolutionize thought. It may take years, but it will gradually come about. Men of science find it difficult to accept this idea. They cannot comprehend it. It is stupendous, and yet it is very simple.'''


Colorado may be the theatre of the first exhibition of “vril.”

Mr. Tesla announces that he is at Colorado Springs, simply collecting experimental data. His instruments will shortly be mounted, and scientific work will begin. He has made similar experiments at different atmospheric levels, and the work here will be comparative.

Nikola Tesla is from the mountains of Servia, and his native tongue is Montenegrin. To those familiar with foreign types, he suggests the Pole—the grave and gentle temperament illumined by the flash of fire. He is very tall and slight, with thin and delicate features, black hair and mustache, and clear gray eyes. He speaks of himself and his work with simple modesty and reticence, in perfect English, with a slight foreign accent.

Mr. Leonard E. Curtis, a well-known member of the bar, who has been Tesla's legal adviser, gave a banquet to the famous electrician at the El Paso Club, where twenty gentlemen of Colorado Springs were invited to meet him, including Governor Thomas, of Colorado. Tesla was in his happiest vein and spoke of his life and work. When first he heard of the great Niagara of the western hemisphere, he was impressed with its power—mighty, resistless force! Some day he would turn it to account. Years after he went to Buffalo, and in the great power plant at Niagara he saw machinery bearing the name of Tesla.

All who were present at the banquet felt, if it may be so stated without bathos, that they had “soared toward the empyrean,” for a glimpse of the glory that excellent; the man in the midst of the fire; the controlling power, 
“Half spirit and half bird. And all a wonder and a wild desire.”
                                                  DESIRE STANTON.

“Now shine your very brightest.”

Said Dame Nature to the Sun;

“Appear, ye flowers and leaflets, for winter'scourse is run; Let every rugged mountain peak in added grandeur rear; Let everything look pleasant—for the tourist season's near.”
                         (“Gazette,” Colorado Springs.)

__________________







__________________

🗞️👨‍💼🧙🗞️
TESLA AGAIN.
by⠀
The Massillon Independent
December 14th, 1899 Page number(s): ?

__________________







__________________

🎞️ At the turn of the century, the various Westinghouse companies were worth about $120 million and employed approximately 50,000 workers.

__________________








****
__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________
****








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘0️⃣0️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '00

__________________
THE PROBLEM OF INCREASING HUMAN ENERGY
by Nikola Tesla
Century Magazine
June, 1900 Page number(s): 175-211
*(foreword)
__________________

War is a negative force, and cannot be turned in a positive direction without passing through the intermediate phases. It is the problem of making a wheel, rotating one way, turn in the opposite direction without slowing it down, stopping it, and speeding it up again the other way.

As the first step toward this realization I conceived the following mechanism. Imagine a thermopile consisting of a number of bars of metal extending from the earth to the outer space beyond the atmosphere. The heat from below, conducted upward along these metal bars, would cool the earth or the sea or the air, according to the location of the lower parts of the bars, and the result, as is well known, would be an electric current circulating in these bars. The two terminals of the thermopile could now be joined through an electric motor, and, theoretically, this motor would run on and on, until the media below would be cooled down to the temperature of the outer space. 

But was it not possible to realize a similar condition without necessarily going to a height?

As regards heat, we are at a high level, which may be represented by the surface of a mountain lake considerably above the sea, the level of which may mark the absolute zero of temperature existing in the interstellar space. Heat, like water, flows from high to low level, and, consequently, just as we can let the water of the lake run down to the sea, so we are able to let heat from the earth's surface travel up into the cold region above. Heat, like water, can perform work in flowing down, and if we had any doubt as to whether we could derive energy from the medium by means of a thermopile, as before described, it would be dispelled by this analogue. But can we produce cold in a given portion of the space and cause the heat to flow in continually? To create such a "sink," or "cold hole," as we might say, in the medium, would be equivalent to producing in the lake a space either empty or filled with something much lighter than water. This we could do by placing in the lake a tank, and pumping all the water out of the latter. We know, then, that the water, if allowed to flow back into the tank, would, theoretically, be able to perform exactly the same amount of work which was used in pumping it out, but not a bit more. Consequently nothing could be gained in this double operation of first raising the water and then letting it fall down. This would mean that it is impossible to create such a sink in the medium. But let us reflect a moment. Heat, though following certain general laws of mechanics, like a fluid, is not such; it is energy which may be converted into other forms of energy as it passes from a high to a low level. To make our mechanical analogy complete and true, we must, therefore, assume that the water, in its passage into the tank, is converted into something else, which may be taken out of it without using any, or by using very little, power. For example, if heat be represented in this analogue by the water of the lake, the oxygen and hydrogen composing the water may illustrate other forms of energy into which the heat is transformed in passing from hot to cold. If the process of heat transformation were absolutely perfect, no heat at all would arrive at the low level, since all of it would be converted into other forms of energy.

Corresponding to this ideal case, all the water flowing into the tank would be decomposed into oxygen and hydrogen before reaching the bottom, and the result would be that water would continually flow in, and yet the tank would remain entirely empty, the gases formed escaping.

We would thus produce, by expending initially a certain amount of work to create a sink for the heat or, respectively, the water to flow in, a condition enabling us to get any amount of energy without further effort.

This would be an ideal way of obtaining motive power.

We do not know of any such absolutely perfect process of heat-conversion, and consequently some heat will generally reach the low level, which means to say, in our mechanical analogue, that some water will arrive at the bottom of the tank, and a gradual and slow filling of the latter will take place, necessitating continuous pumping out. But evidently there will be less to pump out than flows in, or, in other words, less energy will be needed to maintain the initial condition than is developed by the fall, and this is to say that some energy will be gained from the medium. What is not converted in flowing down can just be raised up with its own energy, and what is converted is clear gain.

Thus the virtue of the principle I have discovered resides wholly in the conversion of the energy on the downward flow.







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
Brethren! We have a message from another world, unknown and remote. It reads: 🐇







__________________


SOME NOVEL INVENTIONS OF NIKOLA TESLA
————
by J. Wright
Electrical Engineer
August 10th, 1900 Page number(s): 190-191


Most members of the electrical profession associate the name of Nikola Tesla with high-frequency and high-potential currents, and few are acquainted with the fact that he has also invented several novelties for use in other branches of the profession. It is of some of these extraneous productions that I purpose treating in the course of this paper.

--------
Fig. 1
--------

The first item consists of an electrolytic meter, the principle underlying the action of which is as follows: A conductor is immersed in a metallic solution, and the current to be measured is passed through it. The action of the current in passing is to remove from or deposit on the conductor a certain quantity of metal, and by so doing alter the electrical resistance of the conductor, which can thus, if necessary, be caused to register automatically when the current passing rises above or falls below certain limits. Fig. 1 is a diagrammatic view of the apparatus. A is the glass containing tube of cylindrical form, sealed at each end by an insulating and watertight plug, B C, through which pass the leading-in wires; a b are the active conductors of the apparatus. They are placed parallel to one another throughout the length of the tube, A, and are connected in series through a resistance, D, with the generator, E, and energy-consuming circuits, F, in such a manner that there is an equal difference of potential between them throughout their whole length.

Under the conditions described above a current passing through a and b will establish a difference of potential between them proportional to the current strength. This gives rise to a leakage between them which is proportional to the potential difference, and therefore to the strength of the current passing through the conductors. Again, owing to the fact that there is a constant difference of potential between the two conductors throughout their entire length, the current density through the electrolyte will also be uniform, and as a natural consequence the metal will be removed at a uniform rate from one conductor and deposited at an equal rate on the opposite one, thus causing an alteration in their electrical resistances proportional to the strength of the current passing through them, from which given quantity the value of the latter can be readily ascertained - in the first instance by experiment, and in the second by comparison. It will be seen that this apparatus is somewhat similar in principle to that of Edison, with this difference - that the results depend in one case on electrical resistance, and in the other on actual weight.

The modus operandi of the apparatus is as follows: The two conductors, a and b, are first accurately gauged and measured for resistance, the results being carefully noted. A fixed current is then passed through the instrument for a certain time, and the respective diminution and increase in the resistance of a and b is then ascertained. From the facts thus gathered a constant is obtained whereby the instrument is rendered capable of accurately recording any succeeding currents which may traverse the active conductors, a and b. A test of its accuracy is provided by the separate measurement of the two conductors, when the gain in the resistance of one should equal the simultaneous loss in the other, or, as a further proof, the resistance of the two conductors measured in series with the resistance, D, should be a constant quantity. It is hardly necessary to mention that at certain intervals the direction of the current in the two conductors, a and b, must be reversed in order to equalise the metallic reduction and deposition respectively. The advantages appertaining to this form of meter are obvious: The readings can be made directly by means of an ohmmeter; the whole of the current may be passed through it provided that the gauge of the two wires, a and b, be sufficiently large, thus rendering the use of shunts and attendant inaccuracies unnecessary. The accuracy of the instrument is not impaired to any appreciable extent by temperature variations. Above all, it is a cheap form of apparatus for the purpose.

--------
Fig. 2
--------

--------
Fig. 3
--------

The next inventions with which I purpose dealing are those involved in the manufacture of dynamo commutators and brushes, in which sparking is reduced to a minimum or even rendered impossible. Devices for the reduction of this generally necessary evil were no doubt suggested to Mr. Tesla by his marked antipathy to commutators of any description, brought to light by a consideration of his commutatorless motors. Fig. 2, which is a diagram of an anti-sparking brush device designed by him, will help to explain its principle. A is the end view of an ordinary continuous-current dynamo commutator, B being the brash, which is divided into three principal parts: a, the metallic brush, as usual; b, a plate of mica or other suitable insulating material, such as asbestos paper; and c, a flexible spring, which regulates the pressure of b, and is governed by the set screw, d. The principle of the device will no doubt be understood from its construction. The formation of an arc or spark between the brush, a, and the commutator segment which is just leaving it is prevented by the contact made between the insulating strip, b, and the corresponding insulating material of the commutator. In some forms of this brush two separate strips of insulating material have been introduced at b, instead of one, with advantage.

In another device designed with the same object in view - viz., the elimination of sparking between commutator segments and collectors - both apparatus take the form of discs with their faces well surfaced revolving accurately against one another. Fig. 3 is a diagrammatic end view of the commutator disc of one of these devices. A is the dynamo shaft; B and C are the metallic sectors; D and E the corresponding sectors of insulating material, this being only a simple two-part commutator. The whole surface of the disc in Fig. 3 is accurately faced and smoothed, so that both metallic and insulating sectors are flush with one another. The collector disc is the facsimile of that shown in Fig. 3, but is not keyed to the shaft of the dynamo.

--------
Fig. 4
--------

A general idea of the complete apparatus may be gained by a study of Fig. 4, which represents a longitudinal section of the commutator, A, and B, the collector; a a represent two metallic and b b two insulating sectors; c c are insulating rings which surround the outside edges of the sectors, and prevent a dissolution of partnership on the ground of centrifugal force; C is the dynamo shaft, through the tubular extremity of which are brought the wires from the armature coils; d is an insulating collar placed between the sectors and the shaft to prevent contact, and revolving with the latter; e is a similar insulating sleeve for the collector, and the dynamo shaft revolves inside it; a cap, f, is screwed on the end of this movable sleeve, and the pressure of a set screw, g, on the end of a stiff steel spring, h, serves to maintain good surface contact, between the commutator and collector surfaces; D is a quadrant for adjustment with a set screw, j, which takes the place of the ordinary brush-rocker, and serves to set the angle of the collectors. The advantages of this form of dynamo commutation will also be readily seen. The short-circuiting interval is reduced to a minimum by the simultaneous “make” and “break” of the sectors, which reduces sparking, besides increasing the efficiency of the machine.

In another form of the same device a liquid - mercury, to wit - takes the place of the solid metallic sectors. The two discs are built completely of insulating material in this case, and in place of the solid metallic sectors cavities are left in their faces. The terminals of the collector end in airtight spring plungers or buffers, which serve to regulate the pressure of the mercury under the action of centrifugal force, and also to ensure a good contact between it and the terminal screws. In both forms the insulating blocks should be constructed of some durable material, such as glass or marble, whilst in the solid form the efficiency and durability may be augmented by facing the edges of the metal segments, between which the major portion of the sparking would tend to take place with some durable conducting material, such as platinum.

--------
Fig. 5
--------

In the course of his electrical research, Tesla has not failed to study the subject of thermomagnetism, and as a result he constructed one or two rather ingenious forms of thermomagnetic motor, which are, however, for obvious reasons, still in an experimental stage. They are founded on the fact proved by Dr. William Gilbert at the beginning of the seventeenth century, that a magnet or lodestone when heated to redness is deprived of its magnetism. The principle underlying the device is illustrated in Fig. 5, in which A is a standard or support carrying a magnet, B, permanent or otherwise. C u an armature of the latter, forming the bob of a pendulum rod, D, supported above; E is a spiral spring which comes into play when the armature is demagnetised; F is a gas-burner or other suitable source of heat; and G is a wheel and connecting rod by which the power is converted into the ordinary form of rotary motion. Its action is as follows: The armature, C, is in the first instance attracted by the magnet against the tension of the spring, E. On heating C by means of the burner, F, it loses its magnetism and is drawn back by the spring out of the flame. On cooling, the magnetism again comes into play, and the armature returns to its original position, to be again heated, and so it goes on, the motion being of necessity somewhat slow.

There are several modifications of this motor, all working on the same main principle. In one the core of the electromagnet is made movable, and takes the place of the swinging armature, C, which is fixed. To the end of the magnet core it attached a shield, which, when the armature loses its magnetism and the core is drawn back by the spring in consequence, comes between the armature and the flame, and allows the former to cool by intercepting the heat rays. In another form the armature rocks over the two pole-faces of a permanent horseshoe magnet spanned by a sheet-iron keeper, which latter is heated by a burner whose tap valve is controlled by the rocking armature itself.

--------
Fig. 6
--------

A study of the reverse of these conditions also led Mr. Tesla to construct a pyro-magnetic generator based on the undermentioned laws: “Electricity, or electrical energy, is developed in any conducting body by subjecting such body to a varying magnetic influence. The magnetic properties of iron or other magnetic material may be partially or entirely destroyed or caused to disappear by raising it to a certain temperature, but restored and caused to reappear by again lowering its temperature to a certain degree.” Tesla’s apparatus for practically applying these laws is represented diagrammatically in Fig. 6. A is a permanent magnet, the poles of which are bridged across by a casing containing a number of iron tubes, B. Bound this compound bridging-piece are wound the collecting coils, C and D, which serve to collect the current generated. E is a closed furnace surrounding the central portion of the bridging-piece, and surmounted by a boiler, F, the steam generated in which is conveyed to the tubes, B, in the bridging-piece by the pipe, G. H is the water-supply pipe, and J the exhaust. The admission of steam is regulated by a valve, K, under the control of the magnet A.

From the several inventions dealt with above, it will be seen that Mr. Tesla has not confined his labours solely to the field of high frequencies. 🐇


*photocopy of original here

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘undefined year ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
__________________


— COMING TO AMERICA —
————
by
PBS
?/?/?

Following his discovery in Budapest, Tesla was hired by electric power companies in Strasbourg and Paris to improve their DC generation facilities. In Germany and France, he attempted to interest investors in his concept for an AC motor, but had no success. It was clear that in order to realize his idea, he would have to meet the greatest electrical engineer in the world—Thomas Alva Edison.

At age 28, Nikola Tesla arrived in New York City and was shocked by what he discovered. "What I had left was beautiful, artistic and fascinating in every way; what I saw here was machined, rough and unattractive. It [America] is a century behind Europe in civilization." The Serbian immigrant had four cents in his pocket, some mathematical computations, a drawing of an idea for a flying machine, and a letter of introduction from Charles Batchelor, one of Edison's business associates in Europe.

Electricity was first introduced to New York in the late 1870s. Edison's incandescent lamp had created an astonishing demand for electric power. And his DC power station on Pearl Street in lower Manhattan was quickly becoming a monopoly. On the streets, single poles carried dozens of crooked crossbeams supporting sagging wires, and the exposed electrical wiring was a constant danger. Unsuspecting children would scale the poles only to meet an untimely electrical demise. The residents of Brooklyn became so accustomed to dodging shocks from electric trolley tracks that their baseball team was called the Brooklyn Dodgers. In spite of the perils, wealthy New Yorkers rushed to have their homes wired, the most important being the banker, J.P. Morgan, who had invested heavily in Edison.

It was into this state of affairs that the 6'4" immigrant from Eastern Europe entered Edison's office. Thrilled and terrified to meet his hero, Tesla handed Edison his letter of recommendation: It read: "My Dear Edison: I know two great men and you are one of them. The other is this young man!" Tesla proceeded to describe the engineering work he had done, and his plans for an alternating current motor.

Edison knew little of alternating current and did not care to learn more about it. In short, AC power sounded like competition to Edison. But there was something different about Tesla, and Edison immediately hired him to make improvements in his DC generation plants. Tesla claimed that Edison promised him $50,000 if he succeeded, perhaps thinking it an impossible undertaking. But the potential of so much money appealed mightily to the impoverished immigrant.

Both Tesla and Edison shared a common trait of genius in that neither of them seemed to need much sleep. Edison could go for days, taking occasional catnaps on a sofa in his office. Tesla claimed that his working hours at the Edison Machine Works were 10:30 a.m. till 5 a.m. the next day. Even into old age Tesla said he only slept two or three hours a night.

That's where the similarity ended. Tesla relied on moments of inspiration, perceiving the invention in his brain in precise detail before moving to the construction stage. Edison was a trial and error man who described invention as five percent inspiration and 95 percent perspiration. Edison was self-taught. Tesla had a formal European education.

It was only a matter of time until their differences would lead to conflict.

Several months after Edison employed him, Tesla announced that his work was successfully completed. When Tesla asked to be paid, however, Edison seemed astonished. He explained that the offer of $50,000 had been made in jest. "When you become a full-fledged American you will appreciate an American joke," Edison said. Shocked and disgusted, Tesla immediately resigned.

Word began to spread that a foreigner of unusual talent was digging ditches to stay alive. Investors approached Tesla and asked him to develop an improved method for arc lighting. Although this was not the opportunity he had hoped for, the group was willing to finance the Tesla Electric Light Company. The proud new owner set to work and invented a unique arc lamp of beautiful design and efficiency. Unfortunately, all of the money earned went to the investors and all Tesla got was a stack of worthless stock certificates.

But his luck was about to change. Mr. A.K. Brown of the Western Union Company, agreed to invest in Tesla's idea for an AC motor. In a small laboratory just a short distance from Edison's office, Tesla quickly developed all the components for the system of AC power generation and transmission that is used universally throughout the world today. "The motors I build there," said Tesla, "were exactly as I imagined them. I made no attempt to improve the design, but merely reproduced the pictures as they appeared to my vision and the operation was always as I expected." The battle to produce his motor was over. But the struggle to introduce it commercially was only just beginning.

*insert original here?
https://www.pbs.org/tesla/ll/index.html
😅 https://lettersacrosstime.com/shop/tesla-coming-america/
__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘0️⃣1️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '01

__________________
Letter
April 1, 1901
My dear Mrs. Johnson,

What is the matter with inkspiller Kipling? He actually dared to invite me to dine in an obscure hotel where I would be sure to get hair and cockroaches in the soup.

Yours truly,
N. Tesla
__________________








WIRELESS TELEGRAPHY
————
by
Aspen Democrat
April 4th, 1901 Page number(s): 2


Nicola [sic] Tesla was in Pittsburg last week to buy mechanical devices to be used in his wireless telegraphy across he[sic?] Atlantic ocean. He said the success of his latest enterprise is assured, and within the next six months his invention will be given a practical test. He hopes then to establish the proof that he can communicate across the ocean without wires. Mr. Tesla first went to the Westinghouse works at Pittsburg to confer with electrical experts regarding the construction of the appliances he needs. After spending the day in the works he departed for Buffalo. He stated he intends to erect a plant near New York, from which he will carry on communication with Europe. The machinery will be completed with all possible haste.

  “𝘐 𝘩𝘢𝘷𝘦 𝘯𝘦𝘷𝘦𝘳 𝘧𝘢𝘪𝘭𝘦𝘥 𝘪𝘯 𝘢𝘯𝘺 𝘰𝘧 𝘮𝘺 𝘦𝘹𝘱𝘦𝘳𝘪𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘴,” 𝘴𝘢𝘪𝘥 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢, “𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳𝘦𝘧𝘰𝘳𝘦 𝘐 𝘩𝘢𝘷𝘦 𝘨𝘰𝘰𝘥 𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘴𝘰𝘯 𝘵𝘰 𝘣𝘦𝘭𝘪𝘦𝘷𝘦 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘵𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘰𝘯𝘦 𝘸𝘪𝘭𝘭 𝘯𝘰𝘵 𝘱𝘳𝘰𝘷𝘦 𝘸𝘰𝘳𝘵𝘩𝘭𝘦𝘴𝘴. 𝘐𝘯 𝘧𝘢𝘤𝘵, 𝘢𝘭𝘭 𝘵𝘦𝘴𝘵𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘐 𝘩𝘢𝘷𝘦 𝘮𝘢𝘥𝘦 𝘴𝘰 𝘧𝘢𝘳 𝘩𝘢𝘷𝘦 𝘱𝘳𝘰𝘷𝘦𝘥 𝘥𝘦𝘤𝘪𝘥𝘦𝘥𝘭𝘺 𝘴𝘶𝘤𝘤𝘦𝘴𝘴𝘧𝘶𝘭, 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘶𝘴𝘦 𝘰𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘮𝘢𝘤𝘩𝘪𝘯𝘦 𝘸𝘩𝘪𝘤𝘩 𝘐 𝘩𝘢𝘷𝘦 𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘦 𝘩𝘦𝘳𝘦 𝘵𝘰 𝘴𝘦𝘤𝘶𝘳𝘦, 𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳𝘦 𝘪𝘴 𝘯𝘰 𝘥𝘰𝘶𝘣𝘵 𝘪𝘯 𝘮𝘺 𝘮𝘪𝘯𝘥 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘦𝘹𝘱𝘦𝘳𝘪𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘵 𝘤𝘢𝘯 𝘣𝘦 𝘤𝘢𝘳𝘳𝘪𝘦𝘥 𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘵𝘰 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘧𝘶𝘭𝘭 𝘦𝘹𝘵𝘦𝘯𝘵 𝘰𝘧 𝘮𝘺 𝘦𝘹𝘱𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘢𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯𝘴.”

   When asked regarding the development in his trials for establishing communication with Mars, Mr. Tesla replied: “𝘖𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘐 𝘩𝘢𝘷𝘦 𝘶𝘵𝘮𝘰𝘴𝘵 𝘤𝘰𝘯𝘧𝘪𝘥𝘦𝘯𝘤𝘦. 𝘐𝘵 𝘸𝘪𝘭𝘭 𝘳𝘦𝘲𝘶𝘪𝘳𝘦 𝘢 𝘨𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘵 𝘥𝘦𝘢𝘭 𝘮𝘰𝘳𝘦 𝘮𝘰𝘯𝘦𝘺 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘯 𝘐 𝘱𝘰𝘴𝘴𝘦𝘴𝘴 𝘵𝘰 𝘤𝘢𝘳𝘳𝘺 𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘵𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯, 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘪𝘧 𝘢𝘯𝘺 𝘱𝘦𝘳𝘴𝘰𝘯 𝘪𝘴 𝘸𝘪𝘭𝘭𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘵𝘰 𝘴𝘶𝘱𝘱𝘭𝘺 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘯𝘦𝘤𝘦𝘴𝘴𝘢𝘳𝘺 𝘧𝘶𝘯𝘥𝘴 𝘩𝘦 𝘸𝘪𝘭𝘭 𝘳𝘦𝘤𝘦𝘪𝘷𝘦 𝘱𝘳𝘰𝘰𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘮𝘺 𝘢𝘴𝘴𝘦𝘳𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯𝘴 𝘢𝘳𝘦 𝘯𝘰𝘵 𝘮𝘢𝘥𝘦 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘴𝘰𝘮𝘦 𝘤𝘢𝘶𝘴𝘦.”


stylize font= x
insrt figrs tmplt= 0
*photocopy of original here=
-
__________________







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
Apart from love and religion there happened the other day to Mr. Tesla the most momentous experience that has ever visited a human being on this earth. As he sat beside his instrument on the hillside in Colorado, in the deep silence of that austere, inspiring region, where you plant your feel in gold and your head brushes the constellations — as he sat there one evening, alone, his attention, exquisitively alive at that juncture, was arrested by a faint sound from the receiver — three fairy taps, one after the other, at a fixed (The most essential requirement is, however, that irrespective of frequency the wave or wave-train should continue for a certain interval of time, which I have estimated to be not less than one-twelfth or probably 0.08484 of a second and which is taken in passing to and returning from the region diametrically opposite the pole over the earth's surface with a mean velocity of about four hundred and seventy-one thousand two hundred and forty kilometers per second.) interval. What man who has ever lived on this earth would not envy Tesla that moment! Never before since the globe first swung into form had that sound been heard. Those three soft impulses, reflected from the sensitive disc of the receiver, had not proceeded from any earthly source. The force which propelled them, the measure which regarded them, the significance they were meant to convey, had their origin in no mind native to this planet.
They were sent, those marvelous signals, by a human being living and thinking so far away from us, both in space and in condition, that we can only accept him as a fact, not comprehend him as a phenomenon. Traveling with the speed of light, they must have been dispatched but a few moments before Tesla, in Colorado, received them. But they came fromj some Nicolas 🐇 on the planet Mars!








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘0️⃣2️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '02








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘0️⃣3️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '03

xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
Merry Christmas,
Nikola Tesla







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
TESLA'S FLASHES STARTLING But He Won’t Tell What He Is Trying For at Wardencliffe
🐇
'''Some day, but not at this time, I shall make an announcement of something that I never once dreamed of.'''








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘0️⃣4️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '04
__________________


THE TRANSMISSION OF ELECTRIC ENERGY WITHOUT WIRES
————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical World and Engineer
March 5th, 1904 Page number(s): ?

It is impossible to resist your courteous request extended on an occasion of such moment in the life of your journal. Your letter has vivified the memory of our beginning friendship, of the first imperfect attempts and undeserved successes, of kindnesses and misunderstandings. It has brought painfully to my mind the greatness of early expectations, the quick flight of time, and alas! the smallness of realizations. The following lines which, but for your initiative, might not have been given to the world for a long time yet, are an offering in the friendly spirit of old, and my best wishes for your future success accompany them.

Towards the close of 1898 a systematic research, carried on for a number of years with the object of perfecting a method of transmission of electrical energy through the natural medium, led me to recognize three important necessities: First, to develop a transmitter of great power; second, to perfect means for individualizing and isolating the energy transmitted; and, third, to ascertain the laws of propagation of currents through the earth and the atmosphere. Various reasons, not the least of which was the help proffered by my friend Leonard E. Curtis and the Colorado Springs Electric Company, determined me to select for my experimental investigations the large plateau, two thousand meters above sea-level, in the vicinity of that delightful resort, which I reached late in May, 1899. I had not been there but a few days when I congratulated myself on the happy choice and I began the task, for which I had long trained myself, with a grateful sense and full of inspiring hope. The perfect purity of the air, the unequaled beauty of the sky, the imposing sight of a high mountain range, the quiet and restfulness of the place — all around contributed to make the conditions for scientific observations ideal. To this was added the exhilarating influence of a glorious climate and a singular sharpening of the senses. In those regions the organs undergo perceptible physical changes. The eyes assume an extraordinary limpidity, improving vision; the ears dry out and become more susceptible to sound. Objects can be clearly distinguished there at distances such that I prefer to have them told by someone else, and I have heard — this I can venture to vouch for — the claps of thunder seven and eight hundred kilometers away. I might have done better still, had it not been tedious to wait for the sounds to arrive, in definite intervals, as heralded precisely by an electrical indicating apparatus — nearly an hour before.

In the middle of June, while preparations for other work were going on, I arranged one of my receiving transformers with the view of determining in a novel manner, experimentally, the electric potential of the globe and studying its periodic and casual fluctuations. This formed part of a plan carefully mapped out in advance. A highly sensitive, self-restorative device, controlling a recording instrument, was included in the secondary circuit, while the primary was connected to the ground and an elevated terminal of adjustable capacity. The variations of potential gave rise to electric surgings in the primary; these generated secondary currents, which in turn affected the sensitive device and recorder in proportion to their intensity. The earth was found to be, literally, alive with electrical vibrations, and soon I was deeply absorbed in the interesting investigation. No better opportunities for such observations as I intended to make could be found anywhere. Colorado is a country famous for the natural displays of electric force. In that dry and rarefied atmosphere the sun’s rays beat the objects with fierce intensity. I raised steam, to a dangerous pressure, in barrels filled with concentrated salt solution, and the tin-foil coatings of some of my elevated terminals shriveled up in the fiery blaze. An experimental high-tension transformer, carelessly exposed to the rays of the setting sun, had most of its insulating compound melted out and was rendered useless. Aided by the dryness and rarefaction of the air, the water evaporates as in a boiler, and static electricity is developed in abundance. Lightning discharges are, accordingly, very frequent and sometimes of inconceivable violence. On one occasion approximately twelve thousand discharges occurred in two hours, and all in a radius of certainly less than fifty kilometers from the laboratory. Many of them resembled gigantic trees of fire with the trunks up or down. I never saw fire balls, but as compensation for my disappointment I succeeded later in determining the mode of their formation and producing them artificially.

In the latter part of the same month I noticed several times that my instruments were affected stronger by discharges taking place at great distances than by those near by. This puzzled me very much. What was the cause? A number of observations proved that it could not be due to the differences in the intensity of the individual discharges, and I readily ascertained that the phenomenon was not the result of a varying relation between the periods of my receiving circuits and those of the terrestrial disturbances. One night, as I was walking home with an assistant, meditating over these experiences, I was suddenly staggered by a thought. Years ago, when I wrote a chapter of my lecture before the Franklin Institute and the National Electric Light Association, it had presented itself to me, but I dismissed it as absurd and impossible. I banished it again. Nevertheless, my instinct was aroused and somehow I felt that I was nearing a great revelation.

It was on the third of July — the date I shall never forget — when I obtained the first decisive experimental evidence of a truth of overwhelming importance for the advancement of humanity. A dense mass of strongly charged clouds gathered in the west and towards the evening a violent storm broke loose which, after spending much of its fury in the mountains, was driven away with great velocity over the plains. Heavy and long persisting arcs formed almost in regular time intervals. My observations were now greatly facilitated and rendered more accurate by the experiences already gained. I was able to handle my instruments quickly and I was prepared. The recording apparatus being properly adjusted, its indications became fainter and fainter with the increasing distance of the storm, until they ceased altogether. I was watching in eager expectation. Surely enough, in a little while the indications again began, grew stronger and stronger and, after passing through a maximum, gradually decreased and ceased once more. Many times, in regularly recurring intervals, the same actions were repeated until the storm which, as evident from simple computations, was moving with nearly constant speed, had retreated to a distance of about three hundred kilometers. Nor did these strange actions stop then, but continued to manifest themselves with undiminished force. Subsequently, similar observations were also made by my assistant, Mr. Fritz Lowenstein, and shortly afterward several admirable opportunities presented themselves which brought out, still more forcibly, and unmistakably, the true nature of the wonderful phenomenon. No doubt(,) whatever remained: I was observing stationary waves.

As the source of disturbances moved away the receiving circuit came successively upon their nodes and loops. Impossible as it seemed, this planet, despite its vast extent, behaved like a conductor of limited dimensions. The tremendous significance of this fact in the transmission of energy by my system had already become quite clear to me. Not only was it practicable to send telegraphic messages to any distance without wires, as I recognized long ago, but also to impress upon the entire globe the faint modulations of the human voice, far more still, to transmit power, in unlimited amounts, to any terrestrial distance and almost without loss.

With these stupendous possibilities in sight, (and) with the experimental evidence before me that their realization was henceforth merely a question of expert knowledge, patience and skill, I attacked vigorously the development of my magnifying transmitter, now, however, not so much with the original intention of producing one of great power, as with the object of learning how to construct the best one. This is, essentially, a circuit of very high self-induction and small resistance which in its arrangement, mode of excitation and action, may be said to be the diametrical opposite of a transmitting circuit typical of telegraphy by Hertzian or electromagnetic radiations. It is difficult to form an adequate idea of the marvelous power of this unique appliance, by the aid of which the globe will be transformed. The electromagnetic radiations being reduced to an insignificant quantity, and proper conditions of resonance maintained, the circuit acts like an immense pendulum, storing indefinitely the energy of the primary exciting impulses and impressions upon the earth (of the primary exciting impulses) and (impressions upon the earth and) its conducting atmosphere uniform harmonic oscillations of intensities which, as actual tests have shown, may be pushed so far as to surpass those attained in the natural displays of static electricity.

Simultaneously with these endeavors, the means of individualization and isolation were gradually improved. Great importance was attached to this, for it was found that simple tuning was not sufficient to meet the vigorous practical requirements. The fundamental idea of employing a number of distinctive elements, co-operatively associated, for the purpose of isolating energy transmitted, I trace directly to my perusal of Spencer’s clear and suggestive exposition of the human nerve mechanism. The influence of this principle on the transmission of intelligence, and electrical energy in general, cannot as yet be estimated, for the art is still in the embryonic stage; but many thousands of simultaneous telegraphic and telephonic messages, through one single conducting channel, natural or artificial, and without serious mutual interference, are certainly practicable, while millions are possible. On the other hand, any desired degree of individualization may be secured by the use of a great number of co-operative elements and arbitrary variation of their distinctive features and order of succession. For obvious reasons, the principle will also be valuable in the extension of the distance of transmission.

Progress though of necessity slow was steady and sure, for the objects aimed at were in a direction of my constant study and exercise. It is, therefore, not astonishing that before the end of 1899 I completed the task undertaken and reached the results which I have announced in my article in the Century Magazine of June, 1900, every word of which was carefully weighed.

Much has already been done towards making my system commercially available, in the transmission of energy in small amounts for specific purposes, as well as on an industrial scale. The results attained by me have made my scheme of intelligence transmission, for which the name of “World Telegraphy” has been suggested, easily realizable. It constitutes, I believe, in its principle of operation, means employed and capacities of application, a radical and fruitful departure from what has been done heretofore. I have no doubt that it will prove very efficient in enlightening the masses, particularly in still uncivilized countries and less accessible regions, and that it will add materially to general safety, comfort and convenience, and maintenance of peaceful relations. It involves the employment of a number of plants, all of which are capable of transmitting individualized signals to the uttermost confines of the earth. Each of them will be preferably located near some important center of civilization and the news it receives through any channel will be flashed to all points of the globe. A cheap and simple device, which might be carried in one’s pocket, may then be set up somewhere on sea or land, and it will record the world’s news or such special messages as may be intended for it. Thus the entire earth will be converted into a huge brain, as it were, capable of response in every one of its parts. Since a single plant of but one hundred horse-power can operate hundreds of millions of instruments, the system will have a virtually infinite working capacity, and it must needs immensely facilitate and cheapen the transmission of intelligence.

The first of these central plants would have been already completed had it not been for unforeseen delays which, fortunately, have nothing to do with its purely technical features. But this loss of time, while vexatious, may, after all, prove to be a blessing in disguise. The best design of which I know has been adopted, and the transmitter will emit a wave complex of total maximum activity of ten million horse-power, one per cent. of which is amply sufficient to “girdle the globe.” This enormous rate of energy delivery,(.) approximately twice that of the combined falls of Niagara, is obtainable only by the use of certain artifices, which I shall make known in due course.

For a large part of the work which I have done so far I am indebted to the noble generosity of Mr. J. Pierpont Morgan, which was all the more welcome and stimulating, as it was extended at a time when those, who have since promised most, were the greatest of doubters. I have also to thank my friend, Stanford White, for much unselfish and valuable assistance. This work is now far advanced, and though the results may be tardy, they are sure to come.

Meanwhile, the transmission of energy on an industrial scale is not being neglected. The Canadian Niagara Power Company have offered me a splendid inducement, and next to achieving success for the sake of the art, it will give me the greatest satisfaction to make their concession financially profitable to them. In this first power plant, which I have been designing for a long time, I propose to distribute ten thousand horse-power under a tension of one hundred million volts, which I am now able to produce and handle with safety.

This energy will be collected all over the globe preferably in small amounts, ranging from a fraction of one to a few horse-power. One -(of) its chief uses will be the illumination of isolated homes. I takes very little power to light a dwelling with vacuum tubes operated by high- frequency currents and in each instance a terminal a little above the roof will be sufficient. Another valuable application will be the driving of clocks and other such apparatus. These clocks will be exceedingly simple, will require absolutely no attention and will indicate rigorously correct time. The idea of impressing upon the earth American time is fascinating and very likely to become popular. There are innumerable devices of all kinds which are either now employed or can be supplied, and by operating them in this manner I may be able to offer a great convenience to whole world with a plant of no more than ten thousand horse-power. The introduction of this system will give opportunities for invention and manufacture such as have never presented themselves before.

Knowing the far-reaching importance of this first attempt and its effect upon future development, I shall proceed slowly and carefully. Experience has taught me not to assign a term to enterprises the consummation of which is not wholly dependent on my own abilities and exertions. But I am hopeful that these great realizations are not far off, and I know that when this first work is completed they will follow with mathematical certitude.

When the great truth accidentally revealed and experimentally confirmed is fully recognized, that this planet, with all its appalling immensity, is to electric currents virtually no more than a small metal ball and that by this fact many possibilities, each baffling imagination and of incalculable consequence, are rendered absolutely sure of accomplishment; when the first plant is inaugurated and it is shown that a telegraphic message, almost as secret and non-interferable as a thought, can be transmitted to any terrestrial distance, the sound of the human voice, with all its intonations and inflections, faithfully and instantly reproduced at any other point of the globe, the energy of a waterfall made available for supplying light, heat or motive power, anywhere — on sea, or land, or high in the air — humanity will be like an ant heap stirred up with a stick: See the excitement coming!


*photocopy of original here

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘0️⃣5️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '05
__________________



THE TRANSMISSION OF ELECTRICAL ENERGY WITHOUT WIRES AS A MEANS FOR FURTHERING PEACE
————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical World and Engineer
January 7th, 1905 Page number(s): 21-24 (alternate sources?)


𝐔NIVERSAL PEACE, assuming it to be in the fullest sense realizable, might not require eons for its accomplishment, however probable this may appear, judging from the imperceptibly slow growth of all great reformatory ideas of the past. Man, as a mass in movement, is inseparable from sluggishness and persistence in his life manifestations, but it does not follow from this that any passing phase, or any permanent state of his existence, must necessarily be attained through a stataclitic process of development.

Our accepted estimates of the duration of natural metamorphoses, or changes in general, have been thrown in doubt of late. The very foundations of science have been shaken. We can no longer believe in the Maxwellian hypothesis of transversal ether-undulations -(and the literal truth of its corollaries. The practical utilization of) electrical vibrations, this most important field of human endeavor, particularly in the advancement of philanthropy and peace, was in no small measure retarded by that fascinating illusion, which I since long hoped to dispel. I have noted with satisfaction the first signs of a change of scientific opinion. The brilliant discovery of the exceptionally “radio-active” substances, radium and polonium, by Mrs. Sklodowska Curie, has likewise afforded me much personal gratification, being an e(é)clatant confirmation of my early experimental demonstrations, of electrified radian streams of primary matter or corpuscular emanations *(Electrical Review, New York, 1896-1897)*, which were then received with incredulity. They have awakened us from the poetical dream of an intangible conveyor of energy, weightless, structureless ether, to the plain, palpable reality of a ponderous medium of coarse particles, or bodily carriers of force. They have led us to a radically new interpretation of the changes and transformations we perceive. Enlightened by this recognition, we cannot say the sun is hot, the moon is cold, the star is bright, for all these might be purely electrical phenomena. If this be the case, then even our conceptions of time and space may have to be modified.

So, too, as regards the organic world, a similar revolution of thought is distinctly observable. In biological and zoological research the bold ideas of Haensel have found support in recent discoveries. A heretic belief in such possibilities as the artificial production of simple living material aggregates, the spontaneous natural creation of complex organisms and willful sex control, is gaining ground. We still brush it aside, but not with pedantic disdain as before. The fact is — our faith in the orthodox theory of slow evolution is being destroyed!

Thus a state of human life vaguely defined by the term “Universal Peace,” while a result of cumulative effort through centuries past, might come into existence quickly, not unlike a crystal suddenly forms in a solution which has been slowly prepared. But just as no effect can precede its cause, so this state can never be brought on by any pact between nations, however solemn. Experience is made before the law is formulated, both are related like cause and effect. So long as we are clearly conscious of the expectation, that peace is to result from such a parliamentary decision, so long have we a conclusive evidence that we are not fit for peace. Only then when we shall feel that such international meetings are mere formal procedures, unnecessary except in so far as they might serve to give definite expression to a common desire, will peace be assured.

To judge from current events we must be, as yet, very distant from that blissful goal. It is true that we are proceeding towards it rapidly. There are abundant signs of this progress everywhere. The race enmities and prejudices are decidedly waning. A recent act of His Excellency, the President of the United States, is significant in this respect. We begin to think cosmically. Our sympathetic feelers reach out into the dim distance. The bacteria of the “Weltschmerz,” are upon us. So far, however, universal harmony has been attained only in a single sphere of international relationship. That is the postal service. Its mechanism is working satisfactorily, but — how remote are we still from that scrupulous respect of the sanctity of the mail bag! And how much farther again is the next milestone on the road to peace — an international judicial service equally reliable as the postal!

The coming meeting at the Hague, now indefinitely postponed, can only consider temporary expedients. General disarmament being for the present entirely out of question, a proportionate reduction might be recommended. The safety of any country and of the world’s commerce depending not on the absolute, but relative amount of war material, this would be evidently the first reasonable step to take towards universal economy and peace. But it would be a hopeless task to establish an equitable basis of adjustment. Population, naval strength, force of army, commercial importance, water-power, or any other natural resource, actual or prospective, are equally unsatisfactory standards to consider.

In view of this difficulty a measure suggested by Carnegie might be adopted by a few strong countries to scare all the weaker ones into peace. But while for the time being such a course may seem advisable, the beneficial effects of this homeopathic treatment of the martial disease could hardly be lasting. In the first place, a coalition of the leading powers could not fail to create an organized opposition, which might result in a disaster all the greater as it was long deferred. The ultimate falling out of the virtuous, peace-dictating nations, as certain as the law of gravitation, should be all the more reckoned with, as it would be extremely demoralizing. Again, it is by no means -(demonstrated that any combination of a few powers would have) sufficient authority.

To conquer by sheer force is becoming harder and harder every day. Defensive is getting continuously the advantage of offensive, as we progress in the satanic science of destruction. The new art of controlling electrically the movements and operations of individualized automata at a distance without wires, will soon enable any country to render its coasts impregnable against all naval attacks. It is to be regretted, in this connection, that my proposal to the United States Navy four years ago, to introduce this invention, did not receive the least encouragement. Also that my offer to Secretary Long to establish telegraphic communication across the Pacific Ocean by my wireless system was thrown in the naval waste basket in Washington, quite sans façon. At that time I had already announced in t(T)he Century Magazine of June, 1900, my successful “girdling” of the globe with electrical impulses (stationary waves), and my “telautomata” had been publicly exhibited. But that was not the fault of the naval officials, for then these inventions of mine were decried as bald(bold)+++(lol), visionary schemes, loudest indeed by those who have since become Cræsuses(*)Croesuses of Promise — in “light” storage batteries, “Ocean” telephony and “transatlantic” wireless telegraphy, yet remained to this day — Sisyphuses of Attainment. Had only a few “telautomatic” torpedoes been constructed and adopted by our navy, the mere moral influence of this would have been powerfully and most beneficially felt in the present Eastern Complication. Not to speak of the advantages which might have been secured through the direct and instantaneous transmission of messages to our distant colonies and scenes of the present barbarous conflicts. Since advancing that principle, I have invented a number of improvements, making it possible to direct such a torpedo, submersible at will, from a distance much greater than the range of the largest gun, with unerring precision, upon the object to be destroyed. What is still more surprising, the operator will not need to see the infernal engine or even know its location, and the enemy will be unable to interfere, in the slightest, with its movements by any electrical means. One of these devil-telautomata will soon be constructed, and I shall bring it to the attention of governments. The development of this art must unavoidably arrest the construction of expensive battleships as well as land fortifications, and revolutionize the means and methods of warfare. The distance at which it can strike, and the destructive power of such a quasi-intelligent machine being for all practical purposes unlimited, the gun, the armor of the battleship and the wall of the fortress, lose their import and significance. One can prophesy with a Daniel’s confidence that skilled electricians will settle the battles of the near future. But this is the least. In its effect upon war and peace, electricity offers still much greater and more wonderful possibilities. To stop war by the perfection of engines of destruction alone, might consume centuries and centuries. Other means must be employed to hasten the end. What are these to be? Let us consider.

Fights between individuals, as well as governments and nations, invariably result from misunderstandings in the broadest interpretation of this term. Misunderstandings are always caused by the inability of appreciating one another’s point of view. This again is due to the ignorance of those concerned, not so much in their own, as in their mutual fields. The peril of a clash is aggravated by a more or less predominant sense of combativeness, posed by every human being. To resist this inherent fighting tendency the best was is to dispel ignorance of the doings of others by a systematic spread of general knowledge. With this object in view, it is most important to aid exchange of thought and intercourse.

Mutual understanding would be immensely facilitated by the use of one universal tongue. But which shall it be, is the great question. At present it looks as if the English might be adopted as such, though it must be admitted that it is not the most suitable. Each language, of course, excels in some feature. The English lends itself to a terse, forceful expression of facts. The French is precise and finely distinctive. The Italian is probably the most melodious and easiest to learn. The Slavic tongues are very rich in sound but extremely difficult to master. The German is unequaled in the facility it offers for coining and combining words. A practical answer to that momentous question must perforce be found in times to come, for it is manifest that by adopting one common language the onward march of man would be prodigiously quickened. I do not believe that an artificial concoction, like Volapuk, will ever find universal acceptance, however time-saving it might be. That would be contrary to human nature. Languages have grown into our hearts. I rather look to the possibility of a reversion to the old Latin or Greek mother tongues, basing myself in this conclusion on the Spencerian law of rhythm [see Spencer's First Principles]. It seems unfortunate that the English-speaking nations, who are now fittest to rule the world, while endowed with extraordinary energy and practical intelligence, are singularly wanting in linguistic talent.

Next to speech we must consider permanent records of all kinds as a means for disseminating general information, or that knowledge of mutual endeavor which is chiefly conducive to harmony. Here the newspapers play by far the most important part. They are undoubtedly more effective than institutions of learning, libraries, museums and individual correspondence, all combined. The knowledge they convey is, on the whole, superficial and sometimes defective, but it is poured out in a mighty stream that reaches far and wide. Disregarding the force of electrical invention, that of journalism is the greatest in urging -(us to) peace. Our schools are instrumental, mainly, in the furtherance of special thorough knowledge in our own fields, which is destructive of concordance. A world composed of crass specialists only would be perpetually at war. The diffusion of general knowledge through libraries and similar sources of information is very slow. As to individual correspondence, it is principally useful as an indispensable ingredient of the cement of commercial interest, that most powerful binding material between heterogeneous masses of humanity. It would be hard to overestimate the beneficial influence of the marvelous and precise art of photography, nor can that of other arts or means of recording be ignored. But a simple reflection will show that the peace-making force of all permanent, printed, printed or other records, resides not in themselves. It must be sought elsewhere. This is also true of speech.

Our senses enable us to perceive only a minute portion of the outside world. Our -(touch, taste and smell, require actual contact. Our) hearing extends to a small distance. Our sight is impeded by intervening bodies and shadows. To know each other we must reach beyond the sphere of our sense perceptions. We must transmit our intelligence, travel, transport the materials and transfer the energies necessary for our existence. Following this thought we now realize, forcibly enough to dispense with argument, that of all other conquests of man, without exception, that which is most desirable, which would be most helpful in the establishment of universal peaceful relations is — the complete ANNIHILATION OF DISTANCE.

To achieve this wonder, electricity is the one and only means. Inestimable good has already been done by the use of this all powerful agent, the nature of which is still a mystery. Our astonishment at what has been accomplished would be uncontrollable were it not held in check by the expectation of greater miracles to come. That one, the greatest of all, can be viewed in three aspects: Dissemination of intelligence, transportation, and transmission of power.

Referring to the first, the present systems of telegraphic and telephonic communication are very limited in scope. The conducting channels are costly and of small working capacity. There is serious inductive disturbance, and storms render the service unsafe which, moreover, is too expensive. A vast improvement will be effected by placing the wires underground and insulating them artificially, by refrigeration. Their working capacity also could be(/)(by) indefinitely augmented by resorting to the new principle of “individualization,” which I have more recently announced, permitting the simultaneous transmission of thousands of telegraphic and telephonic messages, without interference, over a single wire. The public would be already profiting from these great advances were it not for the stolid indifference of the leading companies engaged in the transmission of intelligence. But new concerns are springing into existence and the near future will witness a great transformation along these two lines of invention. The submarine cables are subject to still greater limitations. Some obstacles to rapid signaling, through them, seem insuperable. The attempts to overcome these have been numerous, but so far all have proved futile. The celebrated mathematician, O. Heaviside, and several able electricians following in his footsteps, have fallen into the singular error that rapid telegraphy and even telephony through ocean cables would be made practicable by the use of induction coils. Inductances might be to some extent helpful on comparatively short lines with thick paper insulation; on long lines insulated with rubber or gutta-percha they would be positively detrimental. Improvements will, undoubtedly, be made, but great electrostatic capacity and unavoidable loss of energy in the insulation and surrounding conductors will always restrict the usefulness of the -(se delicate and precious nerves of commerce. Apart from all this, the) transmission through artificial conductors is necessarily confined to a small number of stations.

It is therefore evident that the abolishment of all these drawbacks by the conveyance of signals or messages without wires, as I have undertaken in my “world” telegraphy and telephony, will be of the greatest moment in the furtherance of peace. The unifying influence of this advance will be felt all the more, as it will not only completely annihilate distance, but also make it possible to operate from a singe “world” telegraphy plant, an unlimited number of receiving stations distributed all over the globe, and with equal facility, irrespective of location. Within a few years a simple and inexpensive device, readily carried about, will enable one to receive on land or sea the principal news, to hear a speech, a lecture, a song or play of a musical instrument, conveyed from any other region of the globe. The invention will also meet the crying need for cheap transmission to great distances, more especially over the oceans. The small working capacity of the cables and the excessive cost of messages are now fatal impediments in the dissemination of intelligence which can only be removed by transmission without wires.

The deficiencies of Hertzian telegraphy have created in the public mind the impression that exclusive or private messages without the use of artificial channels are impracticable. As a matter of fact, nothing could be more erroneous. Ever since its first appearance in 1891, I have denied the commercial possibilities of the system of signaling by Hertzian or electromagnetic waves, and my forecasts have been fully confirmed. It lends itself little to tuning, still less to the higher artifices of “individualization,” and transmission to considerable distances is wholly out of the question. Portentous claims for this method of communication were made three years ago, but they have been unable to stand the hard, cruel test of time. Moreover, I have recently learned through the leading British electrical journal (Electrician, London, February 27, 1903), that some experimenters have abandoned all their own and have been “converted” to my methods and appliances, without my approval and officiation. I was both astonished and pained — astonished at the nonchalance and lack of appreciation of these men, pained at the inability exhibited in the construction and use of my apparatus. My high hopes raised by that excellent journal, however, are still to be realized, for I have ascertained that His Majesty the King of England, His excellency the President of the United States, and other persons of exalted positions have, after all, not conferred upon me the imperishable honor of graciously condescending to the use for my coils, transformers and high-potential methods of transmission, but have exchanged their august greetings through the medium of a cable in the old-fashioned way. What has been actually achieved by Hertzian telegraphy can only be conjectured.

Quite different conditions exist in my system in which the electromagnetic waves or radiations are designedly minimized, the connection of one of the terminals of the transmitting circuit to the ground having, itself, the effect of reducing the energy of these radiations to about one-half. Under observance of proper rules and artifices the distance is of little or no consequence, and by skillful application of the principle of “individualization,” repeatedly referred to, the messages may be rendered both non-interfering and non-interferable. This invention, which I have described in technical publications, attempts to imitate, in a very crude way, the nervous system in the human body. It was the outcome of long-continued tests demonstrating the impossibility of satisfying rigorous commercial requirements by my earlier system, based on simple tuning, in which the selective quality is dependent on a single characteristic feature. In this later improvement the exclusiveness and non-interferability of impulses transmitted through a common channel result from cooperative association of(/)(four) a number of distinctive elements, and can be pushed as far as desired. In actual practice it is found that by combining only two vibrations or tones, a degree of privacy sufficient for most purposes is attained. When three vibrations are combined, it is extremely difficult, even for a skilled expert, to read or to disturb signals not intended for him, with four it is a vain undertaking. The probability of his getting the secret combinations at the right moments and in proper order, is much smaller than that of drawing an ambo, terno or quaterno, respectively, in a lottery. From experimental facts, I conclude that the invention will permit the simultaneous transmission of several millions of separately distinguishable messages through the earth, which, strangely enough, is in this respect much superior to an artificial conductor. This number ought to be sufficient to meet all the pressing necessities of intelligence transmission for at least one century to come. It is important to observe that but one “world” telegraphy plant, such as I am now completing, will have a greater working capacity than all the ocean cables combined. Once these facts are recognized this new art, which I am inaugurating, will sweep the world with the force of a uragan.

In transportation a great change is now going on. The trolley lines are being extended, the steam locomotive is making place for the electric motor. The ocean liners are adopting the turbine. Land travel is being improved by the automobile. The waterfalls are being harnessed and the energy used in the propulsion of cars. The advantages of first generating electricity by a prime mover, -(and then applying the current to produce mechanical motion, )are being more and more appreciated. To the majority, this may appear a roundabout way of doing, but in reality it is as direct as the driving of a pulley from another by a belt. The idea is already being applied to railroads, and automobiles of this new type are making their appearance. The ocean vessels are bound to follow. An immense and virgin field will be thus opened up to the manufacturers of electric machinery. Effort towards saving time and money is characteristic of all modern methods of transportation. In many of these new developments, the artificial insulation of the high-tension mains by refrigeration will be very useful. However paradoxical, it is true, that by the use of this invention, power for all industrial purposes can be transmitted to distances of many hundreds of miles, not only without any loss, but with appreciable gain of energy. This is due to the fact that the conductor is much colder than the surrounding medium. The operativeness of this method is restricted to the use of a gaseous refrigerant, no known liquid permitting the attainment of a sufficiently low temperature of the transmission line. Hydrogen is by far the best cooling agent to employ. By its use electric railways can be extended to any desired distance. Owing to the smallness of ohmic loss, the objections to the multiphase system disappear and induction motors with closed coil armatures can be adopted. I find that even transmission through a submarine cable, as from Sweden to England, of great amounts of power is perfectly practicable. But the ideal solution of the problem of transportation will be arrived at only when the complete annihilation of distance in the transmission of power in large amounts shall have become a commercial reality. That day we shall invade the domain of the bird. When the vexing problem of aerial navigation, which has defied his attempts for ages, is solved, man will advance with giant strides.

That electrical energy can be economically transmitted without wires to any terrestrial distance, I have unmistakably established in numerous observations, experiments and measurements, qualitative and quantitative. These have demonstrated that is practicable to distribute power from a central plant in unlimited amounts, with a loss not exceeding a small fraction of one per cent. in the transmission, even to the greatest distance, twelve thousand miles — to the opposite end of the globe. This seemingly impossible feat can now be readily performed by any electrician familiar with the design and construction of my “high-potential magnifying transmitter,” the most marvelous electrical apparatus of which I have knowledge, enabling the production of effects of unlimited intensities in the earth and its ambient atmosphere. It is, essentially, a freely vibrating secondary circuit of definite length, very high self-induction and small resistance, which has one of its terminals in intimate direct or inductive connection with the ground and the other with an elevated conductor, and upon which the electrical oscillations of a primary or exciting circuit are impressed under conditions of resonance. To give an idea of the capabilities of this wonderful appliance, I may state that I have obtained, by its means, spark discharges extending through more than one hundred feet and carrying currents of one thousand amperes, electromotive forces approximating twenty million volts, chemically active streamers covering areas of several thousand square feet, and electrical disturbances in the natural media surpassing those caused by lightning, in intensity.

Whatever the future may bring, the universal application of these great principles is fully assured, though it may be long in coming. With the opening of the first power plant, incredulity will give way to wonderment, and this to ingratitude, as ever before. The time is not distant when the energy of falling water will be man’s life energy. So far only about-( three) million horse-power have been harnessed by my system of alternating-current transmission. This is little, but corresponds, nevertheless, to the adding of sixty million indefatigable laborers, working virtually without food and pay, to the world’s population. The projects which have come to my own attention, however, contemplate the exploitation of water-powers aggregating something like one hundred and fifty million horse-power. Should they be carried out in a quarter of a century, as seems probable from present indications, there will be, on the average two such untiring laborers for every individual. Long before this consummation, coal and oil must cease to be important factors in the sustenance of human life on this planet. It should be borne in mind that electrical energy obtained by harnessing a waterfall is probably fifty times more effective than fuel energy. Since this is the most perfect way of rendering the sun’s energy available, the direction of the future material development of man is clearly indicated. He will live on “white coal.” Like a babe to the mothers’s breast will he cling to his waterfall. “Give us our daily waterfall,” will be the prayer of the coming generations. Deus futurus est deus aquae deiectus!

But the fact that stationary waves are producible in the earth is of special and, in many ways, still greater significance in the intellectual development of humanity. Popularly explained, such a wave is a phenomenon generically akin to an echo — a result of reflection. It affords a positive and uncontrovertible experimental evidence that the electric current, after passing into the earth travels to the diametrically opposite region of the same and rebounding from there, returns to its point of departure with virtually undiminished force. The outgoing and returning currents clash and form nodes and loops similar to those observable on a vibrating cord. To traverse the entire distance of about twenty-five thousand miles, equal to the circumference of the globe, the current requires a certain time interval, which I have approximately ascertained. In yielding this knowledge, nature has revealed one of its most precious secrets, of inestimable consequence to man. So astounding are the facts in this connection, that it would seem as though the Creator, himself, had electrically designed this planet just for the purpose of enabling us to achieve wonders which, before my discovery, could not have been conceived by the wildest imagination. A full account of my discoveries and improvements will be given to the world in a special work which I am preparing. In so far, however, as they relate to industrial and commercial uses, they will be disclosed in patent specifications most carefully drawn.

As stated in a recent article (Electrical World and Engineer, March 5, 1904), I have been since some time at work on designs of a power plant which is to transmit ten thousand horse-power without wires. The energy is to be collected al over the earth at many places and in varying amounts. It should not be understood that the practical realization of this undertaking is necessarily far off. The plans could be easily finished this winter, and if some preliminary work on the foundations could be done in the meantime the plant might be ready for operation before the close of next fall. We would then have at our disposal a unique and invaluable machine. Just this one oscillator would advance the world a century. Its civilizing influence would be felt even by the humblest dweller in the wilderness. Millions of instruments of all kinds, for all imaginable purposes, could be operated from that one machine. Universal time could be distributed by simple inexpensive clocks requiring no attention and running with nearly mathematical precision. Stock-tickers, synchronous movements and innumerable devices of this character could be worked in unison all over the earth. Instruments might be provided for indicating the course of a vessel at sea, the distance traversed, the speed, the hour at any particular place, the latitude and longitude. Incalculable commercial advantages could be thus secured and countless accidents and disasters avoided. Here and there a house might be lighted or some other work requiring a few horse-power performed. What is far more important than this, flying machines might be driven in any part of the world. They could be made to travel swiftly because of their small weight and great motive power. My intention would be to utilize this first plant rather as means of enlightenment, to collect its power in very small amounts, and at as many places as possible. The knowledge that there is throbbing through the earth energy readily available everywhere, would exert a strong stimulus on students, mechanics and inventors of all countries. This would be productive of infinite good. Manufacture would receive a fresh and powerful incentive. Conditions, such as never existed before in commerce, would be brought about. Supply would be ever inadequate to demand. The industries of iron, copper, aluminum, insulated wire and many others, could not fail to derive great and lasting benefits from this development.

The economic transmission of power without wires is of all-surpassing importance to man. By its means he will gain complete mastery of the air, the sea and the desert. It will enable him to dispense with the necessity of mining, pumping, transporting and burning fuel, and so do away with innumerable causes of sinful waste. By its means, he will obtain at any place and in any desired amount, the energy of remote waterfalls — to drive his machinery, to construct his canals, tunnels and highways, to manufacture the materials of his want, his clothing and food, to heat and light his home — year in, year out, ever and ever, by day and by night. It will make the living glorious sun his obedient, toiling slave. It will bring peace and harmony on earth.

Over five years have elapsed since that providential lightning storm on the 3d of July, 1899, of which I told in the article before mentioned, and through which I discovered the terrestrial stationary waves; nearly five years since I performed the great experiment which on that unforgettable day, the dark God of Thunder mercifully showed me in his vast, awe-sounding laboratory. I thought then that it would take a year to establish commercially my wireless girdle around the world. Alas! my first “world telegraphy” plant is not yet completed, its construction has progressed but slowly during the past two years. And this machine I am building is but a plaything, an oscillator of a maximum activity of only ten million horse-power, just enough to throw this planet into feeble tremors, by sign and word — to telegraph and to telephone. When shall I see completed that first power plant, that big oscillator which I am designing! From which a current stronger than that of a welding machine, under a tension of one hundred million volts, is to rush through the earth! Which will deliver energy at the rate of one thousand million horse-power — one hundred Falls of Niagara combined in one, striking the universe with blows — blows that will wake from their slumber the sleepiest electricians, if there be any, on Venus or Mars! . . . It is not a dream, it is a simple feat of scientific electrical engineering, only expensive — blind, faint-hearted, doubting world! . . . Humanity is not yet sufficiently advanced to be willingly led by the discover(er)’s keen searching sense. But who knows? Perhaps it is better in this present world of ours that a revolutionary idea or invention instead of being helped and patted, be hampered and ill-treated in its adolescence — by want of means, by selfish interest, pedantry, stupidity and ignorance; that it be attacked and stifled; that it pass through bitter trials and tribulations, through the heartless strife of commercial existence. So do we get our light. So all that was great in the past was ridiculed, condemned, combated, suppressed — only to emerge all the more powerfully, all the more triumphantly from the struggle. ?+/-?(The present is theirs, the future, for which I really worked, is mine.)


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


Alternate sources for 
Electrical World and Engineer
January 7th, 1905
Page number(s): 21-24
article?

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘0️⃣6️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '06








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘0️⃣7️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '07
__________________


CAN BRIDGE THE GAP TO MARS
Nikola Tesla on His Wireless System for the Transmission of Energy.
————
by
New York Times
June 23rd, 1907 Page number(s): ?


To the Editor of The New York Times:

You have called me an “inventor of some useful pieces of electrical apparatus.” It is not quite up to my aspirations, but I must resign myself to my prosaic fate. I cannot deny that you are right.

Nearly four million horse power of waterfalls are harnessed by my alternating current system of transmission, which is like saying that one hundred million men —untiring, consuming nothing, receiving no pay—are laboring to provide for one hundred million tons of coal annually. In this great city the elevated roads, the subways, the street railways are operated by my system, and the lamps and other electrical appliances get the current through machinery of my invention. And as in New York so all the world over where electricity is introduced. The telephone and incandescent lamp fill specific and minor demands, electric power meets the many general and sterner necessities of life. Yes, I must admit, however reluctantly, the truth of your unflattering contention.

But the greater commercial importance of this invention of mine is not the only advantage I have over my celebrated predecessors in the realm of the useful, who have given us the telephone and the incandescent lamp. Permit me to remind you that I did not have, like Bell, such powerful help as the Reis telephone, which reproduced music and only needed a deft turn of an adjusting screw to repeat the human voice; or such vigorous assistance as Edison found in the incandescent lamps of King and Starr, which only needed to be made of high resistance. Not at all. I had to cut the path myself, and my hands are still sore. All the army of my opponents and detractors was ever able to drum up against me in a fanatic contest has simmered down to a short article by an Italian—Prof. Ferraris—dealing with an abstract and meaningless idea of a rotating magnetic pole and published years after my discovery, months even after my complete disclosure of the whole practically developed system in all its essential universally adopted features. It is a publication, pessimistic and discouraging, devoid of the discoverer’s virility and force, devoid of results, utterly wanting in the faith and devotion of the inventor, a defective and belated record of a good but feeble man whose only response to my whole-souled brother greeting was a plaintive cry of priority—a sad contrast to the strong and equanimous Schallenberger, a true American engineer, who stoically bore the pain that killed him.

A fundamental discovery or original invention is always useful, but it is often more than that. There are physicists and philosophers to whom the marvelous manifestations of my rotating magnetic field, the suggestive phenomena of rotation without visible connection, the ideal beauty of my induction motor with its contactless armature, mean quite as much as the thousands of millions of dollars invested in enterprises of which it is the foundation.

𝔸𝕟𝕕 𝕥𝕙𝕚𝕤 𝕚𝕤 𝕥𝕣𝕦𝕖 𝕠𝕗 𝕒𝕝𝕝 𝕞𝕪 𝕕𝕚𝕤𝕔𝕠𝕧𝕖𝕣𝕚𝕖𝕤, 𝕚𝕟𝕧𝕖𝕟𝕥𝕚𝕠𝕟𝕤, 𝕒𝕟𝕕 𝕤𝕔𝕚𝕖𝕟𝕥𝕚𝕗𝕚𝕔 𝕣𝕖𝕤𝕦𝕝𝕥𝕤 𝕨𝕙𝕚𝕔𝕙 𝕀 𝕙𝕒𝕧𝕖 𝕤𝕚𝕟𝕔𝕖 𝕒𝕟𝕟𝕠𝕦𝕟𝕔𝕖𝕕, 𝕗𝕠𝕣 𝕀 𝕙𝕒𝕧𝕖 𝕟𝕖𝕧𝕖𝕣 𝕚𝕟𝕧𝕖𝕟𝕥𝕖𝕕 𝕨𝕙𝕒𝕥 𝕚𝕞𝕞𝕖𝕕𝕚𝕒𝕥𝕖 𝕟𝕖𝕔𝕖𝕤𝕤𝕚𝕥𝕪 𝕤𝕦𝕘𝕘𝕖𝕤𝕥𝕖𝕕, 𝕓𝕦𝕥 𝕨𝕙𝕒𝕥 𝕀 𝕗𝕠𝕦𝕟𝕕 𝕒𝕤 𝕞𝕠𝕤𝕥 𝕕𝕖𝕤𝕚𝕣𝕒𝕓𝕝𝕖 𝕥𝕠 𝕚𝕟𝕧𝕖𝕟𝕥, 𝕚𝕣𝕣𝕖𝕤𝕡𝕖𝕔𝕥𝕚𝕧𝕖 𝕠𝕗 𝕥𝕚𝕞𝕖. 𝕃𝕖𝕥 𝕞𝕖 𝕥𝕖𝕝𝕝 𝕪𝕠𝕦 𝕠𝕟𝕝𝕪 𝕠𝕗 𝕠𝕟𝕖—𝕞𝕪 “𝕞𝕒𝕘𝕟𝕚𝕗𝕪𝕚𝕟𝕘 𝕥𝕣𝕒𝕟𝕤𝕞𝕚𝕥𝕥𝕖𝕣,” 𝕒 𝕞𝕒𝕔𝕙𝕚𝕟𝕖 𝕨𝕚𝕥𝕙 𝕨𝕙𝕚𝕔𝕙 𝕀 𝕙𝕒𝕧𝕖 𝕡𝕒𝕤𝕤𝕖𝕕 𝕒 𝕔𝕦𝕣𝕣𝕖𝕟𝕥 𝕠𝕗 𝕠𝕟𝕖 𝕙𝕦𝕟𝕕𝕣𝕖𝕕 𝕒𝕞𝕡𝕖𝕣𝕖𝕤 𝕒𝕣𝕠𝕦𝕟𝕕 𝕥𝕙𝕖 𝕘𝕝𝕠𝕓𝕖, 𝕨𝕚𝕥𝕙 𝕨𝕙𝕚𝕔𝕙 𝕀 𝕔𝕒𝕟 𝕞𝕒𝕜𝕖 𝕥𝕙𝕖 𝕨𝕙𝕠𝕝𝕖 𝕖𝕒𝕣𝕥𝕙 𝕝𝕠𝕦𝕕𝕝𝕪 𝕣𝕖𝕡𝕖𝕒𝕥 𝕒 𝕨𝕠𝕣𝕕 𝕤𝕡𝕠𝕜𝕖𝕟 𝕚𝕟 𝕥𝕙𝕖 𝕥𝕖𝕝𝕖𝕡𝕙𝕠𝕟𝕖, 𝕨𝕚𝕥𝕙 𝕨𝕙𝕚𝕔𝕙 𝕀 𝕔𝕒𝕟 𝕖𝕒𝕤𝕚𝕝𝕪 𝕓𝕣𝕚𝕕𝕘𝕖 𝕥𝕙𝕖 𝕘𝕦𝕝𝕗 𝕨𝕙𝕚𝕔𝕙 𝕤𝕖𝕡𝕒𝕣𝕒𝕥𝕖𝕤 𝕦𝕤 𝕗𝕣𝕠𝕞 𝕄𝕒𝕣𝕤. 𝔻𝕠 𝕪𝕠𝕦 𝕞𝕖𝕒𝕟 𝕥𝕠 𝕤𝕒𝕪 𝕥𝕙𝕒𝕥 𝕞𝕪 𝕥𝕣𝕒𝕟𝕤𝕞𝕚𝕥𝕥𝕖𝕣 𝕚𝕤 𝕟𝕠𝕥𝕙𝕚𝕟𝕘 𝕞𝕠𝕣𝕖 𝕥𝕙𝕒𝕟 𝕒 “𝕦𝕤𝕖𝕗𝕦𝕝 𝕡𝕚𝕖𝕔𝕖 𝕠𝕗 𝕖𝕝𝕖𝕔𝕥𝕣𝕚𝕔𝕒𝕝 𝕒𝕡𝕡𝕒𝕣𝕒𝕥𝕦𝕤?”

I do not wish to enlarge on this for obvious reasons. To be compelled by taciturn admirers to dwell on my own achievements is hurting my delicate sensibilities, but as I observe your heroic and increasing efforts in praising your paper, while your distinguished confreres maintain on its merits a stolid silence, I feel that there is, at least, one man in New York able to appreciate the incongeniality of the correspondence. Allow me to ask you just one or two questions in regard to a work which I began in 1892, inspired by a high tribute from Lord Rayleigh at the Royal Institution, most difficult labor which I have carried on for years, encouraged by the sympathetic interest and approval of Hemholtz, Lord Kelvin, and my great friends, Sir William Crookes and Sir James Dewar, ridiculed by small men whose names I have seen displayed in vulgar and deceptive advertisements. I refer to my system of wireless transmission of energy.

The principles which it involves are eternal. We are on a conducting body, insulated in space, of definite and unchangeable dimensions and properties. It will never be possible to transmit electrical energy economically through this body and its environment except by essentially the same means and methods which I have discovered, and the system is so perfect now that it admits of but little improvement. Since I have accepted as true your opinion, which I hope will not be shared by posterity, would you mind telling a reason why this advance should not stand worthily beside the discoveries of Copernicus? Will you state why it should not be ever so much more important and valuable to the progress and welfare of man?

We could still believe in the geocentric theory and yet advance virtually as we do. The work of the astronomer would suffer, for some of his deductions would rest on erroneous assumptions. But, after all, we shall never know the intimate nature of things. So long as our perceptions are accurate our logic will be true. No one can estimate to what an extent the great knowledge he conveyed has been instrumental in developing the power of our minds and furthering discovery and invention. Yet, it has left all the pressing material problems confronting us unsolved.

Now my wireless system offers practical solutions for all. The aerial navigation, which now agitates the minds, is only one of its many and obvious applications equally consequential. The waterfalls of this country alone, its greatest wealth, are adequate to satisfy the wants of humanity for thousands of years to come. Their energy can be used with the same facility to dig the Panama Canal as to operate the Siberian Railway or to irrigate and fertilize the Sahara. The Anglo-Saxon race has a great past and present, but its real greatness is in the future, when the water power it owns or controls shall supply the necessities of the entire world.

As to universal peace—if there is nothing in the order of nature which makes war indispensable to the safe and sane progress of man, if that utopian existence is at all possible, it can be only attained through this very means, for all international friction can be traced to but one cause—the immense extension of the planet. My system of wireless transmission completely annihilates distance in all departments of human activity.

𝕀𝕗 𝕥𝕙𝕚𝕤 𝕕𝕠𝕖𝕤 𝕟𝕠𝕥 𝕒𝕡𝕡𝕖𝕒𝕝 𝕥𝕠 𝕪𝕠𝕦 𝕤𝕦𝕗𝕗𝕚𝕔𝕚𝕖𝕟𝕥𝕝𝕪 𝕥𝕠 𝕣𝕖𝕔𝕠𝕘𝕟𝕚𝕫𝕖 𝕚𝕟 𝕞𝕖 𝕒 𝕕𝕚𝕤𝕔𝕠𝕧𝕖𝕣𝕖𝕣 𝕠𝕗 𝕡𝕣𝕚𝕟𝕔𝕚𝕡𝕝𝕖𝕤, 𝕕𝕠 𝕞𝕖, 𝕒𝕥 𝕝𝕖𝕒𝕤𝕥, 𝕥𝕙𝕖 𝕛𝕦𝕤𝕥𝕚𝕔𝕖 𝕠𝕗 𝕔𝕒𝕝𝕝𝕚𝕟𝕘 𝕞𝕖 𝕒𝕟 “𝕚𝕟𝕧𝕖𝕟𝕥𝕠𝕣 𝕠𝕗 𝕤𝕠𝕞𝕖 𝕓𝕖𝕒𝕦𝕥𝕚𝕗𝕦𝕝 𝕡𝕚𝕖𝕔𝕖𝕤 𝕠𝕗 𝕖𝕝𝕖𝕔𝕥𝕣𝕚𝕔𝕒𝕝 𝕒𝕡𝕡𝕒𝕣𝕒𝕥𝕦𝕤.”

Nikola Tesla
New York, June 21, 1907


no figrs
*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


MR. TESLA ON THE WIRELESS TRANSMISSION OF POWER
————
by
New York World
May 19th, 1907 Page number(s): ?

To the Editor of The World:


I have enjoyed very much the odd prediction of Sir Hugh Bell, President of the Iron and Steel Institute, with reference to the wireless transmission of power, reported in The World of the 10th inst.

With all the respect due to that great institution I would take the liberty to remark that if its President is a genuine prophet he must have overslept himself a trifle. Sir Hugh would honor me if he would carefully peruse my British patent No. 8,200, in which I have recorded some of my discoveries and experiments, and which may influence him to considerably reduce his conservative estimate of one hundred years for the fulfillment of his prophecy.

Personally, basing myself on the knowledge of this art to which I have devoted my best energies, I do not hesitate to state here for future reference and as a test of accuracy of my scientific forecast that flying machines and ships propelled by electricity transmitted without wire will have ceased to be a wonder in ten years from now. I would say five were it not that there is such a thing as “inertia of human opinion” resisting revolutionary ideas.

It is idle to believe that because man is endowed with higher attributes his material evolution is governed by other than general physical laws. If the genius of invention were to reveal to-morrow the secret of immortality, of eternal beauty and youth, for which all humanity is aching, the same inexorable agents which prevent a mass from changing suddenly its velocity would likewise resist the force of the new knowledge until time gradually modifies human thought.

What has amused me still more, however, is the curious interview with Lewis Nixon, the naval contractor, printed in The World of the 11th inst. Is it possible that the famous designer of the Oregon is not better versed in editorial matters than some of my farming neighbors of Shoreham? One cannot escape that conviction.

We are not in the dark as regards the electrical energy contained in the earth. It is altogether too insignificant for any industrial use. The current circulating through the globe is of enormous volume but of small tension, and could perform but little work. Beside, how does Nixon propose to coax the current from the natural path of low resistance into an artificial channel of high resistance? Surely he knows that water does not flow up hill. It is absurd of him to compare the inexhaustible dynamic energy of wind with the magnetic energy of the earth, which is minute in amount and in a static condition.

The torpedo he proposes to build is not novel. The principle is old. I could refer him to some of my own suggestions of nine years ago. There are many practical difficulties in the carrying out of the idea, and as much better means for destroying a submarine are available it is doubtful that such a torpedo will ever be constructed.

Nixon has failed to grasp that in my wireless system the effect does not diminish with distance. The Hertz waves have nothing to do with it except that some of my apparatus may be used in their production. So too a Kohinoor might be employed to cut window-glass. And yet, the seeming paradox can be easily understood by any man of ordinary intelligence.

Imagine only that the earth were a hollow shell or reservoir in which the transmitter would compress some fluid, as air, for operating machinery in various localities. What difference would it make when this reservoir is tapped to supply the compressed fluid to the motor? None whatever, for the pressure is the same everywhere. This is also true of my electrical system, with all considerations in its favor. In such a mechanical system of power distribution great losses are unavoidable and definite limits in the quality of the energy transmitted exist. Not so in the electrical wireless supply. It would not be difficult to convey to one of our liners, say, 50,000 horsepower from a plant located at Niagara, Victoria or other waterfall, absolutely irrespective of location. In fact, there would not be a difference of more than a small fraction of one per cent, whether the source of energy be in the vicinity of the vessel or 12,000 miles away, at the antipodes.

Nikola Tesla
New York, May 16, 1907


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


'MAN'S GREATEST ACHIEVEMENT'
————
by Nikola Tesla
May 13th, 1907 preprint. Released July 6th, 1930.


When a child is born its sense-organs are brought in contact with the outer world.

The waves of sound, heat, and light beat upon its feeble body, its sensitive nerve-fibres quiver, the muscles contract and relax in obedience: a gasp, a breath, and in this act a marvelous little engine, of inconceivable delicacy and complexity of construction, unlike any on earth, is hitched to the wheel-work of the Universe.

The little engine labors and grows, performs more and more involved operations, becomes sensitive to ever subtler influences and now there manifests itself in the fully developed being - Man - a desire mysterious, inscrutable and irresistible: to imitate nature, to create, to work himself the wonders he perceives.

Inspired in this task he searches, discovers and invents, designs and constructs, and enriches with monuments of beauty, grandeur and awe, the star of his birth.

He descends into the bowels of the globe to bring forth its hidden treasures and to unlock its immense imprisoned energies for its use.

He invades the dark depths of the ocean and the azure regions of the sky.

He peers into the innermost nooks and recesses of molecular structure and lays bare to his gaze worlds infinitely remote. He subdues and puts to his service the fierce, devastating spark of Prometheus, the titanic forces of the waterfall, the wind and the tide.

He tames the thundering bolt of Jove and annihilates time and space. He makes the great Sun itself his obedient toiling slave.

Such is the power and might that the heavens reverberate and the whole earth trembles by the mere sound of his voice.

What has the future in store for this strange being, born of a breath, of perishable tissue, yet immortal, with his powers fearful and divine? What magic will be wrought by him in the end? What is to be his greatest deed, his crowning achievement?

𝐋𝐨𝐧𝐠 𝐚𝐠𝐨 𝐡𝐞 𝐫𝐞𝐜𝐨𝐠𝐧𝐢𝐳𝐞𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐚𝐥𝐥 𝐩𝐞𝐫𝐜𝐞𝐩𝐭𝐢𝐛𝐥𝐞 𝐦𝐚𝐭𝐭𝐞𝐫 𝐜𝐨𝐦𝐞𝐬 𝐟𝐫𝐨𝐦 𝐚 𝐩𝐫𝐢𝐦𝐚𝐫𝐲 𝐬𝐮𝐛𝐬𝐭𝐚𝐧𝐜𝐞, 𝐨𝐟 𝐚 𝐭𝐞𝐧𝐮𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐛𝐞𝐲𝐨𝐧𝐝 𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐜𝐞𝐩𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐟𝐢𝐥𝐥𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐚𝐥𝐥 𝐬𝐩𝐚𝐜𝐞 - 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐀𝐤𝐚𝐬𝐡𝐚 𝐨𝐫 𝐥𝐮𝐦𝐢𝐧𝐢𝐟𝐞𝐫𝐨𝐮𝐬 𝐞𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐫 - 𝐰𝐡𝐢𝐜𝐡 𝐢𝐬 𝐚𝐜𝐭𝐞𝐝 𝐮𝐩𝐨𝐧 𝐛𝐲 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐥𝐢𝐟𝐞-𝐠𝐢𝐯𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐏𝐫𝐚𝐧𝐚 𝐨𝐫 𝐜𝐫𝐞𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐯𝐞 𝐟𝐨𝐫𝐜𝐞, 𝐜𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐨 𝐞𝐱𝐢𝐬𝐭𝐞𝐧𝐜𝐞, 𝐢𝐧 𝐧𝐞𝐯𝐞𝐫 𝐞𝐧𝐝𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐜𝐲𝐜𝐥𝐞𝐬, 𝐚𝐥𝐥 𝐭𝐡𝐢𝐧𝐠𝐬 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐩𝐡𝐞𝐧𝐨𝐦𝐞𝐧𝐚.

The primary substance, thrown into infinitesimal whirls of prodigious velocity, becomes gross matter; the force subsiding, the motion ceases and matter disappears, reverting to the primary substance.

Can Man control this grandest, most awe-inspiring of all processes in nature? Can he harness her inexhaustible energies to perform all their functions at his bidding, more still - can he so refine his means of control as to put them in operation simply by the force of his will?

If he could do this he would have powers almost unlimited and supernatural. At his command, with but a slight effort on his part, old worlds would disappear and new ones of his planning would spring into being.

He could fix, solidify and preserve the ethereal shapes of his imagining, the fleeting visions of his dreams. He could express all the creations of his mind, on any scale, in forms concrete and imperishable.

He could alter the size of this planet, control its seasons, guide it along any path he might choose through the depths of the Universe.

He could make planets collide and produce his suns and stars, his heat and light. He could originate and develop life in all its infinite forms.

To create and annihilate material substance, cause it to aggregate in forms according to his desire, would be the supreme manifestation of the power of Man’s mind, his most complete triumph over the physical world, his crowning achievement which would place him beside his Creator and fulfill his ultimate destiny.


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


NIKOAL TESLA FAILED TO PAY
Scientist Did Not Communicate With Creditors While Communicating With Mars.
————
by
Salt Lake Herald
June 14th, 1907 Page number(s): ?


New York. June 13. — Because Nikola Tesla, propounder of a theory of communications with Mars, has failed to satisfy a judgment of $1,108.20, the mysterious tower at Wardenclyfffe, L. I. has been advertised for sale by Sheriff Wells of Suffolk county. Mr. Tesla has expended a fortune upon his electrical experimental works in Wardenclyffe, whose purpose he has kept to himself. Only his closest friends were permitted to get within seeing distance of his “wonder tower” as the huge structure of steel and cement was called, and no one appears to know exactly what it was intended for. That it was to be used to demonstrate his theory of communicating with the Martians is popularly believed.

The judgment is held by Dr. James A. Warden. The security is the 200 acres owned by Tesla, upon which stands the tower, which is sunk into the ground a distance of 150 feet and is 150 feet in height, according to Tesla's statements to his friends.

The tower has a great mushroom top, from which there used to be blinding flashes of electricity at night some years ago.

Mr. Tesla, when seen at the Waldorf-Astoria hotel last night, said the case was an old one, the judgment growing out of an option he had taken upon the land. He said that the matter would be settled.

Erected Plant in Colorado.

Colorado Springs, Colo., June 13. — Nikola Tesla about ten years ago erected a laboratory and tower on Nob Hill near this city for experiments in the transmission of power without wires. The plant was valued approximately at $30,000. The eccentricities of his genius prevented him paying any attention to money matters, with the result that shortly after he left this city the caretaker of the plant, a man named Duffner, sued Tesla for about $1,000 salary. Subsequently the assessor's office levied upon the property for taxes with the result that the machinery was sold under the judgment obtained by Duffner and the taxes were paid out of the proceeds of the sale.


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


LETTERS TO THE EDITOR
TESLA ON WIRELESS
Electrical Inventor Thinks Marconi’s Plants Inefficient.
————
by
New York Daily Tribune
October 25th, 1907 Page number(s): ?


To the Editor of The Tribune:

Sir: In so far as wireless art is concerned there is a vast difference between the great inventor Thomas A. Edison and myself, integrally in my favor. Mr. Edison knows little of the theory and practice of electrical vibrations; I have, in this special field, probably more experience than any of my contemporaries. That you are not as yet able to impart your wisdom by wireless telephone to some subscriber in any other part of the world, however remote, and that the presses of your valuable paper are not operated by wireless power is largely due to your own effort and those of some of your distinguished confreres of this city, and to the efficient assistance you have received from my celebrated colleagues, Thomas A. Edison and Michael I. Pupin, assistant consulting wireless engineers. But it was all welcome to me. Difficulty develops resource.

The transmission across the Atlantic was not made by any device of Mr. Marconi’s, but by my system of wireless transmission of energy, and I have already given notice by cable to my friend Sir James DeWar and the royal institution of this fact. I shall also request some eminent man of science to take careful note of the whole apparatus, its mode of operation, dimensions, linear and electrical, all constants and qualitative performance, so as to make possible its exact reproduction and repetition of the experiments. This request is entirely impersonal. I am a citizen of the United States, and I know that the time will come when my busy fellow citizens, too absorbed in commercial pursuits to think of posterity, will honor my memory. A measurement of the time interval taken in the passage of the signal necessary to the full and positive demonstration will show that the current crosses the ocean with a mean speed of 625,000 miles a second.

𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐚𝐫𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐢 𝐩𝐥𝐚𝐧𝐭𝐬 𝐚𝐫𝐞 𝐢𝐧𝐞𝐟𝐟𝐢𝐜𝐢𝐞𝐧𝐭, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐝𝐨 𝐧𝐨𝐭 𝐥𝐞𝐧𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐦𝐬𝐞𝐥𝐯𝐞𝐬 𝐭𝐨 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐩𝐫𝐚𝐜𝐭𝐢𝐜𝐞 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐰𝐨 𝐝𝐢𝐬𝐜𝐨𝐯𝐞𝐫𝐢𝐞𝐬 𝐨𝐟 𝐦𝐢𝐧𝐞, 𝐭𝐡𝐞 “𝐚𝐫𝐭 𝐨𝐟 𝐢𝐧𝐝𝐢𝐯𝐢𝐝𝐮𝐚𝐥𝐢𝐳𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧,” 𝐭𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐦𝐚𝐤𝐞𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐦𝐞𝐬𝐬𝐚𝐠𝐞 𝐧𝐨𝐧-𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐞𝐫𝐟𝐞𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐧𝐨𝐧-𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐞𝐫𝐟𝐞𝐫𝐚𝐛𝐥𝐞, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐞 “𝐬𝐭𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧𝐚𝐫𝐲 𝐰𝐚𝐯𝐞𝐬,” 𝐰𝐡𝐢𝐜𝐡 𝐚𝐧𝐧𝐢𝐡𝐢𝐥𝐚𝐭𝐞 𝐝𝐢𝐬𝐭𝐚𝐧𝐜𝐞 𝐚𝐛𝐬𝐨𝐥𝐮𝐭𝐞𝐥𝐲 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐦𝐚𝐤𝐞 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐰𝐡𝐨𝐥𝐞 𝐞𝐚𝐫𝐭𝐡 𝐞𝐪𝐮𝐢𝐯𝐚𝐥𝐞𝐧𝐭 𝐭𝐨 𝐚 𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐝𝐮𝐜𝐭𝐨𝐫 𝐝𝐞𝐯𝐨𝐢𝐝 𝐨𝐟 𝐫𝐞𝐬𝐢𝐬𝐭𝐚𝐧𝐜𝐞. 𝐖𝐞𝐫𝐞 𝐢𝐭 𝐧𝐨𝐭 𝐟𝐨𝐫 𝐭𝐡𝐢𝐬 𝐝𝐞𝐟𝐢𝐜𝐢𝐞𝐧𝐜𝐲, 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐧𝐮𝐦𝐛𝐞𝐫 𝐨𝐟 𝐰𝐨𝐫𝐝𝐬 𝐩𝐞𝐫 𝐦𝐢𝐧𝐮𝐭𝐞 𝐜𝐨𝐮𝐥𝐝 𝐛𝐞 𝐢𝐧𝐜𝐫𝐞𝐚𝐬𝐞𝐝 𝐚𝐭 𝐰𝐢𝐥𝐥 𝐛𝐲 “𝐢𝐧𝐝𝐢𝐯𝐢𝐝𝐮𝐚𝐥𝐢𝐳𝐢𝐧𝐠.”

You have already commented upon this advance in terms which have caused me no small astonishment, in view of your normal attitude. 𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐮𝐧𝐝𝐞𝐫𝐥𝐲𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐩𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐜𝐢𝐩𝐥𝐞 𝐢𝐬 𝐭𝐨 𝐜𝐨𝐦𝐛𝐢𝐧𝐞 𝐚 𝐧𝐮𝐦𝐛𝐞𝐫 𝐨𝐟 𝐯𝐢𝐛𝐫𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧𝐬, 𝐩𝐫𝐞𝐟𝐞𝐫𝐚𝐛𝐥𝐲 𝐬𝐥𝐢𝐠𝐡𝐭𝐥𝐲 𝐝𝐢𝐬𝐩𝐥𝐚𝐜𝐞𝐝, 𝐭𝐨 𝐫𝐞𝐝𝐮𝐜𝐞 𝐟𝐮𝐫𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐫 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐝𝐚𝐧𝐠𝐞𝐫 𝐨𝐟 𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐞𝐫𝐟𝐞𝐫𝐞𝐧𝐜𝐞, 𝐚𝐜𝐭𝐢𝐯𝐞 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐩𝐚𝐬𝐬𝐢𝐯𝐞, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐭𝐨 𝐦𝐚𝐤𝐞 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐨𝐩𝐞𝐫𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐫𝐞𝐜𝐞𝐢𝐯𝐞𝐫 𝐝𝐞𝐩𝐞𝐧𝐝𝐞𝐧𝐭 𝐨𝐧 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐜𝐨-𝐨𝐩𝐞𝐫𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐯𝐞 𝐞𝐟𝐟𝐞𝐜𝐭 𝐨𝐟 𝐚 𝐧𝐮𝐦𝐛𝐞𝐫 𝐨𝐟 𝐚𝐭𝐭𝐮𝐧𝐞𝐝 𝐞𝐥𝐞𝐦𝐞𝐧𝐭𝐬. Just to illustrate what can be done, suppose that only four vibrations were isolated on each transmitter. Let those on one side be respectively a, b, c, and d. Then the following individualized lines would be ab, ac, ad, bc, bd, cd, abc, abd, acd, bed and abed. The same article on the other side will give eleven similar combinations, and both together twenty-two lines, which can be simultaneously operated. To transmit one thousand words a minute, only forty-six words on each combination are necessary. If the plants were suitable, not ten years, as Edison thinks, but ten hours would be necessary to put this improvement into practice. To do this Marconi would have to reconstruct the plants, and it will then be observed that the indefatigable Italian has departed from universal engineering customs for the fourth time.

Nikola Tesla
New York, Oct. 24, 1907


*photocopy of original here

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘0️⃣8️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '08








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘0️⃣9️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '09








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘1️⃣0️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '10
__________________


WHAT SCIENCE MAY ACHIEVE THIS YEAR
New Mechanical Principle for Conservation of Energy
————
by* Nikola Tesla
Denver Rocky Mountain News
January 16th, 1910 Page number(s): 4


The spread of civilization may be likened to that of fire: First, a feeble spark, next a flickering flame, then a mighty blaze, ever increasing in speed and power. We are now in this last phase of development.

Human activity has become so widespread and intense that years count as centuries of progress. There is no more groping in the dark or accidentally stumbling upon discoveries. The results follow one another like the links of a chain. Such is the force of the accumulated knowledge and the insight into natural laws and phenomena that future events are clearly projected before our vision. To foretell what is coming would be no more than to draw logical conclusions, were it not for the difficulty in accurately fixing the time of accomplishment.

The practical success of an idea, irrespective of its inherent merit, is dependent on the attitude of the contemporaries. If timely it is quickly adopted; if not, it is apt to fare like a sprout lured out of the ground by warm sunshine, only to be injured and retarded in its growth by the succeeding frost. Another determining factor is the amount of change involved in its introduction. To meet with instant success an invention or discovery must come not only as a rational, but a welcome solution. The year 1910 will mark the advent of such an idea. It is a new mechanical principle.

Since the time of Archimedes certain elementary devices were known, which were finally reduced to two, the lever and the inclined plane. Another element is to be added to these, which will give rise to new conceptions and profoundly affect both the practical and theoretical science of mechanics.

This novel principle is capable of embodiment in all kinds of machinery. It will revolutionize the propulsion apparatus on vessels, the locomotive, passenger car and the automobile. It will give us a practical flying machine entirely different from those made heretofore in operation and control, swift, small and compact and so safe that a girl will be able to fly in it to school without the governess. But the greatest value of this improvement will be in its application in a field virtually unexplored and so vast that it will take decades before the ground is broken. It is the field of waste.

We build but to tear down. Most of our work and resource is squandered. Our onward march is marked by devastation. Everywhere there is an appalling loss of time, effort and life. A cheerless view, but true. A single example out of many will suffice for illustration.

The energy necessary to our comfort and safe existence is largely derived from coal. In this country alone nearly one million tons of the life-sustaining material are daily extracted from the bowels of the earth with pain and sacrifice. This is about seven hundred tons per minute, representing a theoretical activity of, say, four hundred and fifty-million horsepower. But only a small percentage of this is usefully applied.

In heating, most of the precious energy escapes through the flue. The chimneys of New York City puff out into the air several million horsepower. In the use of coal for power purposes, we hardly capture more than 10 percent. The exhaust of engines carries off more energy than obtained from live steam.

In many modern plants the power has been actually doubled by obviating this waste, but the machinery employed is cumbersome and expensive. The manufacture of light is in a barbarous state of imperfection, and this may also be said of many industrial processes. Consider just one case, the manufacture of iron and steel.

America produces approximately 30,000,000 tons of pig iron per year. Each ton of iron requires about one and a half tons of coal, hence, in providing the iron market, 70,000,000 tons of coal per annum, or 133 tons per minute, are consumed. In the manufacture of coke a ton of coal yields, roughly, 10,000 cubic feet of gas of a mean heating capacity of 600 heat units per cubic foot.

Bearing in mind that 133 tons are used per minute, the total heat units developed in that time would be 798,000,000, the mechanical equivalent of which is about 19,000,000 horsepower. By the use of the new principle 7,000,000 horsepower might be rendered available. A furnace of 200 tons produces approximately 17,000 cubic feet of gas per minute of heat value of 100 units, corresponding to a theoretical performance of 40,000 horsepower, of which not less than 13,000 might be utilized in the improved apparatus referred to. The power derived by this method from all blast furnaces in the United States would be considerably above 5,000,000 horsepower.

The preceding figures, which are conservative, show that it would be possible to obtain 12,000,000 horsepower merely from the waste gasses in the iron and steel manufacture. The value of this power, fairly estimated, is $180,000,000 per annum, and it must be made worth much more by systematic exploitation.

A part of the power could be advantageously employed for operating the blowers, rollers and other indispensable machinery and supplying electricity for smelting, steel making and other purposes. The bulk might be used in the manufacture of nitrates, aluminum, carbides and ice. The production of nitrates would be particularly valuable from the point of view of national economy. Assuming that 5,000,000 horsepower were apportioned for that purpose, the annual yield would be not less than 10,000,000 tons of concentrated nitric compound, adequate to fertilizing 40,000,000 acres of land. A great encouragement would be given to agriculture and the condition of the steel and iron workers ameliorated by offering to them a fertilizer at a reduced rate, thus enabling them to cultivate their farms with exceptional profit. Other conveniences and necessities, as light, power, ice and ozonized water could be similarly offered and numerous other improvements, both to the advantage of capital and labor, carried out.

To appreciate the above it should be borne in mind that the iron and steel industry is one of the best regulated in the world. In many other fields the waste is even greater. For example, in the operation of steam railroads, not less than 98 per cent of the total energy of coal burned is lost. An enormous saving could be effected by replacing the present apparatus with new gas turbines and other improved devices for transmitting and storing mechanical energy. A study of this subject will convince that for the time being, at least, there is more opportunity for invention in the utilization of waste than in the opening up of new resources.

N. Tesla


*photocopy of original here
__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘1️⃣1️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '11
__________________


DR. TESLA TALKS OF GAS TURBINES
————
by
Motor World
September 18th, 1911 Page number(s): ?

So Confident, He Offers to Build Them for Motor Cars

Considers New Power His Greatest Invention.


 Gas turbines of practical and efficient construction, light, flexible and in every way suitable for automobile propulsion, are not a dream of the future only but a probability of only a very few years hence. At least such is the conviction of Dr. Nikola Tesla, whose newly developed method of fluid propulsion, as he calls it, and which was illustrated and described in last week's Motor World, is attracting so much attention in scientific circles. Dr. Tesla himself considers it the greatest of all his inventions. By his own statement the scientist already has built, run and carefully tested internal combustion engines operating on the new turbine principle and so confident is he of the thorough practicability of the idea that on Friday of last week he informed a Motor World man that he would even be willing today to sign a contract to build and install turbines for automobiles. He readily admits, however, that he would like to have more time, considerable more time probably, in which to develop a method of combustion entirely suited to the turbine.

Automobile motors, as a matter of fact, play a distinct part in the inventor's plans for the future. So do airship motors, pumps of various sorts, steam engines in every conceivable size, shape and capacity, and apparatus of other and varied uses. If in steam engines and pumps wonderful results already have been obtained, it is his expectation later to accomplish equally wonderful results with internal combustion engines.

Bearing in mind that a 110 horsepower steam engine already has been built so diminutive that its rotor or active part would drop into an ordinary water bucket, it would seem that the part of the program which might be supposed to concern the automobile industry would be well worth investigating. It was the tempting prospect of a pocket-size motor, therefore, which led a representative of the Motor World to seek the famous scientist in his offices high up in the Metropolitan Tower in New York.

Contrary to popular impression, not all great and famous men are inaccessible, and Tesla proved not only thoroughly approachable but extremely ready to discuss the new turbine principle in many of its bearings. His easy predictions of the future developments of the system and his confident bearing when he declared it to be the greatest of his accomplishments, might have been merely the vaporings of an over enthusiastic inventor; but the broad bearing of the man, his record and the depth of perception revealed in some of his conclusions would have laid at rest such doubts. The new principle unquestionably is a great contribution to science and engineering, great in its simplicity and breadth of application. Just when its fullest realization will be given to the markets of the world is another question; one that Tesla himself cannot answer, though he explained that he is "under great pressure from all sides" to complete the development of certain kinds of apparatus, steam engines and pumps having received a great deal of attention up to the present, and that he expects to have some of them ready for production "before very long."

Tall, erect, almost angular, with the broad brow of the philosopher and the sharply chiseled features of the habitual student, Dr. Tesla bears few of the earmarks of the. traditional genius. He wears his iron-gray hair a little low in the back, to be sure, but not for an inventor, and when he walks there is just a bare suggestion of histrionic attainments utterly at variance with the hurried preoccupation of the conventional type of man whose brains are stored in the archives of the Patent Office.

"We understand that you are doing remarkable things with steam, but how far has your confidence been extended to the gas turbine?" the scientist was asked.

He laughed.

"Why, I am working with them all the time," he answered.

"You mean to say that you already have built and operated internal combustion turbines employing your principle of fluid propulsion?"

"Yes. But I am not satisfied—not yet. You see there are many things to be considered. The turbine, that is one thing; it is complete in itself and there is no question of its applicability .But when you come to the combustion of the gas you have a new difficulty. I am not satisfied with the present methods of gasification. I have tried one of my turbines discharging the gas into a chamber and then spraying water into it. You see in that way you get an intermittent flow through the nozzle, but you also have better thermal action because you get your adiabatic expansion, [meaning that in which theoretically there is no loss of heat]. And then, I have tried with gasoline using a constant jet, in which you get less efficient thermal action but better action for the turbine. But I am not yet satisfied. I think that some day we shall get better processes of combustion that will enable me to work more advantage with my turbine.

"You see, that is one great trouble," continued Dr. Tesla. "The human mind thinks but to complicate. As soon as one problem is solved, that solution introduces new complications, other problems that perhaps did not exist before. That was one of my great troubles when I was younger, I invented many things that were very fine, but always I was getting into complications. I have had to work very hard to overcome that. But here you see what I have done. Do you see how very simple it is? You take, for instance, the ordinary turbine, a bucket turbine. Here you have around the outside of the wheel a row of little jets, and within, on the periphery of a wheel, a row of buckets—many of them and very small, even on a large wheel. But don't you see that in that entire wheel you have only a narrow strip, a ring perhaps three or four inches wide, that is really useful—that is really active?

"In my invention practically the whole surface is active. In the bucket turbine the action does not even extend all the way around; you must have a series of jets. But in my turbine you have the gas traveling all the way around in free spirals—always seeking the path of least resistance—and expending its full energy."

Here he laid aside the pencil with which he had been illustrating the point, and reverted to the beginning of what he evidently considers his "big idea."

"I have been working at this a long time. Many years ago I invented a pump for pumping mercury .Just a plain disk, like this, and it would work very well. ' All right,' I said, 'that is friction.' But one day I thought it out, and I thought, 'No, that is not friction, it is something else. The particles are not always sliding by the disk, but some of them at least are carried along with it. Therefore it cannot be friction. It must be adhesion. ' And that, you see, was the real beginning.

"For if you can imagine a wheel rotating in a medium, whether the fluid is receiving or imparting energy, and moving at nearly the same velocity as the fluid, then you have a minimum of friction, you get little or no 'slip.' Then you are getting something very different from friction; you are making use of adhesion alone. It's all so simple, so very simple.

"This is the greatest of my inventions," Tesla went on with great enthusiasm. "Now take my 'rotating field'—do you know my rotating field—are you familiar at all with electricity? There are millions invested in it already. Well, that is a very useful thing, but the field is limited to dynamos and motors. But here you have a new power for pumps, steam engines, gasoline motors, for automobiles, for airships, for many other uses, and all so simple."

"But is it really true that you have produced 110 horsepower from a wheel only 9 3/4 inches in diameter and two inches wide, as has been reported?" asked the interviewer incredulously.

"Oh, yes!" was the reply. "And more. We could get more power. We had 125 pounds steam pressure and no vacuum. We ran it that way for hours."

"Was it sustained power?"

"Yes, sustained power. And we could only use part of the drop in pressure; we would have twisted off the shaft, it was so light, if we had been able to use all the energy of the steam. I had to put in a smaller nozzle on that account."

"And they are very light, these steam engines?"

"I can build a steam engine that will develop one horsepower for every one tenth of a pound of weight," was the instant and amazing response. "I am now building a double turbine, one with two wheels which must revolve in opposite directions. It is for a special purpose, and I cannot talk much about that, but each wheel develops 200 horsepower, that is 400 horsepower, and it weighs 88 pounds."

A no less amazing claim made at another time was that the steam turbine could be made to return in power at the shaft no less than 97 percent of the energy of the steam. There seems to be no limit to what the inventor thinks the new system will accomplish, though, of course, a waiting world may be pardoned for withholding a full verdict of confidence until it has had opportunity to witness some of the promised marvels.

As far as demonstration of the basic principle is concerned, however, the success of the idea is unquestionable. A small pump, originally put together for purposes of exhibition before a body of scientists, to whom Dr. Tesla first disclosed his invention, was operated for the benefit of the Motor World man; the inventor himself obligingly switching on and off the current from the little electric motor which drove it, and operating the valve by means of which the discharge could be regulated to increase the flow and decrease the pressure, or vice versa.

The rotor, mounted in a casing of volute form hardly more than six inches in diameter, contained five disks of three inches diameter. From a small tank, which was part of the model, water was drawn into the casing and forced through a pipe with a lift of 18 inches or so to a long strainer in a horizontal pipe, whence, after passing a baffle plate, to break up the flow and prevent splashing, it fell back into the tank over a miniature weir in a beautiful clear sheet. The hand of a pressure gauge indicated four pounds when the valve was closed, but fell to a little under two pounds when the full discharge was permitted.

With the valve closed, the action of the disks was shown to good advantage. Rapidly snapping on and off the switch, the inventor gleefully pointed out how the hand of the gauge jumped up and fell back again so closely in response to the speed of the motor, as judged by the hum of its commutator, that eye and ear failed to detect the difference. "And so you really believe that a practical form of gas turbine can be developed on this principle and in such shape that it could be profitably adapted to automobile use?" asked the Motor World man.

"I am so sure that I would make a contract today to build gas turbines and equip automobiles with them."


*photocopy of original here

__________________


 





    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘1️⃣2️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '12
WHAT OF THE FUTURE IN ELECTRICITY?
by ?
Washington Herald
March 17th, 1912
*(foreword)
"Dr. Nikola Tesla Looks Forward to the Era When

One Electrical Wireless Station
🐇
Shall Supply Power for the World

— Tells of Other Developments That We Have Good Reason to Expect."







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
"Now comes the '''dream''' —or whatever it is. Tesla says he can split the earth in the same way —split it as a boy would split an apple —and forever end the career of man."
🐇
'''There is no doubt in my mind. The earth would be split in two. For the first time in man's history, he has the knowledge with which he may interfere with cosmic processes.'''







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
'''Observation will bring out the fact that the weakening is not noticeable until the aerials have reached a position, with reference to the sun, in which the evaporation of the water is distinctly more rapid. 🐇 The maximum will not be exactly when the angle of incidence of the suns rays is greatest, but some time after.

It is noteworthy

that the experimenters

who watched the effect of the recent eclipse,

above referred to,
🐇
have observed the delay.'''








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘1️⃣3️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '13

📰 HARNESSING NATURE – CAN THE FREE ENERGY OF SPACE BE UTILIZED? – 📰
by Waldemar Kaempffert
Scientific American, Volume 108
April 5th, 1913

..."Experiments conducted by Mr. Nikola Tesla with electromotive forces of 2,000,000 volts have convinced him that if 🐇 100,000,000 volts could be produced it might be possible to break down the atomic structure of any element and thus liberate a certain amount of energy. '''But,''' he told the writer of this article, '''even if the feat could be accomplished and sufficient energy set free, there still remains the enormously difficult problem of devising a means of utilizing the energy in a practical way.'''"...








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘1️⃣4️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '14








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘1️⃣5️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '15

🗞️ THE WONDER WORLD TO BE CREATED BY ELECTRICITY 🗞️
by Nikola Tesla
Manufacturer's Record
September 9th, 1915

...'''The superstitious belief of the ancients, if it existed at all, can therefore not be taken as a reliable proof of their ignorance, but just how much they knew about electricity can only be conjectured. A curious fact is that the ray or torpedo fish was used by them in electrotherapy. Some old coins show twin stars, or sparks, such as might be produced by a galvanic battery. The records, though scanty, are of a nature to fill us with conviction that a few initiated, at least, had a deeper knowledge of amber phenomena. To mention one, Moses was undoubtedly a practical and skillful electrician far in advance of his time. The Bible describes precisely and minutely arrangements constituting a machine in which electricity was generated by friction of air against silk curtains and stored in a box constructed like a condenser. It is very plausible to assume that the sons of Aaron were killed by a high-tension discharge, and that the vestal fires of the Romans were electrical. The belt drive must have been known to engineers of that epoch, and it is difficult to see how the abundant evolution of static electricity could have escaped their notice. Under favorable atmospheric conditions a belt may be transformed into a dynamic generator capable of producing many striking actions. I have lighted incandescent lamps, operated motors and performed numerous other equally interesting experiments with electricity drawn from belts and stored in tin cans.

That many facts in regard to the subtle force were known to the philosophers of old can be safely concluded. The wonder is, why 2000 years elapsed before Gilbert in 1600 published his famous work, the first scientific treatise on electricity and magnetism. To an extent this long period of unproductiveness can be explained. Learning was the privilege of a few and all information was jealously guarded. Communication was difficult and slow, and a mutual understanding between widely-separated investigators hard to reach. Then again, men of those times had no thought of the practical; they lived and fought for abstract principles, creeds, traditions and ideals. Humanity did not change much in Gilberts time, but his clear teachings had a telling effect on the minds of the learned. Friction machines were produced in rapid succession and experiments and observations multiplied. Gradually fear and superstition gave way to scientific insight and in 1745 the world was thrilled with the news that Kleist and Leyden had succeeded in imprisoning the uncanny agent in a phial from which it escaped with an angry snap and destructive force. This was the birth of the condenser, perhaps the most marvelous electrical device ever invented.

Two tremendous leaps were made in the succeeding 40 years. One was when Franklin demonstrated the identity between the gentle soul of amber and the awe-inspiring bolt of Jupiter; the other when Galvany and Volta brought out the contact and chemical battery, from which the magic fluid could be drawn in unlimited quantities. The succeeding 40 years bore still greater fruit. Oersted made a significant advance in deflecting a magnetic needle by an electric current, Arago produced the electro-magnet, Seebeck the thermopile and in 1831, as the crowning achievement of all, Faraday announced that he had obtained electricity from a magnet, thus discovering the principle of that wonderful engine, the dynamo, and inaugurating a new era both in scientific research and practical application.

From that time on inventions of inestimable value have followed one another at a bewildering rate. The telegraph, telephone, phonograph and incandescent lamp, the induction motor, oscillatory transformer, Roentgen ray, Radium, wireless and numerous other revolutionary advances have been made and all conditions of existence profoundly modified. In 84 years which have since elapsed the subtle agents dwelling in the living amber and loadstone have been transformed into cyclopean forces, turning the wheels of human progress with ever-increasing speed. This, in brief, is the fairy tale of electricity from Thales to the present day. The impossible has happened, the wildest dreams have been surpassed and the astounded world is asking. What is coming next?'''...







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
'''Every living being is an engine geared to the wheelwork of the universe. Though seemingly affected only by its immediate surrounding, the sphere of external influence extends to infinite distance. There is no constellation or nebula, no sun or planet, in all the depths of limitless space, no passing wanderer of the starry heaven, that does not exercise some control over its destiny

— not in the vague and delusive sense of astrology,
🐇
but in the rigid and positive meaning of physical science.

More than this can be said. There is no thing endowed with life—from man, who is enslaving the elements, to the humblest creature—in all this world that does not sway it in turn. Whenever action is born from force, though it be infinitesimal, 🐇 the cosmic balance is upset and universal motion result.'''







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
"Nikola Tesla, who, with Thomas A. Edison is to share the Nobel Prize in Physics, according to a dispatch from London, said last evening that he had not yet been officially notified of the honor. His only information on the matter was the dispatch in THE NEW YORK TIMES."

'''I have concluded,''' he said, '''that the honor has been conferred upon me in acknowledgment of a discovery announced a short time ago which concerns the transmission of electrical energy without wires. This discovery means that electrical effects of unlimited intensity and power can be produced, so that not only can energy be transmitted for all practical purposes to any terrestrial distance, 🐇 but even effects of cosmic magnitude may be created.'''

"Mr. Tesla refused to go further into the matter. He said he thought Mr. Edison was worthy of a dozen Nobel prizes. He knew nothing of the discovery, he said, that induced the authorities in Sweden to confer the great honor on Mr. Edison."


"Nikola Tesla, the inventor,

winner of the 1915 Nobel Physics Prize, 🙄 😅

has filed patent applications on the essential parts of a machine the possibilities of which test a layman's imagination and promise a parallel of Thor's shooting thunderbolts from the sky to punish those who had angered the gods. Dr. Tesla insists there is nothing sensational about it, that it is but the fruition of many years of work and study. He is not yet ready to give the details of the engine which he says will render fruitless any military expedition against a country which possesses it. Suffice to say that the destructive invention will go through space with a speed of

300 miles a second,
🐇
a manless airship

without propelling engine or wings, 💊

sent by electricity

to any desired point on the globe on its errand of destruction, if destruction its manipulator wishes to effect."

"It is not the time,” said Dr. Tesla yesterday, '''to go into the details of this thing. It is founded on a principle that means great things in peace; it can be used for great things in war. But I repeat, this is no time to talk of such things'''







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
'''In a thousand years, there will be many recipients of the Nobel Prize, but I have not less than four dozen of my creations identified with my name in the technical literature. These are honors real and permanent, which are bestowed, not by a few who are apt to err, but by the whole world which seldom makes a mistake and for any of those I could give all the Nobel prizes which will be distributed during the next thousand years'''








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘1️⃣6️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '16
__________________


TESLA NO MONEY WIZARD; SWAMPED BY DEBTS, HE VOWS
Inventor Testifies He Owes the Waldorf, Lives Mostly on Credit, Hasn’t a Cent in Bank, and “Hocked” Stock in His Company.
————
by
New York World
March 18th, 1916 Page number(s): ?


Nikola Tesla, electrical wizard, is so hard up that he cannot pay the city $935 personal taxes. He says so himself and states in effect that being a wizard isn’t always a profitable business.

That Mr. Tesla owes so much money he hasn’t the slightest idea when he will be able to meet his obligations became known yesterday when Corporation Counsel Hardy filed in the Supreme Court the minutes of an examination he made of Tesla in supplementary proceedings.

The inventor said he possessed no real estate or stocks and that his belongings, all told, were negligible.

“But don’t you live at the Waldorf-Astoria?” he was asked.

“I do, and I owe the hotel a bill which has not been paid for several years,” was the reply.

“Well, how do you live?”

“Mostly on credit.”

Mr. Tesla said that at one time he had owned nine-tenths of the stock of the Nikola Tesla Company, but he had pledged the stock for money to build an electric plant. He added that the company now has no assets, but is receiving enough royalties on patents to pay expenses.

All of Tesla’s inventions - about 200 - have been made over to the company, according to the witness.

Asked concerning his debts he said there were “scores of them” and that five or more proceedings were pending against him. No one owed him any money, he declared, and he had no money in bank.

“Well, haven’t you got any jewelry?” asked the Corporation Counsel.

“No jewelry; I abhor it.”

“Any automobiles?”

“No.”

“Any horses?”

“No.”

The inventor said he is still President and Treasurer of the Nikola Tesla Company. 🤷‍♂️ 😅

Justice Finch yesterday appointed Robert Marsh receiver for the inventor.


*photocopy of original here*

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘1️⃣7️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '17
__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
'''At the time of those tests I succeeded in producing the most powerful X-rays ever seen. I could stand at a distance of 100 feet from the X-ray apparatus and see the bones of the hand clearly with the aid of a fluoroscope screen; and I could have easily seen them at a distance several times this by utilizing suitable power. In fact, I could not then procure X-ray generators to handle even a small fraction of the power I had available. But I now have apparatus designed whereby this tremendous energy of hundreds of kilowatts can be successfully transformed into X-rays.'''








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘1️⃣8️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '18








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘1️⃣9️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '19
__________________


*MY INVENTIONS I
MY INVENTIONS I - MY EARLY LIFE
————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Experimenter
February, 1919 Page number(s): 696-697 & 743-747


The progressive development of man is vitally dependent on invention. It is the most important product of his creative brain. Its ultimate purpose is the complete mastery of mind over the material world, the harnessing of the forces of nature to human needs. This is the difficult task of the inventor who is often misunderstood and unrewarded. But he finds ample compensation in the pleasing exercises of his powers and in the knowledge of being one of that exceptionally privileged class without whom the race would have long ago perished in the bitter struggle against pitiless elements.

Speaking for myself, I have already had more than my full measure of this exquisite enjoyment, so much that for many years my life was little short of continuous rapture. I am credited with being one of the hardest workers and perhaps I am, if thought is the equivalent of labor, for I have devoted to it almost all of my waking hours. But if work is interpreted to be a definite performance in a specified time according to a rigid rule, then I may be the worst of idlers. Every effort under compulsion demands a sacrifice of life-energy. I never paid such a price. On the contrary, I have thrived on my thoughts.

In attempting to give a connected and faithful account of my activities in this series of articles which will be presented with the assistance of the Editors of the 𝑬𝑳𝑬𝑪𝑻𝑹𝑰𝑪𝑨𝑳 𝑬𝑿𝑷𝑬𝑹𝑰𝑴𝑬𝑵𝑻𝑬𝑹 and are chiefly addrest to our young men readers. I must dwell, however reluctantly, on the impressions of my youth and the circumstances and events which have been instrumental in determining my career.

Our first endeavors are purely instinctive, prompting of an imagination vivid and undisciplined. As we grow older reason asserts itself and we become more and more systematic and designing. But those early impulses, tho not immediately productive, are of the greatest moment and may shape our very destinies. Indeed, I feel now that had I understood and cultivated instead of suppressing them, I would have added substantial value to my bequest to the world. But not until I had attained manhood did I realize that I was an inventor.

This was due to a number of causes. In the first place I had a brother who was gifted to an extraordinary degree — one of those rare phenomena of mentality which biological investigation has failed to explain. His premature death left my parents disconsolate. We owned a horse which had been presented to us by a dear friend. It was a magnificent animal of Arabian breed, possest of almost human intelligence, and was cared for and petted by the whole family, having on one occasion saved my dear father’s life under remarkable circumstances. My father had been called one winter night to perform an urgent duty and while crossing the mountains, infested by wolves, the horse became frightened and ran away, throwing him violently to the ground. It arrived home bleeding and exhausted, but after the alarm was sounded immediately dashed off again, returning to the spot, and before the searching party were far on the way they were met by my father, who had recovered consciousness and remounted, not realizing that he had been lying in the snow for several hours. This horse was responsible for my brother’s injuries from which he died. I witnest the tragic scene and altho fifty-six years have elapsed since, my visual impression of it has lost none of its force. The recollection of his attainments made every effort of mine seem dull in comparison.


𝘏𝘰𝘸 𝘥𝘰𝘦𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘸𝘰𝘳𝘭𝘥’𝘴 𝘨𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘵𝘦𝘴𝘵 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘰𝘳 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵? 𝘏𝘰𝘸 𝘥𝘰𝘦𝘴 𝘩𝘦 𝘤𝘢𝘳𝘳𝘺 𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘢𝘯 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯? 𝘞𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘴𝘰𝘳𝘵 𝘰𝘧 𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘢𝘭𝘪𝘵𝘺 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘕𝘪𝘬𝘰𝘭𝘢 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢? 𝘞𝘢𝘴 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘦𝘢𝘳𝘭𝘺 𝘭𝘪𝘧𝘦 𝘢𝘴 𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘮𝘰𝘯𝘱𝘭𝘢𝘤𝘦 𝘢𝘴 𝘮𝘰𝘴𝘵 𝘰𝘧 𝘰𝘶𝘳𝘴? 𝘞𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘸𝘢𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘦𝘢𝘳𝘭𝘺 𝘵𝘳𝘢𝘪𝘯𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘰𝘧 𝘰𝘯𝘦 𝘰𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘞𝘰𝘳𝘭𝘥’𝘴 𝘊𝘩𝘰𝘴𝘦𝘯? 𝘛𝘩𝘦𝘴𝘦, 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘮𝘢𝘯𝘺 𝘰𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳 𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘺 𝘪𝘯𝘵𝘦𝘳𝘦𝘴𝘵𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘲𝘶𝘦𝘴𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯𝘴 𝘢𝘳𝘦 𝘢𝘯𝘴𝘸𝘦𝘳𝘦𝘥 𝘪𝘯 𝘢𝘯 𝘪𝘯𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘱𝘢𝘳𝘢𝘣𝘭𝘦 𝘮𝘢𝘯𝘯𝘦𝘳 𝘣𝘺 𝘕𝘪𝘬𝘰𝘭𝘢 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘩𝘪𝘮𝘴𝘦𝘭𝘧 𝘪𝘯 𝘵𝘩𝘪𝘴, 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘧𝘪𝘳𝘴𝘵 𝘢𝘳𝘵𝘪𝘤𝘭𝘦.𝘐𝘯 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘢𝘶𝘵𝘰𝘣𝘪𝘰𝘨𝘳𝘢𝘱𝘩𝘺, 𝘵𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘵𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘮𝘢𝘪𝘯𝘭𝘺 𝘰𝘯 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘦𝘢𝘳𝘭𝘺 𝘺𝘰𝘶𝘵𝘩, 𝘸𝘦 𝘰𝘣𝘵𝘢𝘪𝘯 𝘢 𝘨𝘰𝘰𝘥 𝘪𝘯𝘴𝘪𝘨𝘩𝘵 𝘪𝘯𝘵𝘰 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘸𝘰𝘯𝘥𝘦𝘳𝘧𝘶𝘭 𝘭𝘪𝘧𝘦 𝘵𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘮𝘢𝘯 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘭𝘦𝘥. 𝘐𝘵 𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘥𝘴 𝘭𝘪𝘬𝘦 𝘢 𝘧𝘢𝘪𝘳𝘺 𝘵𝘢𝘭𝘦, 𝘸𝘩𝘪𝘤𝘩 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘢𝘥𝘷𝘢𝘯𝘵𝘢𝘨𝘦 𝘰𝘧 𝘣𝘦𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘵𝘳𝘶𝘦. 𝘍𝘰𝘳 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘪𝘴 𝘯𝘰 𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘮𝘰𝘯 𝘮𝘰𝘳𝘵𝘢𝘭. 𝘏𝘦 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘭𝘦𝘥 𝘢 𝘤𝘩𝘢𝘳𝘮𝘦𝘥 𝘭𝘪𝘧𝘦 — 𝘴𝘵𝘳𝘶𝘤𝘬 𝘥𝘰𝘸𝘯 𝘣𝘺 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘱𝘦𝘴𝘵, 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘤𝘩𝘰𝘭𝘦𝘳𝘢 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘸𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘯𝘰𝘵 — 𝘨𝘪𝘷𝘦𝘯 𝘶𝘱 𝘣𝘺 𝘥𝘰𝘤𝘵𝘰𝘳𝘴 𝘢𝘵 𝘭𝘦𝘢𝘴𝘵 𝘵𝘩𝘳𝘦𝘦 𝘵𝘪𝘮𝘦𝘴 𝘢𝘴 𝘥𝘦𝘢𝘥 — 𝘸𝘦 𝘧𝘪𝘯𝘥 𝘩𝘪𝘮 𝘢𝘵 𝘴𝘪𝘹𝘵𝘺, 𝘺𝘰𝘶𝘯𝘨𝘦𝘳 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘯 𝘦𝘷𝘦𝘳. 𝘉𝘶𝘵 — 𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘥 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘰𝘸𝘯 𝘸𝘰𝘳𝘥𝘴. 𝘠𝘰𝘶 𝘩𝘢𝘷𝘦 𝘯𝘦𝘷𝘦𝘳 𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘥 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘭𝘪𝘬𝘦 𝘣𝘦𝘧𝘰𝘳𝘦.
—𝘌𝘥𝘪𝘵𝘰𝘳.


Anything I did that was creditable merely caused my parents to feel their loss more keenly. So I grew up with little confidence in myself. But I was far from being considered a stupid boy, if I am to judge from an incident of which I have still a strong remembrance. One day the Aldermen were passing thru a street where I was at play with other boys. The oldest of these venerable gentlemen — a wealthy citizen — paused to give a silver piece to each of us. Coming to me, he suddenly stopped and commanded, “Look in my eyes.” I met his gaze, my hand outstretched to receive the much valued coin, when, to my dismay, he said, “No, not much, you can get nothing from me, you are too smart.” They used to tell a funny story about me. I had two old aunts with wrinkled faces, one of them having two teeth protruding like the tusks of an elephant which she buried in my cheek every time she kist me. Nothing would scare me more then the prospects of being by these as affectionate as unattractive relatives. It happened that while being carried in my mother’s arms they asked who was the prettier of the two. After examining their faces intently, I answered thoughtfully, pointing to one of them, “This here is not as ugly as the other.”

Then again, I was intended from my very birth, for the clerical profession and this thought constantly opprest me. I longed to be an engineer but my father was inflexible. He was the son of an officer who served in the army of the Great Napoleon and, in common with his brother, professor of mathematics in a prominent institution, had received a military education but, singularly enough, later embraced the clergy in which vocation he achieved eminence. He was a very erudite man, a veritable natural philosopher, poet and writer and his sermons were said to be as eloquent as those of Abraham a Sancta-Clara. He had a prodigious memory and frequently recited at length from works in several languages. He often remarked playfully that if some of the classics were lost he could restore them. His style of writing was much admired. He penned sentences short and terse and full of wit and satire. The humorous remarks he made were always peculiar and characteristic. Just to illustrate, I may mention one or two instances. Among the help there was a cross-eyed man called Mane, employed to do work around the farm. He was chopping wood one day. As he swung the axe my father, who stood nearby and felt very uncomfortable, cautioned him, “For God’s sake, Mane, do not strike at what you are looking but at what you intend to hit.” On another occasion he was taking out for a drive a friend who carelessly permitted his costly fur coat to rub on the carriage wheel. My father reminded him of it saying, “Pull in your coat, you are ruining my tire.” He had the odd habit of talking to himself and would often carry on an animated conversation and indulge in heated argument, changing the tone of his voice. A casual listener might have sworn that several people were in the room.

Altho I must trace to my mother’s influence whatever inventiveness I possess, the training he gave me must have been helpful. It comprised all sorts of exercises — as, guessing one another’s thoughts, discovering the defects of some form of expression, repeating long sentences or performing mental calculations. These daily lessons were intended to strengthen memory and reason and especially to develop the critical sense, and were undoubtedly very beneficial.

My mother descended from one of the oldest families in the country and a line of inventors. Both her father and grandfather originated numerous implements for household, agricultural and other uses. She was a truly great woman, of rare skill, courage and fortitude, who had braved the storms of life and passed thru many a trying experience. When she was sixteen a virulent pestilence swept the country. Her father was called away to administer the last sacraments to the dying and during his absence she went alone to the assistance of a neighboring family who were stricken by the dread disease. All of the members, five in number, succumbed in rapid succession. She bathed, clothed and laid out the bodies, decorating them with flowers according to the custom of the country and when her father returned he found everything ready for a Christian burial. My mother was an inventor of the first order and would, I believe, have achieved great things had she not been so remote from modern life and its multifold opportunities. She invented and constructed all kinds of tools and devices and wove the finest designs from thread which was spun by her. She even planted the seeds, raised the plants and separated the fibers herself. She worked indefatigably, from break of day till late at night, and most of the wearing apparel and furnishings of the home were the product of her hands. When she was past sixty, her fingers were still nimble enough 𝒕𝒐 𝒕𝒊𝒆 𝒕𝒉𝒓𝒆𝒆 𝒌𝒏𝒐𝒕𝒔 𝒊𝒏 𝒂𝒏 𝒆𝒚𝒆𝒍𝒂𝒔𝒉.

There was another and still more important reason for my late awakening. In my boyhood I suffered from a peculiar affliction due to the appearance of images, often accompanied by strong flashes of light, which marred the sight of real objects and interfered with my thought and action. They were pictures of things and scenes which i had really seen, never of those imagined. When a word was spoken to me the image of the object it designated would present itself vividly to my vision and sometimes I was quite unable to distinguish weather what I saw was tangible or not. This caused me great discomfort and anxiety. None of the students of psychology or physiology whom I have consulted could ever explain satisfactorily these phenomenon. They seem to have been unique altho I was probably predisposed as I know that my brother experienced a similar trouble. The theory I have formulated is that the images were the result of a reflex action from the brain on the retina under great excitation. They certainly were not hallucinations such as are produced in diseased and anguished minds, for in other respects I was normal and composed. To give an idea of my distress, suppose that I had witnest a funeral or some such nerve-racking spectacle. The(n*), inevitably, in the stillness of night, a vivid picture of the scene would thrust itself 𝒃𝒆𝒇𝒐𝒓𝒆 my eyes and persist despite all my efforts to banish it. Sometimes it would remain fixt in space tho I pushed my hand thru it. If my explanation is correct, it should be possible to project on a screen the image of any object one conceives and make it visible. Such an advance would revolutionize all human relations. I am convinced that this wonder can and will be accomplished in time to come; I may add that I have devoted much thought to the solution of the problem.

To free myself of these tormenting appearances, I tried to concentrate my mind on something else I had seen, and in this way I would often obtain temporary relief; but in order to get it I had to conjure continuously new images. It was not long before I found that I had exhausted all of those at my command; my “reel” had run out, as it were, because I had seen little of the world — only objects in my home and the immediate surroundings. As I performed these mental operations for the second or third time, in order to chase the appearances from my vision, the remedy gradually lost all its force. Then I instinctively commenced to make excursions beyond the limits of the small world of which I had knowledge, and I saw new scenes. These were at first very blurred and indistinct, and would flit away when I tried to concentrate my attention upon them, but by and by I succeeded in fixing them; they gained in strength and distinctness and finally assumed the concreteness of real things. I soon discovered that my best comfort was attained if I simply went on in my vision farther and farther, getting new impressions all the time, and so I began to travel — of course, in my mind. Every night (and sometimes during the day), when alone, I would start on my journeys — see new places, cities and countries — live there, meet people and make friendships and acquaintances and, however unbelievable, it is a fact that they were just as dear to me as those in actual life and not a bit less intense in their manifestations.


𝐍𝐈𝐊𝐎𝐋𝐀 𝐓𝐄𝐒𝐋𝐀 𝐓𝐇𝐄 𝐌𝐀𝐍
𝑩𝒚 𝑯. 𝑮𝒆𝒓𝒏𝒔𝒃𝒂𝒄𝒌
𝘛𝘩𝘦 𝘥𝘰𝘰𝘳 𝘰𝘱𝘦𝘯𝘴 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘴𝘵𝘦𝘱𝘴 𝘢 𝘵𝘢𝘭𝘭 𝘧𝘪𝘨𝘶𝘳𝘦 — 𝘰𝘷𝘦𝘳 𝘴𝘪𝘹 𝘧𝘦𝘦𝘵 𝘩𝘪𝘨𝘩 — 𝘨𝘢𝘶𝘯𝘵 𝘣𝘶𝘵 𝘦𝘳𝘦𝘤𝘵. 𝘐𝘵 𝘢𝘱𝘱𝘳𝘰𝘢𝘤𝘩𝘦𝘴 𝘴𝘭𝘰𝘸𝘭𝘺, 𝘴𝘵𝘢𝘵𝘦𝘭𝘺. 𝘠𝘰𝘶 𝘣𝘦𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘦 𝘤𝘰𝘯𝘴𝘤𝘪𝘰𝘶𝘴 𝘢𝘵 𝘰𝘯𝘤𝘦 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘺𝘰𝘶 𝘢𝘳𝘦 𝘧𝘢𝘤𝘦 𝘵𝘰 𝘧𝘢𝘤𝘦 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩 𝘢 𝘱𝘦𝘳𝘴𝘰𝘯𝘢𝘭𝘪𝘵𝘺 𝘰𝘧 𝘢 𝘩𝘪𝘨𝘩 𝘰𝘳𝘥𝘦𝘳. 𝘕𝘪𝘬𝘰𝘭𝘢 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘢𝘥𝘷𝘢𝘯𝘤𝘦𝘴 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘴𝘩𝘢𝘬𝘦𝘴 𝘺𝘰𝘶𝘳 𝘩𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩 𝘢 𝘱𝘰𝘸𝘦𝘳𝘧𝘶𝘭 𝘨𝘳𝘪𝘱, 𝘴𝘶𝘳𝘱𝘳𝘪𝘴𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘧𝘰𝘳 𝘢 𝘮𝘢𝘯 𝘰𝘷𝘦𝘳 𝘴𝘪𝘹𝘵𝘺. 𝘈 𝘸𝘪𝘯𝘯𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘴𝘮𝘪𝘭𝘦 𝘧𝘳𝘰𝘮 𝘱𝘪𝘦𝘳𝘤𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘭𝘪𝘨𝘩𝘵 𝘣𝘭𝘶𝘦-𝘨𝘳𝘢𝘺 𝘦𝘺𝘦𝘴, 𝘴𝘦𝘵 𝘪𝘯 𝘦𝘹𝘵𝘳𝘢𝘰𝘳𝘥𝘪𝘯𝘢𝘳𝘪𝘭𝘺 𝘥𝘦𝘦𝘱 𝘴𝘰𝘤𝘬𝘦𝘵𝘴, 𝘧𝘢𝘴𝘤𝘪𝘯𝘢𝘵𝘦𝘴 𝘺𝘰𝘶 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘮𝘢𝘬𝘦𝘴 𝘺𝘰𝘶 𝘧𝘦𝘦𝘭 𝘢𝘵 𝘰𝘯𝘤𝘦 𝘢𝘵 𝘩𝘰𝘮𝘦.

𝘠𝘰𝘶 𝘢𝘳𝘦 𝘨𝘶𝘪𝘥𝘦𝘥 𝘪𝘯𝘵𝘰 𝘢𝘯 𝘰𝘧𝘧𝘪𝘤𝘦 𝘪𝘮𝘮𝘢𝘤𝘶𝘭𝘢𝘵𝘦 𝘪𝘯 𝘪𝘵𝘴 𝘰𝘳𝘥𝘦𝘳𝘭𝘪𝘯𝘦𝘴𝘴. 𝘕𝘰𝘵 𝘢 𝘴𝘱𝘦𝘤𝘬 𝘰𝘧 𝘥𝘶𝘴𝘵 𝘪𝘴 𝘵𝘰 𝘣𝘦 𝘴𝘦𝘦𝘯. 𝘕𝘰 𝘱𝘢𝘱𝘦𝘳𝘴 𝘭𝘪𝘵𝘵𝘦𝘳 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘥𝘦𝘴𝘬, 𝘦𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘺𝘵𝘩𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘫𝘶𝘴𝘵 𝘴𝘰. 𝘐𝘵 𝘳𝘦𝘧𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘮𝘢𝘯 𝘩𝘪𝘮𝘴𝘦𝘭𝘧, 𝘪𝘮𝘮𝘢𝘤𝘶𝘭𝘢𝘵𝘦 𝘪𝘯 𝘢𝘵𝘵𝘪𝘳𝘦, 𝘰𝘳𝘥𝘦𝘳𝘭𝘺 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘱𝘳𝘦𝘤𝘪𝘴𝘦 𝘪𝘯 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘦𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘺 𝘮𝘰𝘷𝘦𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘵. 𝘋𝘳𝘦𝘴𝘵 𝘪𝘯 𝘢 𝘥𝘢𝘳𝘬 𝘧𝘳𝘰𝘤𝘬 𝘤𝘰𝘢𝘵, 𝘩𝘦 𝘪𝘴 𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘪𝘳𝘦𝘭𝘺 𝘥𝘦𝘷𝘰𝘪𝘥 𝘰𝘧 𝘢𝘭𝘭 𝘫𝘦𝘸𝘦𝘭𝘳𝘺. 𝘕𝘰 𝘳𝘪𝘯𝘨, 𝘴𝘵𝘪𝘤𝘬𝘱𝘪𝘯, 𝘰𝘳 𝘦𝘷𝘦𝘯 𝘸𝘢𝘵𝘤𝘩-𝘤𝘩𝘢𝘪𝘯 𝘤𝘢𝘯 𝘣𝘦 𝘴𝘦𝘦𝘯.

𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘴𝘱𝘦𝘢𝘬𝘴 — 𝘢 𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘺 𝘩𝘪𝘨𝘩 𝘢𝘭𝘮𝘰𝘴𝘵 𝘧𝘢𝘭𝘴𝘦𝘵𝘵𝘰 𝘷𝘰𝘪𝘤𝘦. 𝘏𝘦 𝘴𝘱𝘦𝘢𝘬𝘴 𝘲𝘶𝘪𝘤𝘬𝘭𝘺 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘺 𝘤𝘰𝘯𝘷𝘪𝘯𝘤𝘪𝘯𝘨𝘭𝘺. 𝘐𝘵 𝘪𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘮𝘢𝘯’𝘴 𝘷𝘰𝘪𝘤𝘦 𝘤𝘩𝘪𝘦𝘧𝘭𝘺 𝘸𝘩𝘪𝘤𝘩 𝘧𝘢𝘴𝘤𝘪𝘯𝘢𝘵𝘦𝘴 𝘺𝘰𝘶.

𝘈𝘴 𝘩𝘦 𝘴𝘱𝘦𝘢𝘬𝘴 𝘺𝘰𝘶 𝘧𝘪𝘯𝘥 𝘪𝘵 𝘥𝘪𝘧𝘧𝘪𝘤𝘶𝘭𝘵 𝘵𝘰 𝘵𝘢𝘬𝘦 𝘺𝘰𝘶𝘳 𝘦𝘺𝘦𝘴 𝘰𝘧𝘧 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘰𝘸𝘯. 𝘖𝘯𝘭𝘺 𝘸𝘩𝘦𝘯 𝘩𝘦 𝘴𝘱𝘦𝘢𝘬𝘴 𝘵𝘰 𝘰𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳𝘴 𝘥𝘰 𝘺𝘰𝘶 𝘩𝘢𝘷𝘦 𝘢 𝘤𝘩𝘢𝘯𝘤𝘦 𝘵𝘰 𝘴𝘵𝘶𝘥𝘺 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘩𝘦𝘢𝘥, 𝘱𝘳𝘦𝘥𝘰𝘮𝘪𝘯𝘢𝘯𝘵 𝘰𝘧 𝘸𝘩𝘪𝘤𝘩 𝘪𝘴 𝘢 𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘺 𝘩𝘪𝘨𝘩 𝘧𝘰𝘳𝘦𝘩𝘦𝘢𝘥 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩 𝘢 𝘣𝘶𝘭𝘨𝘦 𝘣𝘦𝘵𝘸𝘦𝘦𝘯 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘦𝘺𝘦𝘴 — 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘯𝘦𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘧𝘢𝘪𝘭𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘴𝘪𝘨𝘯 𝘰𝘧 𝘢𝘯 𝘦𝘹𝘤𝘦𝘱𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯𝘢𝘭 𝘪𝘯𝘵𝘦𝘭𝘭𝘪𝘨𝘦𝘯𝘤𝘦. 𝘛𝘩𝘦𝘯 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘭𝘰𝘯𝘨, 𝘸𝘦𝘭𝘭-𝘴𝘩𝘢𝘱𝘦𝘥 𝘯𝘰𝘴𝘦, 𝘱𝘳𝘰𝘤𝘭𝘢𝘪𝘮𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘴𝘤𝘪𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘪𝘴𝘵.

𝘏𝘰𝘸 𝘥𝘰𝘦𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘮𝘢𝘯, 𝘸𝘩𝘰 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘢𝘤𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘱𝘭𝘪𝘴𝘩𝘦𝘥 𝘴𝘶𝘤𝘩 𝘢 𝘵𝘳𝘦𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘥𝘰𝘶𝘴 𝘸𝘰𝘳𝘬, 𝘬𝘦𝘦𝘱 𝘺𝘰𝘶𝘯𝘨 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘮𝘢𝘯𝘢𝘨𝘦 𝘵𝘰 𝘴𝘶𝘳𝘱𝘳𝘪𝘴𝘦 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘸𝘰𝘳𝘭𝘥 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩 𝘮𝘰𝘳𝘦 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘮𝘰𝘳𝘦 𝘯𝘦𝘸 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯𝘴 𝘢𝘴 𝘩𝘦 𝘨𝘳𝘰𝘸𝘴 𝘰𝘭𝘥𝘦𝘳? 𝘏𝘰𝘸 𝘥𝘰𝘦𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘺𝘰𝘶𝘵𝘩 𝘰𝘧 𝘴𝘪𝘹𝘵𝘺, 𝘸𝘩𝘰 𝘪𝘴 𝘢 𝘱𝘳𝘰𝘧𝘦𝘴𝘴𝘰𝘳 𝘰𝘧 𝘮𝘢𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘮𝘢𝘵𝘪𝘤𝘴, 𝘢 𝘨𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘵 𝘮𝘦𝘤𝘩𝘢𝘯𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘦𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘦𝘯𝘨𝘪𝘯𝘦𝘦𝘳 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘨𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘵𝘦𝘴𝘵 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘰𝘳 𝘰𝘧 𝘢𝘭𝘭 𝘵𝘪𝘮𝘦𝘴, 𝘬𝘦𝘦𝘱 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘱𝘩𝘺𝘴𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘢𝘴 𝘸𝘦𝘭𝘭 𝘢𝘴 𝘳𝘦𝘮𝘢𝘳𝘬𝘢𝘣𝘭𝘦 𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘢𝘭 𝘧𝘳𝘦𝘴𝘩𝘯𝘦𝘴𝘴?

𝘛𝘰 𝘣𝘦𝘨𝘪𝘯 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩, 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢, 𝘸𝘩𝘰 𝘪𝘴 𝘣𝘺 𝘣𝘪𝘳𝘵𝘩 𝘢 𝘚𝘦𝘳𝘣𝘪𝘢𝘯, 𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘦𝘴 𝘧𝘳𝘰𝘮 𝘢 𝘭𝘰𝘯𝘨-𝘭𝘪𝘷𝘦𝘥 𝘩𝘢𝘳𝘥𝘺 𝘳𝘢𝘤𝘦. 𝘏𝘪𝘴 𝘧𝘢𝘮𝘪𝘭𝘺 𝘵𝘳𝘦𝘦 𝘢𝘣𝘰𝘶𝘯𝘥𝘴 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩 𝘤𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘦𝘯𝘢𝘳𝘪𝘢𝘯𝘴. 𝘈𝘤𝘤𝘰𝘳𝘥𝘪𝘯𝘨𝘭𝘺, 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 — 𝘣𝘢𝘳𝘳𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘢𝘤𝘤𝘪𝘥𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘴 — 𝘧𝘶𝘭𝘭𝘺 𝘦𝘹𝘱𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘴 𝘵𝘰 𝘣𝘦 𝘴𝘵𝘪𝘭𝘭 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘪𝘯 𝘈. 𝘋. 1960.

𝘉𝘶𝘵 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘤𝘩𝘪𝘦𝘧 𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘴𝘰𝘯 𝘧𝘰𝘳 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘱𝘦𝘳𝘱𝘦𝘵𝘶𝘢𝘭 𝘺𝘰𝘶𝘵𝘩 𝘪𝘴 𝘧𝘰𝘶𝘯𝘥 𝘪𝘯 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘨𝘢𝘴𝘵𝘳𝘰𝘯𝘰𝘮𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘧𝘳𝘶𝘨𝘢𝘭𝘪𝘵𝘺. 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘭𝘦𝘢𝘳𝘯𝘦𝘥 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘨𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘵 𝘧𝘶𝘯𝘥𝘢𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘢𝘭 𝘵𝘳𝘶𝘵𝘩 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘮𝘰𝘴𝘵 𝘱𝘦𝘰𝘱𝘭𝘦 𝘯𝘰𝘵 𝘰𝘯𝘭𝘺 𝘦𝘢𝘵 𝘢𝘭𝘭 𝘰𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘪𝘳 𝘣𝘰𝘥𝘪𝘭𝘺 𝘪𝘭𝘭𝘴, 𝘣𝘶𝘵 𝘢𝘤𝘵𝘶𝘢𝘭𝘭𝘺 𝘦𝘢𝘵 𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘮𝘴𝘦𝘭𝘷𝘦𝘴 𝘵𝘰 𝘥𝘦𝘢𝘵𝘩 𝘣𝘺 𝘦𝘪𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳 𝘦𝘢𝘵𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘵𝘰𝘰 𝘮𝘶𝘤𝘩 𝘰𝘳 𝘦𝘭𝘴𝘦 𝘣𝘺 𝘧𝘰𝘰𝘥 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘥𝘰𝘦𝘴 𝘯𝘰𝘵 𝘢𝘨𝘳𝘦𝘦 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩 𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘮.

𝘞𝘩𝘦𝘯 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘧𝘰𝘶𝘯𝘥 𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘵𝘰𝘣𝘢𝘤𝘤𝘰 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘣𝘭𝘢𝘤𝘬 𝘤𝘰𝘧𝘧𝘦𝘦 𝘪𝘯𝘵𝘦𝘳𝘧𝘦𝘳𝘦𝘥 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘱𝘩𝘺𝘴𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘸𝘦𝘭𝘭-𝘣𝘦𝘪𝘯𝘨, 𝘩𝘦 𝘲𝘶𝘪𝘵 𝘣𝘰𝘵𝘩. 𝘛𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘪𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘴𝘪𝘮𝘱𝘭𝘦 𝘥𝘢𝘪𝘭𝘺 𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘶 𝘰𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘨𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘵 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘰𝘳:

𝘉𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘬𝘧𝘢𝘴𝘵: 𝘖𝘯𝘦 𝘵𝘰 𝘵𝘸𝘰 𝘱𝘪𝘯𝘵𝘴 𝘰𝘧 𝘸𝘢𝘳𝘮 𝘮𝘪𝘭𝘬 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘢 𝘧𝘦𝘸 𝘦𝘨𝘨𝘴, 𝘱𝘳𝘦𝘱𝘢𝘳𝘦𝘥 𝘣𝘺 𝘩𝘪𝘮𝘴𝘦𝘭𝘧 — 𝘺𝘦𝘴, 𝘩𝘦 𝘪𝘴 𝘢 𝘣𝘢𝘤𝘩𝘦𝘭𝘰𝘳!

𝘓𝘶𝘯𝘤𝘩: 𝘕𝘰𝘯𝘦 𝘸𝘩𝘢𝘵𝘴𝘰𝘦𝘷𝘦𝘳, 𝘢𝘴 𝘢 𝘳𝘶𝘭𝘦.

𝘋𝘪𝘯𝘯𝘦𝘳: 𝘊𝘦𝘭𝘦𝘳𝘺 𝘰𝘳 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘭𝘪𝘬𝘦, 𝘴𝘰𝘶𝘱, 𝘢 𝘴𝘪𝘯𝘨𝘭𝘦 𝘱𝘪𝘦𝘤𝘦 𝘰𝘧 𝘮𝘦𝘢𝘵 𝘰𝘳 𝘧𝘰𝘸𝘭, 𝘱𝘰𝘵𝘢𝘵𝘰𝘦𝘴 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘰𝘯𝘦 𝘰𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳 𝘷𝘦𝘨𝘦𝘵𝘢𝘣𝘭𝘦; 𝘢 𝘨𝘭𝘢𝘴𝘴 𝘰𝘧 𝘭𝘪𝘨𝘩𝘵 𝘸𝘪𝘯𝘦. 𝘍𝘰𝘳 𝘥𝘦𝘴𝘴𝘦𝘳𝘵, 𝘱𝘦𝘳𝘩𝘢𝘱𝘴 𝘢 𝘴𝘭𝘪𝘤𝘦 𝘰𝘧 𝘤𝘩𝘦𝘦𝘴𝘦, 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘢𝘳𝘪𝘢𝘣𝘭𝘺 𝘢 𝘣𝘪𝘨 𝘳𝘢𝘸 𝘢𝘱𝘱𝘭𝘦. 𝘈𝘯𝘥 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘵’𝘴 𝘢𝘭𝘭.

𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘪𝘴 𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘺 𝘧𝘶𝘴𝘴𝘺 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘱𝘢𝘳𝘵𝘪𝘤𝘶𝘭𝘢𝘳 𝘢𝘣𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘧𝘰𝘰𝘥: 𝘩𝘦 𝘦𝘢𝘵𝘴 𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘺 𝘭𝘪𝘵𝘵𝘭𝘦, 𝘣𝘶𝘵 𝘸𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘩𝘦 𝘥𝘰𝘦𝘴 𝘦𝘢𝘵 𝘮𝘶𝘴𝘵 𝘣𝘦 𝘰𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘺 𝘣𝘦𝘴𝘵. 𝘈𝘯𝘥 𝘩𝘦 𝘬𝘯𝘰𝘸𝘴, 𝘧𝘰𝘳 𝘰𝘶𝘵𝘴𝘪𝘥𝘦 𝘰𝘧 𝘣𝘦𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘢 𝘨𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘵 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘰𝘳 𝘪𝘯 𝘴𝘤𝘪𝘦𝘯𝘤𝘦 𝘩𝘦 𝘪𝘴 𝘢𝘯 𝘢𝘤𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘱𝘭𝘪𝘴𝘩𝘦𝘥 𝘤𝘰𝘰𝘬 𝘸𝘩𝘰 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘦𝘥 𝘢𝘭𝘭 𝘴𝘰𝘳𝘵𝘴 𝘰𝘧 𝘴𝘢𝘷𝘰𝘳𝘺 𝘥𝘪𝘴𝘩𝘦𝘴.

𝘏𝘪𝘴 𝘰𝘯𝘭𝘺 𝘷𝘪𝘤𝘦 𝘪𝘴 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘨𝘦𝘯𝘦𝘳𝘰𝘴𝘪𝘵𝘺. 𝘛𝘩𝘦 𝘮𝘢𝘯 𝘸𝘩𝘰, 𝘣𝘺 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘪𝘨𝘯𝘰𝘳𝘢𝘯𝘵 𝘰𝘯𝘭𝘰𝘰𝘬𝘦𝘳 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘰𝘧𝘵𝘦𝘯 𝘣𝘦𝘦𝘯 𝘤𝘢𝘭𝘭𝘦𝘥 𝘢𝘯 𝘪𝘥𝘭𝘦 𝘥𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘮𝘦𝘳, 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘮𝘢𝘥𝘦 𝘰𝘷𝘦𝘳 𝘢 𝘮𝘪𝘭𝘭𝘪𝘰𝘯 𝘥𝘰𝘭𝘭𝘢𝘳𝘴 𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘰𝘧 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯𝘴 — 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘴𝘱𝘦𝘯𝘵 𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘮 𝘢𝘴 𝘲𝘶𝘪𝘤𝘬𝘭𝘺 𝘰𝘯 𝘯𝘦𝘸 𝘰𝘯𝘦𝘴. 𝘉𝘶𝘵 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘪𝘴 𝘢𝘯 𝘪𝘥𝘦𝘢𝘭𝘪𝘴𝘵 𝘰𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘩𝘪𝘨𝘩𝘦𝘴𝘵 𝘰𝘳𝘥𝘦𝘳 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘵𝘰 𝘴𝘶𝘤𝘩 𝘮𝘦𝘯 𝘮𝘰𝘯𝘦𝘺 𝘪𝘵𝘴𝘦𝘭𝘧 𝘮𝘦𝘢𝘯𝘴 𝘣𝘶𝘵 𝘭𝘪𝘵𝘵𝘭𝘦.


This I did constantly until I was about seventeen when my thoughts turned seriously to invention. Then I observed to my delight that I could visualize with the greatest facility. I needed no models, drawings or experiments. I could picture them all as real in my mind. Thus I have been led unconsciously to evolve what I consider a new method of materializing inventive concepts and ideas, which is radially opposite to the purely experimental and is in my opinion ever so much more expeditious and efficient. The moment one constructs a device to carry into practice a crude idea he finds himself unavoidably engrost with the details and defects of the apparatus. As he goes on improving and reconstructing, his force of concentration diminishes and he loses sight of the great underlying principle. Results may be obtained but always at the sacrifice of quality.

My method is different. I do not rush into actual work. When I get an idea I start at once building it up in my imagination. I change the construction, make improvements and operate the device in my mind. It is absolutely immaterial to me whether I run my turbine in thought or test it in my shop. 𝑰 𝒆𝒗𝒆𝒏 𝒏𝒐𝒕𝒆 𝒊𝒇 𝒊𝒕 𝒊𝒔 𝒐𝒖𝒕 𝒐𝒇 𝒃𝒂𝒍𝒂𝒏𝒄𝒆. There is no difference whatever, the results are the same. In this way I am able to rapidly develop and perfect a conception without touching anything. When I have gone so far as to embody in the invention every possible improvement I can think of and see no fault anywhere, I put into concrete form this final product of my brain. Invariably my device works as I conceived that it should, and the experiment comes out exactly as I planned it. In twenty years there has not been a single exception. Why should it be otherwise? Engineering, electrical and mechanical, is positive in results. There is scarcely a subject that cannot be examined beforehand from the available theoretical and practical data. The carrying out into practice of a crude idea as is being generally done is, I hold, nothing but a waste of energy, money and time.

My early affliction had, however, another compensation. The incessant mental exertion developed my powers of observation and enabled me to discover a truth of great importance. I had noted that the appearance of images was always preceded by actual vision of scenes under peculiar and generally very exceptional conditions and I was impelled on each occasion to locate the original impulse. After a while this effort grew to be almost automatic and I gained great facility in connecting cause and effect. Soon I became aware, to my surprise, that every thought I conceived was suggested by an external impression. Not only this but all my actions were prompted in a similar way. In the course of time it became perfectly evident to me that I was merely an 𝒂𝒖𝒕𝒐𝒎𝒂𝒕𝒐𝒏 endowed with power of movement, responding to the stimuli of the sense organs and thinking and acting accordingly. The practical result of this was the art of 𝒕𝒆𝒍𝒂𝒖𝒕𝒐𝒎𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒄𝒔 which has been so far carried out only in an imperfect manner. Its latent possibilities will, however, be eventually shown. I have been since years planning self-controlled automata and believe that mechanisms can be produced which will act as if possest of reason, to a limited degree, and will create a revolution in many commercial and industrial departments.

I was about twelve years old when I first succeeded in banishing an image from my vision by willful effort, but I never had any control over the flashes of light to which I have referred. They were, perhaps, my strangest experience and inexplicable. They usually occurred when I found myself in a dangerous or distressing situation or when I was greatly exhilarated. In some instances I have seen all the air around me filled with tongues of living flame. Their intensity, instead of diminishing, increased with time and seemingly attained a maximum when I was about twenty-five years old. While in Paris, in 1883, a prominent French manufacturer sent me an invitation to a shooting expedition which I accepted. I had been long confined to the factory and the fresh air had a wonderfully invigorating effect on me. On my return to the city that night I felt a positive sensation that my brain had caught fire. I saw a light as tho a small sun was located in it and I past the whole night applying cold compressions to my tortured head. Finally the flashes diminished in frequency and force but it took more than three weeks before they wholly subsided. When a second invitation was extended to me my answer was an emphatic NO!

These luminous phenomena still manifest themselves from time to time, as when a new idea opening up possibilities strikes me, but they are no longer exciting, being of relatively small intensity. When I close my eyes I invariably observe first, a background of very dark and uniform blue, not unlike the sky on a clear but starless night. In a few seconds this field becomes animated with innumerable scintillating flakes of green, arranged in several layers and advancing towards me. Then there appears, to the right, a beautiful pattern of two systems of parallel and closely spaced lines, at right angles to one another, in all sorts of colors with yellow-green, and gold predominating. Immediately thereafter the lines grow brighter and the whole is thickly sprinkled with dots of twinkling light. This picture moves slowly across the field of vision and in about ten seconds vanishes to the left, leaving behind a ground of rather unpleasant and inert grey which quickly gives way to a billowy sea of clouds, seemingly trying to mould themselves in living shapes. It is curious that I cannot project a form into this grey until the second phase is reached. Every time, before falling asleep, images of persons or objects flit before my view. When I see them I know I am about to lose consciousness. If they are absent and refuse to come it means a sleepless night.

To what an extent imagination played in my early life I may illustrate by another odd experience. Like most children I was fond of jumping and developed an intense desire to support myself in the air. Occasionally a strong wind richly charged with oxygen blew from the mountains rendering my body light as cork and then I would leap and float in space for a long time. It was a delightful sensation and my disappointment was keen when later I undeceived myself.

During that period I contracted many strange likes, dislikes and habits, some of which I can trace to external impressions while others are unaccountable. I had a violent aversion against the earrings of women but other ornaments, as bracelets, pleased me more or less according to design. The sight of a pearl would almost give me a fit but I was fascinated with the glitter of crystals or objects with sharp edges and plane surfaces. I would not touch the hair of other people except, perhaps, at the point of a revolver. I would get a fever by looking at a peach and if a piece of camphor was anywhere in the house it caused me the keenest discomfort. Even now I am not insensible to some of these upsetting impulses. When I drop little squares of paper in a dish filled with liquid, I always sense a peculiar and awful taste in my mouth. I counted the steps in my walks and calculated the cubical contents of soup plates, coffee cups and pieces of food, — otherwise my meal was unenjoyable. All repeated acts or operations I performed had to be divisible by three and if I mist I felt impelled to do it all over again, even if it took hours.

Up to the age of eight years, my character was weak and vacillating. I had neither courage or strength to form a firm resolve. My feelings came in waves and surges and vibrated unceasingly between extremes. My wishes were of consuming force and like the heads of the hydra, they multiplied. I was opprest by thoughts of pain in life and death and religious fear. I was swayed by superstitious belief and lived in constant dread of the spirit of evil, of ghosts and ogres and other unholy monsters of the dark. Then, all at once, there came a tremendous change which altered the course of my whole existence.

Of all things I liked books the best. My father had a large library and whenever I could manage I tried to satisfy my passion for reading. He did not permit it and would fly into a rage when he caught me in the act. He hid the candles when he found that I was reading in secret. He did not want me to spoil my eyes. But I obtained tallow, made the wicking and cast the sticks into tin forms, and every night I would bush the keyhole and the cracks and read, often till dawn, when all others slept and my mother started on her arduous daily task. On one occasion I came across a novel entitled “Abafi” (the son of Aba), a Serbian translation of a well known Hungarian writer, Josika. This work somehow awakened my dormant powers of will and I began to practice self-control. At first my resolutions faded like snow in April, but in a little while I conquered my weakness and felt a pleasure I never knew before — that of doing as I willed. In the course of time this vigorous mental exercise became second to nature. At the outset my wishes had to be subdued but gradually desire and will grew to be identical. After years of such discipline I gained so complete a mastery over myself that I toyed with passions which have meant destruction to some of the strongest men. At a certain age I contracted a mania for gambling which greatly worried my parents. To sit down to a game of cards was for me the quintessence of pleasure. My father led an exemplary life and could not excuse the senseless waste of time and money in which I indulged. I had a strong resolve but my philosophy was bad. I would say to him, “I can stop whenever I please but is it worth while to give up that which I would purchase with the joys of Paradise?” On frequent occasions he gave vent to his anger and contempt but my mother was different. She understood the character of men and knew that one’s salvation could only be brought about thru his own efforts. One afternoon, I remember, when I had lost all my money and was craving for a game, she came to me with a roll of bills and said, “Go and enjoy yourself. The sooner you lose all we possess the better it will be. I know that you will get over it.” She was right. I conquered my passion then and there and only regretted that it had not been a hundred times as strong. I not only vanquished but tore it from my heart so as not to leave even a trace of desire. Ever since that time I have been as indifferent to any form of gambling as to picking teeth.

During another period I smoked excessively, threatening to ruin my health. Then my will asserted itself and I not only stopt but destroyed all inclination. Long ago I suffered from heart trouble until I discovered that it was due to the innocent cup of coffee I consumed every morning. I discontinued at once, tho I confess it was not an easy task. In this way I checked and bridled other habits and passions and have not only preserved my life but derived an immense amount of satisfaction from what most men would consider privation and sacrifice.

After finishing the studies at the Polytechnic Institute and University, I had a complete nervous breakdown and while the malady lasted I observed many phenomena strange and unbelievable.

(𝑻𝒐 𝒃𝒆 𝒄𝒐𝒏𝒕𝒊𝒏𝒖𝒆𝒅 𝒊𝒏 𝒐𝒖𝒓 𝑴𝒂𝒓𝒄𝒉 𝒊𝒔𝒔𝒖𝒆)


stylize font= x
insrt figrs tmplt= 3x+c
photocopy of original here=

__________________







__________________


*MY INVENTIONS II
MY INVENTIONS II - MY FIRST EFFORTS IN INVENTION
————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Experimenter
March, 1919 Page number(s): 776-777, 839-841 & 843


I shall dwell briefly on these extraordinary experiences, on account of their possible interest to students of psychology and physiology and also because this period of agony was of the greatest consequence on my mental development and subsequent labors. But it is indispensable to first relate the circumstances and conditions which preceded them and in which might be found their partial explanation.

From childhood I was compelled to concentrate attention upon myself. This caused me much suffering but, to my present view, it was a blessing in disguise for it has taught me to appreciate the inestimable value of introspection in the preservation of life, as well as a means of achievement. The pressure of occupation and the incessant stream of impressions pouring into our consciousness through all the gateways of knowledge make modern existence hazardous in many ways. Most persons are so absorbed in the contemplation of the outside world that they are wholly oblivious to what is passing on within themselves. The premature death of millions is primarily traceable to this cause. Even among those who exercise care it is a common mistake to avoid imaginary, and ignore the real dangers. And what is true of an individual also applies, more or less, to a people as a whole. Witness, in illustration, the prohibition movement. A drastic, if not unconstitutional, measure is now being put thru in this country to prevent the consumption of alcohol and yet it is a positive fact that coffee, tea, tobacco, chewing gum and other stimulants, which are freely indulged in even at the tender age, are vastly more injurious to the national body, judging from the number of those who succumb. So, for instance, during my student years I gathered from the published necrologues in Vienna, the home of coffee drinkers, that deaths from heart trouble sometimes reached 𝒔𝒊𝒙𝒕𝒚-𝒔𝒆𝒗𝒆𝒏 𝒑𝒆𝒓 𝒄𝒆𝒏𝒕 of the total.


𝘽𝙤𝙮𝙨 𝙬𝙞𝙡𝙡 𝙗𝙚 𝙗𝙤𝙮𝙨, 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙬𝙤𝙧𝙡𝙙 𝙤𝙫𝙚𝙧. 𝙏𝙝𝙚 𝘽𝙤𝙮 𝙏𝙚𝙨𝙡𝙖 𝙬𝙖𝙨 𝙣𝙤 𝙚𝙭𝙘𝙚𝙥𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣 𝙩𝙤 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙪𝙣𝙞𝙫𝙚𝙧𝙨𝙖𝙡 𝙧𝙪𝙡𝙚, 𝙖𝙨 𝙩𝙝𝙞𝙨, 𝙝𝙞𝙨 𝙨𝙚𝙘𝙤𝙣𝙙 𝙖𝙪𝙩𝙤𝙗𝙞𝙤𝙜𝙧𝙖𝙥𝙝𝙞𝙘𝙖𝙡 𝙖𝙧𝙩𝙞𝙘𝙡𝙚 𝙘𝙡𝙚𝙖𝙧𝙡𝙮 𝙥𝙧𝙤𝙫𝙚𝙨.

𝙈𝙧. 𝙏𝙚𝙨𝙡𝙖 𝙞𝙣 𝙝𝙞𝙨 𝙤𝙬𝙣 𝙞𝙣𝙞𝙢𝙞𝙩𝙖𝙗𝙡𝙚, 𝙙𝙚𝙡𝙞𝙜𝙝𝙩𝙛𝙪𝙡 𝙬𝙖𝙮, 𝙝𝙚𝙧𝙚 𝙥𝙖𝙞𝙣𝙩𝙨 𝙬𝙞𝙩𝙝 𝙖 𝙡𝙞𝙩𝙚𝙧𝙖𝙧𝙮 𝙖𝙧𝙩𝙞𝙨𝙩’𝙨 𝙗𝙧𝙪𝙨𝙝 𝙝𝙞𝙨 𝙤𝙬𝙣 𝙞𝙣𝙩𝙞𝙢𝙖𝙩𝙚 𝙗𝙤𝙮𝙝𝙤𝙤𝙙 𝙞𝙣 𝙘𝙝𝙖𝙧𝙢𝙞𝙣𝙜 𝙖𝙨 𝙬𝙚𝙡𝙡 𝙖𝙨 𝙫𝙞𝙫𝙞𝙙 𝙘𝙤𝙡𝙤𝙧𝙨.

𝙒𝙚 𝙝𝙖𝙫𝙚 𝙤𝙛𝙩𝙚𝙣 𝙝𝙚𝙖𝙧𝙙 𝙤𝙛 𝙏𝙚𝙨𝙡𝙖, 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙙𝙧𝙚𝙖𝙢𝙚𝙧. 𝘽𝙪𝙩 𝙞𝙛 𝙝𝙚 𝙞𝙨 𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙞𝙩𝙡𝙚𝙙 𝙩𝙤 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙚𝙥𝙞𝙩𝙝𝙚𝙩, 𝙝𝙞𝙨 𝙚𝙖𝙧𝙡𝙮 𝙗𝙤𝙮𝙝𝙤𝙤𝙙 𝙘𝙚𝙧𝙩𝙖𝙞𝙣𝙡𝙮 𝙛𝙖𝙞𝙡𝙨 𝙩𝙤 𝙧𝙚𝙫𝙚𝙖𝙡 𝙞𝙣. 𝙏𝙚𝙨𝙡𝙖 𝙙𝙞𝙙 𝙣𝙤𝙩 𝙖𝙡𝙡𝙤𝙬 𝙢𝙪𝙘𝙝 𝙜𝙧𝙖𝙨𝙨 𝙩𝙤 𝙜𝙧𝙤𝙬 𝙪𝙣𝙙𝙚𝙧 𝙝𝙞𝙨 𝙛𝙚𝙚𝙩 𝙬𝙝𝙞𝙡𝙚 𝙖 𝙗𝙤𝙮, 𝙛𝙤𝙧 𝙝𝙚 𝙖𝙨𝙨𝙪𝙧𝙚𝙙𝙡𝙮 𝙬𝙖𝙨 𝙖 𝙨𝙩𝙧𝙚𝙣𝙪𝙤𝙪𝙨, 𝙧𝙚𝙙-𝙗𝙡𝙤𝙤𝙙𝙚𝙙 𝙮𝙤𝙪𝙣𝙜𝙨𝙩𝙚𝙧.

𝙔𝙤𝙪 𝙬𝙞𝙡𝙡 𝙬𝙞𝙨𝙝 𝙩𝙤 𝙧𝙚𝙖𝙙 𝙖𝙡𝙡 𝙖𝙗𝙤𝙪𝙩 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙜𝙧𝙚𝙖𝙩𝙚𝙨𝙩 𝙞𝙣𝙫𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙤𝙧’𝙨 𝙚𝙖𝙧𝙡𝙮 𝙗𝙤𝙮𝙝𝙤𝙤𝙙. 𝙄𝙩 𝙞𝙨 𝙙𝙤𝙪𝙗𝙡𝙮 𝙫𝙖𝙡𝙪𝙖𝙗𝙡𝙚 𝙗𝙚𝙘𝙖𝙪𝙨𝙚 𝙞𝙩 𝙘𝙤𝙢𝙚𝙨 𝙛𝙧𝙤𝙢 𝙝𝙞𝙨 𝙤𝙬𝙣 𝙥𝙚𝙣. 𝙒𝙚 𝙥𝙧𝙤𝙢𝙞𝙨𝙚 𝙮𝙤𝙪 𝙖𝙣 𝙞𝙣𝙩𝙚𝙧𝙚𝙨𝙩𝙞𝙣𝙜 𝙩𝙬𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙮-𝙢𝙞𝙣𝙪𝙩𝙚𝙨’ 𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙚𝙧𝙩𝙖𝙞𝙣𝙢𝙚𝙣𝙩.

—𝙀𝘿𝙄𝙏𝙊𝙍


Similar observations might probably be made in cities where the consumption of tea is excessive. These delicious beverages superexcite and gradually exhaust the fine fibers of the brain. They also interfere seriously with arterial circulation and should be enjoyed all the more sparingly as their deleterious effects are slow and imperceptible. Tobacco, on the other hand, is conducive to easy and pleasant thinking and detracts from the intensity and concentration necessary to all original and vigorous effort of the intellect. Chewing gum is helpful for a short while but soon drains the glandular system and inflicts irreparable damage, not to speak of the revulsion it creates. Alcohol in small quantities is an excellent tonic, but is toxic in its action when absorbed in larger amounts, quite immaterial as to whether it is taken in as whiskey or produced in the stomach from sugar. But it should not be overlooked that all these are great eliminators assisting Nature, as they do, in upholding her stern but just law of the survival of the fittest. Eager reformers should also be mindful of the eternal perversity of mankind which makes the indifferent “𝒍𝒂𝒊𝒔𝒔𝒆𝒛-𝒇𝒂𝒊𝒓𝒆” by far preferable to enforced restraint. The truth about this is that we need stimulants to do our best work under present living conditions, and that we must exercise moderation and control our appetites and inclinations in every direction. That is what I have been doing for many years, in this way maintaining myself young in body and mind. Abstinence was not always to my liking but I find ample reward in the agreeable experiences I am now making. Just in the hope of converting some to my precepts and convictions I will recall one or two.


A short time ago I was returning to my hotel. It was a bitter cold night, the ground slippery, and no taxi to be had. Half a block behind me followed another man, evidently as anxious as myself to get under cover. Suddenly my legs went up in the air. In the same instant there was a flash in my brain, the nerves responded, the muscles contracted, I swung 180 degrees and landed on my hands. I resumed my walk as tho nothing had happened when the stranger caught up with me. “How old are you?” he asked, surveying me critically. “Oh, about fifty-nine,” I replied. “What of it?” “Well,” said he, “I have seen a cat do this but never a man.” About a month since I wanted to order new eyeglasses and went to an oculist who put me through the usual tests. He looked at me incredulously as I read off with ease the smallest print at considerable distance. But when I told him I was past sixty he gasped in astonishment. Friends of mine often remark that my suits fit me like gloves but they do not know that all my clothing is made to measurements which were taken nearly 35 years ago and never changed. During this same period my weight has not varied one pound.

In this connection I may tell a funny story. One evening, in the winter of 1885, Mr. Edison, Edward H. Johnson, the President of the Edison Illuminating Company, Mr. Bachelor, Manager of the works, and myself entered a little place opposite 65 Firth Avenue where the offices of the company were located. Someone suggested guessing weights and I was induced to step on a scale. Edison felt me all over and said: “Tesla weighs 152 lbs. to an ounce,” and he guessed it exactly. Stript I weighed 142 lbs. and that is still my weight. I whispered to Mr. Johnson: “How is it possible that Edison could guess my weight so closely?” “Well,” he said, lowering his voice, “I will tell you confidentially, but you must not say anything. He was employed for a long time in a Chicago slaughter-house where he weighed thousands of hogs every day! That’s why.” My friend, the Hon. Chauncey M. Dupew, tells of an Englishman on whom he sprung one of his original anecdotes and who listened with a puzzled expression, but — a year later — laughed out loud. I will frankly confess it took me longer than that to appreciate Johnson’s joke.

Now, my well being is simply the result of a careful and measured mode of living and perhaps the most astonishing thing is that three times in my youth I was rendered by illness a hopeless physical wreck and given up by physicians. More than this, thru ignorance and lightheartedness, I got into all sorts of difficulties, dangers and scrapes from which I extricated myself as by enchantment. I was almost drowned a dozen times; was nearly boiled alive and just mist being cremated. I was entombed, lost and frozen. I had hair-breadth escapes from mad dogs, hogs, and other wild animals. I past thru dreadful diseases and met with all kinds of odd mishaps and that I am hale and hearty today seems like a miracle. But as I recall these incidents to my mind I feel convinced that my preservation was not altogether accidental.

An inventor’s endeavor is essentially life saving. Whether he harnesses forces, improves devices, or provides new comforts and conveniences, he is adding to the safety of our existence. He is also better qualified than the average individual to protect himself in peril, for he is observant and resourceful. If I had no other evidence that I was, in a measure, possest of such qualities I would find it in these personal experiences. The reader will be able to judge for himself if I mention one or two instances. On one occasion, when about 14 years old, I wanted to scare some friends who were bathing with me. My plan was to dive under a long floating structure and slip out quietly at the other end. Swimming and diving came to me as naturally as to a duck and I was confident that I could perform the feat. Accordingly I plunged into the water and, when out of view, turned around and proceeded rapidly towards the opposite side. Thinking that I was safely beyond the structure, I rose to the surface but to my dismay struck a beam. Of course, I quickly dived and forged ahead with rapid strokes until my breath was beginning to give out. Rising for the second time, my head came again in contact with a beam. Now I was becoming desperate. However, summoning all my energy, I made a third frantic attempt but the result was the same. The torture of supprest breathing was getting unendurable, my brain was reeling and I felt myself sinking. At that moment, when my situation seemed absolutely hopeless, I experienced one of those flashes of light and the structure above me appeared before my vision. I either discerned or guest that there was a little space between the surface of the water and the boards resting on the beams and, with consciousness nearly gone, I floated up, pressed my mouth close to the planks and managed to inhale a little air, unfortunately mingled with a spray of water which nearly choked me. Several times I repeated this procedure as in a dream until my heart, which was racing at a terrible rate, quieted down and I gained composure. After that I made a number of unsuccessful dives, having completely lost the sense of direction, but finally succeeded in getting out of the trap when my friends had already given me up and were fishing for my body.

That bathing season was spoiled for me thru recklessness but I soon forgot the lesson and only two years later I fell into a worse predicament. There was a large flour mill with a dam across the river near the city where I was studying at the time. As a rule the height of the water was only two or three inches above the dam and to swim out to it was a sport not very dangerous in which I often indulged. One day I went alone to the river to enjoy myself as usual. When I was a short distance from the masonry, however, I was horrified to observe that the water had risen and was carrying me along swiftly. I tried to get away but it was too late. Luckily, tho, I saved myself from being swept over by taking hold of the wall with both hands. The pressure against my chest was great and I was barely able to keep my head above the surface. Not a soul was in sight and my voice was lost in the roar of the fall. Slowly and gradually I became exhausted and unable to withstand the strain longer. Just as I was about to let go, to be dashed against the rocks below, I saw in a flash of light a familiar diagram illustrating the hydraulic principle that the pressure of a fluid in motion is proportionate to the area exposed, and automatically I turned on my left side. As if by magic the pressure was reduced and I found it comparatively easy in that position to resist the force of the stream. But the danger still confronted me. I knew that sooner or later I would be carried down, as it was not possible for any help to reach me in time, even if I had attracted attention. I am ambidextrous now but then I was left-handed and had comparatively little strength in my right arm. For this reason I did not dare to turn on the other side to rest and nothing remained but to slowly push my body along the dam. I had to get away from the mill towards which my face was turned as the current there was much swifter and deeper. It was a long and painful ordeal and I came near to failing at its very end for I was confronted with a depression in the masonry. I managed to get over with the last ounce of my force and fell in a swoon when I reached the bank, where I was found. I had torn virtually all the skin from my left side and it took several weeks before the fever had subsided and I was well. These are only two of many instances but they may be sufficient to show that had it not been for the inventor’s instinct I would not have lived to tell this tale.

Interested people have often asked me how and when I began to invent. This I can only answer from my present recollection in the light of which the first attempt I recall was rather ambitious for it involved the invention of an 𝒂𝒑𝒑𝒂𝒓𝒂𝒕𝒖𝒔 and a 𝒎𝒆𝒕𝒉𝒐𝒅. In the former I was anticipated but the later was original. It happened in this way. One of my playmates had come into the possession of a hook and fishing-tackle which created quite an excitement in the village, and the next morning all started out to catch frogs. I was left alone and deserted owing to a quarrel with this boy. I had never seen a real hook and pictured it as something wonderful, endowed with peculiar qualities, and was despairing not to be one of the party. Urged by necessity, I somehow got hold of a piece of soft iron wire, hammered the end to a sharp point between two stones, bent it into shape, and fastened it to a strong string. I then cut a rod, gathered some bait, and went down to the brook where there were frogs in abundance. But I could not catch any and was almost discouraged when it occurred to me dangle the empty hook in front of a frog sitting on a stump. At first he collapsed but by and by his eyes bulged out and became bloodshot, he swelled to twice his normal size and made a vicious snap at the hook. Immediately I pulled him up. I tried the same thing again and again and the method proved infallible. When my comrades, who in spite of their fine outfit had caught nothing, came to me they were green with envy. For a long time I kept my secret and enjoyed the monopoly but finally yielded to the spirit of Christmas. Every boy could then do the same and the following summer brought disaster to the frogs.

In my next attempt I seem to have acted under the first instinctive impulse which later dominated me — to harness the energies of nature to the service of man. I did this through the medium of May-bugs — or June-bugs as they are called in America — which were a veritable pest in that country and sometimes broke the branches of trees by the sheer weight of their bodies. The bushes were black with them. I would attach as many as four of them to a crosspiece, rotably arranged on a thin spindle, and transmit the motion of the same to a large disc and so derive considerable “power.” These creatures were remarkably efficient, for once they were started they had no sense to stop and continued whirling for hours and hours and the hotter it was the harder they worked. All went well until a strange boy came to the place. He was the son of a retired officer in the Austrian Army. That urchin ate May-bugs alive and enjoyed them as tho they were the finest blue-point oysters. That disgusting sight terminated my endeavors in this promising field and I have never since been able to touch a May-bug or any other insect for that matter.

After that, I believe, I undertook to take apart and assemble the clocks of my grandfather. In the former operation I was always successful but often failed in the latter. So it came that he brought my work to a sudden halt in a manner not too delicate and it took thirty years before I tackled another clockwork again. Shortly thereafter I went into the manufacture of a kind of pop-gun which comprised a hollow tube, a piston, and two plugs of hemp. When firing the gun, the piston was prest against the stomach and the tube was pushed back quickly with both hands. The air between the plugs was comprest and raised to a high temperature and one of them was expelled with a loud report. The art consisted in selecting a tube of the proper taper from the hollow stalks which were found in our garden. I did very well with that gun but my activities interfered with the window panes in our house and met with painful discouragement. If I remember rightly, I then took to carving swords from pieces of furniture which I could conveniently obtain. At that time I was under the sway of the Serbian national poetry and full of admiration for the feats of the heroes. I used to spend hours in mowing down my enemies in the form of corn-stalks which ruined the crops and netted me several spankings from my mother. Moreover these were not of the formal kind but the genuine article.

I had all this and more behind me before I was six years old and had past thru one year of elementary school in the village of Smiljan where I was born. At this juncture we moved to the little city of Gospic nearby. This change of residence was like a calamity to me. It almost broke my heart to part from our pigeons, chickens and sheep, and our magnificent flock of geese which used to rise to the clouds in the morning and return from the feeding grounds at sundown in battle formation, so perfect that it would have put a squadron of the best aviators of the present day to shame. In our new house I was but a prisoner, watching the strange people I saw thru the window blinds. My bashfulness was such that I would rather have faced a roaring lion than one of the city dudes who strolled about. But my hardest trial came on Sunday when I had to dress up and attend the service. There I met with an accident, the mere thought of which made my blood curdle like sour milk for years afterwards. It was my second adventure in a church. Not long before I was entombed for a night in an old chapel on an inaccessible mountain which was visited only once a year. It was an awful experience, but this one was worse. There was a wealthy lady in town, a good but pompous woman, who used to come to the church gorgeously painted up and attired with an enormous train and attendants. One Sunday I had just finished ringing the bell in the belfry and rushed downstairs when this grand dame was sweeping out and I jumped on her train. It tore off with a ripping noise which sounded like a salvo of musketry fired by raw recruits. My father was livid with rage. He gave me a gentle slap on the cheek, the only corporal punishment he ever administered to me but I almost feel it now. The embarrassment and confusion that followed are indescribably. I was practically ostracised until something else happened which redeemed me in the estimation of the community.

An enterprising young merchant had organized a fire department. A new fire engine was purchased, uniforms provided and the men drilled for service and parade. The engine was, in reality, a pump to be worked by sixteen men and was beautifully painted red and black. One afternoon the official trial was prepared for and the machine was transported to the river. The entire population turned out to witness the great spectacle. When all the speeches and ceremonies were concluded, the command was given to pump, but not a drop of water came from the nozzle. The professors and experts tried in vain to locate the trouble. The fizzle was complete when I arrived at the scene. My knowledge of the mechanism was nil and I knew next to nothing of air pressure, but instinctively I felt for the suction hose in the water and found that it had collapsed. When I waded in the river and opened it up the water rushed forth and not a few Sunday clothes were spoiled. Archimedes running naked thru the streets of Syracuse and shouting Eureka at the top of his voice did not make a greater impression than myself. I was carried on the shoulders and was hero of the day.

Upon settling in the city I began a four years’ course in the so-called Normal School preparatory to my studies at the College or 𝑹𝒆𝒂𝒍-𝑮𝒚𝒎𝒏𝒂𝒔𝒊𝒖𝒎. During this period my boyish efforts and exploits, as well as troubles, continued. Among other things I attained the unique distinction of champion crow catcher in the country. My method of procedure was extremely simple. I would go in the forest, hide in the bushes, and imitate the call of the bird. Usually I would get several answers and in a short while a crow would flutter down into the shrubbery near me. After that all I needed to do was to throw a piece of cardboard to detract its attention, jump up and grab it before it could extricate itself from the undergrowth. In this way I would capture as many as I desired. But on one occasion something occurred which made me respect them. I had caught a fine pair of birds and was returning home with a friend. When we left the forest, thousands of crows had gathered making a frightful racket. In a few minutes they rose in pursuit and soon enveloped us. The fun lasted until all of a sudden I received a blow on the back of my head which knocked me down. Then they attacked me viciously. I was compelled to release the two birds and was glad to join my friend who had taken refuge in a cave.

In the schoolroom there were a few mechanical models which interested me and turned my attention to water turbines. I constructed many of these and found great pleasure in operating them. How extraordinary was my life an incident may illustrate. My uncle had no use for this kind of pastime and more than once rebuked me. I was fascinated by a description of Niagara Falls I had perused, and pictured in my imagination a big wheel run by the Falls. I told my uncle that I would go to America and carry out this scheme. Thirty years later I was my ideas carried out at Niagara and marveled at the unfathomable mystery of the mind.

I made all kinds of other contrivances and contraptions but among those the arbalests I produced were the best. My arrows, when short, disappeared from sight and at close range traversed a plank of pine one inch thick. Thru the continuous tightening of the bows I developed a skin on my stomach much like that of a crocodile and I am often wondering whether it is due to this exercise that I am able even now to digest cobble-stones! Nor can I pass in silence my performances with the sling which would have enabled me to give a stunning exhibit at the Hippodrome. And now I will tell of one of my feats with this antique implement of war which will strain to the utmost the credulity of the reader. I was practicing while walking with my uncle along the river. The sun was setting, the trout were playful and from time to time one would shoot up into the air, its glistening body sharply defined against a projecting rock beyond. Of course any boy might have hit a fish under these propitious conditions but I undertook a much more difficult task and I foretold to my uncle, to the minutest detail, what I intended doing. I was to hurl a stone to meet the fish, press its body against the rock, and cut it in two. It was no sooner said than done. My uncle looked at me almost scared out of his wits and exclaimed “𝑽𝒂𝒅𝒆 𝒓𝒆𝒕𝒓𝒐 𝑺𝒂𝒕𝒂𝒏𝒂𝒔!!” and it was a few days before he spoke to me again. Other records, however great, will be eclipsed but I feel that I could peacefully rest on my laurels for a thousand years.

(𝑰𝒏 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝑨𝒑𝒓𝒊𝒍 𝒊𝒔𝒔𝒖𝒆 𝑴𝒓. 𝑻𝒆𝒔𝒍𝒂 𝒘𝒊𝒍𝒍 𝒅𝒆𝒔𝒄𝒓𝒊𝒃𝒆 𝒊𝒏 𝒅𝒆𝒕𝒂𝒊𝒍 𝒉𝒐𝒘 𝒉𝒆 𝒄𝒐𝒏𝒄𝒆𝒊𝒗𝒆𝒅 𝒐𝒏𝒆 𝒐𝒇 𝒉𝒊𝒔 𝒎𝒐𝒔𝒕 𝒊𝒎𝒑𝒐𝒓𝒕𝒂𝒏𝒕 𝒂𝒏𝒅 𝒇𝒂𝒓 𝒓𝒆𝒂𝒄𝒉𝒊𝒏𝒈 𝒊𝒏𝒗𝒆𝒏𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏𝒔: “𝑻𝒉𝒆 𝑹𝒐𝒕𝒂𝒓𝒚 𝑴𝒂𝒈𝒏𝒆𝒕𝒊𝒄 𝑭𝒊𝒆𝒍𝒅.” — 𝑬𝒅𝒊𝒕𝒐𝒓.)


stylize font= x
insrt figrs tmplt= 2x+c
photocopy of original here=

__________________







__________________


*MY INVENTIONS III
MY INVENTIONS III - MY LATER ENDEAVORS
————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Experimenter
April, 1919 Page number(s): 864-865, 905, 907-909

𝗧𝗵𝗲 𝗗𝗶𝘀𝗰𝗼𝘃𝗲𝗿𝘆 𝗼𝗳 𝘁𝗵𝗲 𝗥𝗼𝘁𝗮𝘁𝗶𝗻𝗴 𝗠𝗮𝗴𝗻𝗲𝘁𝗶𝗰 𝗙𝗶𝗲𝗹𝗱

At the age of ten I entered the Real Gymnasium which was a new and fairly well equipt institution. In the department of physics were various models of classical scientific apparatus, electrical and mechanical. The demonstrations and experiments performed from time to time by the instructors fascinated me and were undoubtedly a powerful incentive to invention. I was also passionately fond of mathematical studies and often won the professor’s praise for rapid calculation. This was due to my acquired facility of visualizing the figures and performing the operations, not in the usual intuitive manner, but as in actual life. Up to a certain degree of complexity it was absolutely the same to me whether I wrote the symbols on the board or conjured them before my mental vision. But freehand drawing, to which many hours of the course were devoted, was an annoyance I could not endure. This was rather remarkable as most of the members of the family excelled in it. Perhaps my aversion was simply due to the predilection I found in undisturbed thought. Had it not been for a few exceptionally stupid boys, who could not do anything at all, my record would have been the worst. It was a serious handicap as under the then existing educational regime, drawing being obligatory, this deficiency threatened to spoil my whole career and my father had considerable trouble in railroading me from one class to another.

In the second year at that institution I became obsest with the idea of producing continuous motion thru steady air pressure. The pump incident, of which I have told, had set afire my youthful imagination and imprest me with the boundless possibilities of a vacuum. I grew frantic in my desire to harness this inexhaustible energy but for a long time I was groping in the dark. Finally, however, my endeavors crystallized in an invention which was to enable me to achieve what no other mortal ever attempted. Imagine a cylinder freely rotatable on two bearings and partly surrounded by a rectangular trough which fits it perfectly. The open side of the trough is closed by a partition so that the cylindrical segment within the enclosure divides the latter into two compartments entirely separated from each other by air-tight sliding joints. One of these compartments being sealed and once for all exhausted, the other remaining open, a perpetual rotation of the cylinder would result, at least, I thought so. A wooden model was constructed and fitted with infinite care and when I applied the pump on one side and actually observed that there was a tendency to turning, I was delirious with joy. Mechanical flight was the one thing I wanted to accomplish altho still under the discouraging recollection of a bad fall I sustained by jumping with an umbrella from the top of a building. Every day I used to transport myself thru the air to distant regions but could not understand just how I managed to do it. Now I had something concrete — a flying machine with nothing more than a rotating shaft, flapping wings, and — a vacuum of unlimited power! From that time on I made my daily aërial excursions in a vehicle of comfort and luxury as might have befitted King Solomon. It took years before I understood that the atmospheric pressure acted at right angles to the surface of the cylinder and that the slight rotary effort I observed was due to a leak. Tho this knowledge came gradually it gave me a painful shock.


𝙏𝙝𝙞𝙨 𝙞𝙣𝙨𝙩𝙖𝙡𝙡𝙢𝙚𝙣𝙩, 𝙣𝙤 𝙙𝙤𝙪𝙗𝙩 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙢𝙤𝙨𝙩 𝙞𝙣𝙩𝙚𝙧𝙚𝙨𝙩𝙞𝙣𝙜 𝙤𝙛 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙩𝙝𝙧𝙚𝙚 𝙥𝙪𝙗𝙡𝙞𝙨𝙝𝙚𝙙 𝙨𝙤 𝙛𝙖𝙧, 𝙧𝙚𝙫𝙚𝙖𝙡𝙨 𝙢𝙖𝙣𝙮 𝙚𝙭𝙩𝙧𝙖𝙤𝙧𝙙𝙞𝙣𝙖𝙧𝙮 𝙤𝙘𝙘𝙪𝙧𝙧𝙚𝙣𝙘𝙚𝙨 𝙖𝙣𝙙 𝙚𝙭𝙥𝙚𝙧𝙞𝙚𝙣𝙘𝙚𝙨 𝙞𝙣 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙬𝙤𝙧𝙡𝙙’𝙨 𝙜𝙧𝙚𝙖𝙩𝙚𝙨𝙩 𝙞𝙣𝙫𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙤𝙧’𝙨 𝙡𝙞𝙛𝙚 – 𝙚𝙭𝙥𝙚𝙧𝙞𝙚𝙣𝙘𝙚𝙨 𝙨𝙪𝙘𝙝 𝙖𝙨 𝙙𝙤 𝙣𝙤𝙩 𝙛𝙖𝙡𝙡 𝙩𝙤 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙡𝙤𝙩 𝙤𝙛 𝙤𝙧𝙙𝙞𝙣𝙖𝙧𝙮 𝙢𝙤𝙧𝙩𝙖𝙡𝙨. 𝘼𝙣𝙙 𝙏𝙚𝙨𝙡𝙖, 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙢𝙖𝙣𝙮 𝙨𝙞𝙙𝙚𝙙, 𝙖𝙨𝙞𝙙𝙚 𝙤𝙛 𝙞𝙣𝙫𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙞𝙣𝙜, 𝙠𝙣𝙤𝙬𝙨 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙧𝙖𝙧𝙚 𝙖𝙧𝙩 𝙤𝙛 𝙥𝙖𝙞𝙣𝙩𝙞𝙣𝙜 𝙬𝙤𝙧𝙙-𝙥𝙞𝙘𝙩𝙪𝙧𝙚𝙨. 𝙃𝙚 𝙙𝙤𝙚𝙨 𝙨𝙤 𝙝𝙚𝙧𝙚 𝙞𝙣 𝙖 𝙢𝙖𝙨𝙩𝙚𝙧𝙡𝙮 𝙛𝙖𝙨𝙝𝙞𝙤𝙣. 𝙃𝙚 𝙩𝙚𝙡𝙡𝙨 𝙪𝙨 𝙝𝙤𝙬 𝙝𝙚 𝙛𝙞𝙣𝙖𝙡𝙡𝙮 𝙘𝙤𝙣𝙘𝙚𝙞𝙫𝙚𝙙 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙞𝙣𝙙𝙪𝙘𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣 𝙢𝙤𝙩𝙤𝙧 – 𝙥𝙚𝙧𝙝𝙖𝙥𝙨 𝙝𝙞𝙨 𝙜𝙧𝙚𝙖𝙩𝙚𝙨𝙩 𝙙𝙞𝙨𝙘𝙤𝙫𝙚𝙧𝙮 – 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙞𝙣𝙫𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣 𝙬𝙝𝙞𝙘𝙝 𝙘𝙝𝙖𝙣𝙜𝙚𝙙 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙛𝙖𝙘𝙚 𝙤𝙛 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙜𝙡𝙤𝙗𝙚, 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙞𝙣𝙫𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣 𝙬𝙝𝙞𝙘𝙝 𝙢𝙖𝙙𝙚 𝙥𝙤𝙨𝙨𝙞𝙗𝙡𝙚 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙨𝙩𝙧𝙚𝙚𝙩 𝙘𝙖𝙧, 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙨𝙪𝙗𝙬𝙖𝙮, 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙚𝙡𝙚𝙘𝙩𝙧𝙞𝙘 𝙩𝙧𝙖𝙞𝙣, 𝙥𝙤𝙬𝙚𝙧 𝙩𝙧𝙖𝙣𝙨𝙢𝙞𝙨𝙨𝙞𝙤𝙣, 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙝𝙖𝙧𝙣𝙚𝙨𝙨𝙞𝙣𝙜 𝙤𝙛 𝙬𝙖𝙩𝙚𝙧 𝙛𝙖𝙡𝙡𝙨 𝙖𝙣𝙙 𝙘𝙤𝙪𝙣𝙩𝙡𝙚𝙨𝙨 𝙤𝙩𝙝𝙚𝙧𝙨. 𝘽𝙪𝙩 𝙡𝙚𝙩 𝙏𝙚𝙨𝙡𝙖 𝙩𝙚𝙡𝙡 𝙮𝙤𝙪 𝙝𝙞𝙢𝙨𝙚𝙡𝙛 𝙝𝙤𝙬 𝙞𝙩 𝙖𝙡𝙡 𝙘𝙖𝙢𝙚 𝙖𝙗𝙤𝙪𝙩. 𝙄𝙩 𝙞𝙨 𝙖 𝙘𝙡𝙖𝙨𝙨𝙞𝙘 𝙬𝙤𝙧𝙩𝙝 𝙧𝙚𝙖𝙙𝙞𝙣𝙜.

𝙀𝘿𝙄𝙏𝙊𝙍.


I had hardly completed my course at the Real Gymnasium when I was prostrated with a dangerous illness or rather, a score of them, and my condition became so desperate that I was given up by physicians. During this period I was permitted to read constantly, obtaining books from the Public Library which had been neglected and entrusted to me for classification of the works and preparation of the catalogues. One day I was handed a few volumes of new literature unlike anything I had ever read before and so captivating as to make me utterly forget my hopeless state. They were the earlier works of Mark Twain and to them might have been due the miraculous recovery which followed. Twenty-five years later, when I met Mr. Clemens and we formed a friendship between us, I told him of the experience and was amazed to see that great man of laughter burst into tears.

My studies were continued at the higher Real Gymnasium in Carlstadt, Croatia, where one of my aunts resided. She was a distinguished lady, the wife of a Colonel who was an old war-horse having participated in many battles. I never can forget the three years I past at their home. No fortress in time of war was under a more rigid discipline. I was fed like a canary bird. All the meals were of the highest quality and deliciously prepared but short in quantity by a thousand percent. The slices of ham cut by my aunt were like tissue paper. When the Colonel would put something substantial on my plate she would snatch it away and say excitedly to him: “Be careful, Niko is very delicate.” I had a voracious appetite and suffered like Tantalus. But I lived in an atmosphere of refinement and artistic taste quite unusual for those times and conditions. The land was low and marshy and malaria fever never left me while there despite of the enormous amounts of quinin I consumed. Occasionally the river would rise and drive an army of rats into the buildings, devouring everything even to the bundles of the fierce paprika. These pests were to me a welcome diversion. I thinned their ranks by all sorts of means, which won me the unenviable distinction of rat-catcher in the community. At last, however, my course was completed, the misery ended, and I obtained the certificate of maturity which brought me to the cross-roads.


𝐖𝐇𝐀𝐓 𝐈𝐒 𝐓𝐇𝐄 𝐈𝐍𝐃𝐔𝐂𝐓𝐈𝐎𝐍 𝐌𝐎𝐓𝐎𝐑?
𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐢𝐧𝐝𝐮𝐜𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐦𝐨𝐭𝐨𝐫 𝐨𝐩𝐞𝐫𝐚𝐭𝐞𝐬 𝐨𝐧 𝐚𝐥𝐭𝐞𝐫𝐧𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐜𝐮𝐫𝐫𝐞𝐧𝐭. 𝐈𝐭 𝐡𝐚𝐬 𝐧𝐨 𝐜𝐨𝐦𝐦𝐮𝐭𝐚𝐭𝐨𝐫 𝐥𝐢𝐤𝐞 𝐚 𝐝𝐢𝐫𝐞𝐜𝐭 𝐜𝐮𝐫𝐫𝐞𝐧𝐭 𝐦𝐨𝐭𝐨𝐫, 𝐧𝐨𝐫 𝐬𝐥𝐢𝐩 𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠𝐬 𝐥𝐢𝐤𝐞 𝐚𝐧 𝐚𝐥𝐭𝐞𝐫𝐧𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐜𝐮𝐫𝐫𝐞𝐧𝐭 𝐦𝐨𝐭𝐨𝐫. 𝐂𝐨𝐧𝐭𝐫𝐚𝐫𝐲 𝐭𝐨 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐭𝐰𝐨 𝐭𝐲𝐩𝐞𝐬 𝐣𝐮𝐬𝐭 𝐜𝐢𝐭𝐞𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐞 “𝐟𝐢𝐞𝐥𝐝” 𝐜𝐮𝐫𝐫𝐞𝐧𝐭 𝐢𝐬 𝐧𝐨𝐭 𝐬𝐭𝐞𝐚𝐝𝐲, 𝐛𝐮𝐭 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐜𝐮𝐫𝐫𝐞𝐧𝐭 𝐢𝐭𝐬𝐞𝐥𝐟 𝐫𝐨𝐭𝐚𝐭𝐞𝐬 𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐬𝐭𝐚𝐧𝐭𝐥𝐲 𝐩𝐮𝐥𝐥𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐚𝐫𝐨𝐮𝐧𝐝 𝐰𝐢𝐭𝐡 𝐢𝐭 – 𝐛𝐲 𝐢𝐧𝐝𝐮𝐜𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 – 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐨𝐧𝐥𝐲 𝐦𝐨𝐯𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐩𝐚𝐫𝐭 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐦𝐨𝐭𝐨𝐫 – 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐫𝐨𝐭𝐨𝐫 – 𝐨𝐫 𝐚𝐫𝐦𝐚𝐭𝐮𝐫𝐞. 𝐇𝐚𝐯𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐧𝐨 𝐚𝐫𝐦𝐚𝐭𝐮𝐫𝐞 𝐧𝐨𝐫 𝐬𝐥𝐢𝐩 𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠𝐬, 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐢𝐧𝐝𝐮𝐜𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐦𝐨𝐭𝐨𝐫 𝐧𝐞𝐯𝐞𝐫 𝐬𝐩𝐚𝐫𝐤𝐬. 𝐈𝐭 𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐬𝐞𝐪𝐮𝐞𝐧𝐭𝐥𝐲 𝐤𝐧𝐨𝐰𝐬 𝐧𝐨 “𝐛𝐫𝐮𝐬𝐡” 𝐭𝐫𝐨𝐮𝐛𝐥𝐞. 𝐈𝐭 𝐧𝐞𝐞𝐝𝐬 𝐧𝐨 𝐚𝐭𝐭𝐞𝐧𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐛𝐞𝐜𝐚𝐮𝐬𝐞 𝐨𝐟 𝐢𝐭𝐬 𝐫𝐮𝐠𝐠𝐞𝐝𝐧𝐞𝐬𝐬. 𝐎𝐧𝐥𝐲 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐛𝐞𝐚𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠𝐬 𝐰𝐞𝐚𝐫 𝐨𝐮𝐭. 𝐈𝐭𝐬 𝐞𝐟𝐟𝐢𝐜𝐢𝐞𝐧𝐜𝐲 𝐭𝐨𝐨 𝐢𝐬 𝐡𝐢𝐠𝐡𝐞𝐫. 𝐎𝐧 𝐚𝐜𝐜𝐨𝐮𝐧𝐭 𝐨𝐟 𝐚𝐥𝐥 𝐭𝐡𝐢𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐢𝐧𝐝𝐮𝐜𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐦𝐨𝐭𝐨𝐫 𝐢𝐬 𝐮𝐬𝐞𝐝 𝐢𝐧 𝐚 𝐩𝐫𝐞𝐩𝐨𝐧𝐝𝐞𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐩𝐫𝐨𝐩𝐨𝐫𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐢𝐧 𝐬𝐭𝐫𝐞𝐞𝐭 𝐜𝐚𝐫𝐬, 𝐞𝐥𝐞𝐜𝐭𝐫𝐢𝐜 𝐭𝐫𝐚𝐢𝐧𝐬, 𝐟𝐚𝐜𝐭𝐨𝐫𝐢𝐞𝐬. 𝐞𝐭𝐜.


During all those years my parents never wavered in their resolve to make me embrace the clergy, the mere thought of which filled me with dread. I had become intensely interested in electricity under the stimulating influence of my Professor of Physics, who was an ingenious man and often demonstrated the principles by apparatus of his own invention. Among these I recall a device in the shape of a freely rotatable bulb, with tinfoil coatings, which was made to spin rapidly when connected to a static machine. It is impossible for me to convey an adequate idea of the intensity of feeling I experienced in witnessing his exhibitions of these mysterious phenomena. Every impression produced a thousand echoes in my mind. I wanted to know more of this wonderful force; I longed for experiment and investigation and resigned myself to the inevitable with aching heart.

Just as I was making ready for the long journey home I received word that my father wished me to go on a shooting expedition. It was a strange request as he had been always strenuously opposed to this kind of sport. But a few days later I learned that the cholera was raging in that district and, taking advantage of an opportunity, I returned to Gospic in disregard of my parents’ wishes. It is incredible how absolutely ignorant people were as to the causes of this scourge which visited the country in intervals of from fifteen to twenty years. They thought that the deadly agents were transmitted thru the air and filled it with pungent odors and smoke. In the meantime they drank the infected water and died in heaps. I contracted the awful disease on the very day of my arrival and altho surviving the crisis, I was confined to bed for nine months with scarcely any ability to move. My energy was completely exhausted and for the second time I found myself at death’s door. In one of the sinking spells which was thought to be the last, my father rushed into the room. I still see his pallid face as he tried to cheer me in tones belying his assurance. “Perhaps,” I said, “I may get well if you will let me study engineering.” “You will go to the best technical institution in the world,” he solemnly replied, and I knew that he meant it. A heavy weight was lifted from my mind but the relief would have come too late had it not been for a marvelous cure brought about thru a bitter decoction of a peculiar bean. I came to life like another Lazarus to the utter amazement of everybody. My father insisted that I spend a year in healthful physical outdoor exercises to which I reluctantly consented. For most of this term I roamed in the mountains, loaded with a hunter’s outfit and a bundle of books, and this contact with nature made me stronger in body as well as in mind. I thought and planned, and conceived many ideas almost as a rule delusive. The vision was clear enough but the knowledge of principles was very limited. In one of my inventions I proposed to convey letters and packages across the seas, thru a submarine tube, in spherical containers of sufficient strength to resist the hydraulic pressure. The pumping plant, intended to force the water thru the tube, was accurately figured and designed and all other particulars carefully worked out. Only one trifling detail, of no consequence, was lightly dismist. I assumed an arbitrary velocity of the water and, what is more, took pleasure in making it high, thus arriving at a stupendous performance supported by faultless calculations. Subsequent reflections, however, on the resistance of pipes to fluid flow determined me to make this invention public property.

Another one of my projects was to construct a ring around the equator which would, of course, float freely and could be arrested in its spinning motion by reactionary forces, thus enabling travel at a rate of about one thousand miles an hour, impracticable by rail. The reader will smile. The plan was difficult of execution, I will admit, but not nearly so bad as that of a well-known New York professor, who wanted to pump the air from the torrid to the temperate zones, entirely forgetful of the fact that the Lord had provided a gigantic machine for this very purpose.

Still another scheme, far more important and attractive, was to derive power from the rotational energy of terrestrial bodies. I had discovered that objects on the earth’s surface, owing to the diurnal rotation of the globe, are carried by the same alternately in and against the direction of translatory movement. From this results a great change in momentum which could be utilized in the simplest imaginable manner to furnish motive effort in any habitable region of the world. I cannot find words to describe my disappointment when later I realized that I was in the predicament of Archimedes, who vainly sought for a fixt point in the universe.

At the termination of my vacation I was sent to the Polytechnic School in Gratz, Styria, which my father had chosen as one of the oldest and best reputed institutions. That was the moment I had eagerly awaited and I began my studies under good auspices and firmly resolved to succeed. My previous training was above the average, due to my father’s teaching and opportunities afforded. I had acquired the knowledge of a number of languages and waded thru the books of several libraries, picking up information more or less useful. Then again, for the first time, I could choose my subjects as I liked, and free-hand drawing was to bother me no more. I had made up my mind to give my parents a surprise, and during the whole first year I regularly started my work at three o’clock in the morning and continued until eleven at night, no Sundays or holidays excepted. As most of my fellow-students took things easily, naturally enough I eclipsed all records. In the course of that year I past thru nine exams and the professors thought I deserved more than the highest qualifications. Armed with their flattering certificates, I went home for a short rest, expecting a triumph, and was mortified when my father made light of these hard won honors. That almost killed my ambition; but later, after he had died, I was pained to find a package of letters which the professors had written him to the effect that unless he took me away from the Institution I would be killed thru overwork. Thereafter I devoted myself chiefly to physics, mechanics and mathematical studies, spending the hours of leisure in the libraries. I had a veritable mania for finishing whatever I began, which often got me into difficulties. On one occasion I started to read the works of Voltaire when I learned, to my dismay, that there were close on one hundred large volumes in small print which that monster had written while drinking seventy-two cups of black coffee per diem. It had to be done, but when I laid aside the last book I was very glad, and said, “Never more!”

My first year’s showing had won me the appreciation and friendship of several professors. Among these were Prof. Rogner, who was teaching arithmetical subjects and geometry; Prof. Poeschl, who held the chair of theoretical and experimental physics, and Dr. Allé, who taught integral calculus and specialized in differential equations. This scientist was the most brilliant lecturer to whom I ever listened. He took a special interest in my progress and would frequently remain for an hour or two in the lecture room, giving me problems to solve, in which I delighted. To him I explained a flying machine I had conceived, not an illusionary invention, but one based on sound, scientific principles, which has become realizable thru my turbine and will soon be given to the world. Both Professors Rogner and Poeschl were curious men. The former had peculiar ways of expressing himself and whenever he did so there was a riot, followed by a long and embarrassing pause. Prof. Poeschl was a methodical and thoroly grounded German. He had enormous feet and hands like the paws of a bear, but all of his experiments were skillfully performed with clock-like precision and without a miss.

It was in the second year of my studies that we received a Gramme dynamo from Paris, having the horseshoe form of a laminated field magnet, and a wire-wound armature with a commutator. It was connected up and various effects of the currents were shown. While Prof. Poeschl was making demonstrations, running the machine as a motor, the brushes gave trouble, sparking badly, and I observed that it might be possible to operate a motor without these appliances. But he declared that it could not be done and did me the honor of delivering a lecture on the subject, at the conclusion of which he remarked: “Mr. Tesla may accomplish great things, but he certainly never will do this. It would be equivalent to converting a steadily pulling force, like that of gravity, into a rotary effort. It is a perpetual motion scheme, an impossible idea.” But instinct is something which transcends knowledge. We have, undoubtedly, certain finer fibers that enable us to perceive truths when logical deduction, or any other willful effort of the brain, is futile. For a time I wavered, imprest by the professor’s authority, but soon became convinced I was right and undertook the task with all the fire and boundless confidence of youth.

I started by first picturing in my mind a direct-current machine, running it and following the changing flow of the currents in the armature. Then I would imagine an alternator and investigate the processes taking place in a similar manner. Next I would visualize systems comprising motors and generators and operate them in various ways. The images I saw were to me perfectly real and tangible. All my remaining term in Gratz was passed in intense but fruitless efforts of this kind, and I almost came to the conclusion that the problem was insolvable. In 1880 I went to Prague, Bohemia, carrying out my father’s wish to complete my education at the University there. It was in that city that I made a decided advance, which consisted in detaching the commutator from the machine and studying the phenomena in this new aspect, but still without result. In the year following there was a sudden change in my views of life. I realized that my parents had been making too great sacrifices on my account and resolved to relieve them of the burden. The wave of the American telephone had just reached the European continent and the system was to be installed in Budapest, Hungary. It appeared an ideal opportunity, all the more as a friend of our family was at the head of the enterprise. It was here that I suffered the complete breakdown of the nerves to which I have referred. What I experienced during the period of that illness surpasses all belief. My sight and hearing were always extraordinary. I could clearly discern objects in the distance when others saw no trace of them. Several times in my boyhood I saved the houses of our neighbors from fire by hearing the faint crackling sounds which did not disturb their sleep, and calling for help.

In 1899, when I was past forty and carrying on my experiments in Colorado, I could hear very distinctly thunderclaps at a distance of 550 miles. The limit of audition for my young assistants was scarcely more than 150 miles. My ear was thus over thirteen times more sensitive. Yet at that time I was, so to speak, stone deaf in comparison with the acuteness of my hearing while under the nervous strain. In Budapest I could hear the ticking of a watch with three rooms between me and the time-piece. A fly alighting on a table in the room would cause a dull thud in my ear. A carriage passing at a distance of a few miles fairly shook my whole body. The whistle of a locomotive twenty or thirty miles away made the bench or chair on which I sat vibrate so strongly that the pain was unbearable. The ground under my feet trembled continuously. I had to support my bed on rubber cushions to get any rest at all. The roaring noises from near and far often produced the effect of spoken words which would have frightened me had I not been able to resolve them into their accidental components. The sun’s rays, when periodically intercepted, would cause blows of such force on my brain that they would stun me. I had to summon all my will power to pass under a bridge or other structure as I experienced a crushing pressure on the skull. In the dark I had the sense of a bat and could detect the presence of an object at a distance of twelve feet by a peculiar creepy sensation on the forehead. My pulse varied from a few to two hundred and sixty beats and all the tissues of the body quivered with twitchings and tremors which was perhaps the hardest to bear. A renowned physician who gave me daily large doses of Bromide of Potassium pronounced my malady unique and incurable. It is my eternal regret that I was not under the observation of experts in physiology and psychology at that time. I clung desperately to life, but never expected to recover. Can anyone believe that so hopeless a physical wreck could ever be transformed into a man of astonishing strength and tenacity, able to work thirty-eight years almost without a day’s interruption, and find himself still strong and fresh in body and mind? Such is my case. A powerful desire to live and to continue the work, and the assistance of a devoted friend and athlete accomplished the wonder. My health returned and with it the vigor of mind. In attacking the problem again I almost regretted that the struggle was soon to end. I had so much energy to spare. When I undertook the task it was not with a resolve such as men often make. With me it was a sacred vow, a question of life and death. I knew that I would perish if I failed. Now I felt that the battle was won. Back in the deep recesses of the brain was the solution, but I could not yet give it outward expression. One afternoon, which is ever present in my recollection, I was enjoying a walk with my friend in the City Park and reciting poetry. At that age I knew entire books by heart, word for word. One of these was Göethe’s “Faust.” The sun was just setting and reminded me of the glorious passage:

“𝑺𝒊𝒆 𝒓ü𝒄𝒌𝒕 𝒖𝒏𝒅 𝒘𝒆𝒊𝒄𝒉𝒕, 𝒅𝒆𝒓 𝑻𝒂𝒈 𝒊𝒔𝒕 ü𝒃𝒆𝒓𝒍𝒆𝒃𝒕, 𝑫𝒐𝒓𝒕 𝒆𝒊𝒍𝒕 𝒔𝒊𝒆 𝒉𝒊𝒏 𝒖𝒏𝒅 𝒇ö𝒓𝒅𝒆𝒓𝒕 𝒏𝒆𝒖𝒆𝒔 𝑳𝒆𝒃𝒆𝒏. 𝑶𝒉, 𝒅𝒂𝒔𝒔 𝒌𝒆𝒊𝒏 𝑭𝒍ü𝒈𝒆𝒍 𝒎𝒊𝒄𝒉 𝒗𝒐𝒎 𝑩𝒐𝒅𝒆𝒏 𝒉𝒆𝒃𝒕 𝑰𝒉𝒓 𝒏𝒂𝒄𝒉 𝒖𝒏𝒅 𝒊𝒎𝒎𝒆𝒓 𝒏𝒂𝒄𝒉 𝒛𝒖 𝒔𝒕𝒓𝒆𝒃𝒆𝒏!*

𝑬𝒊𝒏 𝒔𝒄𝒉ö𝒏𝒆𝒓 𝑻𝒓𝒂𝒖𝒎 𝒊𝒏𝒅𝒆𝒔𝒔𝒆𝒏 𝒔𝒊𝒆 𝒆𝒏𝒕𝒘𝒆𝒊𝒄𝒉𝒕, 𝑨𝒄𝒉, 𝒛𝒖 𝒅𝒆𝒔 𝑮𝒆𝒊𝒔𝒕𝒆𝒔 𝑭𝒍ü𝒈𝒆𝒍𝒏 𝒘𝒊𝒓𝒅 𝒔𝒐 𝒍𝒆𝒊𝒄𝒉𝒕 𝑲𝒆𝒊𝒏 𝒌ö𝒓𝒑𝒆𝒓𝒍𝒊𝒄𝒉𝒆𝒓 𝑭𝒍ü𝒈𝒆𝒍 𝒔𝒊𝒄𝒉 𝒈𝒆𝒔𝒆𝒍𝒍𝒆𝒏!”†

As I uttered these inspiring words the idea came like a flash of lightning and in an instant the truth was revealed. I drew with a stick on the sand the diagrams shown six years later in my address before the American Institute of Electrical Engineers, and my companion understood them perfectly. The images I saw were wonderfully sharp and clear and had the solidity of metal and stone, so much so that I told him: “See my motor here; watch me reverse it.” I cannot begin to describe my emotions. Pygmalion seeing his statue come to life could not have been more deeply moved. A thousand secrets of nature which I might have stumbled upon accidentally I would have given for that one which I had wrested from her against all odds and at the peril of my existence.

* “The glow retreats, done is the day of toil; It yonder hastes, new fields of life exploring; Ah, that no wing can lift me from the soil Upon its track to follow, follow soaring!”

† “A glorious dream! though now the glories fade. Alas! the wings that lift the mind no aid Of wings to lift the body can bequeath me.”


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


*MY INVENTIONS IIII
MY INVENTIONS IV - THE DISCOVERY OF THE TESLA COIL AND TRANSFORMER
————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Experimenter
May, 1919 Page number(s): 16-17, 64-65, 89


For a while I gave myself up entirely to the intense enjoyment of picturing machines and devising new forms. It was a mental state of happiness about as complete as I have ever known in life. Ideas came in an uninterrupted stream and the only difficulty I had was to hold them fast. The pieces of apparatus I conceived were to me absolutely real and tangible in every detail, even to the minute marks and signs of wear. I delighted in imagining the motors constantly running, for in this way they presented to mind's eye a more fascinating sight. When natural inclination develops into a passionate desire, one advances towards his goal in seven-league boots. In less than two months I evolved virtually all the types of motors and modifications of the system which are now identified with my name. It was, perhaps, providential that the necessities of existence commanded a temporary halt to this consuming activity of the mind. I came to Budapest prompted by a premature report concerning the telephone enterprise and, as irony of fate willed it, I had to accept a position as draftsman in the Central Telegraph Office of the Hungarian Government at a salary which I deem it my privilege not to disclose! Fortunately, I soon won the interest of the Inspector-in-Chief and was thereafter employed on calculations, designs and estimates in connection with new installations, until the Telephone Exchange was started, when I took charge of the same. The knowledge and practical experience I gained in the course of this work was most valuable and the employment gave me ample opportunities for the exercise of my inventive faculties. I made several improvements in the Central Station apparatus and perfected a telephone repeater or amplifier which was never patented or publicly described but would be creditable to me even today. In recognition of my efficient assistance the organizer of the undertaking, Mr. Puskas, upon disposing of his business in Budapest, offered me a position in Paris which I gladly accepted.

I never can forget the deep impression that magic city produced on my mind. For several days after my arrival I roamed thru the streets in utter bewilderment of the new spectacle. The attractions were many and irresistible, but, alas, the income was spent as soon as received. When Mr. Puskas asked me how I was getting along in the new sphere, I described the situation accurately in the statement that "the last twenty-nine days of the month are the toughest!" I led a rather strenuous life in what would now be termed "Rooseveltian fashion." Every morning, regardless of weather, I would go from the Boulevard St. Marcel, where I resided, to a bathing house on the Seine, plunge into the water, loop the circuit twenty-seven times and then walk an hour to reach Ivry, where the Company's factory was located. There I would have a woodchopper's breakfast at half-past seven o'clock and then eagerly await the lunch hour, in the meanwhile cracking hard nuts for the Manager of the Works, Mr. Charles Batchellor, who was an intimate friend and assistant of Edison. Here I was thrown in contact with a few Americans who fairly fell in love with me because of my proficiency in billiards. To these men I explained my invention and one of them, Mr. D. Cunningham, Foreman of the Mechanical Department, offered to form a stock company. The proposal seemed to me comical in the extreme. I did not have the faintest conception of what that meant except that it was an American way of doing things. Nothing came of it, however, and during the next few months I had to travel from one to another place in France and Germany to cure the ills of the power plants. On my return to Paris I submitted to one of the administrators of the Company, Mr. Rau, a plan for improving their dynamos and was given an opportunity. My success was complete and the delighted directors accorded me the privilege of developing automatic regulators which were much desired. Shortly after there was some trouble with the lighting plant which had been installed at the new railroad station in Strassburg, Alsace. The wiring was defective and on the occasion of the opening ceremonies a large part of a wall was blown out thru a short-circuit right in the presence of old Emperor William I. The German Government refused to take the plant and the French Company was facing a serious loss. On account of my knowledge of the German language and past experience, I was entrusted with the difficult task of straightening out matters and early in 1883 I went to Strassburg on that mission.

𝗧𝗵𝗲 𝗙𝗶𝗿𝘀𝘁 𝗜𝗻𝗱𝘂𝗰𝘁𝗶𝗼𝗻 𝗠𝗼𝘁𝗼𝗿 𝗜𝘀 𝗕𝘂𝗶𝗹𝘁.
Some of the incidents in that city have left an indelible record on my memory. By a curious coincidence, a number of men who subsequently achieved fame, lived there about that time. In later life I used to say, "There were bacteria of greatness in that old town. Others caught the disease but I escaped!" The practical work, correspondence, and conferences with officials kept me preoccupied day and night, but, as soon as I was able to manage I undertook the construction of a simple motor in a mechanical shop opposite the railroad station, having brought with me from Paris some material for that purpose. The consummation of the experiment was, however, delayed until the summer of that year when I finally had the satisfaction of 𝙨𝙚𝙚𝙞𝙣𝙜 𝙧𝙤𝙩𝙖𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣 𝙚𝙛𝙛𝙚𝙘𝙩𝙚𝙙 𝙗𝙮 𝙖𝙡𝙩𝙚𝙧𝙣𝙖𝙩𝙞𝙣𝙜 𝙘𝙪𝙧𝙧𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙨 𝙤𝙛 𝙙𝙞𝙛𝙛𝙚𝙧𝙚𝙣𝙩 𝙥𝙝𝙖𝙨𝙚, 𝙖𝙣𝙙 𝙬𝙞𝙩𝙝𝙤𝙪𝙩 𝙨𝙡𝙞𝙙𝙞𝙣𝙜 𝙘𝙤𝙣𝙩𝙖𝙘𝙩𝙨 𝙤𝙧 𝙘𝙤𝙢𝙢𝙪𝙩𝙖𝙩𝙤𝙧, as I had conceived a year before. It was an exquisite pleasure but not to compare with the delirium of joy following the first revelation.

Among my new friends was the former Mayor of the city, Mr. Bauzin, whom I had already in a measure acquainted with this and other inventions of mine and whose support I endeavored to enlist. He was sincerely devoted to me and put my project before several wealthy persons but, to my mortification, found no response. He wanted to help me in every possible way and the approach of the first of July, 1919, happens to remind me of a form of "assistance" I received from that charming man, which was not financial but none the less appreciated. In 1870, when the Germans invaded the country, Mr. Bauzin had buried a good sized allotment of St. Estephe of 1801 and he came to the conclusion that he knew no worthier person than myself to consume that precious beverage. This, I may say, is one of the unforgettable incidents to which I have referred. My friend urged me to return to Paris as soon as possible and seek support there. This I was anxious to do but my work and negotiations were protracted owing to all sorts of petty obstacles I encountered so that at times the situation seemed hopeless.

ᵗʰᵉ ᵖʳᵒᵛᵉʳᵇⁱᵃˡ ᵗʳⁱᵃˡˢ ᵃⁿᵈ ᵗʳⁱᵇᵘˡᵃᵗⁱᵒⁿˢ ᵏⁿᵒʷⁿ ᵗᵒ ᵉᵛᵉʳʸ ⁱⁿᵛᵉⁿᵗᵒʳ ʷᵉʳᵉ ⁿᵒᵗ ˢᵖᵃʳᵉᵈ ᵗᵉˢˡᵃ, ᵗʰᵉ ʷᵒʳˡᵈ'ˢ ᵍʳᵉᵃᵗᵉˢᵗ ⁱⁿᵛᵉⁿᵗᵒʳ ᵒᶠ ᵃˡˡ ᵗⁱᵐᵉˢ. ⁱⁿ ᵗʰⁱˢ ᵃʳᵗⁱᶜˡᵉ ʷᵉ ˢᵉᵉ ʰⁱᵐ, ᵃʳʳⁱᵛᵉᵈ ᵃᵗ ʸᵒᵘⁿᵍ ᵐᵃⁿʰᵒᵒᵈ, ˢᵗʳᵘᵍᵍˡⁱⁿᵍ ᵃˡᵒⁿᵍ ⁱⁿ ᵃ ᶜᵒˡᵈ ʷᵒʳˡᵈ. ᵃˡʳᵉᵃᵈʸ ʰⁱˢ ᶠᵃᵐᵉ ʰᵃˢ ˢᵖʳᵉᵃᵈ ᶠᵃʳ ᵃⁿᵈ ʷⁱᵈᵉ ᵃⁿᵈ ʰⁱˢ ᵍᵉⁿⁱᵘˢ ⁱˢ ʳᵉᶜᵒᵍⁿⁱᶻᵉᵈ. ᵇᵘᵗ ᶜᵒⁿᵛᵉʳᵗⁱⁿᵍ ᵍᵉⁿⁱᵘˢ ᵃⁿᵈ ᶠᵃᵐᵉ ⁱⁿᵗᵒ ᵈᵒˡˡᵃʳˢ ᵃⁿᵈ ᶜᵉⁿᵗˢ ⁱˢ ᑫᵘⁱᵗᵉ ᵃ ᵈⁱᶠᶠᵉʳᵉⁿᵗ ᵐᵃᵗᵗᵉʳ, ᵃⁿᵈ ᵗʰᵉ ʷᵒʳˡᵈ ⁱˢ ᶠᵘˡˡ ᵒᶠ ᵘⁿᵃᵖᵖʳᵉᶜⁱᵃᵗⁱᵛᵉ ᵃⁿᵈ ᵘⁿˢᶜʳᵘᵖᵘˡᵒᵘˢ ᵐᵉⁿ. ᵗᵉˢˡᵃ, ᵗʰᵉ ⁱᵈᵉᵃˡⁱˢᵗ, ᶜᵃʳᵉᵈ ˡⁱᵗᵗˡᵉ ᶠᵒʳ ᵐᵒⁿᵉʸ ᵃⁿᵈ ᵗʰᵘˢ ʷᵃˢ ᵖʳᵒᵐᵖᵗˡʸ ᵗᵃᵏᵉⁿ ᵃᵈᵛᵃⁿᵗᵃᵍᵉ ᵒᶠ. ᵇᵘᵗ ˡᵉᵗ ᵗᵉˢˡᵃ ʰⁱᵐˢᵉˡᶠ ᵗᵉˡˡ ʸᵒᵘ ⁱⁿ ʰⁱˢ ᵒʷⁿ ⁱⁿⁱᵐⁱᵗᵃᵇˡᵉ ˢᵗʸˡᵉ. ⁱᵗ ⁱˢ ᵃ ʷᵒⁿᵈᵉʳᶠᵘˡ ˢᵗᵒʳʸ.

ⁱⁿ ᵗʰⁱˢ ᵐᵒⁿᵗʰ'ˢ ⁱⁿˢᵗᵃˡˡᵐᵉⁿᵗ ᵗᵉˢˡᵃ ᵃˡˢᵒ ᵗᵉˡˡˢ ᵘˢ ʰᵒʷ ʰᵉ ᵐᵃᵈᵉ ᵒⁿᵉ ᵒᶠ ʰⁱˢ ᵐᵒˢᵗ ⁱᵐᵖᵒʳᵗᵃⁿᵗ ᵃˢ ʷᵉˡˡ ᵃˢ ˢᵉⁿˢᵃᵗⁱᵒⁿᵃˡ ᵈⁱˢᶜᵒᵛᵉʳⁱᵉˢ⁻⁻ᵗʰᵉ ᵗᵉˢˡᵃ ᶜᵒⁱˡ. ᶠᵉʷ ⁱⁿᵛᵉⁿᵗⁱᵒⁿˢ ʰᵃᵛᵉ ᶜᵃᵘˢᵉᵈ ˢᵘᶜʰ ᵃ ˢᵉⁿˢᵃᵗⁱᵒⁿ ᵃˢ ᵗʰⁱˢ ᵒⁿᵉ ʷʰⁱᶜʰ ᶜᵘˡᵐⁱⁿᵃᵗᵉᵈ ⁱⁿ ᵗʰᵉ ᵒⁿˡʸ ᵐᵃⁿ⁻ᵐᵃᵈᵉ ˡⁱᵍʰᵗⁿⁱⁿᵍ ᵉᵛᵉʳ ᵖʳᵒᵈᵘᶜᵉᵈ. ᵗʰᵉ ᵗᵉˢˡᵃ ᶜᵒⁱˡ ʰᵃˢ ˢᵒ ᵐᵃⁿʸ ᵘˢᵉˢ ᵃⁿᵈ ʰᵃˢ ᵇᵉᵉⁿ ᵇᵘⁱˡᵗ ⁱⁿ ˢᵒ ᵐᵃⁿʸ ˢᵗʸˡᵉˢ ᵗʰᵃᵗ ⁱᵗ ʷᵒᵘˡᵈ ᵗᵃᵏᵉ ᵃ ᶜᵃᵗᵃˡᵒᵍ ᵗᵒ ˡⁱˢᵗ ᵗʰᵉᵐ ᵃˡˡ. ᶠʳᵒᵐ ᵗʰᵉ ˢᵖᵉᶜᵗᵃᶜᵘˡᵃʳ ʰⁱᵍʰ ᶠʳᵉᑫᵘᵉⁿᶜʸ ˢᵗᵘⁿᵗˢ ᵒⁿ ᵗʰᵉ ˢᵗᵃᵍᵉ ᵈᵒʷⁿ ᵗᵒ ᵗʰᵉ "ᵛⁱᵒˡᵉᵗ" ʳᵃʸ ᵐᵃᶜʰⁱⁿᵉ ⁱⁿ ʸᵒᵘʳ ʰᵒᵐᵉ﹔ ᵃˡˡ ᵃʳᵉ ᵗᵉˢˡᵃ ᶜᵒⁱˡˢ ⁱⁿ ᵒⁿᵉ ᶠᵒʳᵐ ᵒʳ ᵃⁿᵒᵗʰᵉʳ.

ʷⁱʳᵉˡᵉˢˢ ʷⁱᵗʰᵒᵘᵗ ᵗʰᵉ ᵗᵉˢˡᵃ ᶜᵒⁱˡ ʷᵒᵘˡᵈ ⁿᵒᵗ ᵇᵉ ᵖᵒˢˢⁱᵇˡᵉ ᵗᵒᵈᵃʸ. ʷⁱᵗʰᵒᵘᵗ ᵃⁿ ᵒˢᶜⁱˡˡᵃᵗⁱᵒⁿ ᵗʳᵃⁿˢᶠᵒʳᵐᵉʳ, ˢᵖᵃʳᵏ ᵍᵃᵖ ᵃⁿᵈ ᶜᵒⁿᵈᵉⁿˢᵉʳ⁻⁻ʷʰⁱᶜʰ ⁱˢ ᵃ ᵗᵉˢˡᵃ ᶜᵒⁱˡ⁻⁻ᵗʰᵉ ˢᵉⁿᵈⁱⁿᵍ ˢᵗᵃᵗⁱᵒⁿ ʷᵒᵘˡᵈ ᵇᵉ ᶜʳⁱᵖᵖˡᵉᵈ.

ᵇᵘᵗ ⁱᵗ ⁱˢ ᶠᵒʳ ⁱⁿᵈᵘˢᵗʳⁱᵃˡ ᵖᵘʳᵖᵒˢᵉˢ ʷʰᵉʳᵉ ᵗʰᵉ ᵗᵉˢˡᵃ ᶜᵒⁱˡ ʷⁱˡˡ ˢʰⁱⁿᵉ ᵇʳⁱᵍʰᵗᵉˢᵗ ⁱⁿ ᵗʰᵉ ᶠᵘᵗᵘʳᵉ. ᵗʰᵉ ᵖʳᵒᵈᵘᶜᵗⁱᵒⁿ ᵒᶠ ᵒᶻᵒⁿᵉ, ᵗʰᵉ ᵉˣᵗʳᵃᶜᵗⁱᵒⁿ ᵒᶠ ⁿⁱᵗʳᵒᵍᵉⁿ ᶠʳᵒᵐ ᵗʰᵉ ᵃⁱʳ ⁱⁿ ʰᵘᵍᵉ ᑫᵘᵃⁿᵗⁱᵗⁱᵉˢ⁻⁻ᵃˡˡ ᵃʳᵉ ᶜʰⁱˡᵈʳᵉⁿ ᵒᶠ ᵗᵉˢˡᵃ'ˢ ᶠᵉʳᵗⁱˡᵉ ᵇʳᵃⁱⁿ. ʰⁱˢ ᶜᵒⁱˡ ⁱˢ ᵗʰᵉ ᵏᵉʸ ᵗᵒ ᵗʰᵉᵐ ᵃˡˡ.

ᵉᵈⁱᵗᵒʳ

𝗚𝗲𝗿𝗺𝗮𝗻 "𝗘𝗳𝗳𝗶𝗰𝗶𝗲𝗻𝗰𝘆".
Just to give an idea of German thoroness and "efficiency," I may mention here a rather funny experience. An incandescent lamp of 16 c.p. was to be placed in a hallway and upon selecting the proper location I ordered the 𝙢𝙤𝙣𝙩𝙚𝙪𝙧 to run the wires. After working for a while he concluded that the engineer had to be consulted and this was done. The latter made several objections but ultimately agreed that the lamp should be placed two inches from the spot I had assigned, whereupon the work proceeded. Then the engineer became worried and told me that Inspector Averdeck should be notified. That important person called, investigated, debated, and decided that the lamp should be shifted back two inches, which was the place I had marked. It was not long, however, before Averdeck got cold feet himself and advised me that he had informed 𝑶𝒃𝒆𝒓-𝑰𝒏𝒔𝒑𝒆𝒄𝒕𝒐𝒓 Hieronimus of the matter and that I should await his decision. It was several days before the 𝑶𝒃𝒆𝒓-𝑰𝒏𝒔𝒑𝒆𝒄𝒕𝒐𝒓 was able to free himself of other pressing duties but at last he arrived and a two-hour debate followed, when he decided to move the lamp two inches farther. My hopes that this was the final act were shattered when the 𝑶𝒃𝒆𝒓-𝑰𝒏𝒔𝒑𝒆𝒄𝒕𝒐𝒓 returned and said to me: "𝑹𝒆𝒈𝒊𝒆𝒓𝒖𝒏𝒈𝒔𝒓𝒂𝒕𝒉 Funke is so particular that I would not dare to give an order for placing this lamp without his explicit approval." Accordingly arrangements for a visit from that great man were made. We started cleaning up and polishing early in the morning. Everybody brushed up, I put on my gloves and when Funke came with his retinue he was ceremoniously received. After two hours' deliberation he suddenly exclaimed: "I must be going," and pointing to a place on the ceiling, he ordered me to put the lamp there. It was the exact spot which I had originally chosen,

So it went day after day with variations, but I was determined to achieve at whatever cost and in the end my efforts were rewarded. By the spring of 1884 all the differences were adjusted, the plant formally accepted, and I returned to Paris with pleasing anticipations. One of the administrators had promised me a liberal compensation in case I succeeded, as well as a fair consideration of the improvements I had made in their dynamos and I hoped to realize a substantial sum. There were three administrators whom I shall designate as A, B and C for convenience. When I called on A 𝒉𝒆 told me that B had the say. This gentleman thought that only C could decide and the latter was quite sure that A alone had the power to act. After several laps of this 𝒄𝒊𝒓𝒄𝒖𝒍𝒖𝒔 𝒗𝒊𝒄𝒊𝒐𝒔𝒖𝒔 it dawned upon me that my reward was a castle in Spain. The utter failure of my attempts to raise capital for development was another disappointment and when Mr. Batchellor prest me to go to America with a view of redesigning the Edison machines, I determined to try my fortunes in the Land of Golden Promise. But the chance was nearly mist. I liquefied my modest assets, secured accommodations and found myself at the railroad station as the train was pulling out. At that moment I discovered that my money and tickets were gone. What to do was the question. Hercules had plenty of time to deliberate but I had to decide while running alongside the train with opposite feelings surging in my brain like condenser oscillations. Resolve, helped by dexterity, won out in the nick of time and upon passing thru the usual experiences, as trivial as unpleasant, I managed to embark for New York with the remnants of my belongings, some poems and articles I had written, and a package of calculations relating to solutions of an unsolvable integral and to my flying machine. During the voyage I sat most of the time at the stern of the ship watching for an opportunity to save somebody from a watery grave, without the slightest thought of danger. Later when I had absorbed some of the practical American sense I shivered at the recollection and marvelled at my former folly.

𝗧𝗲𝘀𝗹𝗮 𝗶𝗻 𝗔𝗺𝗲𝗿𝗶𝗰𝗮
I wish that I could put in words my first impressions of this country. In the Arabian Tales I read how genii transported people into a land of dreams to live thru delightful adventures. My case was just the reverse. The genii had carried me from a world of dreams into one of realities. What I had left was beautiful, artistic and fascinating in every way; what I saw here was machined, rough and unattractive. A burly policeman was twirling his stick which looked to me as big as a log. I approached him politely with the request to direct me. "Six blocks down, then to the left," he said, with murder in his eyes. "Is this America?" I asked myself in painful surprise. "It is a century behind Europe in civilization." When I went abroad in 1889 - five years having elapsed since my arrival here - I became convinced that 𝒊𝒕 𝒘𝒂𝒔 𝒎𝒐𝒓𝒆 𝒕𝒉𝒂𝒏 𝒐𝒏𝒆 𝒉𝒖𝒏𝒅𝒓𝒆𝒅 𝒚𝒆𝒂𝒓𝒔 𝑨𝑯𝑬𝑨𝑫 𝒐𝒇 𝑬𝒖𝒓𝒐𝒑𝒆 and nothing has happened to this day to change my opinion.

𝗧𝗲𝘀𝗹𝗮 𝗠𝗲𝗲𝘁𝘀 𝗘𝗱𝗶𝘀𝗼𝗻
The meeting with Edison was a memorable event in my life. I was amazed at this wonderful man who, without early advantages and scientific training, had accomplished so much. I had studied a dozen languages, delved in literature and art, and had spent my best years in libraries reading all sorts of stuff that fell into my hands, from Newton's "𝑷𝒓𝒊𝒏𝒄𝒊𝒑𝒊𝒂" to the novels of Paul de Kock, and felt that most of my life had been squandered. But it did not take long before I recognized that it was the best thing I could have done. Within a few weeks I had won Edison's confidence and it came about in this way. 

The S.S. Oregon, the fastest passenger steamer at that time, had both of its lighting machines disabled and its sailing was delayed. As the superstructure had been built after their installation it was impossible to remove them from the hold. The predicament was a serious one and Edison was much annoyed. In the evening I took the necessary instruments with me and went aboard the vessel where I stayed for the night. The dynamos were in bad condition, having several short-circuits and breaks, but with the assistance of the crew I succeeded in putting them in good shape. At five o'clock in the morning, when passing along Fifth Avenue on my way to the shop, I met Edison with Batchellor and a few others as they were returning home to retire. "Here is our Parisian running around at night," he said. When I told him that I was coming from the Oregon and had repaired both machines, he looked at me in silence and walked away without another word. But when he had gone some distance I heard him remark: "Batchellor, this is a d-n good man," and from that time on I had full freedom in directing the work. For nearly a year my regular hours were from 10.30 A.M. until 5 o'clock the next morning without a day's exception. Edison said to me: "I have had many hard-working assistants but you take the cake." During this period I designed twenty-four different types of standard machines with short cores and of uniform pattern which replaced the old ones. The Manager had promised me fifty thousand dollars on the completion of this task but it turned out to be a practical joke. This gave me a painful shock and I resigned my position.

Immediately thereafter some people approached me with the proposal of forming an arc light company under my name, to which I agreed. Here finally was an opportunity to develop the motor, but when I broached the subject to my new associates they said: "No, we want the arc lamp. We don't care for this alternating current of yours." In 1886 my system of arc lighting was perfected and adopted for factory and municipal lighting, and I was free, but with no other possession than a beautifully engraved certificate of stock of hypothetical value. Then followed a period of struggle in the new medium for which I was not fitted, but the reward came in the end and in April, 1887, the Tesla Electric Company was organized, providing a laboratory and facilities. The motors I built there were exactly as I had imagined them. I made no attempt to improve the design, but merely reproduced the pictures as they appeared to my vision and the operation was always as I expected.

In the early part of 1888 an arrangement was made with the Westinghouse Company for the manufacture of the motors on a large scale. But great difficulties had still to be overcome. My system was based on the use of low frequency currents and the Westinghouse experts had adopted 133 cycles with the object of securing advantages in the transformation. They did not want to depart from their standard forms of apparatus and my efforts had to be concentrated upon adapting the motor to these conditions. Another necessity was to produce a motor capable of running efficiently at this frequency on two wires which was not easy of accomplishment.

At the close of 1889, however, my services in Pittsburg being no longer essential, I returned to New York and resumed experimental work in a laboratory on Grand Street, where I began immediately the design of high frequency machines. The problems of construction in this unexplored field were novel and quite peculiar and I encountered many difficulties. I rejected the inductor type, fearing that it might not yield perfect sine waves which were so important to resonant action. Had it not been for this I could have saved myself a great deal of labor. Another discouraging feature of the high frequency alternator seemed to be the inconstancy of speed which threatened to impose serious limitations to its use. I had already noted in my demonstrations before the American Institution of Electrical Engineers that several times the tune was lost, necessitating readjustment, and did not yet foresee, what I discovered long afterwards, a means of operating a machine of this kind at a speed constant to such a degree as not to vary more than a small fraction of one revolution between the extremes of load.

𝗧𝗵𝗲 𝗜𝗻𝘃𝗲𝗻𝘁𝗶𝗼𝗻 *(+) 𝗼𝗳 𝘁𝗵𝗲 𝗧𝗲𝘀𝗹𝗮 𝗖𝗼𝗶𝗹

From many other considerations it appeared desirable to invent a simpler device for the production of electric oscillations. In 1856 Lord Kelvin had exposed the theory of the condenser discharge, but no practical application of that important knowledge was made. I saw the possibilities and undertook the development of induction apparatus on this principle. My progress was so rapid as to enable me to exhibit at my lecture in 1891 a coil giving sparks of 𝒇𝒊𝒗𝒆 𝒊𝒏𝒄𝒉𝒆𝒔. On that occasion I frankly told the engineers of a defect involved in the transformation by the new method, namely, the loss in the spark gap. Subsequent investigation showed that no matter what medium is employed, be it air, hydrogen, mercury vapor, oil or a stream of electrons, the efficiency is the same. It is a law very much like that governing the conversion of mechanical energy. We may drop a weight from a certain height vertically down or carry it to the lower level along any devious path, it is immaterial insofar as the amount of work is concerned. Fortunately however, this drawback is not fatal as by proper proportioning of the resonant circuits an 𝒆𝒇𝒇𝒊𝒄𝒊𝒆𝒏𝒄𝒚 𝒐𝒇 85 𝒑𝒆𝒓 𝒄𝒆𝒏𝒕 is attainable. Since my early announcement of the invention it has come into universal use and wrought a revolution in many departments. But a still greater future awaits it. When in 1900 I obtained powerful discharges of 100 feet and flashed a current around the globe, I was reminded of the first tiny spark I observed in my Grand Street laboratory and was thrilled by sensations akin to those I felt when I discovered the 𝒓𝒐𝒕𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒏𝒈 𝒎𝒂𝒈𝒏𝒆𝒕𝒊𝒄 𝒇𝒊𝒆𝒍𝒅.


stylize font= x
insrt figrs tmplt= 4x+c *(+_)
photocopy of original here=

__________________







__________________


*MY INVENTIONS IIIII
MY INVENTIONS V - THE MAGNIFYING TRANSMITTER
————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Experimenter
June, 1919 Page number(s): 112-113, 148, 173, 176-178


As I review the events of my past life I realize how subtle are the influences that shape our destinies. An incident of my youth may serve to illustrate. One winter’s day I managed to climb a steep mountain, in company with other boys. The snow was quite deep and a warm southerly wind made it just suitable for our purpose. We amused ourselves by throwing balls which would roll down a certain distance, gathering more or less snow, and we tried to outdo one another in this sport. Suddenly a ball was seen to go beyond the limit, swelling to enormous proportions until it became as big as a house and plunged thundering into the valley below with a force that made the ground tremble. I looked on spellbound, incapable of understanding what had happened. For weeks afterward the picture of the avalanche was before my eyes and I wondered how anything so small could grow to such an immense size. Ever since that time the magnification of feeble actions fascinated me, and when, years later, I took up the experimental study of mechanical and electrical resonance, I was keenly interested from the very start. Possibly, had it not been for that early powerful impression, I might not have followed up the little spark I obtained with my coil and never developed my best invention, the true history of which I will tell here for the first time.


------------
*insrt Sitka Small font ?unobtanium? here
------------
Iᴍᴀɢɪɴᴇ ᴀ ᴍᴀɴ ᴀ ᴄᴇɴᴛᴜʀʏ ᴀɢᴏ, ʙᴏʟᴅ ᴇɴᴏᴜɢʜ ᴛᴏ ᴅᴇsɪɢɴ ᴀɴᴅ ᴀᴄᴛᴜᴀʟʟʏ ʙᴜɪʟᴅ ᴀ ʜᴜɢᴇ ᴛᴏᴡᴇʀ ᴡɪᴛʜ ᴡʜɪᴄʜ ᴛᴏ ᴛʀᴀɴsᴍɪᴛ ᴛʜᴇ ʜᴜᴍᴀɴ ᴠᴏɪᴄᴇ, ᴍᴜsɪᴄ, ᴘɪᴄᴛᴜʀᴇs, ᴘʀᴇss ɴᴇᴡs ᴀɴᴅ ᴇᴠᴇɴ ᴘᴏᴡᴇʀ, ᴛʜʀᴜ ᴛʜᴇ ᴇᴀʀᴛʜ ᴛᴏ ᴀɴʏ ᴅɪsᴛᴀɴᴄᴇ ᴡʜᴀᴛᴇᴠᴇʀ ᴡɪᴛʜᴏᴜᴛ ᴡɪʀᴇs! Hᴇ ᴘʀᴏʙᴀʙʟʏ ᴡᴏᴜʟᴅ ʜᴀᴠᴇ ʙᴇᴇɴ ʜᴜɴɢ ᴏʀ ʙᴜʀɴᴛ ᴀᴛ ᴛʜᴇ sᴛᴀᴋᴇ. Sᴏ ᴡʜᴇɴ Tᴇsʟᴀ ʙᴜɪʟᴛ ʜɪs ғᴀᴍᴏᴜs ᴛᴏᴡᴇʀ ᴏɴ Lᴏɴɢ Isʟᴀɴᴅ ʜᴇ ᴡᴀs ᴀ ʜᴜɴᴅʀᴇᴅ ʏᴇᴀʀs ᴀʜᴇᴀᴅ ᴏғ ʜɪs ᴛɪᴍᴇ. Aɴᴅ ғᴏᴏʟɪsʜ ʀɪᴅɪᴄᴜʟᴇ ʙʏ ᴏᴜʀ ʟᴀᴛᴛᴇʀ ᴅᴀʏ ᴀʀᴍ-ᴄʜᴀɪʀ “sᴀᴠᴀɴᴛs,” ᴅᴏᴇs ɴᴏᴛ ɪɴ ᴛʜᴇ ʟᴇᴀsᴛ ᴍᴀʀ Tᴇsʟᴀ’s ɢʀᴇᴀᴛɴᴇss.

Tʜᴇ ᴛɪᴛᴀɴɪᴄ ʙʀᴀɪɴ ᴏғ Tᴇsʟᴀ ʜᴀs ʜᴀʀᴅʟʏ ᴘʀᴏᴅᴜᴄᴇᴅ ᴀ ᴍᴏʀᴇ ᴀᴍᴀᴢɪɴɢ ᴡᴏɴᴅᴇʀ ᴛʜᴀɴ ᴛʜɪs “ᴍᴀɢɴɪғʏɪɴɢ ᴛʀᴀɴsᴍɪᴛᴛᴇʀ.” Cᴏɴᴛʀᴀʀʏ ᴛᴏ ᴘᴏᴘᴜʟᴀʀ ʙᴇʟɪᴇғ ʜɪs ᴛᴏᴡᴇʀ ᴡᴀs ɴᴏᴛ ʙᴜɪʟᴛ ᴛᴏ ʀᴀᴅɪᴀᴛᴇ Hᴇʀᴛᴢɪᴀɴ ᴡᴀᴠᴇs ɪɴᴛᴏ ᴛʜᴇ ᴇᴛʜᴇʀ. Tᴇsʟᴀ’s sʏsᴛᴇᴍ sᴇɴᴅs ᴏᴜᴛ ᴛʜᴏᴜsᴀɴᴅs ᴏғ ʜᴏʀsᴇᴘᴏᴡᴇʀ ᴛʜʀᴜ ᴛʜᴇ ᴇᴀʀᴛʜ – ʜᴇ ʜᴀs sʜᴏᴡɴ ᴇxᴘᴇʀɪᴍᴇɴᴛᴀʟʟʏ ʜᴏᴡ ᴘᴏᴡᴇʀ ᴄᴀɴ ʙᴇ sᴇɴᴛ ᴡɪᴛʜᴏᴜᴛ ᴡɪʀᴇs ᴏᴠᴇʀ ᴅɪsᴛᴀɴᴄᴇs ғʀᴏᴍ ᴀ ᴄᴇɴᴛʀᴀʟ ᴘᴏɪɴᴛ. Nᴏʀ ɪs ᴛʜᴇʀᴇ ᴀɴʏ ᴍʏsᴛᴇʀʏ ᴀʙᴏᴜᴛ ɪᴛ ʜᴏᴡ ʜᴇ ᴀᴄᴄᴏᴍᴘʟɪsʜᴇs ᴛʜᴇ ʀᴇsᴜʟᴛ. Hɪs ʜɪsᴛᴏʀɪᴄ U. S. ᴘᴀᴛᴇɴᴛs ᴀɴᴅ ᴀʀᴛɪᴄʟᴇs ᴅᴇsᴄʀɪʙᴇ ᴛʜᴇ ᴍᴇᴛʜᴏᴅ ᴜsᴇᴅ. Tᴇsʟᴀ’s Mᴀɢɴɪғʏɪɴɢ Tʀᴀɴsᴍɪᴛᴛᴇʀ ɪs ᴛʀᴜʟʏ ᴀ ᴍᴏᴅᴇᴍ ʟᴀᴍᴘ ᴏғ Aʟᴀᴅᴅɪɴ.

Eᴅɪᴛᴏʀ.
------------
𝘐𝘮𝘢𝘨𝘪𝘯𝘦 𝘢 𝘮𝘢𝘯 𝘢 𝘤𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘶𝘳𝘺 𝘢𝘨𝘰, 𝘣𝘰𝘭𝘥 𝘦𝘯𝘰𝘶𝘨𝘩 𝘵𝘰 𝘥𝘦𝘴𝘪𝘨𝘯 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘢𝘤𝘵𝘶𝘢𝘭𝘭𝘺 𝘣𝘶𝘪𝘭𝘥 𝘢 𝘩𝘶𝘨𝘦 𝘵𝘰𝘸𝘦𝘳 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩 𝘸𝘩𝘪𝘤𝘩 𝘵𝘰 𝘵𝘳𝘢𝘯𝘴𝘮𝘪𝘵 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘩𝘶𝘮𝘢𝘯 𝘷𝘰𝘪𝘤𝘦, 𝘮𝘶𝘴𝘪𝘤, 𝘱𝘪𝘤𝘵𝘶𝘳𝘦𝘴, 𝘱𝘳𝘦𝘴𝘴 𝘯𝘦𝘸𝘴 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘦𝘷𝘦𝘯 𝘱𝘰𝘸𝘦𝘳, 𝘵𝘩𝘳𝘶 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘦𝘢𝘳𝘵𝘩 𝘵𝘰 𝘢𝘯𝘺 𝘥𝘪𝘴𝘵𝘢𝘯𝘤𝘦 𝘸𝘩𝘢𝘵𝘦𝘷𝘦𝘳 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘸𝘪𝘳𝘦𝘴! 𝘏𝘦 𝘱𝘳𝘰𝘣𝘢𝘣𝘭𝘺 𝘸𝘰𝘶𝘭𝘥 𝘩𝘢𝘷𝘦 𝘣𝘦𝘦𝘯 𝘩𝘶𝘯𝘨 𝘰𝘳 𝘣𝘶𝘳𝘯𝘵 𝘢𝘵 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘴𝘵𝘢𝘬𝘦. 𝘚𝘰 𝘸𝘩𝘦𝘯 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘣𝘶𝘪𝘭𝘵 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘧𝘢𝘮𝘰𝘶𝘴 𝘵𝘰𝘸𝘦𝘳 𝘰𝘯 𝘓𝘰𝘯𝘨 𝘐𝘴𝘭𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘩𝘦 𝘸𝘢𝘴 𝘢 𝘩𝘶𝘯𝘥𝘳𝘦𝘥 𝘺𝘦𝘢𝘳𝘴 𝘢𝘩𝘦𝘢𝘥 𝘰𝘧 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘵𝘪𝘮𝘦. 𝘈𝘯𝘥 𝘧𝘰𝘰𝘭𝘪𝘴𝘩 𝘳𝘪𝘥𝘪𝘤𝘶𝘭𝘦 𝘣𝘺 𝘰𝘶𝘳 𝘭𝘢𝘵𝘵𝘦𝘳 𝘥𝘢𝘺 𝘢𝘳𝘮-𝘤𝘩𝘢𝘪𝘳 “𝘴𝘢𝘷𝘢𝘯𝘵𝘴,” 𝘥𝘰𝘦𝘴 𝘯𝘰𝘵 𝘪𝘯 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘭𝘦𝘢𝘴𝘵 𝘮𝘢𝘳 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢’𝘴 𝘨𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘵𝘯𝘦𝘴𝘴.

𝘛𝘩𝘦 𝘵𝘪𝘵𝘢𝘯𝘪𝘤 𝘣𝘳𝘢𝘪𝘯 𝘰𝘧 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘩𝘢𝘳𝘥𝘭𝘺 𝘱𝘳𝘰𝘥𝘶𝘤𝘦𝘥 𝘢 𝘮𝘰𝘳𝘦 𝘢𝘮𝘢𝘻𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘸𝘰𝘯𝘥𝘦𝘳 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘯 𝘵𝘩𝘪𝘴 “𝘮𝘢𝘨𝘯𝘪𝘧𝘺𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘵𝘳𝘢𝘯𝘴𝘮𝘪𝘵𝘵𝘦𝘳.” 𝘊𝘰𝘯𝘵𝘳𝘢𝘳𝘺 𝘵𝘰 𝘱𝘰𝘱𝘶𝘭𝘢𝘳 𝘣𝘦𝘭𝘪𝘦𝘧 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘵𝘰𝘸𝘦𝘳 𝘸𝘢𝘴 𝘯𝘰𝘵 𝘣𝘶𝘪𝘭𝘵 𝘵𝘰 𝘳𝘢𝘥𝘪𝘢𝘵𝘦 𝘏𝘦𝘳𝘵𝘻𝘪𝘢𝘯 𝘸𝘢𝘷𝘦𝘴 𝘪𝘯𝘵𝘰 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘦𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳. 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢’𝘴 𝘴𝘺𝘴𝘵𝘦𝘮 𝘴𝘦𝘯𝘥𝘴 𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘵𝘩𝘰𝘶𝘴𝘢𝘯𝘥𝘴 𝘰𝘧 𝘩𝘰𝘳𝘴𝘦𝘱𝘰𝘸𝘦𝘳 𝘵𝘩𝘳𝘶 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘦𝘢𝘳𝘵𝘩 – 𝘩𝘦 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘴𝘩𝘰𝘸𝘯 𝘦𝘹𝘱𝘦𝘳𝘪𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘢𝘭𝘭𝘺 𝘩𝘰𝘸 𝘱𝘰𝘸𝘦𝘳 𝘤𝘢𝘯 𝘣𝘦 𝘴𝘦𝘯𝘵 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘸𝘪𝘳𝘦𝘴 𝘰𝘷𝘦𝘳 𝘥𝘪𝘴𝘵𝘢𝘯𝘤𝘦𝘴 𝘧𝘳𝘰𝘮 𝘢 𝘤𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘳𝘢𝘭 𝘱𝘰𝘪𝘯𝘵. 𝘕𝘰𝘳 𝘪𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳𝘦 𝘢𝘯𝘺 𝘮𝘺𝘴𝘵𝘦𝘳𝘺 𝘢𝘣𝘰𝘶𝘵 𝘪𝘵 𝘩𝘰𝘸 𝘩𝘦 𝘢𝘤𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘱𝘭𝘪𝘴𝘩𝘦𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘳𝘦𝘴𝘶𝘭𝘵. 𝘏𝘪𝘴 𝘩𝘪𝘴𝘵𝘰𝘳𝘪𝘤 𝘜. 𝘚. 𝘱𝘢𝘵𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘴 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘢𝘳𝘵𝘪𝘤𝘭𝘦𝘴 𝘥𝘦𝘴𝘤𝘳𝘪𝘣𝘦 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘮𝘦𝘵𝘩𝘰𝘥 𝘶𝘴𝘦𝘥. 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢’𝘴 𝘔𝘢𝘨𝘯𝘪𝘧𝘺𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘛𝘳𝘢𝘯𝘴𝘮𝘪𝘵𝘵𝘦𝘳 𝘪𝘴 𝘵𝘳𝘶𝘭𝘺 𝘢 𝘮𝘰𝘥𝘦𝘮 𝘭𝘢𝘮𝘱 𝘰𝘧 𝘈𝘭𝘢𝘥𝘥𝘪𝘯.

𝘌𝘥𝘪𝘵𝘰𝘳.
------------
ᴵᵐᵃᵍᶦⁿᵉ ᵃ ᵐᵃⁿ ᵃ ᶜᵉⁿᵗᵘʳʸ ᵃᵍᵒ, ᵇᵒˡᵈ ᵉⁿᵒᵘᵍʰ ᵗᵒ ᵈᵉˢᶦᵍⁿ ᵃⁿᵈ ᵃᶜᵗᵘᵃˡˡʸ ᵇᵘᶦˡᵈ ᵃ ʰᵘᵍᵉ ᵗᵒʷᵉʳ ʷᶦᵗʰ ʷʰᶦᶜʰ ᵗᵒ ᵗʳᵃⁿˢᵐᶦᵗ ᵗʰᵉ ʰᵘᵐᵃⁿ ᵛᵒᶦᶜᵉ, ᵐᵘˢᶦᶜ, ᵖᶦᶜᵗᵘʳᵉˢ, ᵖʳᵉˢˢ ⁿᵉʷˢ ᵃⁿᵈ ᵉᵛᵉⁿ ᵖᵒʷᵉʳ, ᵗʰʳᵘ ᵗʰᵉ ᵉᵃʳᵗʰ ᵗᵒ ᵃⁿʸ ᵈᶦˢᵗᵃⁿᶜᵉ ʷʰᵃᵗᵉᵛᵉʳ ʷᶦᵗʰᵒᵘᵗ ʷᶦʳᵉˢᵎ ᴴᵉ ᵖʳᵒᵇᵃᵇˡʸ ʷᵒᵘˡᵈ ʰᵃᵛᵉ ᵇᵉᵉⁿ ʰᵘⁿᵍ ᵒʳ ᵇᵘʳⁿᵗ ᵃᵗ ᵗʰᵉ ˢᵗᵃᵏᵉ. ˢᵒ ʷʰᵉⁿ ᵀᵉˢˡᵃ ᵇᵘᶦˡᵗ ʰᶦˢ ᶠᵃᵐᵒᵘˢ ᵗᵒʷᵉʳ ᵒⁿ ᴸᵒⁿᵍ ᴵˢˡᵃⁿᵈ ʰᵉ ʷᵃˢ ᵃ ʰᵘⁿᵈʳᵉᵈ ʸᵉᵃʳˢ ᵃʰᵉᵃᵈ ᵒᶠ ʰᶦˢ ᵗᶦᵐᵉ. ᴬⁿᵈ ᶠᵒᵒˡᶦˢʰ ʳᶦᵈᶦᶜᵘˡᵉ ᵇʸ ᵒᵘʳ ˡᵃᵗᵗᵉʳ ᵈᵃʸ ᵃʳᵐ⁻ᶜʰᵃᶦʳ “ˢᵃᵛᵃⁿᵗˢ,” ᵈᵒᵉˢ ⁿᵒᵗ ᶦⁿ ᵗʰᵉ ˡᵉᵃˢᵗ ᵐᵃʳ ᵀᵉˢˡᵃ’ˢ ᵍʳᵉᵃᵗⁿᵉˢˢ.

ᵀʰᵉ ᵗᶦᵗᵃⁿᶦᶜ ᵇʳᵃᶦⁿ ᵒᶠ ᵀᵉˢˡᵃ ʰᵃˢ ʰᵃʳᵈˡʸ ᵖʳᵒᵈᵘᶜᵉᵈ ᵃ ᵐᵒʳᵉ ᵃᵐᵃᶻᶦⁿᵍ ʷᵒⁿᵈᵉʳ ᵗʰᵃⁿ ᵗʰᶦˢ “ᵐᵃᵍⁿᶦᶠʸᶦⁿᵍ ᵗʳᵃⁿˢᵐᶦᵗᵗᵉʳ.” ᶜᵒⁿᵗʳᵃʳʸ ᵗᵒ ᵖᵒᵖᵘˡᵃʳ ᵇᵉˡᶦᵉᶠ ʰᶦˢ ᵗᵒʷᵉʳ ʷᵃˢ ⁿᵒᵗ ᵇᵘᶦˡᵗ ᵗᵒ ʳᵃᵈᶦᵃᵗᵉ ᴴᵉʳᵗᶻᶦᵃⁿ ʷᵃᵛᵉˢ ᶦⁿᵗᵒ ᵗʰᵉ ᵉᵗʰᵉʳ. ᵀᵉˢˡᵃ’ˢ ˢʸˢᵗᵉᵐ ˢᵉⁿᵈˢ ᵒᵘᵗ ᵗʰᵒᵘˢᵃⁿᵈˢ ᵒᶠ ʰᵒʳˢᵉᵖᵒʷᵉʳ ᵗʰʳᵘ ᵗʰᵉ ᵉᵃʳᵗʰ – ʰᵉ ʰᵃˢ ˢʰᵒʷⁿ ᵉˣᵖᵉʳᶦᵐᵉⁿᵗᵃˡˡʸ ʰᵒʷ ᵖᵒʷᵉʳ ᶜᵃⁿ ᵇᵉ ˢᵉⁿᵗ ʷᶦᵗʰᵒᵘᵗ ʷᶦʳᵉˢ ᵒᵛᵉʳ ᵈᶦˢᵗᵃⁿᶜᵉˢ ᶠʳᵒᵐ ᵃ ᶜᵉⁿᵗʳᵃˡ ᵖᵒᶦⁿᵗ. ᴺᵒʳ ᶦˢ ᵗʰᵉʳᵉ ᵃⁿʸ ᵐʸˢᵗᵉʳʸ ᵃᵇᵒᵘᵗ ᶦᵗ ʰᵒʷ ʰᵉ ᵃᶜᶜᵒᵐᵖˡᶦˢʰᵉˢ ᵗʰᵉ ʳᵉˢᵘˡᵗ. ᴴᶦˢ ʰᶦˢᵗᵒʳᶦᶜ ᵁ. ˢ. ᵖᵃᵗᵉⁿᵗˢ ᵃⁿᵈ ᵃʳᵗᶦᶜˡᵉˢ ᵈᵉˢᶜʳᶦᵇᵉ ᵗʰᵉ ᵐᵉᵗʰᵒᵈ ᵘˢᵉᵈ. ᵀᵉˢˡᵃ’ˢ ᴹᵃᵍⁿᶦᶠʸᶦⁿᵍ ᵀʳᵃⁿˢᵐᶦᵗᵗᵉʳ ᶦˢ ᵗʳᵘˡʸ ᵃ ᵐᵒᵈᵉᵐ ˡᵃᵐᵖ ᵒᶠ ᴬˡᵃᵈᵈᶦⁿ.

ᴱᵈᶦᵗᵒʳ.
------------


SCRAPPING THE WORLD’S ENGINES.

“Lionhunters” have often asked me which of my discoveries I prize most. This depends on the point of view. Not a few technical men, very able in their special departments, but dominated by a pedantic spirit and nearsighted, have asserted that excepting the induction motor I have given to the world little of practical use. This is a grievous mistake. A new idea must not be judged by its immediate results. My alternating system of power transmission came at a psychological moment, as a long-sought answer to pressing industrial questions, and altho considerable resistance had to be overcome and opposing interests reconciled, as usual, the commercial introduction could not be long delayed. Now, compare this situation with that confronting my turbine, for example. One should think that so simple and beautiful an invention, possessing many features of an ideal motor, should be adopted at once and, undoubtedly, it would under similar conditions. But the prospective effect of the rotating field was not to render worthless existing machinery; on the contrary, it was to give it additional value. The system lent itself to new enterprise as well as to improvement of the old. My turbine is an advance of a character entirely different. It is a radical departure in the sense that its success would mean the abandonment of the antiquated types of prime movers on which billions of dollars have been spent. Under such circumstances the progress must needs be slow and perhaps the greatest impediment is encountered in the prejudicial opinions created in the minds of experts by organized opposition. Only the other day I had a disheartening experience when I met my friend and former assistant, Charles F. Scott, now professor of Electrical Engineering at Yale. I had not seen him for a long time and was glad to have an opportunity for a little chat at my office. Our conversation naturally enough drifted on my turbine and I became heated to a high degree. “Scott,” I exclaimed, carried away by the vision of a glorious future, “my turbine will scrap all the heat-engines in the world.” Scott stroked his chin and looked away thoughtfully, as though making a mental calculation. “That will make quite a pile of scrap,” he said, and left without another word!

“ALADDIN’S LAMP”.

These and other inventions of mine, however, were nothing more than steps forward in certain directions. In evolving them I simply followed the inborn instinct to improve the present devices without any special thought of our far more imperative necessities. The “Magnifying Transmitter” was the product of labors extending through years, having for their chief object the solution of problems which are infinitely more important to mankind than mere industrial development.

If my memory serves me right, it was in November, 1890, that I performed a laboratory experiment which was one of the most extraordinary and spectacular ever recorded in the annals of science. In investigating the behaviour of high frequency currents I had satisfied myself that an electric field of sufficient intensity could be produced in a room to light up electrodeless vacuum tubes. Accordingly, a transformer was built to test the theory and the first trial proved a marvelous success. It is difficult to appreciate what those strange phenomena meant at that time. We crave for new sensations but soon become indifferent to them. The wonders of yesterday are today common occurrences. When my tubes were first publicly exhibited they were viewed with amazement impossible to describe. From all parts of the world I received urgent invitations and numerous honors and other flattering inducements were offered to me, which I declined.

𝙄𝙉 𝙁𝘼𝙍𝘼𝘿𝘼𝙔’𝙎 𝘾𝙃𝘼𝙄𝙍

But in 1892 the demands became irresistible and I went to London where I delivered a lecture before the Institution of Electrical Engineers. It had been my intention to leave immediately for Paris in compliance with a similar obligation, but Sir James Dewar insisted on my appearing before the Royal Institution. I was a man of firm resolve but succumbed easily to the forceful arguments of the great Scotsman. He pushed me into a chair and poured out half a glass of a wonderful brown fluid which sparkled in all sorts of iridescent colors and tasted like nectar. “Now,” said he. “you are sitting in Faraday’s chair and you are enjoying whiskey he used to drink.” In both aspects it was an enviable experience. The next evening I gave a demonstration before that Institution, at the termination of which Lord Rayleigh addressed the audience and his generous words gave me the first start in these endeavors. I fled from London and later from Paris to escape favors showered upon me, and journeyed to my home where I passed through a most painful ordeal and illness. Upon regaining my health I began to formulate plans for the resumption of work in America. Up to that time I never realized that I possessed any particular gift of discovery but Lord Rayleigh, whom I always considered as an ideal man of science, had said so and if that was the case I felt that I should concentrate on some big idea.

NATURE’S TRIGGER.

One day, as I was roaming in the mountains, I sought shelter from an approaching storm. The sky became overhung with heavy clouds but somehow the rain was delayed until, all of a sudden, there was a lightning flash and a few moments after a deluge. This observation set me thinking. It was manifest that the two phenomena were closely related, as cause and effect, and a little reflection led me to the conclusion that the electrical energy involved in the precipitation of the water was inconsiderable, the function of lightning being much like that of a sensitive trigger. Here was a stupendous possibility of achievement. If we could produce electric effects of the required quality, this whole planet and the conditions of existence on it could be transformed. The sun raises the water of the oceans and winds drive it to distant regions where it remains in a state of most delicate balance. If it were in our power to upset it when and wherever desired, this mighty life-sustaining stream could be at will controlled. We could irrigate arid deserts, create lakes and rivers and provide motive power in unlimited amounts. This would be the most efficient way of harnessing the sun to the uses of man. The consummation depended on our ability to develop electric forces of the order of those in nature. It seemed a hopeless undertaking, but I made up my mind to try it and immediately on my return to the United States, in the Summer of 1892, work was begun which was to me all the more attractive, because a means of the same kind was necessary for the successful transmission of energy without wires.

FOUR MILLION VOLTS.

The first gratifying result was obtained in the spring of the succeeding year when I reached tensions of about 1,000,000 volts with my conical coil. That was not much in the light of the present art, but it was then considered a feat. Steady progress was made until the destruction of my laboratory by fire in 1895, as may be judged from an article by T. C. Martin which appeared in the April number of the Century Magazine. This calamity set me back in many ways and most of that year had to be devoted to planning and reconstruction. However, as soon as circumstances permitted, I returned to the task. Although I knew that higher electro-motive forces were attainable with apparatus of larger dimensions, I had an instinctive perception that the object could be accomplished by the proper design of a comparatively small and compact transformer. In carrying on tests with a secondary in the form of a flat spiral, as illustrated in my patents, the absence of streamers surprised me, and it was not long before I discovered that this was due to the position of the turns and their mutual action. Profiting from this observation I resorted to the use of a high tension conductor with turns of considerable diameter sufficiently separated to keep down the distributed capacity, while at the same time preventing undue accumulation of the charge at any point. The application of this principle enabled me to produce pressures of 4,000,000 volts, which was about the limit obtainable in my new laboratory at Houston Street, as the discharges extended through a distance of 16 feet. A photograph of this transmitter was published in the 𝑬𝒍𝒆𝒄𝒕𝒓𝒊𝒄𝒂𝒍 𝑹𝒆𝒗𝒊𝒆𝒘 of November, 1898. In order to advance further along this line I had to go into the open, and in the spring of 1899, having completed preparations for the erection of a wireless plant, I went to Colorado where I remained for more than one year. Here I introduced other improvements and refinements which made it possible to generate currents of any tension that may be desired. Those who are interested will find some information in regard to the experiments I conducted there in my article, “The Problem of Increasing Human Energy” in the 𝑪𝒆𝒏𝒕𝒖𝒓𝒚 𝑴𝒂𝒈𝒂𝒛𝒊𝒏𝒆 of June, 1900, to which I have referred on a previous occasion.

THE MAGNIFYING TRANSMITTER.

I have been asked by the 𝑬𝒍𝒆𝒄𝒕𝒓𝒊𝒄𝒂𝒍 𝑬𝒙𝒑𝒆𝒓𝒊𝒎𝒆𝒏𝒕𝒆𝒓 to be quite explicit on this subject so that my young friends among the readers of the magazine will clearly understand the construction and operation of my “Magnifying Transmitter” and the purposes for which it is intended. Well, then, in the first place, it is a 𝒓𝒆𝒔𝒐𝒏𝒂𝒏𝒕 𝒕𝒓𝒂𝒏𝒔𝒇𝒐𝒓𝒎𝒆𝒓 with a secondary in which the parts, charged to a high potential, are of considerable area and arranged in space along ideal enveloping surfaces of very large radii of curvature, and at proper distances from one another thereby insuring a 𝒔𝒎𝒂𝒍𝒍 𝒆𝒍𝒆𝒄𝒕𝒓𝒊𝒄 𝒔𝒖𝒓𝒇𝒂𝒄𝒆 𝒅𝒆𝒏𝒔𝒊𝒕𝒚 𝒆𝒗𝒆𝒓𝒚𝒘𝒉𝒆𝒓𝒆 so that 𝒏𝒐 𝒍𝒆𝒂𝒌 𝒄𝒂𝒏 𝒐𝒄𝒄𝒖𝒓 𝒆𝒗𝒆𝒏 𝒊𝒇 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒄𝒐𝒏𝒅𝒖𝒄𝒕𝒐𝒓 𝒊𝒔 𝒃𝒂𝒓𝒆. It is suitable for any frequency, from a few to many thousands of cycles per second, and can be used in the production of currents of tremendous volume and moderate pressure, or of smaller amperage and immense electro-motive force. The maximum electric 𝒕𝒆𝒏𝒔𝒊𝒐𝒏 𝒊𝒔 𝒎𝒆𝒓𝒆𝒍𝒚 𝒅𝒆𝒑𝒆𝒏𝒅𝒆𝒏𝒕 𝒐𝒏 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒄𝒖𝒓𝒗𝒂𝒕𝒖𝒓𝒆 𝒐𝒇 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒔𝒖𝒓𝒇𝒂𝒄𝒆𝒔 on which the charged elements are situated and the area of the latter.

100 MILLION VOLTS POSSIBLE.

Judging from my past experience, as much as 100,000,000 volts are perfectly practicable. On the other hand currents of many thousands of amperes may be obtained in the antenna. A plant of but very moderate dimensions is required for such performances. Theoretically, a terminal of less than 90 feet in diameter is sufficient to develop an electro-motive force of that magnitude while for antenna currents of from 2,000-4,000 amperes at the usual frequencies it need not be larger than 30 feet in diameter.

In a more restricted meaning this wireless transmitter is one in which the Hertz-wave radiation is an entirely negligible quantity as compared with the whole energy, under which condition the damping factor is extremely small and an enormous charge is stored in the elevated capacity. Such a circuit may then be excited with impulses of any kind, even of low frequency and it will yield sinusoidal and continuous oscillations like those of an alternator.

Taken in the narrowest significance of the term, however, it is a resonant transformer which, besides possessing these qualities, is accurately proportioned to fit the globe and its electrical constants and properties, by virtue of which design it becomes highly efficient and effective in the wireless transmission of energy. Distance is then absolutely eliminated, there being 𝒏𝒐 𝒅𝒊𝒎𝒊𝒏𝒖𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏 𝒊𝒏 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒊𝒏𝒕𝒆𝒏𝒔𝒊𝒕𝒚 𝒐𝒇 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒕𝒓𝒂𝒏𝒔𝒎𝒊𝒕𝒕𝒆𝒅 𝒊𝒎𝒑𝒖𝒍𝒔𝒆𝒔. It is even possible to make the actions increase with the distance from the plant according to an exact mathematical law.

This invention was one of a number comprised in my “World-System” of wireless transmission which I undertook to commercialize on my return to New York in 1900. As to the immediate purposes of my enterprise, they were clearly outlined in a technical statement of that period from which I quote:

“The ‘World-System’ has resulted from a combination of several original discoveries made by the inventor in the course of long continued research and experimentation. It makes possible not only the instantaneous and precise wireless transmission of any kind of signals, messages or characters, to all parts of the world, but also the inter-connection of the existing telegraph, telephone, and other signal stations without any change in their present equipment. By its means, for instance, a telephone subscriber here may call up and talk to any other subscriber on the Globe. An inexpensive receiver, not bigger than a watch, will enable him to listen anywhere, on land or sea, to a speech delivered or music played in some other place, however distant. These examples are cited merely to give an idea of the possibilities of this great scientific advance, which annihilates distance and makes that perfect natural conductor, the Earth, available for all the innumerable purposes which human ingenuity has found for a line-wire. One far-reaching result of this is that any device capable of being operated thru one or more wires (at a distance obviously restricted) can likewise be actuated, without artificial conductors and with the same facility and accuracy, at distances to which there are no limits other than those imposed by the physical dimensions of the Globe. Thus, not only will entirely new fields for commercial exploitation be opened up by this ideal method of transmission but the old ones vastly extended.

“The ‘World-System’ is based on the application of the following important inventions and discoveries:

“1. 𝑻𝒉𝒆 ‘𝑻𝒆𝒔𝒍𝒂 𝑻𝒓𝒂𝒏𝒔𝒇𝒐𝒓𝒎𝒆𝒓.’ This apparatus is in the production of electrical vibrations as revolutionary as gunpowder was in warfare. Currents many times stronger than any ever generated in the usual ways, and sparks over one hundred feet long, have been produced by the inventor with an instrument of this kind.

“2. The ‘𝑻𝒉𝒆 ‘𝑴𝒂𝒈𝒏𝒊𝒇𝒚𝒊𝒏𝒈 𝑻𝒓𝒂𝒏𝒔𝒎𝒊𝒕𝒕𝒆𝒓.’ This is Tesla’s best invention — a peculiar transformer specially adapted to excite the Earth, which is in the transmission of electrical energy what the telescope is in astronomical observation. By the use of this marvelous device he has already set up electrical movements of greater intensity than those of lightning and passed a current, sufficient to light more than two hundred incandescent lamps, around the Globe.

“3. The ‘𝑻𝒉𝒆 ‘𝑻𝒆𝒔𝒍𝒂 𝑾𝒊𝒓𝒆𝒍𝒆𝒔𝒔 𝑺𝒚𝒔𝒕𝒆𝒎.’ This system comprises a number of improvements and is the only means known for transmitting economically electrical energy to a distance without wires. Careful tests and measurements in connection with an experimental station of great activity, erected by the inventor in Colorado, have demonstrated that power in any desired amount can be conveyed, clear across the Globe if necessary, with a loss not exceeding a few per cent.

“4. The ‘𝑻𝒉𝒆 ‘𝑨𝒓𝒕 𝒐𝒇 𝑰𝒏𝒅𝒊𝒗𝒊𝒅𝒖𝒂𝒍𝒊𝒛𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏.’ This invention of Tesla is to primitive ‘tuning’ what refined language is to unarticulated expression. It makes possible the transmission of signals or messages absolutely secret and exclusive both in the active and passive aspect, that is, non-interfering as well as non-interferable. Each signal is like an individual of unmistakable identity and there is virtually no limit to the number of stations or instruments which can be simultaneously operated without the slightest mutual disturbance.

“5. ‘𝑻𝒉𝒆 𝒕𝒆𝒓𝒓𝒆𝒔𝒕𝒓𝒊𝒂𝒍 𝑺𝒕𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏𝒂𝒓𝒚 𝑾𝒂𝒗𝒆𝒔.’ This wonderful discovery, popularly explained, means that the Earth is responsive to electrical vibrations of definite pitch just as a tuning fork to certain waves of sound. These particular electrical vibrations, capable of powerfully exciting the Globe, lend themselves to innumerable uses of great importance commercially and in many other respects.

“The first ‘World-System’ power plant can be put in operation in nine months. With this power plant it will be practicable to attain electrical activities up to ten million horsepower and it is designed to serve for as many technical achievements as are possible without due expense. Among these the following may be mentioned:

“(1) The inter-connection of the existing telegraph exchanges or offices all over the world;

“(2) The establishment of a secret and non-interferable government telegraph service;

“(3) The inter-connection of all the present telephone exchanges or offices on the Globe;

“(4) The universal distribution of general news, by telegraph or telephone, in connection with the Press;

“(5) The establishment of such a ‘World-System’ of intelligence transmission for exclusive private use;

“(6) The inter-connection and operation of all stock tickers of the world;

“(7) The establishment of a ‘World-System’ of musical distribution, etc.;

“(8) The universal registration of time by cheap clocks indicating the hour with astronomical precision and requiring no attention whatever;

“(9) The world transmission of typed or handwritten characters, letters, checks, etc.;

“(10) The establishment of a universal marine service enabling the navigators of all ships to steer perfectly without compass, to determine the exact location, hour and speed, to prevent collisions and disasters, etc.;

“(11) The inauguration of a system of world-printing on land and sea;

“(12) The world reproduction of photographic pictures and all kinds of drawings or records.

I also proposed to make demonstrations in the wireless transmission of power on a small scale but sufficient to carry conviction. Besides these I referred to other and incomparably more important applications of my discoveries which will be disclosed at some future date.

A plant was built on Long Island with a tower 187 feet high, having a spherical terminal about 68 feet in diameter. These dimensions were adequate for the transmission of virtually any amount of energy. Originally only from 200 to 300 K.W. were provided but I intended to employ later several thousand horsepower. The transmitter was to emit a wave-complex of special characteristics and I had devised a unique method of telephonic control of any amount of energy.

The tower was destroyed two years ago but my projects are being developed and another one, improved in some features, will be constructed. On this occasion I would contradict the widely circulated report that the structure was demolished by the Government which owing to war conditions, might have created prejudice in the minds of those who may not know that the papers, which thirty years ago conferred upon me the honor of American citizenship, are always kept in a safe, while my orders, diplomas, degrees, gold medals and other distinctions are packed away in old trunks. If this report had a foundation I would have been refunded a large sum of money which I expended in the construction of the tower. On the contrary it was in the interest of the Government to preserve it, particularly as it would have made possible — to mention just one valuable result — the location of a submarine in any part of the world. My plant, services, and all my improvements have always been at the disposal of the officials and ever since the outbreak of the European conflict I have been working at a sacrifice on several inventions of mine relating to aerial navigation, ship propulsion and wireless transmission which are of the greatest importance to the country. Those who are well informed know that my ideas have revolutionized the industries of the United States and I am not aware that there lives an inventor who has been, in this respect, as fortunate as myself especially as regards the use of his improvements in the war. I have refrained from publicly expressing myself on this subject before as it seemed improper to dwell on personal matters while all the world was in dire trouble. I would add further, in view of various rumors which have reached me, that Mr. J. Pierpont Morgan did not interest himself with me in a business way but in the same large spirit in which he has assisted many other pioneers. He carried out his generous promise to the letter and it would have been most unreasonable to expect from him anything more. He had the highest regard for my attainments and gave me every evidence of his complete faith in my ability to ultimately achieve what I had set out to do. I am unwilling to accord to some small-minded and jealous individuals the satisfaction of having thwarted my efforts. These men are to me nothing more than microbes of a nasty disease. My project was retarded by laws of nature. The world was not prepared for it. It was too far ahead of time. But the same laws will prevail in the end and make it a triumphal success.


stylize font= x
insrt figrs tmplt= 2x+c
photocopy of original here=

__________________







__________________


*MY INVENTIONS IIIIII
MY INVENTIONS VI - THE ART OF TELAUTOMATICS
————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Experimenter
October, 1919 Page number(s): 506-508, 552, 554, 556, 600-601, 603


My friend, the Hon. Chauncey M. Dupew, tells of an Englishman on whom he sprung one of his original anecdotes and who listened with a puzzled expression, but a year later, laughed out loud. I will frankly confess it took me longer than that to appreciate Johnson’s joke. Now, my well-being is simply the result of a careful and measured mode of living and perhaps the most astonishing thing is that three times in my youth I was rendered by illness a hopeless physical wreck and given up by physicians. MORE than this, through ignorance and lightheartedness, I got into all sorts of difficulties, dangers and scrapes from which I extricated myself as by enchantment. I was almost drowned, entombed, lost and frozen. I had hair-breadth escapes from mad dogs, hogs, and other wild animals. I passed through dreadful diseases and met with all kinds of odd mishaps and that I am whole and hearty today seems like a miracle. But as I recall these incidents to my mind I feel convinced that my preservation was not altogether accidental,


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


FAMOUS SCIENTIFIC ILLUSIONS 🐇
————
by Nikola Tesla
𝘞𝘳𝘪𝘵𝘵𝘦𝘯 𝘴𝘱𝘦𝘤𝘪𝘧𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭𝘭𝘺 𝘧𝘰𝘳 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘌𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘌𝘹𝘱𝘦𝘳𝘪𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘦𝘳
Electrical Experimenter
February, 1919 Page number(s): 692-694, 728, 730 & 732-734


---
𝐈𝐧 𝐭𝐡𝐢𝐬 𝐨𝐫𝐢𝐠𝐢𝐧𝐚𝐥 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐫𝐞𝐯𝐨𝐥𝐮𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧𝐢𝐳𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐝𝐢𝐬𝐜𝐮𝐬𝐬𝐢𝐨𝐧, 𝐍𝐢𝐤𝐨𝐥𝐚 𝐓𝐞𝐬𝐥𝐚 𝐠𝐢𝐯𝐞𝐧 𝐮𝐬 𝐬𝐨𝐦𝐞𝐭𝐡𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐫𝐞𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐲 𝐧𝐞𝐰 𝐭𝐨 𝐭𝐡𝐢𝐧𝐤 𝐚𝐛𝐨𝐮𝐭. 𝐅𝐢𝐫𝐬𝐭 — 𝐃𝐨𝐞𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐦𝐨𝐨𝐧 𝐫𝐨𝐭𝐚𝐭𝐞 𝐨𝐧 𝐢𝐭𝐬 𝐚𝐱𝐢𝐬? 𝐒𝐞𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐝 — 𝐢𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐅𝐫𝐚𝐧𝐤𝐥𝐢𝐧 𝐩𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐞𝐝 𝐥𝐢𝐠𝐡𝐭𝐧𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐫𝐨𝐝 𝐜𝐨𝐫𝐫𝐞𝐜𝐭 𝐢𝐧 𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐨𝐫𝐲 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐨𝐩𝐞𝐫𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧? 𝐓𝐡𝐢𝐫𝐝 — 𝐃𝐨 𝐰𝐢𝐫𝐞𝐥𝐞𝐬𝐬 𝐬𝐢𝐠𝐧𝐚𝐥 𝐟𝐥𝐲 𝐭𝐡𝐫𝐮 𝐬𝐩𝐚𝐜𝐞 𝐛𝐲 𝐦𝐞𝐚𝐧𝐬 𝐨𝐟 𝐬𝐨-𝐜𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐞𝐝 𝐇𝐞𝐫𝐭𝐳𝐢𝐚𝐧 𝐰𝐚𝐯𝐞𝐬 𝐢𝐧 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐞𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐫, 𝐨𝐫 𝐚𝐫𝐞 𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐲 𝐩𝐫𝐨𝐩𝐚𝐠𝐚𝐭𝐞𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐫𝐮 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐞𝐚𝐫𝐭𝐡 𝐚𝐭 𝐩𝐫𝐨𝐝𝐢𝐠𝐢𝐨𝐮𝐬 𝐯𝐞𝐥𝐨𝐜𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐛𝐲 𝐦𝐞𝐚𝐧𝐬 𝐨𝐟 𝐞𝐚𝐫𝐭𝐡-𝐛𝐨𝐮𝐧𝐝 𝐨𝐬𝐜𝐢𝐥𝐥𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧𝐬? 𝐖𝐨𝐫𝐥𝐝-𝐟𝐚𝐦𝐨𝐮𝐬 𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐮𝐧𝐝𝐫𝐮𝐦𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐬𝐞 — 𝐪𝐮𝐞𝐬𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧𝐬 𝐰𝐡𝐢𝐜𝐡 𝐡𝐚𝐯𝐞 𝐛𝐞𝐞𝐧 𝐚𝐧𝐬𝐰𝐞𝐫𝐞𝐝 𝐢𝐧 𝐦𝐚𝐧𝐲 𝐰𝐚𝐲𝐬 𝐛𝐲 𝐬𝐨𝐦𝐞 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐠𝐫𝐞𝐚𝐭𝐞𝐬𝐭 𝐬𝐜𝐢𝐞𝐧𝐭𝐢𝐬𝐭𝐬. 𝐃𝐫. 𝐓𝐞𝐬𝐥𝐚 𝐞𝐱𝐩𝐥𝐚𝐢𝐧𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐬𝐞 𝐭𝐡𝐫𝐞𝐞 𝐩𝐫𝐞𝐝𝐨𝐦𝐢𝐧𝐚𝐧𝐭 𝐬𝐜𝐢𝐞𝐧𝐭𝐢𝐟𝐢𝐜 𝐟𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐚𝐜𝐢𝐞𝐬 𝐢𝐧 𝐚 𝐦𝐚𝐬𝐭𝐞𝐫𝐥𝐲 𝐰𝐚𝐲, 𝐬𝐨 𝐭𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐞𝐯𝐞𝐫𝐲𝐨𝐧𝐞 𝐜𝐚𝐧 𝐮𝐧𝐝𝐞𝐫𝐬𝐭𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐦.
---

------
For over a century and a half the whole world, educated and otherwise, thought that the moon revolved around its axis. Nikola Tesla in the present highly instructive article disproves that theory and will convince scientists and all others alike that the moon does so such thing.

For thousands of years it was thought that the sun and stars revolved around the earth and all kinds of experimental proofs were furnished to substantiate this theory. The illustrious Galileo thought different, and everyone today knows that the earth revolves around the sun.

So it is with Tesla’s discovery. Tesla also, in the second part of the present paper, shows us that the ancient and time-worn theory advanced by Benjamin Franklin as to the lightning conductor is not substantially correct as viewed by latter day science. It will come as a shock even to our professors that the lightning rod actually aids the lightning in hitting the building. The reason is that the lightning rod helps in ionizing (making conductive) the surrounding air.

Mr. Tesla has devised a lightning conductor with no points, and there is no doubt whatsoever that his theory is right. Scientists the world over will acknowledge this very shortly.

In a third section of the same paper Tesla explodes still another popular delusion, viz., that wireless waves follow the curvature of the earth when messages are transmitted, let us say from a point in the United States to a point in Europe. In his revolutionary arguments, supported by facts as well as by logic, Tesla shows why the currents do not travel around the earth but directly thru it. In other words, Tesla maintains that wireless communication is accomplished ONLY thru the medium of the earth itself. His contention seems very sound. If it were not so, let every wireless station, commercial or otherwise, do away with its ground connection. None could then operate as is well known, except perhaps over very limited distances.

Mr. Tesla’s present article will arouse world-wide comment due to the revolutionary philosophy contained therein. We are sure our readers will appreciate Mr. Tesla’s most timely and illuminating article on this but little understood subject.
------


𝐓HE human brain, with all its wonderful capabilities and power, is far from being a faultless apparatus. Most of its parts may be in perfect working order, but some are atrophied, undeveloped or missing altogether. Great men of all classes and pro-

---
figure  1
𝐈𝐭 𝐈𝐬 𝐖𝐞𝐥𝐥 𝐊𝐧𝐨𝐰𝐧 𝐓𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐨𝐨𝐧, 𝐌., 𝐀𝐥𝐰𝐚𝐲𝐬 𝐓𝐮𝐫𝐧𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐒𝐚𝐦𝐞 𝐅𝐚𝐜𝐞 𝐓𝐨𝐰𝐚𝐫𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐄𝐚𝐫𝐭𝐡, 𝐄, 𝐚𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐁𝐥𝐚𝐜𝐤 𝐀𝐫𝐫𝐨𝐰𝐬 𝐈𝐧𝐝𝐢𝐜𝐚𝐭𝐞. 𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐏𝐚𝐫𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐞𝐥 𝐑𝐚𝐲𝐬 𝐅𝐫𝐨𝐦 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐒𝐮𝐧 𝐈𝐥𝐥𝐮𝐦𝐢𝐧𝐚𝐭𝐞 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐨𝐨𝐧 𝐈𝐧 𝐈𝐭𝐬 𝐒𝐮𝐜𝐜𝐞𝐬𝐬𝐢𝐯𝐞 𝐎𝐫𝐛𝐢𝐭𝐚𝐥 𝐏𝐨𝐬𝐢𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧𝐬 𝐚𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐔𝐧𝐬𝐡𝐚𝐝𝐞𝐝 𝐒𝐞𝐦𝐢-𝐜𝐢𝐫𝐜𝐥𝐞𝐬 𝐈𝐧𝐝𝐢𝐜𝐚𝐭𝐞. 𝐁𝐞𝐚𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐓𝐡𝐢𝐬 𝐢𝐧 𝐌𝐢𝐧𝐝, 𝐃𝐨 𝐘𝐨𝐮 𝐁𝐞𝐥𝐢𝐞𝐯𝐞 𝐓𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐨𝐨𝐧 𝐑𝐨𝐭𝐚𝐭𝐞𝐬 𝐨𝐧 𝐈𝐭𝐬 𝐎𝐰𝐧 𝐀𝐱𝐢𝐬?
---
figure 2
𝐓𝐞𝐬𝐥𝐚'𝐬 𝐂𝐨𝐧𝐜𝐞𝐩𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐑𝐨𝐭𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐨𝐨𝐧, 𝐌, 𝐀𝐫𝐨𝐮𝐧𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐄𝐚𝐫𝐭𝐡, 𝐄; 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐨𝐨𝐧, 𝐈𝐧 𝐓𝐡𝐢𝐬 𝐃𝐞𝐦𝐨𝐧𝐬𝐭𝐫𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐇𝐲𝐩𝐨𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐬𝐢𝐬, 𝐁𝐞𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐂𝐨𝐧𝐬𝐢𝐝𝐞𝐫𝐞𝐝 𝐚𝐬 𝐄𝐦𝐛𝐞𝐝𝐝𝐞𝐝 𝐈𝐧 𝐚 𝐒𝐨𝐥𝐢𝐝 𝐌𝐚𝐬𝐬, 𝐌,. 𝐈𝐟, 𝐀𝐬 𝐂𝐨𝐦𝐦𝐨𝐧𝐥𝐲 𝐁𝐞𝐥𝐢𝐞𝐯𝐞𝐝, 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐨𝐨𝐧 𝐑𝐨𝐭𝐚𝐭𝐞𝐬, 𝐓𝐡𝐢𝐬 𝐖𝐨𝐮𝐥𝐝 𝐁𝐞 𝐄𝐪𝐮𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐲 𝐓𝐫𝐮𝐞 𝐅𝐨𝐫 𝐚 𝐏𝐨𝐫𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐚𝐬𝐬 𝐌?, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐏𝐚𝐫𝐭 𝐂𝐨𝐦𝐦𝐨𝐧 𝐭𝐨 𝐁𝐨𝐭𝐡 𝐁𝐨𝐝𝐢𝐞𝐬 𝐖𝐨𝐮𝐥𝐝 𝐓𝐮𝐫𝐧 𝐒𝐢𝐦𝐮𝐥𝐭𝐚𝐧𝐞𝐨𝐮𝐬𝐥𝐲 𝐈𝐧 "𝐎𝐩𝐩𝐨𝐬𝐢𝐭𝐞" 𝐃𝐢𝐫𝐞𝐜𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧𝐬.
---

fessions — scientists, inventors, and hard-headed financiers — have placed themselves on record with impossible theories, inoperative devices, and unrealizable schemes. It is doubtful that there could be found a single work of any one individual free of error. There is no such thing as an infallible brain. Invariably, some cells or fibers are wanting or unresponsive, with the result of impairing judgment, sense of proportion, or some other faculty. A man of genius eminently practical, whose name is a household word, has wasted the best years of his life in a visionary undertaking. A celebrated physicist was incapable of tracing the direction of an electric current according to a childishly simple rule. The writer, who was known to recite entire volumes by heart, has never been able to retain in memory and recapitulate in their proper order the words designating the colors of the rainbow, and can only ascertain them after long and laborious thought, strange as it may seem.

Our organs of reception, too, are deficient and deceptive. As a semblance of life is produced by a rapid succession of inanimate pictures, so many of our perceptions are but trickery of the senses, devoid of reality. The greatest triumphs of man were those in which his mind had to free itself from the influence of delusive appearances. Such was the revelation of Buddha that self is an illusion caused by the persistence and continuity of mental images: the discovery of Copernicus that, contrary to all observation, this planet rotates around the sun; the recognition of Descartes that the human being is an automaton, governed by external influence and the idea that the earth is spherical, which led Columbus to the finding of this continent. And tho the minds of individuals supplement one another and science and experience are continually eliminating fallacies and misconceptions, much of our present knowledge is still incomplete and unreliable. We have sophisms in mathematics which cannot be disproved. Even in pure reasoning, free of the shortcomings of symbolic processes, we are often arrested by doubt which the strongest intelligences have been unable to dispel. Experimental science itself, most positive of all, is not unfailing.

In the following I shall consider three exceptionally interesting errors in the interpretation and application of physical phenomena which have for years dominated the minds of experts and men of science.

𝐈. 𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐈𝐥𝐥𝐮𝐬𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐀𝐱𝐢𝐚𝐥 𝐑𝐨𝐭𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐨𝐨𝐧.

It is well known since the discovery of Galileo that the moon, in travelling thru space, always turns the same face towards the earth. This is explained by stating that while passing once around its mother-planet the lunar globe performs just one revolution on its axis. The spinning motion of a heavenly body must necessarily undergo modifications in the course of time, being either retarded by resistances internal or external, or accelerated owing to shrinkage and other causes. An unalterable rotational velocity thru all phases of planetary evolution is manifestly impossible. What wonder, then, that at this very instant of its long existence our satellite should revolve exactly so, and not faster or slower. But many astronomers have accepted as a physical fact that such rotation takes place. It does not, but only appears so; it is an illusion, a most surprising one, too.

I will endeavor to make this clear by reference to Fig. 1, in which 𝑬 represents the earth and 𝑴 the moon. The movement thru space is such that the arrow, firmly attached to the latter, always occupies the position indicated with reference to the earth. If one imagines himself as looking down on the orbital plane and follows the motion he will become convinced that the moon 𝒅𝒐𝒆𝒔 turn on its axis as it travels around. But in this very act the observer will have deceived himself. To make the delusion complete let him take a washer similarly marked and supporting it rotatably in the center, carry it around a stationary object, constantly keeping the arrow pointing towards the latter. Tho to his bodily vision the disk will revolve on its axis, such movement does not exist. He can dispel the illusion at once by holding the washer fixedly while going around. He will now readily see that the supposed axial rotation is only apparent, the impression being produced by successive changes of position in space.

But more convincing proofs can be given that the moon does not, and cannot revolve on its axis. With this object in view attention is called to Fig. 2, in which both the satellite, 𝑴, and earth, 𝑬, are shown embedded in a solid mass, 𝑴₁, (indicated by stippling) and supposed to rotate so as to impact to the moon its normal translatory velocity. Evidently, if the lunar globe could rotate as commonly believed, this would be equally true of any other portion of mass 𝑴₁, as the sphere 𝑴₂, shown in dotted lines, and then the part common to both bodies would have to turn 𝘴𝘪𝘮𝘶𝘭𝘵𝘢𝘯𝘦𝘰𝘶𝘴𝘭𝘺 𝘪𝘯 𝘰𝘱𝘱𝘰𝘴𝘪𝘵𝘦 𝘥𝘪𝘳𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯𝘴. This can be experimentally illustrated in the manner suggested by using instead of one, two overlapping rotatable washers, as may be conveniently represented by circles 𝑴 and 𝑴₂, and carrying them around a center as 𝑬, so that the plain and dotted arrows are always pointing towards the same center. No further argument is needed to demonstrate that the two gyrations cannot co-exist or even be pictured in the imagination and reconciled in a purely abstract sense.

The truth is, the so-called “axial rotation” of the moon is a phenomenon deceptive alike to the eye and mind and devoid of physical meaning. It has nothing in common with real mass revolution characterized by effects positive and unmistakable. Volumes have been written on the subject and many erroneous arguments advanced in support of the notion. Thus, it is reasoned, that if the planet did 𝙣𝙤𝙩 turn on its axis it would expose the whole surface to terrestrial view; as only one-half is visible, it 𝒎𝒖𝒔𝒕 revolve. The first statement is true but the logic of the second is defective, for it admits of only one alternative. 🐇 The conclusion is not justified as the same appearance can also be produced in another way. The moon does rotate, not on its own, 𝐛𝐮𝐭 𝐚𝐛𝐨𝐮𝐭 𝐚𝐧 𝐚𝐱𝐢𝐬 𝐩𝐚𝐬𝐬𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐭𝐡𝐫𝐮 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐜𝐞𝐧𝐭𝐞𝐫 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐞𝐚𝐫𝐭𝐡, 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐭𝐫𝐮𝐞 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐨𝐧𝐥𝐲 𝐨𝐧𝐞.

The unfailing test of the spinning of a mass is, however, the existence of energy of motion. The moon is not possest of such 𝒗𝒊𝒔 𝒗𝒊𝒗𝒂. If it were the case then a revolving body as 𝑴₁ would contain mechanical energy other than that of which we have experimental evidence. Irrespective of this so exact a coincidence between the axial and orbital periods is, in itself, immensely improbable for this is not the permanent condition towards which the system is tending. Any axial rotation of a mass left to itself, retarded by forces external or internal, must cease. Even admitting its perfect control by tides the coincidence would still be miraculous. But when we remember that most of the satellites exhibit this peculiarity, the probability becomes infinitestimal.

Three theories have been advanced for the origin of the moon. According to the oldest suggested by the great German philosopher Kant, and developed by Laplace in his monumental treatise “Mécanique Céleste,” the planets have been thrown off from larger central masses by centrifugal force. Nearly forty years ago Prof. George H. Darwin in a masterful essay on tidal friction furnished mathematical proofs, deemed unrefutable, that the moon had separated from the earth. Recently this established theory has been attacked by Prof. T. J. J. See in a remarkable work on the “Evolution of the Stellar Systems,” in which he propounds the view that centrifugal force was altogether inadequate to bring about the separation and that all planets, including the moon, have come from the depths of space and have been captured. Still a third hypothesis of unknown origin exists which has been examined and commented upon by Prof. W. H. Pickering in “Popular Astronomy of 1907,” and according to which the moon was torn from the earth when the later was partially solidified, this accounting for the continents which might not have been formed otherwise.

Undoubtedly planets and satellites have originated in both ways and, in my opinion, it is not difficult to ascertain the character of their birth. The following conclusions can be safely drawn:

1. A heavenly body thrown off from a larger one cannot rotate on its axis. The mass, rendered fluid by the combined action of heat and pressure, upon the reduction of the latter immediately stiffens, being at the same time deformed by gravitational pull. The shape becomes permanent upon cooling and solidification and the smaller mass continues to move about the larger one as tho it were rigidly connected to it except for pendular swings or librations due to varying orbital velocity. Such motion precludes the possibility of axial rotation in the strictly physical sense. The moon has never spun around as is well demonstrated by the fact that the most precise measurements have failed to show any measurable flattening in form.

2. If a planetary body in its orbital movement turns the same side towards the central mass this is a positive proof that it has been separated from the latter and is a true satellite.

3. A planet revolving on its axis in its passage around another cannot have been thrown off from the same but must have been captured.

𝐈𝐈. 𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐅𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐚𝐜𝐲 𝐨𝐟 𝐅𝐫𝐚𝐧𝐤𝐥𝐢𝐧’𝐬 𝐏𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐞𝐝 𝐋𝐢𝐠𝐡𝐭𝐧𝐢𝐧𝐠-𝐑𝐨𝐝.

The display of atmospheric electricity has since ages been one of the most marvelous spectacles afforded to the sight of man. Its grandeur and power filled him with fear and superstition. For centuries he attributed lightning to agents god-like and supernatural and its purpose in the scheme of this universe remained unknown to him. Now we have learned that the waters of the ocean are raised by the sun and maintained in the atmosphere delicately suspended, that they are wafted to distant regions of the globe where electric forces assert themselves in upsetting the sensitive balance and causing precipitation, thus sustaining all organic life. There is every reason to hope that man will soon be able to control this life-giving flow of water and thereby solve many pressing problems of his existence.

Atmospheric electricity became of special scientific interest in Franklin’s time. Faraday had not yet announced his epochal discoveries in magnetic induction but static frictional machines were already generally used in physical laboratories. Franklin’s powerful mind at once leaped to the conclusion that frictional and atmospheric electricity were identical. To our present view this inference appears obvious, but in his time the mere thought of it was little short of blasphemy. He investigated the phenomena and argued that if they were of the same nature then the clouds could be drained of their charge exactly as the ball of a static machine, and in 1749 he indicated in a publisht memoir how this could be done by the use of pointed metal rods.

The earliest trials were made by Dalibrand in France, but Franklin himself was the first to obtain a spark by using a kite, in June, 1752. When these atmospheric discharges manifest themselves today in our wireless station we feel annoyed and wish that they would stop, but to the man who discovered them they brought tears of joy.

The lightning conductor in its classical form was invented by Benjamin Franklin in 1755 and immediately upon its adoption proved a success to a degree. As usual, however, its virtues were often exaggerated. So, for instance, it was seriously claimed that in the city of Pietermaritzburg (capital of Natal, South Africa) no lightning strokes occurred after the pointed rods were installed, altho the storms were as frequent as before. Experience has shown that just the opposite is true. A modern city like New York, presenting innumerable sharp points and projections in good contact with the earth, is struck much more often than equivalent area of land. Statistical records, carefully compiled and publisht from time to time, demonstrate that the danger from lightning to property and life has been reduced to a small percentage by Franklin’s invention, but the damage by fire amounts, nevertheless, to several million dollars annually. It is astonishing that this device, which has been in universal use for more than one century and a half, should be found to involve a gross fallacy in design and construction which impairs its usefulness and may even render its employment hazardous under certain conditions.

For explanation of this curious fact I may first refer to Fig. 3, in which 𝙨 is a metallic sphere of radius 𝙧, such as the capacity terminal of a static machine, provided with a sharply pointed pin of length 𝙝, as indicated. It is well known that the latter has the property of quickly dissipating the accumulated charge into the air. To examine this action in the light of present knowledge we may liken electric potential to temperature. Imagine that sphere 𝒔 is heated to 𝙏 degrees and that the pin or metal bar is a perfect conductor of heat so that its extreme end is at the same temperature 𝙏. Then if another sphere of larger radius, 𝙫₁, is drawn about the first and the temperature along this boundary is 𝙏₁, it is evident that there will be between the end of the bar and its surrounding a difference of temperature 𝙏 — 𝙏₁, which will determine the outflow of heat. Obviously, if the adjacent medium was not affected by the hot sphere this temperature difference would be greater and more heat would be given off. Exactly so in the electric system. Let 𝙦 be the quantity of the charge, then the sphere — and owing to its great conductivity also the pin — will be at the potential 𝙦 / 𝙧. The medium around the point of the pin will be at the potential 𝙦 / 𝙧₁ = 𝙦 / (𝙧 + 𝙝) and, consequently, the difference 𝙦 / 𝙧 — 𝙦 / (𝙧 + 𝙝) = 𝙦 𝙝 / 𝙧 (𝙧 + 𝙝). Suppose now that a sphere 𝙎 of much larger radius 𝙍 = 𝙣𝙧 is employed containing a charge 𝙌 this difference of potential will be, analogously 𝙌𝙝 / 𝙍 (𝙍 + 𝙝). According to elementary principles of electro-statics the potentials of the two spheres 𝙨 and 𝙎 will be equal if 𝙌 = 𝙣𝙦 in which case 𝙌𝙝 / 𝙍 (𝙍 + 𝙝) = 𝙣𝙦𝙝 / 𝙣𝙧 (𝙣𝙧 + 𝙝) = 𝙦𝙝 / 𝙧 (𝙣𝙧 + 𝙝). Thus the difference of potential between the point of the pin and the medium around the same will be smaller in the ratio 𝙧 + 𝙝 / 𝙣𝙧 + 𝙝 when the large sphere is used. In many scientific tests and experiments this important observation has been disregarded with the result of causing serious errors. Its significance is that the behavior of the pointed rod entirely depends on the linear dimensions of the electrified body. Its quality to give off the charge may be entirely lost if the latter is very large. For this reason, all points or projections on the surface of a conductor of such vast dimensions as the earth would be quite ineffective were it not for other influences. These will be elucidated with reference to Fig. 4, in which our artist of the Impressionist school has emphasized Franklin’s notion that his rod was drawing electricity from the clouds. If the earth were not surrounded by an atmosphere which is generally oppositely charged it would behave, despite all its irregularities of surface, like a polished sphere. But owing to the electrified masses of air and cloud the distribution is greatly modified. Thus in Fig. 4, the positive charge of the cloud induces in the earth an equivalent 𝒐𝒑𝒑𝒐𝒔𝒊𝒕𝒆 charge, the density at the surface of the latter diminishing with the cube of the distance from the static center of the cloud. A brush discharge is then formed at the point of the rod and the action Franklin anticipated takes place. In addition, the surrounding air is ionized and rendered conducting and, eventually, a bolt may hit the building or some other object in the vicinity. The virtue of the pointed end to dissipate the charge, which was uppermost in Franklin’s mind is, however, infinitesimal. 𝑪𝒂𝒓𝒆𝒇𝒖𝒍 𝒎𝒆𝒂𝒔𝒖𝒓𝒆𝒎𝒆𝒏𝒕𝒔 𝒔𝒉𝒐𝒘 𝒕𝒉𝒂𝒕 𝒊𝒕 𝒘𝒐𝒖𝒍𝒅 𝒕𝒂𝒌𝒆 𝒎𝒂𝒏𝒚 𝒚𝒆𝒂𝒓𝒔 𝒃𝒆𝒇𝒐𝒓𝒆 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒆𝒍𝒆𝒄𝒕𝒓𝒊𝒄𝒊𝒕𝒚 𝒔𝒕𝒐𝒓𝒆𝒅 𝒊𝒏 𝒂 𝒔𝒊𝒏𝒈𝒍𝒆 𝒄𝒍𝒐𝒖𝒅 𝒐𝒇 𝒎𝒐𝒅𝒆𝒓𝒂𝒕𝒆 𝒔𝒊𝒛𝒆 𝒘𝒐𝒖𝒍𝒅 𝒃𝒆 𝒅𝒓𝒂𝒘𝒏 𝒐𝒇𝒇 𝒐𝒓 𝒏𝒆𝒖𝒕𝒓𝒂𝒍𝒊𝒛𝒆𝒅 𝒕𝒉𝒓𝒖 𝒔𝒖𝒄𝒉 𝒂 𝒍𝒊𝒈𝒉𝒕𝒏𝒊𝒏𝒈 𝒄𝒐𝒏𝒅𝒖𝒄𝒕𝒐𝒓. The grounded rod has the quality of rendering harmless most of the strokes it receives, tho occasionally the charge is diverted with damaging results. But, what is very important to note, it invites danger and hazard on account of the fallacy involved in its design. The sharp point which was thought advantageous and indispensable to its operation, is really a defect detracting considerably from the practical value of the device. I have produced a much improved form of lightning protector characterized by the employment of a terminal of considerable area and large radius of curvature which makes impossible undue density of the charge and ionization of the air.* 𝑻𝒉𝒆𝒔𝒆 𝒑𝒓𝒐𝒕𝒆𝒄𝒕𝒐𝒓𝒔 𝒂𝒄𝒕 𝒂𝒔 𝒒𝒖𝒂𝒔𝒊-𝒓𝒆𝒑𝒆𝒍𝒍𝒆𝒏𝒕𝒔 𝒂𝒏𝒅 𝒔𝒐 𝒇𝒂𝒓 𝒉𝒂𝒗𝒆 𝒏𝒆𝒗𝒆𝒓 𝒃𝒆𝒆𝒏 𝒔𝒕𝒓𝒖𝒄𝒌 𝒕𝒉𝒐 𝒆𝒙𝒑𝒐𝒔𝒆𝒅 𝒂 𝒍𝒐𝒏𝒈 𝒕𝒊𝒎𝒆. Their safety is experimentally demonstrated to greatly exceed that invented by Franklin. By their use property worth millions of dollars which is now annually lost, can be saved.

* Refer to the October, 1918, issue of this journal wherein Dr. Tesla’s new form of non-pointed lightning rod was fully described and illustrated.

𝐈𝐈𝐈. 𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐒𝐢𝐧𝐠𝐮𝐥𝐚𝐫 𝐌𝐢𝐬𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐜𝐞𝐩𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐖𝐢𝐫𝐞𝐥𝐞𝐬𝐬.

To the popular mind this sensational advance conveys the impression of a single invention but in reality it is an art, the successful practise of which involves the employment of a great many discoveries and improvements. I viewed it as such when I undertook to solve wireless problems and it is due to this fact that my insight into its underlying principles was clear from their very inception.

In the course of development of my induction motors it became desirable to operate them at high speeds and for this purpose I constructed alternators of relatively high frequencies. The striking behavior of the currents soon captivated my attention and in 1889 I started a systematic investigation of their properties and the possibilities of practical application. The first gratifying result of my efforts in this direction was the transmission of electrical energy thru 𝒐𝒏𝒆 𝒘𝒊𝒓𝒆 without return, of which I gave demonstrations in my lectures and addresses before several scientific bodies here and abroad in 1891 and 1892. During that period, while working with my oscillation transformers and dynamos of frequencies up to 200,000 cycles per second, the idea gradually took hold of me that the earth might be used in place of the wire, thus dispensing with artificial conductors altogether. The immensity of the globe seemed an unsurmountable obstacle but after a prolonged study of the subject I became satisfied that the undertaking was rational, and in my lectures before the Franklin Institute and National Electric Light Association early in 1893 I gave the outline of the system I had conceived. In the latter part of that year, at the Chicago World’s Fair, I had the good fortune of meeting Prof. Helmholtz to whom I explained my plan, illustrating it with experiments. On that occasion I asked the celebrated physicist for an expression of opinion on the feasibility of the scheme. He stated unhesitatingly that it was practicable, provided I could perfect apparatus capable of putting it into effect but this, he anticipated, would be extremely difficult to accomplish.

I resumed the work very much encouraged and from that date to 1896 advanced slowly but steadily, making a number of improvements the chief of which was my system of 𝒄𝒐𝒏𝒄𝒂𝒕𝒆𝒏𝒂𝒕𝒆𝒅 𝒕𝒖𝒏𝒆𝒅 𝒄𝒊𝒓𝒄𝒖𝒊𝒕𝒔 and method of regulation, now universally adopted. In the summer of 1897 Lord Kelvin happened to pass thru New York and honored me by a visit to my laboratory where I entertained him with demonstrations in support of my wireless theory. He was fairly carried away with what he saw but, nevertheless, condemned my project in emphatic terms, qualifying it as something impossible, “an illusion and a snare.” I had expected his approval and was pained and surprised. But the next day he returned and gave me a better opportunity for explanation of the advances I had made and of the true principles underlying the system I had evolved. Suddenly he remarked with evident astonishment: “Then you are not making use of Hertz waves?” “Certainly not,” I replied, “𝒕𝒉𝒆𝒔𝒆 𝒂𝒓𝒆 𝒓𝒂𝒅𝒊𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏𝒔. No energy could be economically transmitted to a distance by any such agency. In my system the process is one of 𝒕𝒓𝒖𝒆 𝒄𝒐𝒏𝒅𝒖𝒄𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏 which, theoretically, can be effected at the greatest distance without appreciable loss.” I can never forget the magic change that came over the illustrious philosopher the moment he freed himself from that erroneous impression. The skeptic who would not believe was suddenly transformed into the warmest of supporters. He parted from me not only thoroly convinced of the scientific soundness of the idea but strongly exprest his confidence in its success. In my exposition to him I resorted to the following mechanical analogues of my own and the Hertz wave system.

Imagine the earth to be a bag of rubber filled with water, a small quantity of which is periodically forced in and out of the same by means of a reciprocating pump, as illustrated. If the strokes of the latter are effected in intervals of more than one hour and forty-eight minutes, sufficient for the transmission of the impulse thru the whole mass, the entire bag will expand and contract and corresponding movements will be imparted to pressure gauges or movable pistons with the same intensity, irrespective of distance. By working the pump faster, shorter waves will be produced which, on reaching the opposite end of the bag, may be reflected and give rise to stationary nodes and loops, but in any case, the fluid being incompressible, its inclosure perfectly elastic, and the frequency of oscillations not very high, the energy will be economically transmitted and very little power consumed so long as no work is done in the receivers. This is a crude but correct representation of my wireless system in which, however, I resort to various refinements. Thus, for instance, the pump is made part of a resonant system of great inertia, enormously magnifying the force of the imprest impulses. The receiving devices are similarly conditioned and in this manner the amount of energy collected in them vastly increased.

The Hertz wave system is in many respects the very opposite of this. To explain it by analogy, the piston of the pump is assumed to vibrate to and fro at a terrific rate and the orifice thru which the fluid passes in and out of the cylinder is reduced to a small hole. There is scarcely any movement of the fluid and almost the whole work performed results in the production of radiant heat, of which an infinitesimal part is recovered in a remote locality. However incredible, it is true that the minds of some of the ablest experts have been from the beginning, and still are, obsest by this monstrous idea, and so it comes that the true wireless art, to which I laid the foundation in 1893, has been retarded in its development for twenty years. This is the reason why the “statics” have proved unconquerable, why the wireless shares are of little value and why the Government has been compelled to interfere.

We are living on a planet of well-nigh inconceivable dimensions, surrounded by a layer of insulating air above which is a rarefied and conducting atmosphere (Fig. 5). This is providential, for if all the air were conducting the transmission of electrical energy thru the natural media would be impossible. My early experiments have shown that currents of high frequency and great tension readily pass thru an atmosphere but moderately rarefied, so that the insulating stratum is reduced to a small thickness as will be evident by inspection of Fig. 6, in which a part of the earth and its gaseous envelope is shown to scale. If the radius of the sphere is 12½”, then the non-conducting layer is only 1/64″ thick and it will be obvious that the Hertzian rays cannot traverse so thin a crack between two conducting surfaces for any considerable distance, without being absorbed. The theory has been seriously advanced that these radiations pass around the globe by 𝒔𝒖𝒄𝒄𝒆𝒔𝒔𝒊𝒗𝒆 𝒓𝒆𝒇𝒍𝒆𝒄𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏𝒔, but to show the absurdity of this suggestion reference is made to Fig. 7 in which this process is diagrammatically indicated. Assuming that there is no refraction, the rays, as shown on the right, would travel along the sides of a polygon drawn around the solid, and inscribed into the conducting gaseous boundary in which case the length of the side would be about 400 miles. As one-half the circumference of the earth is approximately 12,000 miles long there will be, roughly, thirty deviations. The efficiency of such a reflector cannot be more than 25 per cent, so that if none of the energy of the transmitter were lost in other ways, the part recovered would be measured by the fraction (¼)³⁰. Let the transmitter radiate Hertz waves at the rate of 1,000 kilowatts. Then about 𝒐𝒏𝒆 𝒉𝒖𝒏𝒅𝒓𝒆𝒅 𝒂𝒏𝒅 𝒇𝒊𝒇𝒕𝒆𝒆𝒏 𝒃𝒊𝒍𝒍𝒊𝒐𝒏𝒕𝒉 𝒑𝒂𝒓𝒕 𝒐𝒇 𝒐𝒏𝒆 𝒘𝒂𝒕𝒕 is all that would be collected in a 𝒑𝒆𝒓𝒇𝒆𝒄𝒕 receiver. In truth, the reflections would be much more numerous as shown on the left of the figure, and owing to this and other reasons, on which it is unnecessary to dwell, the amount recovered would be a vanishing quantity.

Consider now the process taking place in the transmission by the instrumentalities and methods of my invention. For this purpose attention is called to Fig. 8, which gives an idea of the mode of propagation of the current waves and is largely self-explanatory. The drawing represents a solar eclipse with the shadow of the moon just touching the surface of the earth at a point where the transmitter is located. As the shadow moves downward it will spread over the earth’s surface, first with infinite and then gradually diminishing velocity until at a distance of about 6,000 miles it will attain its true speed in space. From there on it will proceed with increasing velocity, reaching infinite value at the opposite point of the globe. It hardly need be stated that this is merely an illustration and not an accurate representation in the astronomical sense.

The exact law will be readily understood by reference to Fig. 9, in which a transmitting circuit is shown connected to earth and to an antenna. The transmitter being in action, two effects are produced: Hertz waves pass thru the air, and a current traverses the earth. The former propagate with the speed of light and their energy is 𝒖𝒏𝒓𝒆𝒄𝒐𝒗𝒆𝒓𝒂𝒃𝒍𝒆 in the circuit. The latter proceeds with the speed varying as the cosecant of the angle which a radius drawn from any point under consideration forms with the axis of symmetry of the waves. At the origin the speed is infinite but gradually diminishes until a quadrant is traversed, when the velocity is that of light. From there on it again increases, becoming infinite at the antipole. Theoretically the energy of this current is 𝒓𝒆𝒄𝒐𝒗𝒆𝒓𝒂𝒃𝒍𝒆 in its entirety, in properly attuned receivers.


---
figure 3
𝐃𝐢𝐚𝐠𝐫𝐚𝐦 𝐔𝐬𝐞𝐝 𝐭𝐨 𝐄𝐱𝐩𝐥𝐚𝐢𝐧 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐅𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐚𝐜𝐲 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐅𝐫𝐚𝐧𝐤𝐥𝐢𝐧 𝐏𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐞𝐝 𝐋𝐢𝐠𝐡𝐭𝐧𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐑𝐨𝐝, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐚𝐧 𝐀𝐧𝐚𝐥𝐨𝐠𝐲 𝐖𝐡𝐞𝐫𝐞𝐛𝐲 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐀𝐮𝐭𝐡𝐨𝐫 𝐒𝐡𝐨𝐰𝐬 𝐈𝐧 𝐚 𝐂𝐥𝐞𝐚𝐫 𝐌𝐚𝐧𝐧𝐞𝐫 𝐇𝐨𝐰 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐂𝐡𝐚𝐫𝐠𝐞𝐝 𝐒𝐩𝐡𝐞𝐫𝐞 𝐌𝐚𝐲 𝐟𝐨𝐫 𝐈𝐥𝐥𝐮𝐬𝐭𝐫𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐛𝐞 𝐂𝐨𝐧𝐬𝐢𝐝𝐞𝐫𝐞𝐝 𝐚𝐬 𝐇𝐞𝐚𝐭𝐞𝐝 𝐭𝐨 𝐚 𝐇𝐢𝐠𝐡 𝐃𝐞𝐠𝐫𝐞𝐞, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐇𝐞𝐚𝐭 𝐀𝐥𝐥𝐨𝐰𝐞𝐝 𝐭𝐨 𝐄𝐬𝐜𝐚𝐩𝐞 𝐚𝐭 𝐚 𝐊𝐧𝐨𝐰𝐧 𝐑𝐚𝐭𝐞.
---
figure 4
𝐓𝐞𝐬𝐥𝐚 𝐄𝐱𝐩𝐥𝐚𝐢𝐧𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐅𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐚𝐜𝐲 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐅𝐫𝐚𝐧𝐤𝐥𝐢𝐧 𝐏𝐨𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐞𝐝 𝐋𝐢𝐠𝐡𝐭𝐧𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐑𝐨𝐝, 𝐇𝐞𝐫𝐞 𝐈𝐥𝐥𝐮𝐬𝐭𝐫𝐚𝐭𝐞𝐝, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐒𝐡𝐨𝐰𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐔𝐬𝐮𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐲 𝐒𝐮𝐜𝐡 𝐚 𝐑𝐨𝐝 𝐂𝐨𝐮𝐥𝐝 𝐍𝐨𝐭 𝐃𝐫𝐚𝐰 𝐎𝐟𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐞𝐥𝐞𝐜𝐭𝐫𝐢𝐜𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐈𝐧 𝐚 𝐒𝐢𝐧𝐠𝐥𝐞 𝐂𝐥𝐨𝐮𝐝 𝐈𝐧 𝐌𝐚𝐧𝐲 𝐘𝐞𝐚𝐫𝐬. 𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐃𝐞𝐧𝐬𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐃𝐨𝐭𝐬 𝐈𝐧𝐝𝐢𝐜𝐚𝐭𝐞𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐈𝐧𝐭𝐞𝐧𝐬𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐂𝐡𝐚𝐫𝐠𝐞𝐬.
---
figure 5 & 6
𝐀 𝐒𝐞𝐜𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐄𝐚𝐫𝐭𝐡 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐈𝐭𝐬 𝐀𝐭𝐦𝐨𝐬𝐩𝐡𝐞𝐫𝐢𝐜 𝐄𝐧𝐯𝐞𝐥𝐨𝐩𝐞 𝐃𝐫𝐚𝐰𝐧 𝐭𝐨 𝐒𝐜𝐚𝐥𝐞. 𝐈𝐭 𝐢𝐬 𝐎𝐛𝐯𝐢𝐨𝐮𝐬 𝐓𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐇𝐞𝐫𝐭𝐳𝐢𝐚𝐧 𝐑𝐚𝐲𝐬 𝐂𝐚𝐧𝐧𝐨𝐭 𝐓𝐫𝐚𝐯𝐞𝐫𝐬𝐞 𝐒𝐨 𝐓𝐡𝐢𝐧 𝐚 𝐂𝐫𝐚𝐜𝐤 𝐁𝐞𝐭𝐰𝐞𝐞𝐧 𝐓𝐰𝐨 𝐂𝐨𝐧𝐝𝐮𝐜𝐭𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐒𝐮𝐫𝐟𝐚𝐜𝐞𝐬 𝐅𝐨𝐫 𝐀𝐧𝐲 𝐂𝐨𝐧𝐬𝐢𝐝𝐞𝐫𝐚𝐛𝐥𝐞 𝐃𝐢𝐬𝐭𝐚𝐧𝐜𝐞. 𝐖𝐢𝐭𝐡𝐨𝐮𝐭 𝐁𝐞𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐀𝐛𝐬𝐨𝐫𝐛𝐞𝐝, 𝐒𝐚𝐲𝐬 𝐃𝐫. 𝐓𝐞𝐬𝐥𝐚, 𝐢𝐧 𝐃𝐢𝐬𝐜𝐮𝐬𝐬𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐄𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐫 𝐒𝐩𝐚𝐜𝐞 𝐖𝐚𝐯𝐞 𝐓𝐡𝐞𝐨𝐫𝐲.
---
figure 7
𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐓𝐡𝐞𝐨𝐫𝐲 𝐇𝐚𝐬 𝐁𝐞𝐞𝐧 𝐒𝐞𝐫𝐢𝐨𝐮𝐬𝐥𝐲 𝐀𝐝𝐯𝐚𝐧𝐜𝐞𝐝 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐓𝐚𝐮𝐠𝐡𝐭 𝐭𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐑𝐚𝐝𝐢𝐨 𝐄𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐫 𝐖𝐚𝐯𝐞 𝐎𝐬𝐜𝐢𝐥𝐥𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧𝐬 𝐏𝐚𝐬𝐬 𝐀𝐫𝐨𝐮𝐧𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐄𝐚𝐫𝐭𝐡 𝐛𝐲 𝐒𝐮𝐜𝐜𝐞𝐬𝐬𝐢𝐯𝐞 𝐑𝐞𝐟𝐥𝐞𝐜𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧𝐬, 𝐚𝐬 𝐇𝐞𝐫𝐞 𝐒𝐡𝐨𝐰𝐧. 𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐄𝐟𝐟𝐢𝐜𝐢𝐞𝐧𝐜𝐲 𝐨𝐟 𝐒𝐮𝐜𝐡 𝐚 𝐑𝐞𝐟𝐥𝐞𝐜𝐭𝐨𝐫 𝐂𝐚𝐧𝐧𝐨𝐭 𝐛𝐞 𝐦𝐨𝐫𝐞 𝐭𝐡𝐚𝐧 𝟐𝟓 𝐏𝐞𝐫 𝐂𝐞𝐧𝐭; 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐀𝐦𝐨𝐮𝐧𝐭 𝐨𝐟 𝐄𝐧𝐞𝐫𝐠𝐲 𝐑𝐞𝐜𝐨𝐯𝐞𝐫𝐚𝐛𝐥𝐞 𝐢𝐬 𝐚 𝟏𝟐,𝟎𝟎𝟎-𝐦𝐢𝐥𝐞 𝐓𝐫𝐚𝐧𝐬𝐦𝐢𝐬𝐬𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐛𝐞𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐛𝐮𝐭 𝐎𝐧𝐞 𝐇𝐮𝐧𝐝𝐫𝐞𝐝 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐅𝐢𝐟𝐭𝐞𝐞𝐧 𝐁𝐢𝐥𝐥𝐢𝐨𝐧𝐭𝐡 𝐏𝐚𝐫𝐭 𝐨𝐟 𝐎𝐧𝐞 𝐖𝐚𝐭𝐭, 𝐰𝐢𝐭𝐡 𝟏.𝟎𝟎𝟎 𝐊𝐢𝐥𝐨𝐰𝐚𝐭𝐭𝐬 𝐚𝐭 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐓𝐫𝐚𝐧𝐬𝐦𝐢𝐭𝐭𝐞𝐫.
---
figure 8
𝐓𝐡𝐢𝐬 𝐃𝐢𝐚𝐠𝐫𝐚𝐦 𝐈𝐥𝐥𝐮𝐬𝐭𝐫𝐚𝐭𝐞𝐬 𝐇𝐨𝐰, 𝐃𝐮𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐚 𝐒𝐨𝐥𝐚𝐫 𝐄𝐜𝐥𝐢𝐩𝐬𝐞, 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐨𝐨𝐧'𝐬 𝐒𝐡𝐚𝐝𝐨𝐰 𝐏𝐚𝐬𝐬𝐞𝐬 𝐎𝐯𝐞𝐫 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐄𝐚𝐫𝐭𝐡 𝐖𝐢𝐭𝐡 𝐂𝐡𝐚𝐧𝐠𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐕𝐞𝐥𝐨𝐜𝐢𝐭𝐲, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐒𝐡𝐨𝐮𝐥𝐝 𝐁𝐞 𝐒𝐭𝐮𝐝𝐢𝐞𝐝 𝐈𝐧 𝐂𝐨𝐧𝐧𝐞𝐜𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐖𝐢𝐭𝐡 𝐅𝐢𝐠. 𝟗. 𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐒𝐡𝐚𝐝𝐨𝐰 𝐌𝐨𝐯𝐞𝐬 𝐃𝐨𝐰𝐧𝐰𝐚𝐫𝐝 𝐖𝐢𝐭𝐡 𝐈𝐧𝐟𝐢𝐧𝐢𝐭𝐞 𝐕𝐞𝐥𝐨𝐜𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐚𝐭 𝐅𝐢𝐫𝐬𝐭. 𝐓𝐡𝐞𝐧 𝐖𝐢𝐭𝐡 𝐈𝐭𝐬 𝐓𝐫𝐮𝐞 𝐕𝐞𝐥𝐨𝐜𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐓𝐡𝐫𝐮 𝐒𝐩𝐚𝐜𝐞, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐅𝐢𝐧𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐲 𝐖𝐢𝐭𝐡 𝐈𝐧𝐟𝐢𝐧𝐢𝐭𝐞 𝐕𝐞𝐥𝐨𝐜𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐀𝐠𝐚𝐢𝐧.
---
figure 9
𝐓𝐡𝐞𝐨𝐫𝐲.
---

Some experts, whom I have credited with better knowledge, have for years contended that my proposals to transmit power without wires are sheer nonsense but I note that they are growing more cautious every day. The latest objection to my system is found in the cheapness of gasoline. These men labor under the impression that the energy flows in all directions and that, therefore, only a minute amount can be recovered in any individual receiver. But this is far from being so. The power is conveyed in only one direction, from the transmitter to the receiver, and none of it is lost elsewhere. It is perfectly practicable to recover at any point of the globe energy enough for driving an airplane, or a pleasure boat or for lighting a dwelling. I am especially sanguine in regard to the lighting of isolated places and believe that a more economical and convenient method can hardly be devised. The future will show whether my foresight is as accurate now as it has proved heretofore.


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


THE MOON'S ROTATION 🐇
————
by NIKOLA TESLA
Electrical Experimenter
April, 1919 Page number(s): 866 & 892


---
figure 1
𝐈𝐟 𝐘𝐨𝐮 𝐒𝐭𝐢𝐥𝐥 𝐓𝐡𝐢𝐧𝐤 𝐓𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐨𝐨𝐧 𝐑𝐨𝐭𝐚𝐭𝐞 𝐨𝐧 𝐈𝐭𝐬 𝐀𝐱𝐢𝐬, 𝐋𝐨𝐨𝐤 𝐚𝐭 𝐓𝐡𝐢𝐬 𝐃𝐢𝐚𝐠𝐫𝐚𝐦 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐅𝐨𝐥𝐥𝐨𝐰 𝐂𝐥𝐨𝐬𝐞𝐥𝐲 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐒𝐮𝐜𝐜𝐞𝐬𝐬𝐢𝐯𝐞 𝐏𝐨𝐬𝐢𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧𝐬 𝐓𝐚𝐤𝐞𝐧 𝐛𝐲 𝐎𝐧𝐞 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐁𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐬 𝐌 𝐖𝐡𝐢𝐥𝐞 𝐈𝐭 𝐢𝐬 𝐑𝐨𝐭𝐚𝐭𝐞𝐝 𝐛𝐲 𝐚 𝐒𝐩𝐨𝐤𝐞 𝐨𝐟 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐖𝐡𝐞𝐞𝐥. 𝐒𝐮𝐛𝐬𝐭𝐢𝐭𝐮𝐭𝐞 𝐆𝐫𝐚𝐯𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐟𝐨𝐫 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐒𝐩𝐨𝐤𝐞 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐀𝐧𝐚𝐥𝐨𝐠𝐲 𝐒𝐨𝐥𝐯𝐞𝐬 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐌𝐨𝐨𝐧 𝐑𝐨𝐭𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐑𝐢𝐝𝐝𝐥𝐞.
---

------
𝑾𝒆 𝒃𝒆𝒍𝒊𝒆𝒗𝒆 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒂𝒄𝒄𝒐𝒎𝒑𝒂𝒏𝒚𝒊𝒏𝒈 𝒊𝒍𝒍𝒖𝒔𝒕𝒓𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏 𝒂𝒏𝒅 𝒊𝒕𝒔 𝒆𝒙𝒑𝒍𝒂𝒏𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏 𝒘𝒊𝒍𝒍 𝒅𝒊𝒔𝒑𝒆𝒍 𝒂𝒍𝒍 𝒅𝒐𝒖𝒃𝒕𝒔 𝒂𝒔 𝒕𝒐 𝒘𝒉𝒆𝒕𝒉𝒆𝒓 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒎𝒐𝒐𝒏 𝒓𝒐𝒕𝒂𝒕𝒆𝒔 𝒐𝒏 𝒊𝒕𝒔 𝒂𝒙𝒊𝒔 𝒐𝒓 𝒏𝒐𝒕. 𝑬𝒂𝒄𝒉 𝒐𝒇 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒃𝒂𝒍𝒍𝒔, 𝒂𝒔 𝑴, 𝒅𝒆𝒑𝒊𝒄𝒕𝒔 𝒂 𝒅𝒊𝒇𝒇𝒆𝒓𝒆𝒏𝒕 𝒑𝒐𝒔𝒊𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏 𝒐𝒇, 𝒂𝒏𝒅 𝒓𝒐𝒕𝒂𝒕𝒆𝒔 𝒆𝒙𝒂𝒄𝒕𝒍𝒚 𝒍𝒊𝒌𝒆, 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒎𝒐𝒐𝒏 𝒌𝒆𝒆𝒑𝒊𝒏𝒈 𝒂𝒍𝒘𝒂𝒚𝒔 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒔𝒂𝒎𝒆 𝒇𝒂𝒄𝒆 𝒕𝒖𝒓𝒏𝒆𝒅 𝒕𝒐𝒘𝒂𝒓𝒅𝒔 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒄𝒆𝒏𝒕𝒆𝒓 𝑶, 𝒓𝒆𝒑𝒓𝒆𝒔𝒆𝒏𝒕𝒊𝒏𝒈 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒆𝒂𝒓𝒕𝒉.

𝑩𝒖𝒕 𝒂𝒔 𝒚𝒐𝒖 𝒔𝒕𝒖𝒅𝒚 𝒕𝒉𝒊𝒔 𝒅𝒊𝒂𝒈𝒓𝒂𝒎, 𝒄𝒂𝒏 𝒚𝒐𝒖 𝒄𝒐𝒏𝒄𝒆𝒊𝒗𝒆 𝒕𝒉𝒂𝒕 𝒂𝒏𝒚 𝒐𝒇 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒃𝒂𝒍𝒍𝒔 𝒕𝒖𝒓𝒏 𝒐𝒏 𝒕𝒉𝒆𝒊𝒓 𝒂𝒙𝒊𝒔? 𝑷𝒍𝒂𝒊𝒏𝒍𝒚 𝒕𝒉𝒊𝒔 𝒊𝒔 𝒓𝒆𝒏𝒅𝒆𝒓𝒆𝒅 𝒑𝒉𝒚𝒔𝒊𝒄𝒂𝒍𝒍𝒚 𝒊𝒎𝒑𝒐𝒔𝒔𝒊𝒃𝒍𝒆 𝒃𝒚 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒔𝒑𝒐𝒌𝒆𝒔. 𝑩𝒖𝒕 𝒊𝒇 𝒚𝒐𝒖 𝒂𝒓𝒆 𝒔𝒕𝒊𝒍𝒍 𝒖𝒏𝒄𝒐𝒏𝒗𝒊𝒏𝒄𝒆𝒅, 𝑴𝒓. 𝑻𝒆𝒔𝒍𝒂’𝒔 𝒆𝒙𝒑𝒆𝒓𝒊𝒎𝒆𝒏𝒕𝒂𝒍 𝒑𝒓𝒐𝒐𝒇 𝒘𝒊𝒍𝒍 𝒔𝒖𝒓𝒆𝒍𝒚 𝒔𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒔𝒇𝒚 𝒚𝒐𝒖. 𝑨 𝒃𝒐𝒅𝒚 𝒓𝒐𝒕𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒏𝒈 𝒐𝒏 𝒊𝒕𝒔 𝒂𝒙𝒊𝒔 𝒎𝒖𝒔𝒕 𝒄𝒐𝒏𝒕𝒂𝒊𝒏 𝒓𝒐𝒕𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏𝒂𝒍 𝒆𝒏𝒆𝒓𝒈𝒚. 𝑵𝒐𝒘 𝒊𝒕 𝒊𝒔 𝒂 𝒇𝒂𝒄𝒕, 𝒂𝒔 𝑴𝒓. 𝑻𝒆𝒔𝒍𝒂 𝒔𝒉𝒐𝒘𝒔, 𝒕𝒉𝒂𝒕 𝒏𝒐 𝒔𝒖𝒄𝒉 𝒆𝒏𝒆𝒓𝒈𝒚 𝒊𝒔 𝒊𝒎𝒑𝒂𝒓𝒕𝒆𝒅 𝒕𝒐 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒃𝒂𝒍𝒍 𝒂𝒔, 𝒇𝒐𝒓 𝒊𝒏𝒔𝒕𝒂𝒏𝒄𝒆, 𝒕𝒐 𝒂 𝒑𝒓𝒐𝒋𝒆𝒄𝒕𝒊𝒍𝒆 𝒅𝒊𝒔𝒄𝒉𝒂𝒓𝒈𝒆𝒅 𝒇𝒓𝒐𝒎 𝒂 𝒈𝒖𝒏. 𝑰𝒕 𝒊𝒔 𝒕𝒉𝒆𝒓𝒆𝒇𝒐𝒓𝒆 𝒆𝒗𝒊𝒅𝒆𝒏𝒕 𝒕𝒉𝒂𝒕 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒎𝒐𝒐𝒏, 𝒊𝒏 𝒘𝒉𝒊𝒄𝒉 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒈𝒓𝒂𝒗𝒊𝒕𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏𝒂𝒍 𝒂𝒕𝒕𝒓𝒂𝒄𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏 𝒊𝒔 𝒔𝒖𝒃𝒔𝒕𝒊𝒕𝒖𝒕𝒆𝒅 𝒇𝒐𝒓 𝒂 𝒔𝒑𝒐𝒌𝒆, 𝒄𝒂𝒏𝒏𝒐𝒕 𝒓𝒐𝒕𝒂𝒕𝒆 𝒐𝒏 𝒊𝒕𝒔 𝒂𝒙𝒊𝒔 𝒐𝒓, 𝒊𝒏 𝒐𝒕𝒉𝒆𝒓 𝒘𝒐𝒓𝒅𝒔, 𝒄𝒐𝒏𝒕𝒂𝒊𝒏 𝒓𝒐𝒕𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏𝒂𝒍 𝒆𝒏𝒆𝒓𝒈𝒚. 𝑰𝒇 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒆𝒂𝒓𝒕𝒉’𝒔 𝒂𝒕𝒕𝒓𝒂𝒄𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏 𝒘𝒐𝒖𝒍𝒅 𝒔𝒖𝒅𝒅𝒆𝒏𝒍𝒚 𝒄𝒆𝒂𝒔𝒆 𝒂𝒏𝒅 𝒄𝒂𝒖𝒔𝒆 𝒊𝒕 𝒕𝒐 𝒇𝒍𝒚 𝒐𝒇𝒇 𝒊𝒏 𝒂 𝒕𝒂𝒏𝒈𝒆𝒏𝒕, 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒎𝒐𝒐𝒏 𝒘𝒐𝒖𝒍𝒅 𝒉𝒂𝒗𝒆 𝒏𝒐 𝒐𝒕𝒉𝒆𝒓 𝒆𝒏𝒆𝒓𝒈𝒚 𝒆𝒙𝒄𝒆𝒑𝒕 𝒕𝒉𝒂𝒕 𝒐𝒇 𝒕𝒓𝒂𝒏𝒔𝒍𝒂𝒕𝒐𝒓𝒚 𝒎𝒐𝒗𝒆𝒎𝒆𝒏𝒕, 𝒂𝒏𝒅 𝒊𝒕 𝒘𝒐𝒖𝒍𝒅 𝒏𝒐𝒕 𝒔𝒑𝒊𝒏 𝒍𝒊𝒌𝒆 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒃𝒂𝒍𝒍. — 𝑬𝒅𝒊𝒕𝒐𝒓.
------

Since the appearance of my article entitled the “Famous Scientific Illusions” in your February issue, I have received a number of letters criticizing the views I exprest regarding the moon’s “axial rotation.” These have been partly answered by my statement to the 𝙉𝙚𝙬 𝙔𝙤𝙧𝙠 𝙏𝙧𝙞𝙗𝙪𝙣𝙚 of February 23, which allow me to quote:

In your issue of February 2, Mr. Charles E. Manierre, commenting upon my article in the 𝙀𝙡𝙚𝙘𝙩𝙧𝙞𝙘𝙖𝙡 𝙀𝙭𝙥𝙚𝙧𝙞𝙢𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙚𝙧 for February which appeared in the 𝙏𝙧𝙞𝙗𝙪𝙣𝙚 of January 26, suggests that I give a definition of axial rotation.

I intended to be explicit on this point as may be judged from the following quotation: “The unfailing test of the spinning of a mass is, however, the existence of 𝙚𝙣𝙚𝙧𝙜𝙮 𝙤𝙛 𝙢𝙤𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣. The moon is not posest of such 𝙫𝙞𝙨 𝙫𝙞𝙫𝙖.” By this I meant that “axial rotation” is not simply “rotation upon an axis nonchalantly defined in dictionaries, but is a circular motion in the true physical sense — that is, one in which half the product of the mass with the square of velocity is a definite and positive quantity. The moon is a nearly spherical body, of a radius of about 1,087.5 miles, from which I calculate its volume to be approximately 5,300,216,300 cubic miles. Since its mean density is 3.27, one cubic foot of material composing it weighs close on 205 lbs. Accordingly, the total weight of the satellite is about 79,969,000,000,000,000,000, and its mass 2,483,500,000,000,000,000 terrestrial short tons. Assuming that the moon does physically rotate upon its axis, it performs one revolution in 27 days, 7 hours, 43 minutes and 11 seconds, or 2,360,591 seconds. If, in conformity with mathematical principles, we imagine the entire mass concentrated at a distance from the center equal to two-fifths of the radius, then the calculated rotational velocity is 3.04 feet per second, at which the globe would contain 11,474,000,000,000,000,000 short foot tons of energy sufficient to run 1,000,000,000 horsepower for a period of 1,323 years. Now, I say, that there is not enough of that energy in the moon to run a delicate watch.

In astronomical treatisies usually the argument is advanced that “if the lunar globe did not turn upon its axis it would expose all parts to terrestrial view. As only a little over one-half is visible it 𝙢𝙪𝙨𝙩 rotate.” But this inference is erroneous, for it only admits of one alternative. There are an infinite number of axis besides its own in each of which the moon might turn and still exhibit the same peculiarity.

I have stated in my article that the moon rotates about an axis passing thru the center of the earth, which is not strictly true, but it does not vitiate the conclusions I have drawn. It is well known, of course, that the two bodies revolve around a common center of gravity, which is at a distance of a little over 2,899 miles from the earth’s center.

Another mistake in books on astronomy is made in considering this motion equivalent to that of a weight whirled on a string or in a sling. In the first place there is an essential difference between these two devices tho involving the same mechanical principle. If a metal ball, attached to a string, is whirled around and the latter breaks, an axial rotation of the missile results which is definitely related in magnitude and direction to the motion preceding. By way of illustration — if the ball is whirled on the string clockwise ten times per second, then when it flies off, it will rotate on its axis ten times per second, likewise in the direction of a clock. Quite different are the conditions when the ball is thrown from a sling. In this case a 𝙢𝙪𝙘𝙝 𝙢𝙤𝙧𝙚 𝙧𝙖𝙥𝙞𝙙 rotation is imparted to it in the 𝙤𝙥𝙥𝙤𝙨𝙞𝙩𝙚 𝙨𝙚𝙣𝙨𝙚. There is no true analogy to these in the motion of the moon. 𝙄𝙛 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙜𝙧𝙖𝙫𝙞𝙩𝙖𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣𝙖𝙡 𝙨𝙩𝙧𝙞𝙣𝙜, 𝙖𝙨 𝙞𝙩 𝙬𝙚𝙧𝙚, 𝙬𝙤𝙪𝙡𝙙 𝙨𝙣𝙖𝙥, 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙨𝙖𝙩𝙚𝙡𝙡𝙞𝙩𝙚 𝙬𝙤𝙪𝙡𝙙 𝙜𝙤 𝙤𝙛𝙛 𝙞𝙣 𝙖 𝙩𝙖𝙣𝙜𝙚𝙣𝙩 𝙬𝙞𝙩𝙝𝙤𝙪𝙩 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙨𝙡𝙞𝙜𝙝𝙩𝙚𝙨𝙩 𝙨𝙬𝙚𝙧𝙫𝙞𝙣𝙜 𝙤𝙧 𝙧𝙤𝙩𝙖𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣, 𝙛𝙤𝙧 𝙩𝙝𝙚𝙧𝙚 𝙞𝙨 𝙣𝙤 𝙢𝙤𝙢𝙚𝙣𝙩 𝙖𝙗𝙤𝙪𝙩 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙖𝙭𝙞𝙨 𝙖𝙣𝙙, 𝙘𝙤𝙣𝙨𝙚𝙦𝙪𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙡𝙮, 𝙣𝙤 𝙩𝙚𝙣𝙙𝙚𝙣𝙘𝙮 𝙬𝙝𝙖𝙩𝙚𝙫𝙚𝙧 𝙩𝙤 𝙨𝙥𝙞𝙣𝙣𝙞𝙣𝙜 𝙢𝙤𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣.

Mr. Manierre is mistaken in his surmise as to what would happen if the earth were suddenly eliminated. Let us suppose that this would occur at the instant when the moon is in 𝙤𝙥𝙥𝙤𝙨𝙞𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣. Then it would continue on its eliptical path around the sun, presenting to it steadily the face which was always exposed to the earth. If, on the other hand, the latter would disappear at the moment of 𝙘𝙤𝙣𝙟𝙪𝙣𝙘𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣, the moon would gradually swing around thru 180° and, after a number of oscillations, revolve, again with the same face to the sun. In either case there would be no periodic changes but eternal day and night, respectively, on the sides turned towards, and away from, the luminary.

Some of the arguments advanced by the correspondents are ingenious and not a few comical. None, however, are valid.

One of the writers imagines the earth in the center of a circular orbital plate, having fixedly attached to its periperal portion a disk-shaped moon, in frictional or geared engagement with another disk of the same diameter and freely rotatable on a pivot projecting from an arm entirely independent of the planetary system. The arm being held continuously parallel to itself, the pivoted disk, of course, is made to turn on its axis as the orbital plate is rotated. This is a well-known drive, and the rotation of the pivoted disk is as palpable a fact as that of the orbital plate. But, the moon in this model only revolves about the center of the system 𝙬𝙞𝙩𝙝𝙤𝙪𝙩 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙨𝙡𝙞𝙜𝙝𝙩𝙚𝙨𝙩 𝙖𝙣𝙜𝙪𝙡𝙖𝙧 𝙙𝙞𝙨𝙥𝙡𝙖𝙘𝙚𝙢𝙚𝙣𝙩 on its own axis. The same is true of a cart-wheel to which this writer refers. So long as it advances on the earth’s surface it turns on the axle in the true physical sense; when one of its spokes is always kept in a perpendicular position the wheel still 𝙧𝙚𝙫𝙤𝙡𝙫𝙚𝙨 about the earth’s center, 𝙗𝙪𝙩 𝙖𝙭𝙞𝙖𝙡 𝙧𝙤𝙩𝙖𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣 𝙝𝙖𝙨 𝙘𝙚𝙖𝙨𝙚𝙙. Those who think that it then still exists are laboring under an illusion.

An obvious fallacy is involved in the following abstract reasoning. The orbital plate is assumed to gradually shrink, so that finally the centers of the earth and the satellite coincide when the latter revolves simultaneously about its own and the earth’s axis. We may reduce the earth to a mathematical point and the distance between the two planets to the radius of the moon without affecting the system in principle, but a further diminution of the distance is manifestly absurd and of no bearing on the question under consideration.

In all the communications I have received, tho different in the manner of presentation, the successive changes of position in space are mistaken for axial rotation. So, for instance, a positive refutation of my arguments is found in the observation that the moon exposes all sides to other planets! It revolves, to be sure, but none of the evidences is a proof that it turns on its axis. Even the well-known experiment with the Foucault pendulum, altho exhibiting similar phenomena as on our globe, would merely demonstrate a motion of the satellite about 𝙨𝙤𝙢𝙚 axis. The view I have advanced is NOT BASED ON A THEORY but on facts 𝙙𝙚𝙢𝙤𝙣𝙨𝙩𝙧𝙖𝙗𝙡𝙚 𝙗𝙮 𝙚𝙭𝙥𝙚𝙧𝙞𝙢𝙚𝙣𝙩. It is not a matter of 𝙙𝙚𝙛𝙞𝙣𝙞𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣 as some would have it. A MASS REVOLVING ON ITS AXIS MUST BE POSEST OF MOMENTUM. If it has none, there is no axial rotation, all appearances to the contrary notwithstanding.

A few simple reflections based on well establisht mechanical principles will make this clear. Consider first the case of two equal weights 𝙬 and 𝙬₁, in Fig. 1, whirled about the center 𝙊 on a string 𝙨 as shown. Assuming the latter to break at 𝙖 both weights will fly off on tangents to their circles of gyration, and, being animated with different velocities, they will rotate around their common center of gravity 𝙤. If the weights are whirled 𝙣 times per second then the speed of the outer and the inner one will be, respectively, 𝙑 = 2 (𝙍 + 𝙧) 𝙣 and 𝙑₁= 𝟮 𝝅 (𝙍—𝙧) 𝙣, and the difference 𝙑—𝙑₁ = 4 π 𝙧 𝙣, will be the length of the circular path of the outer weight. Inasmuch, however, as there will be equalization of the speeds until the mean value is attained, we shall have, 𝙑—𝙑₁ / 𝟮 = 𝟮 𝝅 𝙧 𝙣 = 𝟮 𝝅 𝙧 𝙉, 𝙉 being the number of revolutions per second of the weights around their center of gravity. Evidently then, the weights continue to rotate at the original rate and in the same direction. I know this to be a fact from actual experiments. It also follows that a ball, as that shown in the figure, will behave in a similar manner for the two half-spherical masses can be concentrated at their centers of gravity and 𝙢 and 𝙢₁, respectively, which will be at a distance from 𝙤 equal to 3/8 𝙧.

This being understood, imagine a number of balls 𝙈 carried by as many spokes 𝙎 radiating from a hub 𝙃, as illustrated in Fig. 2, and let this system be rotated 𝙣 times per second around center 𝙊 on frictionless bearings. A certain amount of work will be required to bring the structure to this speed, and it will be found that it equals exactly half the product of the masses with the square of the tangential velocity. Now if it be true that the moon rotates in reality on its axis 𝙩𝙝𝙞𝙨 𝙢𝙪𝙨𝙩 𝙖𝙡𝙨𝙤 𝙝𝙤𝙡𝙙 𝙜𝙤𝙤𝙙 𝙛𝙤𝙧 𝙀𝘼𝘾𝙃 𝙤𝙛 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙗𝙖𝙡𝙡𝙨 𝙖𝙨 𝙞𝙩 𝙥𝙚𝙧𝙛𝙤𝙧𝙢𝙨 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙨𝙖𝙢𝙚 𝙠𝙞𝙣𝙙 𝙤𝙛 𝙢𝙤𝙫𝙚𝙢𝙚𝙣𝙩. Therefore, in imparting to the system a given velocity, energy must have been used up in the axial rotation of the balls. Let 𝙈 be the mass of one of these and 𝙍 the radius of gyration, then the rotational energy will be 𝙀 = ½𝙈 (𝟮 π 𝙍 𝙣)². Since for one complete turn of the wheel every ball makes one revolution on its axis, according to the prevailing theory, the energy of axial rotation of each ball will be 𝙚 = ½𝙈 (𝟮 π 𝙧₁ 𝙣)², 𝙧₁ being the radius of gyration about the axis and equal to 0.6325 r. We can use as large balls as we like, and so make 𝙚 a considerable percentage of 𝙀 and yet, it is positively established by experiment that each of the rotating balls contain only the energy 𝙀, no power whatever being consumed in the supposed axial rotation, which is, consequently, wholly illusionary. Something even more interesting may, however, be stated. As I have shown before, a ball flying off will rotate at the rate of the wheel and in the same direction. But this whirling motion, unlike that of a projectile, neither adds to, nor detracts from, the energy of the translatory movement which is exactly equal to the work consumed in giving to the mass the observed velocity.


From the foregoing it will be seen that in order to make one physical revolution on its axis the moon should have twice its present angular velocity, and then it would contain a quantity of stored energy as given in my above letter to the 𝙉𝙚𝙬 𝙔𝙤𝙧𝙠 𝙏𝙧𝙞𝙗𝙪𝙣𝙚, on the assumption that the radius of gyration is 2/5 that of figure. This, of course, is uncertain, as the distribution of density in the interior is unknown. But from the character of motion of the satellite it may be concluded with certitude 𝙩𝙝𝙖𝙩 𝙞𝙩 𝙞𝙨 𝙙𝙚𝙫𝙤𝙞𝙙 𝙤𝙛 𝙢𝙤𝙢𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙪𝙢 𝙖𝙗𝙤𝙪𝙩 𝙞𝙩𝙨 𝙖𝙭𝙞𝙨. If it be bisected by a plane tangential to the orbit, the masses of the two halves are inversely as the distances of their centers of gravity from the earth’s center and, therefore, if the latter were to disappear suddenly, no axial rotation, as in the case of a weight thrown off, would ensue.



*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


THE MOON'S ROTATION (FOLLOW-UP) 🐇
————
by Nikola Tesla
Electrical Experimenter
June, 1919 Page number(s): 132-133, 156-157 & 160

------
𝙄𝙣 𝙩𝙝𝙞𝙨 𝙖𝙧𝙩𝙞𝙘𝙡𝙚 𝘿𝙧. 𝙏𝙚𝙨𝙡𝙖 𝙥𝙧𝙤𝙫𝙚𝙨 𝙘𝙤𝙣𝙘𝙡𝙪𝙨𝙞𝙫𝙚𝙡𝙮 𝙗𝙮 𝙩𝙝𝙚𝙤𝙧𝙮 𝙖𝙣𝙙 𝙚𝙭𝙥𝙚𝙧𝙞𝙢𝙚𝙣𝙩 𝙩𝙝𝙖𝙩 𝙖𝙡𝙡 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙠𝙞𝙣𝙚𝙩𝙞𝙘 𝙚𝙣𝙚𝙧𝙜𝙮 𝙤𝙛 𝙖 𝙧𝙤𝙩𝙖𝙩𝙞𝙣𝙜 𝙢𝙖𝙨𝙨 𝙞𝙨 𝙥𝙪𝙧𝙚𝙡𝙮 𝙩𝙧𝙖𝙣𝙨𝙡𝙖𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣𝙖𝙡 𝙖𝙣𝙙 𝙩𝙝𝙖𝙩 𝙩𝙝𝙚 𝙢𝙤𝙤𝙣 𝙘𝙤𝙣𝙩𝙖𝙞𝙣𝙨 𝙖𝙗𝙨𝙤𝙡𝙪𝙩𝙚𝙡𝙮 𝙣𝙤 𝙧𝙤𝙩𝙖𝙩𝙞𝙤𝙣𝙖𝙡 𝙚𝙣𝙚𝙧𝙜𝙮, 𝙞𝙣 𝙤𝙩𝙝𝙚𝙧 𝙬𝙤𝙧𝙙𝙨, 𝙙𝙤𝙚𝙨 𝙣𝙤𝙩 𝙧𝙤𝙩𝙖𝙩𝙚 𝙤𝙣 𝙞𝙩𝙨 𝙖𝙭𝙞𝙨. — 𝙀𝘿𝙄𝙏𝙊𝙍.
------

In revising my article on “The Moon’s Rotation”, which appeared in the April issue of the 𝙀𝙡𝙚𝙘𝙩𝙧𝙞𝙘𝙖𝙡 𝙀𝙭𝙥𝙚𝙧𝙞𝙢𝙚𝙣𝙩𝙚𝙧, I appended a few remarks to the original text in further support and elucidation of the theory advanced. Due to the printer’s error these were lost and, in consequence, I found it necessary to forward another communication which, unfortunately, was received too late for embodiment in the May number. Meanwhile many letters have reached me in which certain phenomena presented by rotating bodies, as the moon’s librations of longitude, are cited as evidences of energy due to spinning motion, i.e., proofs of axial rotation of the satellite in the true physical sense. I trust that the following amplified statement will meet all of the objections raised and convert to my views those who are still unconvinced.

The kinetic energy of a rotating mass can be determined in four ways which are illustrated in diagrams, Figs. 1, 2, 3 and 4 and may be found more or less suitable.

Referring to Fig. 1, the method consists in selecting judiciously a number of points as 𝙤₁, 𝙤₂, 𝙤₃, etc., within the straight rod or mass 𝙈, respectively at distances 𝙧₁ 𝙧₂ 𝙧₃ , etc., from the axis of rotation 𝗢 and calculating the square root of the mean square of these distances. Its value being 𝙍𝓰, denoted radius of gyration, the 𝙚𝙛𝙛𝙚𝙘𝙩𝙞𝙫𝙚 velocity of the mass at 𝙣 revolutions per second will be 𝐯ₙ = 2 π 𝙍𝓰 𝙣 and its kinetic energy 𝙀 = ½ 𝙈 𝐕ₙ² = ½ 𝙢 (2 π 𝙍𝓰 𝙣)².

In Fig. 2 the mass 𝙈, rotating 𝙣 times per second about an axis 𝙊 at right angles to the plane of the paper, is divided into numerous elements or small parts, most conveniently very thin concentric laminae, as 𝑰₁, 𝑰₂, 𝑰₃ , etc., at distances 𝙧₁ 𝙧₂ 𝙧₃ , etc., from 𝙊. Since the kinetic energy of each part is equal to half the product of its mass and the square of the velocity, the sum of all these elemental energies 𝙀 = ½ Σ 𝙢 𝐯² = ½ 𝙢₁ 𝐕₁² + ½ 𝙢₂ 𝐕₂² + ½ 𝙢₃ 𝐕₃² + …… = ½ 𝙢₁ (2 π 𝙧₁𝙣)² + ½ 𝙢₂ (2 π 𝙧₂𝙣)² + ½ 𝙢₃ (2 π 𝙧₃𝙣)² + ……

A different form of expression for the energy of a rotating body may be obtained by determining its moment of inertia. For this purpose the mass 𝙈 (in Fig. 3), rotating 𝙣 times per second about an axis 𝙊, is separated into minute parts, as 𝙢₁, 𝙢₂, 𝙢₃, etc., respectively at distances 𝙧₁, 𝙧₂, 𝙧₃, etc., from the same. The sum of the products of all these small masses and the squares of their distances is the moment of inertia 𝑰, and then 𝙀 = ½ 𝑰 ω², ω = 2 π 𝙣 being the angular velocity.

It is obvious that in all these instances many points or elements will be required for great accuracy but, as a rule, very few are sufficient in practice.

Still another way to compute the kinetic energy is illustrated in Fig. 4, in which case the quantity 𝑰 is given in terms of the moment of inertia 𝑰ₑ about another axis parallel to 𝙊 and passing thru the center of gravity 𝘾 of mass 𝙈. In conformity with this the energy of motion 𝙀 = ½ 𝙈 𝐕² + ½ 𝑰ₑ ω² in which equation 𝐕 is the velocity of the center of gravity.

The preceding is deemed indispensable as I note that the correspondents, even those who seem thoroly familiar with mechanical principles, fail to make a distinction between theoretical and physical truths which is essential to my argument.

In estimating the kinetic energy of a rotating mass in any of the ways indicated we arrive, thru suitable conceptions and methods of approximation, at expressions which may be made quantitatively precise to any desired degree, but do not truly define the actual condition of the body. To illustrate, when proceeding according to the plan of Fig. 1, we find a certain hypothetical velocity with which the entire mass should move in order to contain the same energy, a state wholly imaginary and irreconcilable with the actual. Only, when 𝙖𝙡𝙡 particles of the body have the same velocity, does the product ½ 𝙈 𝐕² specify a physical fact and is numerically and descriptively accurate. Still more remote from palpable truth is the equation of motion obtained in the manner indicated in Fig. 4, in which the first term represents the kinetic energy of translation of the body as a whole and the second that of its axial rotation. The former would demand a movement of the mass in a definite path and direction, all particles having the same velocity, the latter its simultaneous motion in another path and direction, the particles having different velocities. This abstract idea of angular motion is chiefly responsible for the illusion of the moon’s axial rotation, which I shall endeavor to dispel by additional evidences.

With this object attention is called to Fig. 5 showing a system composed of eight balls 𝙈, which are carried on spokes 𝙎, radiating from a hub 𝙃, rotatable around a central axis 𝙊 in bearings supposed to be frictionless. It is an arrangement similar to that before illustrated with the exception that the balls, instead of forming parts of the spokes, are supported in screw pivots 𝙨, which are normally loose but can be tightened so as to permit both free turning and rigid fixing as may be desired. To facilitate observation the spokes are provided with radial marks and the lower sides of the balls are shaded. Assume, first, that the drawing depicts the state of rest, the balls being rotatable without friction, and let an angular velocity ω = 2 π 𝙣 be imparted to the system in the clockwise direction as indicated by the long solid arrow. Viewing a ball as 𝙈, its successive positions 1, 2, 3-8 in space, and also relatively to the spoke, will be just as drawn, and it is evident from an inspection of the diagram that while moving with the angular velocity ω about 𝙊, in the clockwise direction, the ball turns, with respect to its axis, at the same angular velocity but in the opposition direction, that of the dotted arrow. The combined result of these two motions is a translatory movement of the ball such that all particles are animated with the same velocity 𝐕, which is that of its center of gravity. In this case, granted that there is absolutely no friction the kinetic energy of each ball will be given by the product of ½ 𝙈 𝐕² not approximately, but with mathematical riger. If now the pivots are screwed tight and the balls fixed rigidly to the spokes, this angular motion relatively to their axes becomes physically impossible and then it is found that the kinetic energy of each ball is increased, the increment being exactly the energy of rotation of the ball on its axis. This fact, which is borne out both by theory and experiment, is the foundation of the general notion that a gyrating body — in this instance ball 𝙈 — presenting always the same face towards the center of motion, actually rotates upon its axis in the same sense, as indicated by the short full arrow. But it does not tho to the eye it seems so. The fallacy will become manifest on further inquiry.

To begin with, observe that when a mass, say the armature of an electric motor, rotating with the angular velocity ω, is reversed, its speed is -ω and the difference ω – (-ω) = 2 ω. Now, in fixing the ball to the spoke, the change of angular velocity is only ω; therefore, an additional velocity ω would have to be imparted to it in order to cause a clockwise rotation of the ball on its axis in the true significance of the word. The kinetic energy would then be equal to the sum of the energies of the translatory and axial motions, not merely in the abstract mathematical meaning, but as a physical fact. I am well aware that, according to the prevailing opinion, when the ball is free on the pivots it does not turn on its axis at all and only rotates with the angular velocity of the frame when rigidly attached to the same, but the truth will appear upon a closer examination of this kind of movement.

Let the system be rotated as first assumed and illustrated, the balls being perfectly free on the pivots, and imagine the latter to be gradually tightened to cause friction slowly reducing and finally preventing the slip. At the outset all particles of each ball have been moving with the speed of its center of gravity, but as the bearing resistance asserts itself more and more the translatory velocity of the particles nearer to the axis 𝙊 will be 𝒅𝒊𝒎𝒊𝒏𝒊𝒔𝒉𝒊𝒏𝒈 while that of the diametrically opposite ones will be 𝒊𝒏𝒄𝒓𝒆𝒂𝒔𝒊𝒏𝒈, until the maxima of these changes are attained when the balls are firmly held. In this operation we have thus deprived those parts of the masses which are nearer to the center of motion, of some kinetic energy of 𝒕𝒓𝒂𝒏𝒔𝒍𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏 while adding to the energy of those which are farther and, obviously, the gain was greater than the loss so that the 𝒆𝒇𝒇𝒆𝒄𝒕𝒊𝒗𝒆 velocity of each ball as a whole was increased. 𝑶𝒏𝒍𝒚 𝒔𝒐 have we augmented the kinetic energy of the system, not by causing 𝒂𝒙𝒊𝒂𝒍 𝒓𝒐𝒕𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏 of the balls. The energy 𝙀 of each of these is 𝒔𝒐𝒍𝒆𝒍𝒚 that of translatory movement with an effective velocity 𝐕ₑ as above defined such that E = ½ M 𝐕ₑ². The axial rotations of the ball in either direction are but apparent; 𝒕𝒉𝒆𝒚 𝒉𝒂𝒗𝒆 𝒏𝒐 𝒓𝒆𝒂𝒍𝒊𝒕𝒚 𝒘𝒉𝒂𝒕𝒆𝒗𝒆𝒓 and call for no mechanical effort. It is merely when an extraneous force acts independently to turn the whirling body on its axis that energy comes into play. Incidentally it should be pointed out that in true axial rotation of a rigid and homogenous mass all symmetrically situated particles contribute equally to the momentum which is not the case here. That there exists not even the slightest tendency to such motion can, however, be readily established.

For this purpose I would refer to Fig. 6 showing a ball 𝙈 of radius 𝙧, the center 𝘾 of which is at a distance 𝙍 from axis 𝗢 and which is bisected by a tangential plane 𝙥𝙥 as indicated, the lower half sphere being shaded for distinction. The kinetic energy of the ball when whirled 𝙣 times per second about 𝗢 is according to the first form of expression 𝙀 = ½ 𝙈 𝐕ₑ² = ½ 𝙈 (2 π 𝙍𝓰 𝙣)², 𝙈 being the mass and 𝙍𝓰 the radius of gyration. But, as explained in connection with Fig. 4, we have also 𝙀 = ½ 𝙈 𝐕² + ½ 𝑰ₑ ω², 𝐕 = 2 π 𝙍 𝙣 being the velocity of the center of gravity 𝘾 and 𝑰ₑ the moment of inertia of the ball, about the parallel axis passing thru 𝘾 and equal to 2/5 𝙈 !lowercase bold italic i!

𝙤₁₂₃𝙈𝙧𝗢𝙍𝓰𝐯ₙπ𝙣𝙀½𝐕²𝙢𝑰ωₑ𝙎𝙃𝙨ω𝘾𝙥𝙥


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


NIKOLA TESLA TELLS HOW WE MAY FLY EIGHT MILES HIGH AT 1,000 MILES AN HOUR
————
by Nikola Tesla
(In an interview with Frederick M. Kerby)
Reconstruction
July, 1919 Page number(s): 196-198


𝘈𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘰𝘳 𝘰𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘢𝘭𝘵𝘦𝘳𝘯𝘢𝘵𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘤𝘶𝘳𝘳𝘦𝘯𝘵, 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘸𝘰𝘳𝘭𝘥 𝘪𝘴 𝘪𝘯𝘥𝘦𝘣𝘵𝘦𝘥 𝘵𝘰 𝘔𝘳. 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘧𝘰𝘳 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘶𝘴𝘦 𝘰𝘧 𝘦𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤𝘪𝘵𝘺 𝘤𝘢𝘳𝘳𝘪𝘦𝘥 𝘭𝘰𝘯𝘨 𝘥𝘪𝘴𝘵𝘢𝘯𝘤𝘦𝘴. 𝘏𝘦 𝘯𝘰𝘸 𝘥𝘪𝘴𝘤𝘶𝘴𝘴𝘦𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘱𝘳𝘰𝘣𝘢𝘣𝘪𝘭𝘪𝘵𝘺 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘢𝘪𝘳𝘱𝘭𝘢𝘯𝘦𝘴 𝘸𝘪𝘭𝘭 𝘳𝘪𝘴𝘦 𝘵𝘰 𝘨𝘳𝘦𝘢𝘵 𝘩𝘦𝘪𝘨𝘩𝘵𝘴 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘵𝘳𝘢𝘷𝘦𝘭 𝘢𝘵 𝘴𝘱𝘦𝘦𝘥𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘵 𝘴𝘦𝘦𝘮 𝘪𝘯𝘤𝘳𝘦𝘥𝘪𝘣𝘭𝘦. 𝘛𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘢𝘳𝘵𝘪𝘤𝘭𝘦 𝘪𝘴 𝘸𝘳𝘪𝘵𝘵𝘦𝘯, 𝘪𝘯 𝘱𝘢𝘳𝘵 𝘣𝘺 𝘔𝘳. 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘩𝘪𝘮𝘴𝘦𝘭𝘧. 𝘛𝘩𝘦 𝘳𝘦𝘴𝘵 𝘪𝘴 𝘸𝘳𝘪𝘵𝘵𝘦𝘯 𝘧𝘳𝘰𝘮 𝘴𝘵𝘦𝘯𝘰𝘨𝘳𝘢𝘱𝘩𝘪𝘤 𝘯𝘰𝘵𝘦𝘴. 𝘐𝘵 𝘨𝘪𝘷𝘦𝘴, 𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘺 𝘭𝘪𝘬𝘦𝘭𝘺, 𝘢 𝘨𝘭𝘪𝘮𝘱𝘴𝘦 𝘰𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘪𝘮𝘮𝘦𝘥𝘪𝘢𝘵𝘦 𝘧𝘶𝘵𝘶𝘳𝘦.

Sitting in his office on the twenty-fifth floor of the Woolworth Tower, Mr. J. Pierpont Jones, American business man, will one day glance at his watch and discover it is 3 o’clock in the afternoon.

“By George,” he will say, buzzing for his secretary, “If I don’t hurry I’ll be late for that dinner engagement at the Savoy!” And as his secretary answers the buzzer:

“Charles, when does the next London bus leave?”

“Three-thirty, sir,” says Charles. “You can make it if you hurry. The car is waiting.”

And fifteen minutes later Mr. J. Pierpont Jones will emerge from the elevator on the aeronautic landing stage of lower Manhattan, climb into the hermetically sealed steel fuselage of the New York-London Limited, which will rise promptly at 3:30 p. m. At seven that night he will climb out of his compartment on the landing stage on the Thames Embankment, and descend to meet his friend for dinner.

The three-hour aeroplane trip from New York to London, flying above the storm level at eight miles above the earth’s surface is the possibility of the immediate future.

This is not my own prediction. It is the result of sixteen pages of close calculations in higher mathematics made by Nikola Tesla, to test and check up other pages of intricate calculations made by Samuel D. Mott, charter member of the Aero Club of America.

Mr. Mott asserts that the three-hour trip to London from New York is a question of rising into rarefied air where the air pressure is only one-fifth what it is at the earth’s surface, at which point the “altiplane”, as he has named the flying machine of the future, may be expected to fly five times as fast as at the earth’s surface. And if the speed of the aeroplane is increased not five times but only one-fifth, Mr. Mott says the trip will be made anyhow in the rarefied air eight miles above the earth’s surface in not more than
twelve hours running time.

And Nikola Tesla agrees that taking a plane to such an altitude must result in great increase in speed, although he does not wish, in the absence of exact knowledge of certain factors entering into the problem, to predict exact speeds.

Speaking before the Pan-American Aeronautic Convention at Atlantic City, Mr. Mott asserted that in order to avoid being weather-bound as were the aviators at Newfoundland, it will be necessary to construct planes that will rise above the storm limit.

“I submit,” he said, “that waiting indefinitely for ideal weather conditions for long-distance flying over land or sea will not do for the demands of commerce. Therefore I would bring to your attention the possibilities from the airplane or hydroplane, to go into the stillness of nature above the weather.”

WHAT THE PROBLEM IS 🐇

“The problem is evidently one of equipment of our planes to function in rarefied air, and protection of navigators against its tenuity; likewise protection of their body warmth and comfort in extremes of temperature. How high we may go no one may know until tested. Personally I believe it possible to go fifteen or twenty miles aloft, if necessary. It is obviously a matter of equipment plus climbing ability of aircraft designed for the purpose.

“What is the object of high flying? Daily experience shows us that high speed and density are incompatible. We know that we must furnish aircraft with four times the power to go twice as fast, and the marine engineer knows that he must furnish eight times the power to go twice as fast. In other words, from the ultimate height of the air to the earth’s core pressure is progressive. Thirty-three feet below the ocean’s surface the pressure doubles. For every 1,000 feet ascent the pressure diminishes roughly one-half pound per square inch. The pressure two miles high is 9.8 pounds per square inch; at one mile high, 10.88; at three-quarters of a mile, 12.06; one-half mile, 13.33; one-quarter mile, 14.2, and at sea level, 14.7 pounds, or, in round numbers, 15 pounds per square inch.

“The unknown factor in the high altitude problem is this: 🐇 Will an altiplane in one-fifth density (eight miles high), with equal push, go five times faster or one-fifth faster? The rest is a matter of simple equipment and good construction. In either case the gain is substantial. If the former were true a voyage between New York and London can be made in about three hours by going eight miles high. If the latter is true the same voyage can be made in about twelve hours running time, assuming a surface speed of 200 miles an hour, which is practically a question of power.

“To my mind it is plain that the high altitudes will be determining factors in long distance flying. Greater speed, greater distance, more comfort and less danger because when we double the time to do a risky thing we double the risk incurred; less gasolene, less weight
and expense, for if environment permits us to go 100 miles with twice the fuel we formerly used to go twenty-five miles our economic gain is obviously 100 per cent, because we may then go 100 miles with the amount of fuel we formerly consumed to go fifty miles.”

That aerial navigation at higher altitudes will undoubtedly result in great increase of speed is also the opinion of Nikola Tesla, to whom I took Mr. Mott’s conclusions in order to get the opinion of this man who has made a life-time study of the air as a medium for the transmission of electrical energy.

“In the propulsion of aerial vessels problems are involved entirely different from those presented in the navigation of the water,” said Tesla. “The atmosphere may be likened to a vast ocean, but if one imagines a submarine vessel constructed like an aeroplane one immediately realizes how inefficient it would be. The energy used in propelling a body through a medium of any kind is wasted in three different ways; first, by skin friction; second, wave making; third, production of eddies. On general principles, however, the resistance can be divided into two parts: one which is due to the friction of the medium and the other to its stickiness, or viscosity, as it is termed. The first is proportionate to the density; the second to this peculiar property of the fluid.

“Everybody will readily understand that the denser the medium the harder it is to push a body through it, but it might not be clear to every person what this other resistance — this viscosity — means. This will be understood if we compare, for instance, water and oil. The latter is lighter, but much more sticky, so that it is a greater obstacle to propulsion than water. Air is a very viscous substance and that part of resistance which is due to this quality is considerable. We must take this latter resistance into account in calculating how fast an aeroplane could fly in the upper reaches of the air.

“Now, the idea is to fly at a great height where the air is rarefied, and therefore much less power is required to propel the machine through it. If we take the pressure at sea-level at 14.7 pounds and the temperature at 15 degrees centigrade, then, without introducing several corrections that would make for greater accuracy, the pressures at different heights are about as follows: At 1,000 feet above sea-level, 14.178 lbs.; at one-mile, 12.1457 lbs.; at two miles, 10.035 lbs.; at eight miles, 3.1926 lbs.; at fifteen miles, 0.8392 lbs. and at twenty miles, 0.323 lbs.”

CONDITION EIGHT MILES UP

“According to these figures that I have worked out, at a height of eight miles the density of the air is 0.2172 or about 22-100th of that at sea level; at fifteen miles it is 0.057, and at twenty miles only 0.0219, or nearly 22-1000th of that at sea-level.

“Let us suppose then that an aeroplane rises to a height of eight miles where the pressure of the air will be only 3.1926 lbs., or, in other words, the density 0.2172 of that at sea- level. Since, as pointed out, the purely frictional resistance is proportionate to the density of the air, it is obvious that, if there were no other resistance to overcome, only about 22
per cent of power or roughly one-fifth, would be required to propel the vessel at that height, so that extremely high speed, as Mr. Mott points out, would be obtainable.

“And though the other resistance, which is due to the stickiness of the medium, will not be diminished at the same ratio, and therefore the gain will not be strictly in proportion to the decrease of density of the air, nevertheless, the total resistance will be reduced, if not to 22 per cent, perhaps to 30 per cent, so that there will be a great excess of power available for more rapid flight.

“Even allowing for the decreased thrust of the propeller due to the thinness of the air, which cannot be overcome by driving the screw faster, there still will be the very considerable gain and the aircraft will be propelled at a higher speed.

“Of course many incertitudes still exist in the theoretical treatment of a question like this, as there are a number of factors which affect the result and in regard to which we have not yet complete information.”

AT AN ALTITUDE OF TWENTY MILES

“I doubt that it will be possible to rise as high as fifteen or twenty miles, which is the opinion expressed by Mr. Mott. At the height of twenty miles there is only about 7 per cent of oxygen in the air instead of 21 per cent which is present close to the ground, and there would be great trouble in securing the oxygen supply for the combustion of the fuel, not to speak of other limitations.

“However, at a height of eight miles the decrease of oxygen can be overcome for both engine and aviator. Of course provision would have to be made for supplying the aviator and passengers with oxygen. In all probability they would have to be entirely enclosed just as a diver is enclosed. Our highest mountains are five miles and the rarefication of the air makes climbing them difficult. About five miles provision would certainly have to be made for supplying the aviator. If he were not enclosed the decrease of pressure due to the thinner air would result disastrously. The human mechanism is adjusted to a pressure of nearly 15 pounds per square inch; and if that pressure is reduced to about three pounds, as it would be at an altitude of eight miles, the aviator’s ear drums would burst, and even the blood would be forced through the pores and would ooze out of the body.”

Tesla explained that the effect would be the same as that of bringing a deep-sea fish, accustomed to live a mile below the surface, to the surface of the water. The fish simply explodes, for lack of the pressure which its body is built to withstand.

With proper protection of the aviator and an artificial supply of oxygen Tesla believes that flights at the eight-mile altitude are quite possible.

“Then there will be great progress with the lighter than air machine and we may soon expect the advent of a dirigible of the Zeppelin type as a common vehicle for travel. Contrary to the general belief, such a vessel can be propelled more rapidly than an airplane and it will be, on the whole, much safer. Furthermore it will give to the passengers the comforts that are necessary in order to make this form of travel popular. Of course in the practical use of these monstrous structures, formidable obstacles will be encountered. They are susceptible to damage by storms, and I believe also from certain danger from lightning, which will not be obviated by the use of helium gas. But I expect to see these difficulties overcome.

The dirigible, supplied with sufficient power, need not fear the storm; it can rise above it, or go around it. The only danger from storm in any case lies in being blown from the course, for while the ship is moving with the storm it is in no danger, since it travels at the same speed as the wind, and the passengers would be in absolutely quiet air, so that a candle might be lighted on deck. Methods of docking and housing the big ships must be devised, but several have been proposed that reduce the danger of landing by making it unnecessary for the ship to come to earth.”

But the revolutionizing influence on aircraft of the future Mr. Tesla believes to lie in the possibility of transmitting power to them through the air.

“For years,” he said, ” I have advocated my system of wireless transmission of power which is now perfectly practicable and I am looking confidently to its adoption and further development. In the system I have developed, distance is of absolutely no consequence. That is to say, a Zeppelin vessel would receive the same power whether it was 12,000 miles away or immediately above the power plant. The application of wireless power for aerial propulsion will do away with a great deal of complication and waste, and it is difficult to imagine that a more perfect means will ever be found to transport human beings to great distances economically. The power supply is virtually unlimited, as any number of power plants can be operated together, supplying energy to airships just as trains running on tracks are now supplied with electrical energy through rails or wires.

“The transmission of power by wireless will do away with the present necessity for carrying fuel on the airplane or airship. The motors of the plane or airship will be energized by this transmitted power, and there will be no such thing as a limitation on their radius of action, since they can pick up power at any point on the globe.

“The advance of science to this point, however, is attended with terrible risks for the world. We are facing a condition that is positively appalling if we ever permit warfare to invade the earth again. For up to the present war the main destructive force was provided by guns which are limited by the size of the projectile and the distance it can be thrown. In the future nations will fight each other thousands of miles apart. No soldier will see his enemy. In fact future wars will not be conducted by men directly but by the forces which if let loose may well destroy civilization completely. If war comes again, I look for the extensive use of self-propelled air vehicles carrying enormous charges of explosive which will be sent from any point to another to do their destructive work, with no human being aboard to guide them. The distance to which they can be sent is practically unlimited and the amount of explosive they can carry is likewise practically unlimited. It is practicable to send such an air vessel say to a distance of four or five thousand miles and so control its course either gyroscopically or electrically that it will land at the exact spot where it is intended to have it land, within a few feet, and its cargo of explosive can there be detonated.

“This cannot be done by means of the present wireless plants, but with a proper plant it can be done, and we have here the appalling prospect of a war between nations at a distance of thousands of miles, with weapons so destructive and demoralizing that the world could not endure them. That is why there must be no more war.”


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
'''All my previous efforts with Rhumkorf coils had left me unconvinced, and in order to settle my doubts I went over the whole ground once more, very carefully, with these improved appliances. Similar phenomena were noted, greatly magnified in intensity, but they were susceptible of a different and more plausible explanation. I considered this so important that in 1892 I went to Bonn, Germany, to confer with Dr. Hertz in regard to my observations. He seemed disappointed to such a degree that I regretted my trip and parted from him sorrowfully.

During the succeeding years I made numerous experiments with the same object, but the results were uniformly negative. In 1900, however, after I had evolved a wireless transmitter which enabled me to obtain electro-magnetic activities of many millions of horse-power, I made a last desperate attempt to prove that the disturbances emanating from the oscillator were ether vibrations akin to those of light, but met again with utter failure. For more than eighteen years I have been reading treatises, reports of scientific transactions, and articles on Hertz-wave telegraphy, to keep myself informed, but they have always imprest me like works of fiction.'''

🐇 '''In time, however, I recognized that devices of this kind, to be most effective and efficient, should be designed with due regard to the physical properties of this planet and the electrical conditions obtaining on the same."...

'''But, altho I have overcome all obstacles which seemed in the beginning unsurmountable and found elegant solutions of all the problems which confronted me, yet, even at this very day, the majority of experts are still blind to the possibilities which are within easy attainment."...

'''The underlying principle can be explained in a few words. Suppose that there are n simple vibrations suitable for use in wireless transmission, the probability that any one tune will be struck by an extraneous disturbance is 1/n. There will then remain n-1 vibrations and the chance that one of these will be excited is 1/n-1 hence the probability that two tunes would be struck at the same time is 1/n(n-1). Similarly, for a combination of three the chance will be 1/n(n-1)(n-2) and so on. It will be readily seen that in this manner any desired degree of safety against the statics or other kind of disturbance can be attained provided the receiving apparatus is so designed that is operation is possible only thru the joint action of all the tuned elements. This was a difficult problem which I have successfully solved so that now any desired number of simultaneous messages is practicable in the transmission thru the earth as well as thru artificial conductors.'''...

'''It occurs to me here to ask the question — why have the Hertz waves been reduced from the original frequencies to those I have advocated for my system, when in so doing the activity of the transmitting apparatus has been reduced a billion fold? I can invite any expert to perform an experiment such as is illustrated in Fig. 15, which shows the classical Hertz oscillator and my grounded transmitting circuit. It is a fact which I have demonstrated that, altho we may have in the Hertz oscillator an activity thousands of times greater, the effect on the receiver is not to be compared to that of the grounded circuit. 
This shows that in the transmission from an airplane we are merely working thru a condenser, the capacity of which is a function of a logarithmic ratio between the length of the conductor and the distance from the ground. The receiver is affected in exactly the same manner as from an ordinary transmitter, the only difference being that there is a certain modification of the action which can be predetermined from the electrical constants. It is not at all difficult to maintain communication between an airplane and a station on the ground, on the contrary, the feat is very easy.'''







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
'''Evidently, when an object in seen, consciousness of the external form can only be due to the fact that those cones and rods of the retina which are covered by the image are affected differently from the rest, and it is speculation not to hazardous to assume that visualization is accompanied by reflex action on the retina which may be detected by suitable instruments. In this way it might also be possible to project the reflex action on a screen, and with further refinement, resorting to the principle involved in moving picture, the continuous play of thots might be rendered visible, recorded and at will reproduced.'''







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
'''As stated on a previous occasion, when I was a student at college I conceived a flying machine quite unlike the present ones. The underlying principle was sound but could not be carried into practice for want of a prime-mover of sufficiently great activity. In recent years I have successfully solved this problem and am now planning
🐇
aerial machines devoid

of sustaining planes, ailerons, propellers

and other external attachments,

which will be capable of immense speeds 💊

and are very likely to furnish powerful arguments for peace in the near future. Such a machine, sustained and

propelled entirely by reaction,

is shown on page 108 and is supposed to be controlled either mechanically or by wireless energy. By installing proper plants it will be practicable to project a missile of this kind into the air and drop it almost on the very spot designated, which may be thousands of miles away. But we are not going to stop at this. 🐇 Telautomata will be ultimately produced, capable of acting as if possest of their own intelligence, and their advent will create a revolution. As early as 1898 I proposed to representatives of a large manufacturing concern the construction and public exhibition of an automobile carriage which, left to itself, would perform a great variety of operations involving something akin to judgment. But my proposal was deemed chimerical at that time and nothing came from it.'''








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘2️⃣0️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '20
__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
HELLO, EARTH! HELLO!
🐇 Marconi believes he is receiving signals from the planets
"The most familiar signal received Is curiously musical. It comes In the form of three short raps, which may be Interpreted as the Morse letter S, but there are other sounds which may stand for other letters. 

Nikola Tesla, the famous Serbian inventor and electrical expert says:
'''Marconi's Idea of communicating with the other planets is the greatest and most fascinating problem confronting the human imagination today. To Insure success a body of competent scientists should be organized to study all possible plans and put into execution the best. The matter should be directed probably by astronomers with sufficient backing from men with money and imagination. Supposing that there are intelligent human beings on Mars, success is easily within the range of possibility. In March, 1907, I stated in the Harvard Illustrated Magazine that experiments looking to communication with other planets should be undertaken.
'''In 1899 I built an electric plant in Colorado and obtained activities of 18,000,000 horsepower. In the course of my experiments I employed a receiver of virtually unlimited sensitiveness. There were no other wireless plants near, and, at that time, no other wireless plants anywhere on this earth of sufficient range to affect mine. One day my ear caught what seemed to be regular signals. I knew that they could not have been produced upon the earth. The possibility that they came from Mars occurred to me, but the pressure of business affairs caused me to drop the experiment.
'''The thing, I think, that we should try to develop Is a plan akin to picture transmission, by means of which we could convey to the Inhabitants of Mars knowledge of earthly forms. This would enable up to exchange with them not only simple primitive facts, but involved conceptions. To talk to Mars seems to me only a matter of electric power and perseverance.'''
Pro. Albert Einstein, the German astronomer and author of the theory of "Relativity" that is apparently upsetting all accepted doctrines, believes 🐇 that Mars and other planets are inhabited but if intelligent creatures are trying to communicate with the earth he should expect them to use rays of light, which would much more easily be controlled.








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘2️⃣1️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '21








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘2️⃣2️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '22
__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
'''I caught signals which I interpreted as meaning 1--2--3--4--🐇. I believe the (Wal)Martians use(d) numbers for communication because numbers are universal.'''








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘2️⃣3️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '23
__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
Think of it, a great mechanical eye, created of finest tempered steel, endowed with electric power and seeing to all parts of the earth' "Science, in the person of Nikola Tesla announces it as a realized achievement. It affords a fantastic picture,
a superb imaginative flight for
🐇
the mechanical orb 💊

will follow in principle the exquisite and flawless construction of the human eye.

Tesla, the creator,
is a Nobel prize winner 🤦‍♂️ 🤷‍♂️ 😆
and the man who harnessed Niagara Falls. He describes his all-seeing eye as follows:

'''My electrical eye comes as the result of years of study and experiment. Three stages mark its construction and the first two and most difficult have already been completed. I am certain that Man will soon possess this machine in completed form and will be able to








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘2️⃣4️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '24








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘2️⃣5️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '25








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘2️⃣6️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '26
__________________
WHEN WOMAN IS BOSS
by John B. Kennedy
Collier's Weekly
January 30th, 1926 Page number(s): 17
*(foreword)
__________________
Modern systems of power transmission will become antiquated. Compact relay stations one half o🐇r one quarter the size of our modern power plants will be the basis of operation—in the air and under the sea, f🐇r (sea) water will effect small loss in conveying energy by wireless.

This struggle of the human female toward sex equality will end in a new sex order, with the female as superior.  The modern woman, who anticipates in merely superficial phenomena the advancement of her sex, is but a surface symptom of something deeper and more potent fermenting in the bosom of the race. 








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘2️⃣7️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '27
__________________


WORLD SYSTEM OF WIRELESS TRANSMISSION OF ENERGY
————
by Nikola Tesla
Telegraph and Telephone Age
October 16th, 1927 Page number(s): 457-460


The transmission of power without wires is not a theory or a mere possibility, as it appears to most people, but a fact demonstrated by me in experiments which have extended for years. Nor did the idea present itself to me all of a sudden, but was the result of a very slow and gradual development and a logical consequence of my investigations which were earnestly undertaken in 1893 when I gave the world the first outline of my system of broadcasting wireless energy for all purposes. In several demonstrative lectures before scientific societies during the preceding three years I showed that it was not necessary to use two wires in transmitting electrical energy, but that one only might be employed equally well. My experiments with currents of high frequencies were the first ever performed in public and elicited the keenest interest on account of the possibilities they opened up and striking character of the phenomena. Few of the experts familiar with the up-to-date appliances will appreciate the difficulty of my task with the elementary devices I had then at command, as accurate adjustments for resonance had to be made in every experiment.

The transmission of energy through a single conductor without return having been found practicable it occurred to me that possibly even that one wire might be dispensed with and the earth used to convey the energy from the transmitter to the receiver.
HIGH FREQUENCY DYNAMO AND “TESLA COIL”

Manifestly, currents such as were ordinarily employed in the arts and industries were unsuitable and I had to devise special generators and transformers for furnishing impulses of the requisite quality.

First, I perfected high frequency dynamos which were of two types, one with a direct current field excitation and the other in which the magnet was energized by alternating currents of different phase, producing a rotating magnetic field. Both of these have found employment in connection with my broadcasting wireless system. In the first machine I exhibited an efficiency of ninety per cent. was attained, but it was necessary to run it in hydrogen or rarefied air to minimize the otherwise prohibitive windage loss and deafening noise.

In order to overcome the inherent limitations of such machines I next concentrated my efforts on the perfection of a peculiar transformer consisting of several tuned circuits in inductive relation which received the primary energy from oscillatory discharges of condensers. This apparatus, originally identified with my name and considered by the leading scientific men my best achievement, is now used in every wireless transmitter and receiver throughout the world. It has enabled me to obtain currents of any desired frequency, electromotive force and volume, and to produce a great variety of electrical, chemical, thermal, light and other effects, Roentgen, cathodic and other rays of transcending intensities. I have employed it in my investigations of the constitution of matter and radioactivity, published from 1896 to 1898 in the Electrical Review in which it was demonstrated, prior to the discovery of Radium by Mme. Sklodowska and Pierre Curie, that radio-activity is a common property of matter and that such bodies emit small particles of various sizes and great velocities, a view which was received with incredulity but finally recognized as true. It has been put to innumerable uses and proved in the hands of others a veritable lamp of Aladdin.

As I think of my earliest coils, which were nothing more than scientific toys, the subsequent development appears to me like a dream.

THE “MAGNIFYING TRANSMITTER” AND EARTH RESONANCE

While I was perfectly convinced, from the outset, that success would be ultimately achieved, it was not until by slow improvement I evolved the so-called “Magnifying Transmitter” that I obtained convincing evidence of the feasibility of wireless power transmission on a vast scale for all industrial purposes.

The chief discovery, which satisfied me thoroughly as to the practicability of my plan, was made in 1899 at Colorado Springs, where I carried on tests with a generator of fifteen hundred kilowatt capacity and ascertained that under certain conditions the current was capable of passing across the entire globe and returning from the antipodes to its origin with undiminished strength. It was a result so unbelievable that the revelation at first almost stunned me. I saw in a flash that by properly organized apparatus at sending and receiving stations, power virtually in unlimited amounts could be conveyed through the earth at any distance, limited only by the physical dimensions of the globe, with an efficiency as high as ninety-nine and one-half per cent.

The mode of propagation of the currents from my transmitter through the terrestrial globe is most extraordinary considering the spread of the electrification of the surface. The wave starts with a theoretically infinite speed, slowing down first very quickly and afterward at a lesser rate until the distance is about six thousand miles, when it proceeds with the speed of light. From there on it again increases in speed, slowly at first, and then more rapidly, reaching the antipode with approximately infinite velocity. The law of motion can be expressed by stating that the waves on the terrestrial surface sweep in equal intervals of time over equal areas, but it must be understood that the current penetrates deep into the earth and the effects produced on the receivers are the same as if the whole flow was confined to the earth’s axis joining the transmitter with the antipode. The mean surface speed is thus about 471,200 kilometers per second — fifty-seven per cent. greater than that of the so-called Hertz waves — which should propagate with the velocity of light if they exist. The same constant was found by the noted American astronomer, Capt. J. T. T. See, in his mathematical investigations, for the smallest particles of the ether which he fittingly designates as “etherons.” But while in the light of his theory this speed is a physical reality, the spread of the currents at the terrestrial surface is much like the passage of the moon’s shadow over the globe.

It will be difficult for most people engaged in practical pursuits to measure or even to form an adequate conception of the intensity of inspiration and force I derive from that part of my work which has passed into history. I have every reason to consider myself one of the most fortunate men, for I experience incessantly a feeling of inexpressible satisfaction that my alternating system is universally employed in the transmission and distribution of heat, light and power and that also my wireless system, in all its essential features, is used throughout the world for conveying intelligence. But my pioneer efforts in this later field are still grossly misunderstood.

SHORT WAVE BROADCASTING AND “BEAM” TRANSMISSION

Nothing illustrates this better than the recent demonstrations of a number of experts with very short waves, which have created the impression that power will be eventually transmitted by such means. In reality, experiments of this kind are the very denial of the possibility of economic transmission of energy. I have investigated this special subject experimentally during a great number of years, using sometimes waves as short as one millimeter, and have found even these unsuitable for such a purpose, not to say that their production is inseparable from great waste.

In order to secure good results by this method it would be necessary to employ radiations of a wave length incomparably smaller than the dimensions of the reflector, as radiant heat, light, infra-red or ultra-violet rays. Notwithstanding my repeated explanations experts do not seem to realize that no concentration of energy such as I attain in my wireless power system can or will ever be achieved through the instrumentality of reflectors, for in transmitting energy in this manner the receiver can collect only an amount proportionate to the area exposed to the rays, while in my system it draws the energy from an immense reservoir in ever so much greater quantity.

Similar considerations apply to directional transmission by short reflected waves or “beams.” If we could produce economically electric vibrations of a frequency approximating that of radiant heat waves, efficient reflectors without appreciable dispersion, and prevent absorption — then such a mode of transmitting energy might become of great importance. But attempts to accomplish this purpose with relatively very low frequencies are sure to prove futile. More than twenty-five years ago my efforts to transmit large amounts of power through the atmosphere resulted in the development of an invention of great promise, which has since been called the “Death Ray,” and attributed to Dr. Grindell Mathews, an ingenious and skillful English electrician. The underlying idea was to render the air conducting by suitable ionizing radiations and to convey high tension currents along the path of the rays. Experiments, conducted on a large scale, showed that with pressures of many millions of volts virtually unlimited quantities of energy can be projected to a small distance, as a few hundred feet, which might be satisfactory if the process were more economical and the apparatus less expensive. Since that time I have made important improvements and discovered a new principle which can be successfully applied without difficulty for various purposes in peace and war.

If I have understood the reports correctly, in the “beam transmission” with waves of a few meters length, an oscillating circuit, consisting of a straight vertical conductor, is placed in the focal line of a parabolic surface on which are placed many secondary straight wires parallel to the primary conductor. Now, this disposition is entirely faulty and to all evidence inefficient, as the secondary system does not operate in the manner of a parabolic reflector but merely produces a confused echo. The correct arrangement would require primary and secondary conductors situated in two vertical parallel planes separated by a distance equal to one quarter of the wave length. But even in this best form such a transmitter can only be of doubtful practical value. The two wave trains behind the reflecting, or rather echoing, system do not completely neutralize and there is considerable lateral dissipation. The energy of the primary system diminishes with the square of the distance, and this being also true of the secondary, the useful waves from the latter will suffer diminution of energy in proportion to the fourth power of their length. This means that only a very short wave can be used which, moreover, is unchangeable and difficult to regulate. One must be shortsighted not to perceive that better results will be obtained if the capital is all invested in a single directional system of proper design for the power available increases much more rapidly than the cost of the plant. Assuming even that the beam arrangement works with ideal perfection, it must still be inferior, since the requisite radiant energy is producible at smaller expense with the single system, which has the further advantages that it can be adapted to any wavelength, is equally effective in two directions and therefore of greater earning capacity. So palpably unsound is this scheme that I am at a loss to understand how it could pass the scrutiny of competent experts such as Dr. W. L. Austin and John Stone Stone.

THE “WORLD SYSTEM”

Since I began the construction of the first power plant in 1899 I have expressed myself repeatedly in regard to it and the plans I had previously formed through the medium of the Electrical Review, Electrical World, Electrical Experimenter, Science and Invention and other periodicals, notably the Century Magazine of June, 1900, to which I contributed a lengthy article on the “Problem of Increasing Human Energy“; but certain facts must still be told. In the first place the fundamental difference between the broadcasting system as now practiced and the one I expect to inaugurate is that at present the transmitter emits energy in all directions, while in the system I have devised only force is conveyed to all points of the earth, the energy itself traveling in definite paths determined beforehand. Perhaps the most wonderful feature is that the energy travels chiefly along an orthodromic line, that is, the shortest distance between two points at the surface of the globe, and reaches the receiver without the slightest dispersion, so that an incomparably greater amount is collected than is possible by radiations. I have thus provided a perfect means for transmitting power in any desired direction far more economically and without any such qualitative and quantitative limitations as the use of reflectors would necessarily involve.

Another distinction is that my system is based entirely on resonance, while in present practice reliance is placed chiefly on amplification by auxiliary devices generally consisting of various forms of vacuum tubes which have been brought to remarkable perfection. The foundation to their use was laid by Sir William Crookes, who discovered in 1876 that a highly heated conductor emits electrified particles. In 1882 a young French electrician, Vissière by name, observed that a current issues from the filament of an incandescent lamp and made careful measurements with specially prepared bulbs, some of which I had opportunity to witness in Ivry-sur-Seine, a suburb of Paris, at that time. But these phenomena found no application in the art until in 1892 I produced a vacuum tube detector superior in sensitiveness to any other form of which I have knowledge. Amazing progress has been since then achieved, but the employment of the modem vacuum detectors and amplifiers is an impediment to advance in the right direction and most of the troubles experienced in broadcasting are due to this cause. Until quite recently the transmitted waves were lacking in uniformity of length, rendering accurate attunement impossible. This defect has been in a measure remedied by control through quartz crystals, and now, for the first time, it is practicable to carry out important refinements for bettering the service.

The electro-mechanical process of producing isochronous oscillations is one of my earliest inventions and I have applied it in many ways with great success. Its application to the operation of existing plants secures important advantages, but in spite of this and other improvements a change in the present apparatus and method of broadcasting is becoming daily more imperative and for this reason I am anxious to resume the introduction of my “World System” with novel transmitters of great effectiveness and receivers of elementary simplicity. In my apparatus the isochronism is so perfect and attunement sharp to such a degree that in the transmission of speech, pictures or similar operations, the frequency or wavelength is varied only through a minute range which need not be more than one hundredth of one per cent. if desired. Statics and all other interferences are completely eliminated and the service is unaffected by weather, seasonal or diurnal changes of any kind. The system lends itself particularly to World Wireless Telephony and Telegraphy as the current from the transmitter can be kept virtually constant and the control effected by a simple microphone without the elaborate means now employed. Any reasonable number of simultaneous and non-interfering messages is practicable and a speed of many thousands of words per minute can be attained in telegraphic transmission. The same principles are also applicable to operation through wires and cables. In 1903 I proposed to the Western Union and Postal Telegraph companies such multiplex transmission for their lines but received no encouragement mainly because the volume of business did not call for a great increase of working capacity. At a later date my improvements were introduced as “Wired Wireless.” A quite inappropriate name inasmuch as the waves radiated from the wire are completely lost and of no effect on the receiver.

My plans for a power plant have been developed to the point of application, but I am still unable to say when I shall begin active work. There are no such difficulties in the way as confronted me from the outset, for at that time I was alone; now many are convinced that my undertaking is rational and practical. Needless to say that I am using every effort to give to the world my best and most important work as soon as possible and free of all blemish and flaw. I have in view a number of places which seem well suited for the purpose, but my warmest wish is to transmit power from Niagara Falls, where the first triumph with my alternating system was achieved.

One of the most important uses of wireless energy will be undoubtedly for the propulsion of flying machines to which power can be readily supplied without ground connection, for although the flow of the currents is confined to the earth an electro magnetic field is created in the atmosphere surrounding it. If conductors or circuits accurately attuned and properly positioned are carried by the plane, energy is drawn into these circuits much the same as a fluid will pass through a hole created in the container. With an industrial plant of great capacity sufficient power can be derived in this manner to propel any kind of aerial machine. This I have always considered as the best and permanent solution of the problems of flight. No fuel of any kind will be required as the propulsion will be accomplished by light electric motors operated at great speed. Nevertheless, anticipating slow progress, I am developing a novel type of flying machine which seems to be well suited for meeting the present necessity of a safe, small and compact “aerial flivver” capable of rising and descending vertically.

Television, as conceived by me in 1893, will be another valuable and timely application. At that time I advanced the idea that the formation of a clear mental image of external objects is accompanied by a reflex action on the retina, making it possible to read thoughts and even to project the images conceived on a screen and render them visible to an audience. This would be of inestimable consequence on all human relations but the idea can not be realized until some way is found to lay bare the retina. Continued reflections on this subject led me to evolve apparatus for transmitting instantaneously true vision without any moving devices, and in 1900 I had already solved three of the problems which confronted me, namely: to individualize and isolate a very great number of channels or “nerves”; to convey to the receiving apparatus energy in sufficient amount, and, to make the vision of the moving images independent of distance. Eventually also I hope to overcome the shortcomings of the selenium cell by a different device.

I am most interested, however, in the perfection of broadcasting which is now carried on with unfit apparatus and on a commercially defective plan. The transmitters have to be greatly improved and the receivers simplified and in the distribution of wireless energy for all purposes the precedent established by the telegraph, telephone and power companies must be followed, for while the means are different the service is of the same character. 𝕋𝕖𝕔𝕙𝕟𝕚𝕔𝕒𝕝 𝕚𝕟𝕧𝕖𝕟𝕥𝕚𝕠𝕟 𝕚𝕤 𝕒𝕜𝕚𝕟 𝕥𝕠 𝕒𝕣𝕔𝕙𝕚𝕥𝕖𝕔𝕥𝕦𝕣𝕖 𝕒𝕟𝕕 𝕥𝕙𝕖 𝕖𝕩𝕡𝕖𝕣𝕥𝕤 𝕞𝕦𝕤𝕥 𝕚𝕟 𝕥𝕚𝕞𝕖 𝕔𝕠𝕞𝕖 𝕥𝕠 𝕥𝕙𝕖 𝕤𝕒𝕞𝕖 𝕔𝕠𝕟𝕔𝕝𝕦𝕤𝕚𝕠𝕟𝕤 𝕀 𝕙𝕒𝕧𝕖 𝕣𝕖𝕒𝕔𝕙𝕖𝕕 𝕝𝕠𝕟𝕘 𝕒𝕘𝕠. 𝕊𝕠𝕠𝕟𝕖𝕣 𝕠𝕣 𝕝𝕒𝕥𝕖𝕣 𝕞𝕪 𝕡𝕠𝕨𝕖𝕣 𝕤𝕪𝕤𝕥𝕖𝕞 𝕨𝕚𝕝𝕝 𝕙𝕒𝕧𝕖 𝕥𝕠 𝕓𝕖 𝕒𝕕𝕠𝕡𝕥𝕖𝕕 𝕚𝕟 𝕚𝕥𝕤 𝕖𝕟𝕥𝕚𝕣𝕖𝕥𝕪 𝕒𝕟𝕕 𝕤𝕠 𝕗𝕒𝕣 𝕒𝕤 𝕀 𝕒𝕞 𝕔𝕠𝕟𝕔𝕖𝕣𝕟𝕖𝕕 𝕚𝕥 𝕚𝕤 𝕒𝕤 𝕘𝕠𝕠𝕕 𝕒𝕤 𝕕𝕠𝕟𝕖. If I were ever assailed by doubt of ultimate success I would dismiss it by remembering the words of that great philosopher, Lord Kelvin, who after witnessing some of my experiments said to me with tears in his eyes: “I am sure you will do it.”


stylize font= x 0
insrt figrs tmplt= 1x+C
photocopy of original here=

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘2️⃣8️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '28

It is hereby certified that 'error' appears in the printed specification of the above numbered patent requiring 'correction' as follows: Page 1, after line 57, strike out the formula and insert instead








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘2️⃣9️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '29
__________________


NIKOLA TESLA TELLS OF NEW RADIO THEORIES
————
by
New York Herald Tribune
September 22nd, 1929 Page number(s): 1, 29

Does Not Believe in Hertz Waves and Heaviside Layer, Interview Discloses


The model of a "Tesla Coil" which will be featured in the historic exhibit of the radio show reawakens interest in its inventor.

It is not generally appreciated that this curious apparatus, often associated with pretty or spectacular demonstrations of high voltage electricity, is really a fundamental part of modern radio. For all the tuning apparatus and circuits in every transmitting and receiving set are simply variations of Tesla coils and Tesla coil circuits.

It was for this invention, and other inventions and principles concerned with tuning, heterodyning, and the generation of continuous waves, which were made at least several years before the very first experiments of Marconi, that many of our most reputable engineers have conceded to Nikola Tesla the title of "Father of Radio".

Mr. Tesla, still actively working, was interviewed last week to get his ideas regarding the prospects of the radio of 1930, and beyond. As a prophet, however, he balked. He had repeated time and again his visions for the future. As far back as 1900, he had contemplated a world-wireless system which included broadcasting, picture transmission, international time service, and in addition television and the distribution of electrical power. Part of this early prophecy has been realized - what remained, still stood as his prediction.

Disputes Hertz Waves

What, then, about power transmission by radio? Laurence M. Cockaday, the technical editor of this radio section, had expressed the opinion several weeks ago that, with present apparatus at least, it was hardly feasible. Mr. Tesla agreed to discuss the point at length. As a result, he made public for the first time one of the most extraordinary conclusions - that Hertz waves do not exist! If his theory is true, there may be found in it more adequate explanations of "dead spots", fading, reflection and a dozen other problems that have always puzzled the profession.

The inventor began by referring to Cockaday's article:

"I have read the article, and I quite agree with the opinion expressed - that wireless power transmission is impractical with present apparatus. This conclusion will be naturally reached by any one who recognizes the nature of the agent by which the impulses are transmitted in present wireless practice.

"When Dr. Heinrich Hertz undertook his experiments from 1887 to 1889 his object was to demonstrate a theory postulating a medium filling all space, called the ether, which was structureless, of inconceivable tenuity and yet solid and possessed of rigidity incomparably greater than that of the hardest steel. He obtained certain results and the whole world acclaimed them as an experimental verification of that cherished theory. But in reality what he observed tended to prove just its fallacy.
🐇
"I had maintained for many years before that such a medium as supposed could not exist, and that we must rather accept the view that all space is filled with a gaseous substance. On repeating the Hertz experiments with much improved and very powerful apparatus, I satisfied myself that what he had observed was nothing else but effects of longitudinal waves in a gaseous medium, that is to say, waves, propagated by alternate compression and expansion. He had observed waves in the ether much of the nature of sound waves in the air.
🐇
"Up to 1896, however, I did not succeed in obtaining a positive experimental proof of the existence of such a medium. But in that year I brought out a new form of vacuum tube capable of being charged to any desired potential, and operated it with effective pressures of about 4,000,000 volts. I produced cathodic and other rays of transcending intensity. The effects, according to my view, were due to minute particles of matter carrying enormous electrical charges, which, for want of a better name, I designated as matter not further decomposable. Subsequently those particles were called electrons.

"One of the first striking observations made with my tubes was that a purplish glow for several feet around the end of the tube was formed, and I readily ascertained that it was due to the escape of the charges of the particles as soon as they passed out into the air; for it was only in a nearly perfect vacuum that these charges could be confined to them. The coronal discharge proved that there must be a medium besides air in the space, composed of particles immeasurably smaller than those of air, as otherwise such a discharge would not be possible. On further investigation I found that this gas was so light that a volume equal to that of the earth would weigh only about one-twentieth of a pound.

"The velocity of any sound wave depends on a certain ratio between elasticity and density, and for this ether or universal gas the ratio is 800,000,000,000 times greater than for air. This means that the velocity of the sound waves propagated through the ether is about 300,000 times greater than that of the sound waves in air, which travel at approximately 1,085 feet a second. Consequently the speed in ether is 900,000 x 1,085 feet, or 186,000 miles, and that is the speed of light.

"As the waves of this kind are all the more penetrative the shorter they are, I have for years urged the wireless experts to use such waves in order to get good results, but it took a long time before they settled upon this practice.

"Although the world is still skeptical as to the feasibility of my undertaking, I note that some advanced experts, at least, share my views, and I hope that before long wireless power transmission will be as common as transmission by wires."

According to Mr. Tesla, the present broadcasting station does not propagate Hertzian waves, as has always been supposed, but acts more like an "ether whistle" - transmitting waves through the ether similar to the waves transmitted by an ordinary whistle through the air. He also expressed his disbelief in the Heavenside layer, and claimed that the reflection of waves back toward the earth was due to the change of medium encountered at the vacuous boundary of the atmosphere.

At Colorado Springs, about thirty years ago, this scientist had a Tesla coil seventy-five feet in diameter which produced voltages above 12,000,000, and sparks over 100 feet long. Electrical flashes were created which were the nearest approach to lightning that man has ever made. During his experiments there, of over a year, Tesla claims that he transmitted a considerable amount of electrical current to the other side of the earth. It was upon these, and later experiments that he bases his present prediction.


stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt= 0
photocopy of original here=

__________________







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
🐇 '''The mode of propagation of the currents from my transmitter through the terrestrial globe is most extraordinary considering the spread of the electrification of the surface. The wave starts with a theoretically infinite speed, slowing down first very quickly and afterward at a lesser rate until the distance is about six thousand miles, when it proceeds with the speed of light. From there on it again increases in speed, slowly at first, and then more rapidly, reaching the antipode with approximately infinite velocity. The law of motion can be expressed by stating that the waves on the terrestrial surface sweep in equal intervals of time over equal areas, but it must be understood that the current penetrates deep into the earth and the effects produced on the receivers are the same as if the whole flow was confined to the earth's axis joining the transmitter with the antipode. The mean surface speed is thus about 471,200 kilometers per second — fifty-seven per cent. greater than that of the so-called Hertz waves — which should propagate with the velocity of light if they exist. The same constant was found by the noted American astronomer, Capt. J. T. T. See, in his mathematical investigations, for the smallest particles of the ether which he fittingly designates as “etherons.” But while in the light of his theory this speed is a physical reality, the spread of the currents at the terrestrial surface is much like the passage of the moon's shadow over the globe.
It will be difficult for most people engaged in practical pursuits to measure or even to form an adequate conception of the intensity of inspiration and force I derive from that part of my work which has passed into history. I have every reason to consider myself one of the most fortunate men, for I experience incessantly a feeling of inexpressible satisfaction that my alternating system is universally employed in the transmission and distribution of heat, light and power and that also my wireless system, in all its essential features, is used throughout the world for conveying intelligence. But my pioneer efforts in this later field are still grossly misunderstood.'''








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘3️⃣0️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '30
__________________


'MAN'S GREATEST ACHIEVEMENT'
————
by
New York American
July 6th, 1930 (also see: preprint May 13th, 1907)


When a child is born its sense-organs are brought in contact with the outer world.

The waves of sound, heat, and light beat upon its feeble body, its sensitive nerve-fibres quiver, the muscles contract and relax in obedience: a gasp, a breath, and in this act a marvelous little engine, of inconceivable delicacy and complexity of construction, unlike any on earth, is hitched to the wheel-work of the Universe.

The little engine labors and grows, performs more and more involved operations, becomes sensitive to ever subtler influences and now there manifests itself in the fully developed being - Man - a desire mysterious, inscrutable and irresistible: to imitate nature, to create, to work himself the wonders he perceives.

Inspired in this task he searches, discovers and invents, designs and constructs, and enriches with monuments of beauty, grandeur and awe, the star of his birth.

He descends into the bowels of the globe to bring forth its hidden treasures and to unlock its immense imprisoned energies for its use.

He invades the dark depths of the ocean and the azure regions of the sky.

He peers into the innermost nooks and recesses of molecular structure and lays bare to his gaze worlds infinitely remote. He subdues and puts to his service the fierce, devastating spark of Prometheus, the titanic forces of the waterfall, the wind and the tide.

He tames the thundering bolt of Jove and annihilates time and space. He makes the great Sun itself his obedient toiling slave.

Such is the power and might that the heavens reverberate and the whole earth trembles by the mere sound of his voice.

What has the future in store for this strange being, born of a breath, of perishable tissue, yet immortal, with his powers fearful and divine? What magic will be wrought by him in the end? What is to be his greatest deed, his crowning achievement?

𝐋𝐨𝐧𝐠 𝐚𝐠𝐨 𝐡𝐞 𝐫𝐞𝐜𝐨𝐠𝐧𝐢𝐳𝐞𝐝 𝐭𝐡𝐚𝐭 𝐚𝐥𝐥 𝐩𝐞𝐫𝐜𝐞𝐩𝐭𝐢𝐛𝐥𝐞 𝐦𝐚𝐭𝐭𝐞𝐫 𝐜𝐨𝐦𝐞𝐬 𝐟𝐫𝐨𝐦 𝐚 𝐩𝐫𝐢𝐦𝐚𝐫𝐲 𝐬𝐮𝐛𝐬𝐭𝐚𝐧𝐜𝐞, 𝐨𝐟 𝐚 𝐭𝐞𝐧𝐮𝐢𝐭𝐲 𝐛𝐞𝐲𝐨𝐧𝐝 𝐜𝐨𝐧𝐜𝐞𝐩𝐭𝐢𝐨𝐧 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐟𝐢𝐥𝐥𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐚𝐥𝐥 𝐬𝐩𝐚𝐜𝐞 - 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐀𝐤𝐚𝐬𝐡𝐚 𝐨𝐫 𝐥𝐮𝐦𝐢𝐧𝐢𝐟𝐞𝐫𝐨𝐮𝐬 𝐞𝐭𝐡𝐞𝐫 - 𝐰𝐡𝐢𝐜𝐡 𝐢𝐬 𝐚𝐜𝐭𝐞𝐝 𝐮𝐩𝐨𝐧 𝐛𝐲 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐥𝐢𝐟𝐞-𝐠𝐢𝐯𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐏𝐫𝐚𝐧𝐚 𝐨𝐫 𝐜𝐫𝐞𝐚𝐭𝐢𝐯𝐞 𝐟𝐨𝐫𝐜𝐞, 𝐜𝐚𝐥𝐥𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐢𝐧𝐭𝐨 𝐞𝐱𝐢𝐬𝐭𝐞𝐧𝐜𝐞, 𝐢𝐧 𝐧𝐞𝐯𝐞𝐫 𝐞𝐧𝐝𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐜𝐲𝐜𝐥𝐞𝐬, 𝐚𝐥𝐥 𝐭𝐡𝐢𝐧𝐠𝐬 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐩𝐡𝐞𝐧𝐨𝐦𝐞𝐧𝐚.

The primary substance, thrown into infinitesimal whirls of prodigious velocity, becomes gross matter; the force subsiding, the motion ceases and matter disappears, reverting to the primary substance.

Can Man control this grandest, most awe-inspiring of all processes in nature? Can he harness her inexhaustible energies to perform all their functions at his bidding, more still - can he so refine his means of control as to put them in operation simply by the force of his will?

If he could do this he would have powers almost unlimited and supernatural. At his command, with but a slight effort on his part, old worlds would disappear and new ones of his planning would spring into being.

He could fix, solidify and preserve the ethereal shapes of his imagining, the fleeting visions of his dreams. He could express all the creations of his mind, on any scale, in forms concrete and imperishable.

He could alter the size of this planet, control its seasons, guide it along any path he might choose through the depths of the Universe.

He could make planets collide and produce his suns and stars, his heat and light. He could originate and develop life in all its infinite forms.

To create and annihilate material substance, cause it to aggregate in forms according to his desire, would be the supreme manifestation of the power of Man’s mind, his most complete triumph over the physical world, his crowning achievement which would place him beside his Creator and fulfill his ultimate destiny.


*photocopy of original here

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘3️⃣1️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '31

TESLA CELEBRATES HIS 75TH BIRTHDAY
by ?
New York Sun
July 11th, 1931 Page Number(s): ?

"—Back in 1894 a long, lean, almost cadaverous, looking man used to enthrall Ward McAllister and other playboys at Delmonico's with dissertations on the fly — and how he could fly! And maybe man would get that way some day, too. That was Nikola Tesla from the kingdom of Lika, on the borders of Austria-Hungary, but rubbed out of existence as an independent State long before the big war. Mr. Tesla's visions suggested hashish to some rock ribbed scientists,

but in 1915 he got the Nobel physics prize 😭 😂

for his research in energy transmission, his take-off in today's prophecy. While he has called many of the modern scientific miracles in advance, some are still in suspense,

notably his prediction that
🐇
some day the Atlantic Ocean will be lit up

like Forty-second street and Broadway

by some comparatively simple, electrical conjuring.—"







__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
'''Tesla contradicts a part of the relativity theory emphatically, holding that mass is unalterable; otherwise, energy could be produced from nothing, since the kinetic energy acquired in the fall of a body would be greater than that necessary to lift it at a small velocity.'''








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘3️⃣2️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '32
__________________


TESLA, AT 76, CALLS RADIO HIS DESPISED 'CHILD'
————
by
New York Herald Tribune
July 10th, 1932 Page number(s): 11


...

"We are all automata, nothing else." he said. "And yet I have a certain idealism. There is an ideal striving which is the effort of the human mind to free itself from materialistic fetters. But there is no individuality. You wouldn't say a wave on the ocean had individuality. It is a succession of waves. You are not the same person today that you were yesterday. I am just a concatenation of existences which are nearly, but not exactly, alike. It is this concatenation which produces the effect of continuance, like a motion picture. What Tesla gives to posterity is not the product or Tesla, but of a succession of existences."


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


PIONEER RADIO ENGINEER GIVES VIEW ON POWER
————
by Nikola Tesla
New York Herald Tribune
September 11th, 1932 Page number(s): ?

Tesla Says Wireless Waves Are Not Electromagnetic, But Sound In Nature

Holds Space Not Curved

Predicts Power Transmission to Other Planets


The assumption of the Maxwellian ether was thought necessary to explain the propagation of light by transverse vibrations, which can only occur in a solid. So fascinating was this theory that even at present it has many supporters, despite the manifest impossibility of a medium, perfectly mobile and tenuous to a degree inconceivable, and yet extremely rigid, like steel. As a result some illusionary ideas have been formed and various phenomena erroneously interpreted. The so-called Hertz waves are still considered a reality proving that light is electrical in its nature, and also that the ether is capable of transmitting transverse vibrations of frequencies however low. This view has become untenable since I showed that the universal medium is a gaseous body in which only longitudinal pulses can be propagated, involving alternating compressions and expansions similar to those produced by sound waves in the air. Thus, a wireless transmitter does not emit Hertz waves which are a myth, but sound waves in the ether, behaving in every respect like those in the air, except that, owing to the great elastic force and extremely small density of the medium, their speed is that of light.

Suggested Short Waves Early

Since waves of this kind are all the more penetrating, the shorter they are, I have urged the experts engaged in the commercial application of the wireless art to employ very short waves, but for a long time my suggestions were not heeded. Eventually, though, this was done, and gradually the wave lengths were reduced to but a few meters. Invariably it was found that these waves, just as those in the air, follow the curvature of the earth and bend around obstacles, a peculiarity exhibited to a much lesser degree by transverse vibrations in a solid. Recently, however, ultrashort waves have been experimented with and the fact that they also have the same property was hailed as a great discovery, offering the stupendous promise to make wireless transmission infinitely simpler and cheaper.

It is of interest to know what wireless experts have expected, knowing that waves a few meters long are transmitted clear to the antipodes. Is there any reason that they would behave radically different when their length is reduced to about half of one meter?

Waves Go Around World.

As the general knowledge of this subject seems very limited, I may state, that even waves only one or two millimeters long, which I produced thirty-three years -ago, provided that they carry sufficient energy, can be transmitted around the globe. This is not so much due to refraction and reflection as to the properties of a gaseous medium and certain peculiar action which I shall explain some time in the future. At present it may be sufficient to cell attention to an important fact in this connection, namely, that this bending of the beam projected from reflector does not affect in the least its behavior in other respects. As regards deflection in a horizontal plane, it acts just as though it were straight. To be explicit the horizontal deviations are comparatively slight. In a proposed ultrashort wave transmission, the vertical bending, far from being an advantage, is a serious drawback, as it increased greatly the liability of disturbances by obstacles at the earth's surface. The downward deflection always occurs, irrespective of wave length, and also if the beam is thrown upward at an angle to the horizontal, and this tendency is, according to my finding, all the more pronounced the bigger the planet. On a body as large as the sun, it would be impossible to project a disturbance of this kind to any considerable distance except along the surface.

It might be inferred that I am alluding to the curvature of space supposed to exist according to the teachings of relativity, but nothing could be further from my mind. I hold that space cannot be curved, for the simple reason that it can have no properties. It might as well be said that God has properties. He has not, but only attributes and these are of our own making. Of properties we can only speak when dealing with matter filling the space. To say that in the presence of large bodies space becomes curved, is equivalent to stating that something can act upon nothing. I, for one, refuse to subscribe to such a view.

Need Radio Channels.

The chief object of employing very short waves is to provide an increased number of channels required to satisfy the ever-growing demand for wireless appliances. But this is only because the transmitting and receiving apparatus, as generally employed, is ill-conceived and not well adapted for selection. The transmitter generates several systems of waves, all of which, except one, are useless. As a consequence, only an infinitesimal amount of energy reaches the receiver and dependence is placed on extreme amplification, which can be easily affected by the use of the so-called three-electrode tubes. This invention has been credited to others, but as a matter of fact, it was brought out by me in 1892, the principle being described and illustrated in my lecture before the Franklin Institute and National Electric Light Association. In my original device I put around the incandescent filament a conducting member, which I called a "sieve." This device is connected to a wire leading outside of the bulb and serves to modify the stream of particles projected from the filament according to the charge imparted to it. In this manner a new kind of detector, rectifier and amplifier was provided. Many forms of tubes on this principle were constructed by me and various interesting effects obtained by their means shown to visitors in my laboratory from 1893 to 1899, when I undertook the erection of an experimental world-system wireless plant at Colorado Springs.

During the last thirty-two years these tubes have been made veritable marvels of mechanical perfection, but while helpful in many ways they have drawn the experts away from the simpler and much superior arrangement which I attempted to introduce in 1901. My plans involved the use of a highly effective and efficient transmitter conveying to any receiver at whatever distance, a relatively large amount of energy. The receiver is itself a device of elementary simplicity partaking of the characteristics of the ear, except that it is immensely more sensitive. In such a system resonant amplification is the only one necessary and the selectivity is so great that any desired number of separate channels can be provided without going to waves shorter than a few meters.

For this reason, and because of other shortcomings, I do not attach much importance to the employment of waves which are now being experimented with. Besides, I am contemplating the practical use of another principle, which I have discovered and which is almost unlimited in the number of channels and in the energy three-electrode tubes. This invention has been credited to others, but as a matter of fact, it was brought out by me in 1892, the principle being transmitted. It should enable us to obtain many important results heretofore considered impossible. With the knowledge of the facts before me, I do not think it hazardous to predict that we will be enabled to illuminate the whole sky at night and-that eventually we will flash power in virtually unlimited amounts to planets. It would not surprise me at all if an experiment to transmit thousands of horsepower to the moon by this new method were made in a few years from now.


*photocopy of original here

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘3️⃣3️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '33
__________________

THE WORLD OF TOMORROW
An Interview With Nikola Tesla

————
by Grace M. Keeffe
Psychology
October, 1933 Page number(s): 12-14, 54-55


An Interview With Nikola Tesla

Dr. Tesla, world-famous inventor, electrical wizard, and scientific forecaster unfolds the curtain of the very near future. “We are now watching the inauguration of a tremendous revolution,” he says.

To spend an hour with Dr. Tesla, as I did the other evening, is like soaring high above the clouds in an aeroplane, or viewing the earth from a distant mountain top.

At seventy-seven, Dr. Tesla looks out upon the world he has done so much to revolutionize and forecasts even greater changes within the very near future. Like the infrared ray, his deep-set, blue eyes pierce the fog of ignorance that engulfs us.

Tall, thin, ascetic, he towers high above the masses. But his interests remain closely interwoven with their welfare. Never does his gaze leave the drama of their daily living.
His entire thought is centered upon making that drama more beautiful and satisfying to all humanity.

“The desire that guides me in all I do,” Dr. Tesla told me, “is the desire to harness the forces of nature to the service of mankind.”

As he sat there, unfolding the curtain on the future and recalling the conflict of his early years, I was struck by the happy, youthful gleam in his eye, the serenity of his long, delicately chiseled face, the fine, slender lines of his hands. Those hands are the hands of an artist; that face the face of a philosopher, a poet, a dreamer. But Dr. Tesla is more than that. He is a practical scientist who converts his dreams into realities — realities that have startled the world and will do so many times again.

“We are now watching the inauguration of a tremendous revolution,” he told me. “It hinges upon the commercialization of the wireless transmission of power, the principles of which I have discovered. As soon as this is done, distance will be practically eliminated. And just think what that means — the end of the misunderstanding that is at the base of all of our present troubles. Up to now, individuals and nations never have been able really to come together. Wireless will make that possible. It will largely obliterate international boundaries and harmonize conflicting national interests. It will create understanding and sympathy, where now misunderstanding and antagonism reign.

“When wireless energy is commercialized, transport and transmission will be revolutionized. Motion pictures will be carried illimitable distances by wireless. Flying machines will be propelled by the same energy. We shall be able to fly from New York to Europe, with perfect safety, in a few short hours. We shall be able to go anywhere in the world — to the highest mountain, to the arctic, the desert, the jungle — and set up a little equipment that will give us heat to cook with, and light to read by. And we shall be able to carry this equipment in a satchel smaller than the ordinary suitcase.

“When wireless is perfectly applied, the whole earth will be converted into a huge brain. We shall be able to communicate with one another instantly. We shall see and hear one another as though we were face to face, even though thousands of miles separate us. And the instruments through which these wonders will be achieved will be amazingly simple. They may be small enough to be carried about in the pocket.”

Dr. Tesla was born in the Lika mountain district of Jugoslavia. His father was a cler-

𝘋𝘳. 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢, 𝘸𝘩𝘰 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘥𝘪𝘴𝘤𝘰𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘦𝘥 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘧𝘶𝘯𝘥𝘢𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘢𝘭 𝘱𝘳𝘪𝘯𝘤𝘪𝘱𝘭𝘦𝘴 𝘰𝘧 𝘸𝘪𝘳𝘦𝘭𝘦𝘴𝘴 𝘰𝘳 𝘳𝘢𝘥𝘪𝘰, 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘩𝘪𝘨𝘩 𝘧𝘳𝘦𝘲𝘶𝘦𝘯𝘤𝘺 𝘱𝘩𝘦𝘯𝘰𝘮𝘦𝘯𝘢 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘤𝘰𝘴𝘮𝘪𝘤 𝘳𝘢𝘺, 𝘸𝘩𝘰 𝘩𝘢𝘴 𝘨𝘪𝘷𝘦𝘯 𝘶𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢 𝘊𝘰𝘪𝘭 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘖𝘴𝘤𝘪𝘭𝘭𝘢𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯 𝘛𝘳𝘢𝘯𝘴𝘧𝘰𝘳𝘮𝘦𝘳, 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘏𝘪𝘨𝘩 𝘗𝘰𝘵𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘪𝘢𝘭 𝘝𝘢𝘤𝘶𝘶𝘮 𝘛𝘶𝘣𝘦, 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘛𝘦𝘭𝘢𝘶𝘵𝘰𝘮𝘢𝘵𝘪𝘤 𝘈𝘳𝘵 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘰𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳 𝘪𝘮𝘱𝘰𝘳𝘵𝘢𝘯𝘵 𝘪𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘯𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯𝘴, 𝘪𝘴 𝘢𝘭𝘴𝘰 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘥𝘪𝘴𝘤𝘰𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘦𝘳 𝘰𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘣𝘢𝘴𝘪𝘤 𝘱𝘳𝘪𝘯𝘤𝘪𝘱𝘭𝘦 𝘰𝘧 𝘮𝘰𝘥𝘦𝘳𝘯 𝘦𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘭 𝘴𝘤𝘪𝘦𝘯𝘤𝘦 — 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘳𝘰𝘵𝘢𝘵𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘮𝘢𝘨𝘯𝘦𝘵𝘪𝘤 𝘧𝘪𝘦𝘭𝘥 — 𝘦𝘮𝘣𝘰𝘥𝘪𝘦𝘥 𝘪𝘯 𝘩𝘪𝘴 𝘪𝘯𝘥𝘶𝘤𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯 𝘮𝘰𝘵𝘰𝘳 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘢𝘭𝘵𝘦𝘳𝘯𝘢𝘵𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘴𝘺𝘴𝘵𝘦𝘮 𝘰𝘧 𝘱𝘰𝘸𝘦𝘳 𝘵𝘳𝘢𝘯𝘴𝘮𝘪𝘴𝘴𝘪𝘰𝘯, 𝘸𝘩𝘪𝘤𝘩 𝘶𝘱𝘰𝘯 𝘪𝘵𝘴 𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘮𝘦𝘳𝘤𝘪𝘢𝘭 𝘪𝘯𝘵𝘳𝘰𝘥𝘶𝘤𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯 𝘣𝘺 𝘞𝘦𝘴𝘵𝘪𝘯𝘨𝘩𝘰𝘶𝘴𝘦, 𝘪𝘯 1888, 𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘱𝘭𝘦𝘵𝘦𝘭𝘺 𝘳𝘦𝘷𝘰𝘭𝘶𝘵𝘪𝘰𝘯𝘪𝘻𝘦𝘥 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘪𝘯𝘥𝘶𝘴𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘦𝘴 𝘰𝘧 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘸𝘰𝘳𝘭𝘥.

gyman, his mother an inventor like her father. Before he was six, little Nikola displayed the family genius in a scheme he evolved for catching bull-frogs. But that didn’t deter his parents from directing him toward the ministry.

“When I was nine,” Dr. Tesla told me, “I used to build little turbines in a mountain stream on my father’s land and drive with belts all sorts of machinery. I told my uncle, ‘Some day I am going to America and I will run a big wheel at Niagara Falls.’ I had read about the Falls and they fascinated me. But my uncle refused to take me seriously. ‘You’ll never see Niagara Falls,’ he told me. But I did come to America, and thirty years later, I realized my idea.”

Probably few other boyhood dreams have had such brilliant fulfillment. Dr. Tesla, at many points in his career, has proved the soundness of the old adage that “nothing is impossible.”

“From the age of ten,” Dr. Tesla continued his story, “I had been inventing all sorts of things, from elementary devices to means for getting power from the planets, and my mind worked so fast that it was impossible to fix my thoughts on paper.”

“𝘞𝘦𝘳𝘦 𝘸𝘦 𝘵𝘰 𝘴𝘦𝘪𝘻𝘦 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘦𝘭𝘪𝘮𝘪𝘯𝘢𝘵𝘦 𝘧𝘳𝘰𝘮 𝘰𝘶𝘳 𝘪𝘯𝘥𝘶𝘴𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘢𝘭 𝘸𝘰𝘳𝘭𝘥 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘳𝘦𝘴𝘶𝘭𝘵𝘴 𝘰𝘧 𝘋𝘳. 𝘛𝘦𝘴𝘭𝘢’𝘴 𝘸𝘰𝘳𝘬,” 𝘴𝘢𝘺𝘴 𝘋𝘳. 𝘉. 𝘈. 𝘉𝘦𝘩𝘳𝘦𝘯𝘥, 𝘰𝘶𝘵𝘴𝘵𝘢𝘯𝘥𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘦𝘯𝘨𝘪𝘯𝘦𝘦𝘳 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘢𝘶𝘵𝘩𝘰𝘳, “𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘸𝘩𝘦𝘦𝘭𝘴 𝘰𝘧 𝘪𝘯𝘥𝘶𝘴𝘵𝘳𝘺 𝘸𝘰𝘶𝘭𝘥 𝘤𝘦𝘢𝘴𝘦 𝘵𝘰 𝘵𝘶𝘳𝘯, 𝘰𝘶𝘳 𝘦𝘭𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘳𝘪𝘤 𝘤𝘢𝘳𝘴 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘵𝘳𝘢𝘪𝘯𝘴 𝘸𝘰𝘶𝘭𝘥 𝘴𝘵𝘰𝘱, 𝘰𝘶𝘳 𝘵𝘰𝘸𝘯𝘴 𝘸𝘰𝘶𝘭𝘥 𝘣𝘦 𝘥𝘢𝘳𝘬, 𝘰𝘶𝘳 𝘮𝘪𝘭𝘭𝘴 𝘸𝘰𝘶𝘭𝘥 𝘣𝘦 𝘥𝘦𝘢𝘥 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘪𝘥𝘭𝘦.”

At the gymnasium the young inventor became intensely interested in physics and electricity. But his parents still planned for him to become a minister. And he might have done so had it not been for a serious illness. After graduating from the Higher Realschule at Carlstadt in Croatia, he was stricken with cholera. Death seemed imminent. When his grief-stricken father tried to encourage him, he said:

“Perhaps I might get well, if you would let me become an engineer instead of a clergyman.”

His father promised solemnly to send him to the best technical institution in the world if he would only recover.

“That promise,” Dr. Tesla told me, “literally put new life into me. I did recover. And father kept his word. I was soon enrolled in the Polytechnic School in Gratz, Styria, one of the oldest institutions in Europe.

“During my second year there, we received a Gramme dynamo from Paris — a machine with a horseshoe form of field magnet and a wire-wound armature with a commutator, that has long since become antiquated. While the professor was demonstrating with the electro-dynamic principle the brushes sparked badly, and I suggested that it might be possible to operate a motor without those appliances. The professor declared that I could never create such a machine because the idea was equivalent to a perpetual motion scheme.

“𝘞𝘩𝘦𝘯 𝘸𝘪𝘳𝘦𝘭𝘦𝘴𝘴 𝘪𝘴 𝘱𝘦𝘳𝘧𝘦𝘤𝘵𝘭𝘺 𝘢𝘱𝘱𝘭𝘪𝘦𝘥, 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘸𝘩𝘰𝘭𝘦 𝘦𝘢𝘳𝘵𝘩 𝘸𝘪𝘭𝘭 𝘣𝘦 𝘤𝘰𝘯𝘷𝘦𝘳𝘵𝘦𝘥 𝘪𝘯𝘵𝘰 𝘢 𝘩𝘶𝘨𝘦 𝘣𝘳𝘢𝘪𝘯. 𝘞𝘦 𝘴𝘩𝘢𝘭𝘭 𝘣𝘦 𝘢𝘣𝘭𝘦 𝘵𝘰 𝘤𝘰𝘮𝘮𝘶𝘯𝘪𝘤𝘢𝘵𝘦 𝘸𝘪𝘵𝘩 𝘰𝘯𝘦 𝘢𝘯𝘰𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳 𝘪𝘯𝘴𝘵𝘢𝘯𝘵𝘭𝘺. 𝘞𝘦 𝘴𝘩𝘢𝘭𝘭 𝘴𝘦𝘦 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘩𝘦𝘢𝘳 𝘰𝘯𝘦 𝘢𝘯𝘰𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳 𝘢𝘴 𝘵𝘩𝘰𝘶𝘨𝘩 𝘸𝘦 𝘸𝘦𝘳𝘦 𝘧𝘢𝘤𝘦 𝘵𝘰 𝘧𝘢𝘤𝘦, 𝘵𝘩𝘰𝘶𝘨𝘩 𝘵𝘩𝘰𝘶𝘴𝘢𝘯𝘥𝘴 𝘰𝘧 𝘮𝘪𝘭𝘦𝘴 𝘴𝘦𝘱𝘢𝘳𝘢𝘵𝘦 𝘶𝘴. . . .”

“Hearing this from such a high authority, I cast my idea aside for the time being. But it wouldn’t leave my mind and before long I began thinking intently on the problem, trying to visualize the kind of machine I wanted to build and constructing all its parts in my imagination. These images were as clear and distinct as those I conjured up to drive away tormenting visions in my childhood, about which I am going to tell you presently. But it was not until four years later, in Budapest, that I arrived at a workable plan. One afternoon, I was walking through the City Park with a friend, and reciting poetry. The setting sun reminded me of these lines from Goethe’s Faust:

The glow retreats, done is the day of toil;
It yonder hastes, new fields of life exploring;
Ah, that no wing can lift me from the soil,
Upon its tracks to follow, follow soaring!

“As I spoke those beautiful words, the vision of my induction motor suddenly appeared before my eyes, complete, perfect, workable. Like a flash it had come and I stopped quick to draw the vision in the sand. There I made the same diagrams I was to show six years later before the American Institute of Electrical Engineers. The vision was so real that I cried with joy: ‘Look! Watch me reverse my motor!’ And I did it, demonstrating with my stick.

“𝘛𝘩𝘦 𝘥𝘢𝘺 𝘪𝘴 𝘯𝘰𝘵 𝘧𝘢𝘳 𝘥𝘪𝘴𝘵𝘢𝘯𝘵 𝘸𝘩𝘦𝘯 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘩𝘶𝘮𝘢𝘯 𝘳𝘢𝘤𝘦 𝘸𝘪𝘭𝘭 𝘯𝘰 𝘭𝘰𝘯𝘨𝘦𝘳 𝘣𝘦 𝘧𝘰𝘳𝘤𝘦𝘥 𝘵𝘰 𝘭𝘢𝘣𝘰𝘳 𝘧𝘰𝘳 𝘢 𝘭𝘪𝘷𝘦𝘭𝘪𝘩𝘰𝘰𝘥. 𝘛𝘩𝘦𝘯, 𝘸𝘦 𝘴𝘩𝘢𝘭𝘭 𝘣𝘦 𝘫𝘶𝘥𝘨𝘦𝘥 𝘢𝘴 𝘳𝘪𝘤𝘩 𝘰𝘳 𝘱𝘰𝘰𝘳 𝘢𝘤𝘤𝘰𝘳𝘥𝘪𝘯𝘨 𝘵𝘰 𝘰𝘶𝘳 𝘴𝘱𝘪𝘳𝘪𝘵𝘶𝘢𝘭 𝘤𝘢𝘱𝘢𝘤𝘪𝘵𝘺 𝘢𝘯𝘥 𝘰𝘶𝘳 𝘸𝘪𝘭𝘭 𝘵𝘰 𝘥𝘰, 𝘳𝘢𝘵𝘩𝘦𝘳 𝘵𝘩𝘢𝘯 𝘣𝘺 𝘰𝘶𝘳 𝘮𝘢𝘵𝘦𝘳𝘪𝘢𝘭 𝘱𝘰𝘴𝘴𝘦𝘴𝘴𝘪𝘰𝘯𝘴. 𝘏𝘪𝘨𝘩 𝘪𝘥𝘦𝘢𝘭𝘴 𝘢𝘭𝘰𝘯𝘦 𝘸𝘪𝘭𝘭 𝘧𝘳𝘦𝘦 𝘶𝘴 𝘧𝘳𝘰𝘮 𝘵𝘩𝘦 𝘧𝘦𝘵𝘵𝘦𝘳𝘴 𝘰𝘧 𝘮𝘢𝘵𝘦𝘳𝘪𝘢𝘭𝘪𝘴𝘮.”

“This discovery is known as the ‘rotating magnetic field.’ It is the principle on which my induction motor operates. In this invention I produced a sort of magnetic cyclone which grips the rotable part and whirls it — exactly what my professor had said could never be done. After inventing this motor, I gave myself up more intensely than ever to the enjoyment of picturing in my mind new kinds of machines. And, in less than two months, I had created mentally nearly all the types of motors and modifications of the system which is now identified with my name.

“In 1888, shortly after my arrival in America, where I worked nearly a year with Thomas A. Edison, Westinghouse began the manufacture of my induction motor. And before long my system was universally adopted against tremendous opposition and skepticism. This system gave the first great impetus to the harnessing of water power, and was used with real success at Niagara Falls. It is now employed in the generation and transmission of power in practically every part of the world.”

With his invention of the wireless light, Dr. Tesla achieved fame overnight. And since that time his name has grown continuously. Before he was forty, Lord Kelvin said of him, that he had contributed more than any other man to the study of electricity. That statement holds good today. C. A. Dana, the famous editor of the New York Sun said of him, “Men like Nikola Tesla can be counted on the fingers of one hand, perhaps on the thumb of one hand!”

Besides being one of the greatest living scientists, Dr. Tesla is a psychological phenomenon. His case has attracted the attention of the world’s leading psychologists. Many of them have declared his methods of work to be unique. To explain these methods, it is necessary to go back once more to his childhood days.

“In my early years,” Dr. Tesla told me, “l was greatly oppressed by the appearance of images of objects I had seen. These images were so vivid that they often blotted out my vision of real objects, and, by their persistence interfered with thought. Sometimes they were accompanied by strong flashes of light. Frequently, because of them, I passed through veritable agonies of fear. For instance, after I had seen a funeral, I no sooner retired to my room than the coffin appeared beside me and, no matter how I tried, I could not banish the image. For years I suffered so much from this that my life was almost despaired of.

“One day in my twelfth year, I was walking among the fields and feeling exceptionally well, when suddenly the object of a thought appeared before me. I thrust forth my hand to banish it. It receded. So thrilled was I by this victory of my will that I ran home, crying:

“‘Mother, I now can think of a thing without seeing it.’

“My mother laughed and said:

“You foolish boy, anybody can do that!’

“But I knew better. It had taken a great amount of will power for me to do it just that once.

“In trying to rid myself permanently of those tormenting visions, I began to take mental excursions beyond the small world of my actual knowledge. Day and night, in my imagination, I would journey through distant lands, meet and come to know strange people, grow very fond of them, and visit them again in later dreams, just as old friends. I can think of no greater enjoyment than that I derived from such experiences.

“Finally, I gained control of myself and became observant. And it was not long before I found that there was an external cause prompting every thought and action. In years of constant effort, I got so that I could not think of anything without becoming conscious of the impression which prompted the thought. Through this habit of locating the external cause that gave rise to a certain thought or action, I arrived at the conclusion that I was just an automatic engine, endowed with power of movement and motivated by impulses from the environment.

“In fact, we all are automata obeying external influences, entirely under the control of agents that beat on our senses from all directions of the outside world. Being merely receivers, it is a very important question how good the receivers are — some are sensitive and respond accurately. Others are sluggish and their reception is imperfect. The individual who is a better machine has so much greater chance of preserving himself and achieving success and happiness.

“Through my efforts to drive away those annoying images of my early years, I acquired a great facility for visualizing. And through this faculty I have evolved what is, I believe, a unique method of materializing inventive ideas and conceptions. This method may prove of great assistance to any imaginative man, whether he is an inventor, a business man, or an artist. It should help him to arrive at a clear conception of the central idea of his problem, instead of getting lost in the details.

“In brief, it is as follows: After experiencing a desire to invent a particular thing, I go on for days or months or even years with the idea in the back of my head. Whenever I feel like it, I play around with the problem without giving it any deliberate consideration. This is a period of incubation.

“Then follows the period of direct effort. I study the possible solutions of the problem and gradually center my mind on a narrowed field of investigation. When I am thus deliberately thinking of the problem in its specific aspects, I may begin to feel that I am arriving at the solution. And when I do feel that way, I know I really have solved the problem. That feeling is as convincing as the actual solution. In fact, I believe that the solution is then in my subconscious mind, although it may take a long time before it reaches the level of consciousness.

“As the form of the device becomes clearer, I change its construction, make improvements, and even operate it — all in my mind. If I am planning a machine of five hundred parts, I take the vital part, calculate all the dimensions from it, and give the workmen the accurate size of every detail. All of this is done without making a single sketch on paper, and when completed, the various parts fit together, just as certainly as though I had made accurate drawings. When the machine itself is finished, I slip my imaginary machine over it, as you would put a glove on your hand, and find that they coincide in the minutest detail.

“In ways, my method of work is an advantage. In others, it is a disadvantage. When you imagine things too easily, you are apt to neglect very important steps in practical life. You are likely to procrastinate, letting your work go until the last minute and then doing it in a hurry. The gift is fortunate only in so far as you use it to originate. But it also has helped me in other ways.

“Oftentimes, when I was a poor, young student without the money to buy an evening meal, I would retire to my room and visualize a sumptuous snack."


*photocopy of original here







__________________


TESLA PREDICTS NEW SOURCE OF POWER IN YEAR
————
by Nikola Tesla
New York Herald Tribune
July 9th, 1933 Page number(s): ?

SCIENTIST, 77 TOMORROW, TO
REVEAL RESULT OF HALF
LIFETIME'S STUDY SOON

CHEAP ENERGY FOR ALL
————————
DECLARES GENERATORS WILL
RUN500YEARSUNRENEWED[sic]


Dr. Nikola Tesla, who will be seventy-seven years old tomorrow, looked back yesterday over a lifetime in which he has been variously called a madman and a wizard of electricity and told of his plans for the tapping of a new source of energy so vast and so revolutionary in effect that he predicts he will be remembered for this alone.

This problem he has worked on for thirty-five years and within the next year he will be able to publish his findings, he says, with experimental data that will convince scientists and the lay public alike. What the nature of the new form of energy is he would not say beyond that it was “undreamed of,” that it was “violently opposed” to Einsteinian physics, that the sun has something to do with it, and that the energy would be available anywhere over the earth's surface in illimitable quantities. The primary cost of securing the energy will be high, the inventor said, but once the apparatus is installed the cost of production will be negligible and the machines will last 500 years.

Possibility of Error Admitted
“There is a possibility of mistake,” he said, “but I say that this thing can be done. I am as positive of it as I was of my results when working on the induction motor and the polyphase current. It will be my great work, it will be remembered when all else connected with my life has been forgotten. They thought I was a lunatic in 1896 when I first published a treatise in an electrical review on cosmic rays. Now the scientific journals are full of discussions of cosmic rays and no one calls the authors madmen — they are given Novel prizes, instead.”

Asked how it felt to be so far ahead of his time that he was subject to attacks upon his sanity, Dr. Tesla smiled and said that he had long since ceased to regard it as important.

“I live a life of seclusion,” he said. “The opinion of the world does not affect me. I have placed as the real values in my life what follows after I am dead, although it has been given to me to live to see those things which were once scouted accepted as scientific dogma.

“The thing that recompenses me is that my name shall be known to generations yet unborn for the Tesla coil, the Tesla motor, and now perhaps my name will be connected with the absolutely new source of power I am about to present to the world. It is this thought in which I find my happiness and health. A pioneer does not apply his energies in the way the world is going. Rather he goes against the current. He lets them call him a lunatic. He lets them trample him — if I should ever tell you the inside story of how I had been trampled — but never mind, it was all good for me. I have come through it. I am able to work harder than I worked a year ago. I work now with greater energy and get results more easily than ever before in my life.”

Takes Ten-Mile Walk Each Day
Dr. Tesla's appearance bore out his statement about his health. He is tall, rangy, bony. His regimen at seventy-seven calls for working all day in his laboratory in midtown Manhattan and a daily walk from eight to ten miles in all sorts of weather.

He preferred to talk while walking and lead the way from the Hotel Governor Clinton, where he has his bachelor apartment, up Seventh Avenue amid the hustle of the fur and garment centers. He strode along on his stork-like legs, with the tails of his old-fashioned long coat swinging in the breeze, with a straw hat upon his head and gray gloves in his hand.

In facial appearance he closely resembles Cornelius MacGillicudy, better known as “Connie Mack,” high cheekbones, a long, thin face and the eyes of a man who would pierce the secrets of the material world by power of external as well as internal vision. His hair is not yet entirely gray. The mustache that he once wore has been shaved off — it took much attention, he explained. Later on it became apparent how much this man valued time. “I do not sleep well,” he said. “My mind will not let me. It is going night and day. There is no more tyrannical thing than a mind that is accustomed to thought. It really seems to resent me falling asleep. It pounds for attention until I wake up again.

The tough fiber that is in him he explained entirely on congenital grounds. It is nothing unusual for members of his family to live to be more than 100 years old. His grandfather died at the early age of eighty-six, following a race on horseback in which he outdistanced the youths of his Serbian village. A hernia developed. “You know, in those days and in that wild country, they did not have the skillful doctors who can take you apart and put you together again,” the grandson said.

The distilled results of much living, much thought and communion with the forces of nature found expression as Dr. Tesla dodged in and out of traffic, avoided the hand-trucks of the garment trade, and conducted his peripatetic school.

“I have learned that you cannot break the laws of nature. That is death. Self-preservation is the only rigid law I know of. There is no morality in nature, beyond the necessity of preserving one's self and one's best efficiency. The social contract not to kill others comes under that heading, also. I believe in certain human truths as contained in the Bible but not in revealed religion or in the theologies. There seems to be an irreconcilable difference between science and that sort of religion.

“Then, too, there is a conflict between science and art. By ‘art’ I mean a certain integrated idealism. It is a centripetal something, opposed to the endless centrifugal forces of science. Eventually science will fly apart and fall of its own forces. There is too much for any one man to know. It is no longer possible, as in Bacon's day, for one may to take all knowledge as his province. The seeds of decay and disunion are there as the mass becomes too unwieldy — it works like everything else in nature — attractions set up repulsions, backwards and forwards it goes, now one side winning, now the other side.

Science will win in the present setup of things but it will likely carry civilization down with it when it goes. The art will have to step in, gather up the pieces and carry on. Of course, it is possible that there will be developed scientists who are artists as well. They must realize that this is something dynamic about idealism and apply that dynamism as they would any other force. Then civilization may be able to continue. But I doubt it — forces and counter forces — attractions and repulsions — all say “No.”

As he enters his seventy-eighth year, Dr. Tesla confided that he has three projects which he is working on, on the side, as a sort of relief from concentration on his power idea. One is to produce a type of radio transmission which will permit an individual wave-length for everyone of the 120,000,000 persons in the United States, thus bringing about private radio telephony; second, a discovery which will revolutionize the science of metallurgy; and third, a project to remake the face of society by exposing the inmost thoughts of the human brain through photographing the retina of the eye by invisible rays.

The idea is that all concepts, in the last analysis, are visual and are photographed on the retina while the thought is held. No one could lie or deceive if this invention came into use.

“After all, they have called me a lunatic before,” said Dr. Tesla. “What is one more time?”


*photocopy of original here

__________________







__________________


TREMENDOUS NEW POWER SOON TO BE UNLEASHED
————
by Carol Bird
Kansas City Journal-Post
September 10th, 1933 Page number(s): ?


Nikola Tesla, Starting His 78th Year, Works on Revolutionary Power Project and Also is Completing Process for Photographing Thought by Carol Bird.

Proving his theory that a man's efficiency and accomplishments should increase, and not diminish with mellow age', Nikola Tesla, inventor, physicist, and one of the world's leading electrical technicians, enters his seventy-eighth year busily engaged on three or four great scientific projects.

Several of these inventions or discoveries will be looked upon as "miracles" by many people, for Mr. Tesla has long been a scientist years ahead of his time, one whose advanced theories have alternately stamped him a "madman" and a wizard.

Just as people ridiculed Copernicus' theory of the planetary system, the unenlightened jeered Tesla's accomplishment, years ago, regarding cosmic rays. The pathfinder and the pioneer - and Mr. Tesla is both - are always condemned by the masses.

Nikola Tesla, tall, lean, with the face of an asthetic* and deep-dash set eyes, whose expression denotes concentration on a canvas of work too big for most people's comprehension, partially described a new and inexhaustible source of power he has discovered after years of research, revolutionizing modern physical science. At the same time he touched on his own reservoir of energy which makes such monumental discoveries possible at his advanced age.

How does he tap both these deep wells? What is the secret of fine health, keen mind, unusual vitality and mental force at 77, the time of life when most men are sitting in the sun with shawls over their knees or, alas: lying beneath the sod?

Mr. Tesla is the father of the alternating system of power transmission and radio, the induction motor and Tesla coil.

Asked about his startling new scientific discoveries, one of which concerns the "photographing of thought," which will, he maintains, bring about a tremendous social revolution, he said:

"My first and most important discovery concerns the harnassing* of a new source of power, hitherto unavailable, to be developed through fundamentally novel machines of my invention.

"I am not yet prepared to dwell on the details of the project, for they must be checked before my findings can be formally announced. I have worked on the development of the underlying principles for many years. From the practical point of view of the engineer engaged in power development, the first investment will be relatively very great, but once a machine is installed it may be depended on to function indefinitely, and the cost of operation will be next to nothing.

"My power generator will be of the simplest kind - just a big mass of steel, copper and aluminum, comprising a stationary and rotating part, peculiarly assembled. I am planning to develop electricity and transmit it to a distance
*
by my alternating system now universally established. The direct current system could also be employed if the heretofore insuperable difficulties of insulating the transmission lines can be overcome.

"Such a source of power obtainable everywhere will solve many problems with which the human race is confronted. My alternating system has been the means of harnassing* 30,000,000 horsepower of waterpower, and there are projects now going on all over the world which will eventually double that amount. But, unfortunately, there is not enough water power to satisfy the present needs, and everywhere inventors and engineers are endeavoring to unlock some additional store of energy."

Beyond adding that the new form of energy which he has been investigating many years would be available at any place in the world in unlimited quantities, and that the machinery for harnassing* it would last more than 5,000 years. Mr. Tesla would say little more on the subject. Just when the power will become available for practical purposes he could not predict with any degree of precision. In a few years, perhaps, he ventured to say.

Mr. Tesla then talked of several projects on which he has been working by way of relief from too much concentration on the main piece of work. He described one of his other interests, one highly dramatic, which stirs the imagination and which, doubtless, will sound too revolutionary to most people. But it must not be forgotten, as Mr. Tesla points out, that the ideas of television and radio and airplane were scoffed at in their infancy .

"I expect to photograph thoughts," announced Mr. Tesla calmly, in the same tone of voice that a person occupied with some trivial things in the scheme of life might announce that it was going to rain.

Continued Mr. Tesla: "In 1893, while engaged in certain investigations, I became convinced that a definite image formed in thought must, by reflex action, produce a corresponding image on the retina, which might possibly be read by suitable apparatus. This brought me to my system of television, which I announced at that time.

"My idea was to employ an artificial retina receiving the image of the object seen, an 'optic nerve' and another such retina at the place of reproduction. These two retinas were to be constructed after the fashion of a checkerboard with many separate little sections, and the so-called optic nerve was nothing more than a part of the earth.

"An invention of mine enables me to transmit simultaneously, and without any interference whatsoever, hundreds of thousands of distinct impulses through the ground just as though I had so many separate wires. I did not contemplate using any moving part - a scanning apparatus or a cathodic ray, which is a sort of moving device, the use of which I suggested in one of my lectures.

"Now if it be true that a thought reflects an image on the retina, it is a mere question of illuminating the same property and taking photographs, and then using the ordinary methods which are available to project the image on a screen.

"If this can be done successfully, then the objects imagined by a person would be clearly reflected on the screen as they are formed, and in this way every thought of the individual could be read. Our minds would then, indeed, be like open books."

Besides his discoveries concerning the harnassing* of the new energy, television and thought photography, Mr. Tesla is working to produce a type of radio transmitter which will insure the strictest privacy in wireless communication regardless of the number of subscribers, and he is developing some important discoveries in molecular physics which will revolutionize the science of metallurgy and greatly improve metals.

After a discussion of his new scientific findings, Mr. Tesla turned to the subject of his personal source of energy and what he considers the real values of life.

"One of the most fundamental and also one of the saddest facts in human life is well brought out in a French proverb which, freely translated, means: 'If youth had the knowledge and age the power of doing,"' said Mr. Tesla "our condition of body and mind in old age if merely a certificate of how we have spent our youth. The secret of my own strength and vitality today is that in my youth I led what you might call a virtuous life.

"I have never dissipated. When I was a young man I understood well the significance of that old French proverb, although I doubt that I had even heard it then. But I seem to have a clear understanding while still young that I must control my passions and appetites if I wanted to make some of my dreams come true.

"So with this in view, quite early in life I set about disciplining myself, planning out a program of living for what I considered the most sane and worthwhile life.

"Since I love my work above all things, it is only natural that I should wish to continue it until I die. I want no vacation - no surcease from my labors. If people would select a life work compatible with their temperaments, the sum total of happiness would be immeasurably increased in the world.

"Many are saddened and depressed by the brevity of life. 'What is the use of attempting to accomplish anything?' they say. 'Life is so short. We may never life to see the completion of the task.' Well, people could prolong their lives considerably if they would but make the effort. Human beings do so many things that pave the way to an early grave.

"First of all, we eat too much ,* but this we have heard said often before. And we eat the wrong kinds of foods and drink the wrong kinds of liquids.

Most of the harm is done by overeating and under exercising, which bring about toxic conditions in the body and make it impossible to throw off the accumulated poisons.

"My regime for the good life and my diet? Well, for one thing, I drink plenty of milk and water. "Why overburden the bodies that serve us? I eat but two meals a day, and I avoid all acid-producing foods. Almost everyone eats too many peas and beans and other foods containing uric acid and other poisons. I partake liberally of fresh vegetables, fish and meat sparingly, and rarely. Fish is reputed as fine brain food, but has a very strong acid reaction, as it contains a great deal of phosphorus. Acidity is by far the worst enemy to fight off in old age.

"Potatoes are splendid, and should be eaten at least once a day. They contain valuable mineral salts and are neutralizing.

"I believe in plenty of exercise. I walk eight or ten miles every day, and never take a cab or other conveyances when I have the time to use leg power. I also exercise in my bath daily, for I think that this is of great importance. I take a warm bath, followed by a prolonged cold shower..

"Sleep? I scarcely ever sleep. I come of a long=lived* family, but it is noted for its poor sleepers. I expect to match the records of my ancestors and live to be at least 100.

"My sleeplessness does not worry me. Sometimes I doze for an hour or so. Occasionally, however, once in a few months, I may sleep for four or five hours. Then I awaken virtually charged with energy, like a battery. Nothing can stop me after such a night. I feel great strength then. There is no doubt about it but that sleep is a restorer, a vitalizer, that it increases energy. But on the other hand, I do not think it is essential to one's well being, particularly if one is habitually a poor sleeper.

"Today, at 77, as a result of a well regulated life, sleeplessness notwithstanding, I have an excellent certificate of health. I never felt better in my life. I am energetic, strong, in full possession of all my mental facilties*. In my prime I did not possess the energy I have today. And what is more, in solving my problems I use but a small part of the energy I possess, for I have learned how to conserve it. Because of my experience and knowledge gained through the years, my tasks are much lighter. Contrary to general belief, work comes easier for older people if they are in good health, because they have learned through years of practice how to arrive at a given place by the shortest path."


*photocopy of original here

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘3️⃣4️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '34

__________________


xxx
————
by
xxx
xxx Page number(s): ?
-
-
xxx
-
-
stylize font=
insrt figrs tmplt=
photocopy of original here=
-
__________________ ****
'''Every other planet has to pass through 🐇 the same phase of existence this earth did, and life is started on them during that favorable phase by the rays of some sun. It develops in the presence of moisture, heat and light in much the same manner as life does here. We know 🐇 that light propagates in straight lines, and consequently our perceptions of the forms through the images projected on the retina must be true.'''








RADIO POWER WILL REVOLUTIONIZE THE WORLD
by Nikola Tesla
Modern Mechanix and Inventions
July, 1934 Page number(s): 40-42 & 117-119
*(foreword)








🗞️ INVENTS PEACE RAY 🗞️
by unknown
New York Sun
July 10th, 1934

Tesla Describes His Beam of Destructive Energy

Invention of a '''beam of matter moving at high velocity''' which would act as a '''beam of destructive energy''' was announced today by Dr. Nikola Tesla, the inventor, in his annual birthday interview. Dr. Tesla is 78, and for the past several years has made his anniversary the occasion for an announcement of scientific discoveries.

The beam, as described by the inventor to rather bewildered reporters, would be projected on land from power houses set 200 miles or so apart and would provide an impenetrable wall about a country in time of war. Anything with which the ray came in contact would be destroyed, the inventor indicated. Planes would fall, armies would be wiped out and even the smallest country might so insure '''security''' against which nothing could avail.

Dr. Tesla announced that he plans to suggest his method at Geneva as an insurance of peace.
______








🗞️ TRIBUTE TO KING ALEXANDER 🗞️
by Nikola Tesla
New York Times
October 21st, 1934 Page number(s): 5
To The Editor of The New York Times:

'''Much has been said about Yugoslavia and its people, but many Americans may be under a wrong impression for political enemies and agitators have spread the idea that its inhabitants belong to different nations animated by mutual hate and held together against their will, by a tyrannical power. The fact is that all Yugoslavs-Serbians, Slavonians, Bosnians, Herzegovinians, Dalmations, Montenagrins, Croatians and Slovenes - are of the same race, speak the same language and have common national ideals and traditions.

At the termination of the World War, Alexander brought about a political union creating a powerful and resourceful State. This was hailed with joy by all the Slavs of the Balkans, but it took time before the people found themselves in the new conditions.

    Serbs Did the Fighting.
I was born in Croatia. The Croatians and Slovenes were never in a position to fight for their independence. It was the Serbians who fought the battles for freedom and the price of liberty was paid in Serbian blood. All true Croatians and Slovenes remember that gratefully. They also know that the Serbians have an unequalled aptitude and experience in warfare and are best qualified to direct the forces of the country in a crisis.

Ever since united Yugoslavia came into being through Alexander's efforts, political enemies have done all they could to disrupt it by sowing seeds of discord and disseminating malicious reports. An instance of the kind is a book by Louis Adamic, "The Native's Return," which he is supposed to have written under the provisions of the Guggenheim award for literature and in which he indulges in political defamation, denunciation of the ruler of the country and promulgation of ideas as unwelcome here as in Yugoslavia.

His denunciations of the King and reflections on his character can be contemptuously passed, but one thing cannot be ignored. The book contains statements representing the great and fearless man, who has led his people in sanguinary battles, as a weakling in mortal fear of assassination, so much so that he retired every night to a different room and did not show himself until hundreds of his aides had 'I cleared the place and made safe his appearance. This has cut deep into the heart of every loyal Yugoslav.

    Dissensions Denied.
Mr. Adamic is very loud in telling of the hatred and dissensions between Croatians and Slovenes and the Serbians, but recent events have disproved his statements, The countries, which according to his accounts ,.[sic?] should be in open revolt, have shown themselves as devoted to the King of Serbia. This has been reflected in several reports of The New York Times, among which is the extraordinarily vivid and dramatic description of the obsequies.

The death of the King has shaken the country to its very foundations, but the enemies who say that it means the disruption of Yugoslavia will hope in vain, for the noble blood of the great man has only served to cement its parts more firmly and strengthen the national structure. Alexander will live long in the memory of his people, a heroic figure of imposing stature, both the Washington and Lincoln of the Yugoslavs; like Washington an able and intrepid general who freed his country from oppression; like Lincoln a wise and patriotic leader who suffered martyrdom.

Nikola Tesla, New York, Oct. 19, 1934''''
______







__________________


DR. TESLA VISIONS THE END OF AIRCRAFT IN WAR
————
by Helen Welshimer
The Montana Butte Standard
October 21st, 1934 Page number(s): 24


"𝐀MERICA Enters War!"

"United Stated Joins Allies!"

"Congress Declares War!"

The newsboys were screaming the headlines through the rainy April night. Men and women stood on corners, talking, talking, talking--

The drift of the days went on. Troop trains pulled out of the stations, from Centreville, Mississippi, up to Bangor, Maine. The drums throbbed and the trumpets blew. The ships sailed and the casualty lists came back. One by one, the gold stars replaced the white--

And 1917 drifted into 1918.

Dr. Nikola Tesla was in his laboratory trying hard to solve a problem of ages. Once in a while he raised his head to listen. Then he turned back to his experiments. He was going to end war!

The noted inventor, 78 years old now, already had 700 inventions to his credit. This was to be his greatest.

Years marched on. The fanfare and the drums were done. The dead were buried. The living came home.

NOW, 15 years after the war has ended, Tesla, one of the greatest inventors of all time, has announced that his invention to end all wars, by a perfect means of defense which any nation can employ, is ready. Soon, he says, he will take it to Geneva to present it to the Peace Conference.

Whether it is a dream or reality may soon be known. He claims to have created a new agent, silent and invisible, which kills without trace and yet pierces the thickest armor. It is a beam of death and destruction formed of minute particles of matter carrying such tremendous energy that they could bring down a fleet of 10,000 attacking planes and wipe out an army of millions at a distance of 250 miles.

"The invention," says Dr. Tesla, "will make war impossible for it will surround any country using this means with an impenetrable, invisible wall of protection. Plants for the generating of this beam will be erected along the coasts and near cities. One plant will afford perfect safety within an area of 40,000 square miles.

"The beam will be effective at any distance at which the object to be destroyed can be perceived through a telescope. Every country will have to adopt this invention, for without it a nation will be helpless.

------

------
𝑫𝒓. 𝑵𝒊𝒌𝒐𝒍𝒂 𝑻𝒆𝒔𝒍𝒂

"The beam, intended chiefly for defense, will be projected from an electric power plant, ready to be put in action at the first sign of danger. The cost of operation will be insignificant, as the plant is chiefly intended for use in emergency. But to make the investment profitable in times of peace it may be commercially employed for a number of purposes."

Dr. Tesla wishes it to be understood that the means he has perfected has nothing in common with the so-called "death ray."

"It is impossible to develop such a ray. I worked on that idea for many years," he says, "before my ignorance was dispelled and I became convinced that it could not be realized. This new beam of mine consists of minute bul-

------

------

lets moving at a terrific speed, and any amount of power desired can be transmitted by them. The whole plant is just a gun, but one which is incomparably superior to the present.

THE picture of the protected world in which men will devote their time to pursuits of peace, is a strangely fascinating one.

Imagine the map of the world, every country surrounded by great plants which will offer absolute protection to the nation itself and instant death to any intruders. Only ships flying white flags of peace can sail into a foreign harbor.

The power plants, resembling forts placed at strategic distances along a country's border, will be on guard. As they are immovable, they will constitute essentially means for defense, and by making invasion impossible will greatly advance the cause of peace.

------

------
𝐓𝐡𝐞 𝐟𝐚𝐦𝐨𝐮𝐬 𝐢𝐧𝐯𝐞𝐧𝐭𝐨𝐫'𝐬 𝐧𝐞𝐰 𝐛𝐞𝐚𝐦 𝐨𝐟 𝐝𝐞𝐚𝐭𝐡 𝐜𝐨𝐮𝐥𝐝 𝐛𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐠 𝐝𝐨𝐰𝐧 𝐚 𝐟𝐥𝐞𝐞𝐭 𝐨𝐟 𝟏𝟎,𝟎𝟎𝟎 𝐩𝐥𝐚𝐧𝐞𝐬 𝐚𝐭 𝐚 𝐝𝐢𝐬𝐭𝐚𝐧𝐜𝐞 𝐨𝐟 𝟐𝟓𝟎 𝐦𝐢𝐥𝐞𝐬, 𝐡𝐞 𝐜𝐥𝐚𝐢𝐦𝐬, 𝐚𝐧𝐝 𝐢𝐭 𝐚𝐥𝐬𝐨 𝐰𝐨𝐮𝐥𝐝 𝐦𝐚𝐤𝐞 𝐨𝐛𝐬𝐨𝐥𝐞𝐭𝐞 𝐭𝐡𝐞 𝐬𝐮𝐛𝐦𝐚𝐫𝐢𝐧𝐞

IF, occasionally, nations decide that they must have war just for the thrill of a throbbing drum and a singing bugle, it can be staged on the sea, Dr. Tesla says. Navy supremacy will banish aircraft.

"The airplane will cease to be used as a means of offense," the great inventor explains. "It will be used entirely for peace, as it should be. An airplane, through the very nature of its construction, can not carry with it a generating plant for the beam. If it comes in contact with a country which is protected, it has no chance.

"The battleships will ride to sea safe from air raids, for they will be equipped with smaller plants for generating a beam of sufficient power to destroy any attacking airplane. But they will not be permitted to come near the shore of a protected country and attack it with any chance of success.

"The nation which has the best equipped battleships, however, will gain the supremacy of the seas. Submarines will be obsolete, for the methods of detecting them will be perfected to such a degree that there will be no longer any advantage in submerging.

------

------
𝑨𝒏 𝒂𝒓𝒕𝒊𝒔𝒕'𝒔 𝒄𝒐𝒏𝒄𝒆𝒑𝒕𝒊𝒐𝒏 𝒐𝒇 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒘𝒂𝒚 𝒂 𝒕𝒆𝒄𝒉𝒏𝒊𝒄𝒊𝒂𝒏, 𝒔𝒊𝒕𝒕𝒊𝒏𝒈 𝒊𝒏 𝒐𝒏𝒆 𝒐𝒇 𝑫𝒓. 𝑻𝒆𝒔𝒍𝒂'𝒔 𝒈𝒓𝒆𝒂𝒕 𝒈𝒆𝒏𝒆𝒓𝒂𝒕𝒊𝒏𝒈 𝒑𝒍𝒂𝒏𝒕𝒔, 𝒘𝒐𝒖𝒍𝒅 𝒖𝒔𝒆 𝒕𝒉𝒆 𝒏𝒆𝒘 𝒃𝒆𝒂𝒎 𝒕𝒐 𝒅𝒆𝒔𝒕𝒓𝒐𝒚 𝒉𝒐𝒔𝒕𝒊𝒍𝒆 𝒂𝒊𝒓𝒑𝒍𝒂𝒏𝒆𝒔.

When a submarine is located the beams will function under water, though not quite so effectively as in air."

Four new inventions of Dr. Tesla are involved in the creation of the beam.

"Briefly, the first comprises a method and apparatus for producing rays and other manifestations of energy in free air, eliminating the high vacuum heretofore indispensable," he explains.

"The second one is the process for producing electrical force of immense power.

"The third method amplifies the process, and the fourth produces a tremendous electrical repelling force."

In times of peace such a plant can be used to transmit power in any amount up to its full capacity and to any place on the earth visible through a telescope, according to its inventor. Voltages never before attained, of 50,000,000 volts or more, will have to be applied.

The man who is responsible for so many discoveries and improvements has devoted his entire life to his scientific pursuits. Tall, lean, reserved, his path goes between the two small laboratories and the various manufacturing plants with which he has contact.

Born in Yugoslavia, Tesla comes from a race of inventors.

"On my mother's side, for three generations, almost all members of the families were inventors," he says. "My mother was Georgianna Mandic, who was noted as an inventor of household appliances. One of the things which she perfected was her own weaving machine.

"Her family can be traced back to the seventh century, in the historical records. My grandfather was an officer in Napoleon's army."

TESLA began to invent at the age of six.

As he grew up his interest focused in the laboratory.

"I sleep about one and one-half hours a night," the inventor says. "I think that is enough for any man. When I was young I needed more sleep. But age doesn't require so much. There are so many things to do I do not want to spend time sleeping needlessly. In my family all were poor sleepers. Time spend in sleep is lost time, we always felt."

Tesla, busy with his 700 inventions, never had time for marriage. He never had a girl in his young days. He never had a romance. There was no leisure for them.

His diet is simple. He lives chiefly on vegetables, cereals and milk. The menu includes onions, spinach, celery, carrots, lettuce, with potatoes occasionally. Whites of eggs and milk complete the diet. There is no meat on his vegetable plate. He never smokes or tastes tea, coffee, alcoholic beverages or any other stimulant.

While he is perfecting the beam which will defend nations from attack, the inventor is playing with other ideas. He goes from one to the other, he says, as this or that gains paramount interest or some new clew is suggested.

"BUT what is giving me more fun than anything I have done for a long, long time," Dr. Tesla explains, "is an electric bath which I hope to have ready for general use very soon.

"It doesn't require much room. There is a platform on which the person stands. He turns on the current. Instantly all foreign material such as dust, dandruff, scales on the skin and microbes is thrown off from the body. The nerves, too, are exhilarated and strengthened. The 'bath' is excellent for medical as well as for cleaning purposes."

However, the war picture gives the master inventor more satisfaction than the minor inventions. He is rejoicing because his instrument of death will save millions of lives and inestimable property.

His only regret is that there may be another war before the discoveries he has made have been placed before the Disarmament Conference at Geneva, and generally adopted by the nations of the world.

"The next war, and I am afraid that there will be one before long," he says, "will be fought in the air. But if the beam is adopted war in the air will cease.

"Whatever battles there are thereafter will be confined to the sea. But no nation will dare to attack another nation when every country is armed. There will be a general feeling of safety throughout the world."


*photocopy of original here

__________________








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘3️⃣5️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '35

🗞️ DR. TESLA GIVES HOME TO AN ERRANT PIGEON 🗞️
    THAT FLEW INTO 40TH-STORY ROOM IN HOTEL

               New York Times
             February 6th, 1935

Early yesterday morning, not so long after it started snowing, an apologetic housekeeper on the fortieth floor of the Hotel New Yorker — one flight from the roof — telephoned down to the office that there was a bird in one of the unoccupied rooms. Apparently it had flown in a window which had been left partially open during the night, she explained.


When the management arrived on the scene the “bird” was perched on the top of a dresser, as unaccountable as Poe's raven, and twice as ambiguous. It was a homing pigeon with a leg band reading: “I. F. 34 N. U. 1286,” and it seemed to have just got in after a long hard flight. It was caught and shut in a bathroom until its legband could be deciphered.


The news of it spread, however. At 7 o'clock, while the management was still trying to face the anomaly of the homing pigeons without a home, a chambermaid was repeating the story to Dr. Nikola Tesla, the 78-year-old scientist, in his thirty-third floor suite. Dr. Tesla, who is fond of pigeons, as the chambermaid knows from experience, promptly called the management and volunteered to take charge of the foundling.


He was afraid it might be sick, instead of merely storm-driven, Dr. Tesla explained, and since he was already keeping one convalescent pigeon in his room, the two of them might be company for each other. The management gratefully assented. After looking over the bird, Dr. Tesla decided that it wasn't sick but hungry and a little upset by having gorged itself, for want of anything more edible, on snow. 🐇 He decided to keep it anyway.


Though accustom to walk ten miles daily, Dr. Tesla did not leave his apartment all day yesterday, according to hotel officials. And he is known to have dropped work on a new electrical project he has underway, lest his charge might require some little attention. The man who recently announced the discovery of electrical death-beam, powerful enough to destroy 10,000 airplanes at a swoop, had carefully spread towels on his window ledge and set down a little cup of seed for his two pigeons.

The first pigeon was found in a dying condition ten days ago and is being nursed back to health. The second, after a good feed and rest, will be able to go along home under its own power, Dr. Tesla said. He admitted that he had made a specialty of treating sick pigeons since he was a lad of twelve in his native Croatian village of Smilian.
______








   📰 NIKOLA TESLA'S YOUTH AND STRENGTH AT 78 📰

         Electrical Wizard, Inventor of
        Wireless and Power Transmission,
        Tells His Secrets of Keeping Fit

                       By
              George F. Corners

               Physical Culture
        March, 1935 Page Number(s) 22-?

Fig. 1 Portrait of Tesla taken October 13, 1933 by Napoleon Sarony.
(Sarony)
Nikola Tesla, keen and vigorous at 78, expects to live
                 more than fifty yeas longer

'''LACKING but two years of eighty, I am as fit today as I was at twenty.'''

Tall, slim, erect, Nikola Tesla was walking briskly across the mezzanine floor of the metropolitan hotel where he lives. There was a sheen in his white hair, and in his blue eyes an unquenchable fire. Time, the great antagonist of all men, has not been able to worst the illustrious inventor in a bout of nearly four-score years.

In that time, Tesla has given to the world five thousand inventions and ideas. “As a matter of history,” says C. F. Scott, President of the American Institute of Electrical Engineers, “it is the Tesla principle and the Tesla system which have been the directing factors in modern electrical engineering practise.” “His name,” adds B. A. Behrend, engineer and author, “marks an epoch in the advance of electrical science.” Tesla discovered wireless before Marconi. He solved the secret of high frequency transmissions. His induction motor runs 10,000 ships and plants. Niagara Falls is chained according to his system.

If Tesla's inventions were suddenly withdrawn, half of the transportation systems and half of the industries of the world would stand still. Today at seventy-eight, Tesla still works in three different laboratories. He devotes the major part of his time to the completion of a device which, if successful, will put an end to war. There are innumerable other tricks in the bag of this electric magician.

I was eager to discover how the man who has energized our epoch and helped to make it the Machine Age, recharges the battery of his own body. I met him one afternoon emerging from a long conference, which in turn had followed many hours of laboratory work. But Tesla showed no trace of fatigue. We talked — talked for two hours. At the end he seemed perfectly fresh and wended his way on foot to a special research room of the New York Public Library where he often devotes many hours to his studies.

“How,” I asked, “do you find it possible to continue your labors with undiminished vigor at seventy-eight? What is your secret of youth?”

A smile crept over Tesla's features. '''It is no secret, but common sense. I look upon the human body as a machine, and I treat it with the respect which a machine deserves. I keep it properly oiled and properly cleaned, and I see to it that it has no opportunity to gather rust.

'''The most important element in my scheme of life is my diet. You cannot expect a machine to function well if you do not provide it with the proper fuel.

'''Being a scientist, I attempt to regulate the machine which I call my body according to the laws of the planet on which I live. Whatever scheme of life man adopts, it must conform to the physical condition created by the rotation of the globe. The physical law which divides twenty-four hours into day and night also divides man's life into two periods — one in which he lives and another in which he rests. This in itself seems to indicate the desirability of two meals a day in unison with the world rhythm — one meal to give us energy for the day's work, another to supply the body with the material with which it will replenish itself during sleep.

'''I have been interested in physical culture eyer since I was a young man and have experimented with different nutritional theories. In my early youth I concluded that the ideal way was to absorb food in a fine, almost fluid form and in the proper volume continuously, in small amounts, throughout our hours of work. This method, it seemed to me, would supply steadily energy to the body and impose the least strain upon the digestive organs. Fascinated by the theory, I lived that way for several years, preparing myself dishes consisting of milk, beef juice, and purees. Working in the laboratory, I took my nourishment whenever I felt the need. My health was excellent, my heart and my digestive organs reacted most favorably.

'''However, my work called me away to places where it was impossible for me to prepare my food in the fashion to which I had accustomed myself. I was compelled to take my meals like other men. The change caused considerable digestive disturbances. My intestines and my stomach had shrunk and my interior organs had lost much of their peristaltic power. It took me a long time to adjust myself to the new regimen.'''

“How many meals a day did you find most conducive to health?”

Tesla laughed: '''I have tried everything - six meals a day, like most Europeans; three a day, one a day; I have tried continuous feeding. Finally I decided that two meals are most beneficial.

'''Lunch is a superfluous meal, because it is futile in the economy of the human body. Lunch loads the stomach with food which it cannot transform quickly into energy for work. It takes from three to four hours before we can digest our luncheon: three or four hours before the food takes effect. Hence, lunch does not increase our efficiency. On the contrary, the digestive process summons the blood from the brain to the stomach and impedes our mental and physical activities.

'''One meal a day does not furnish sufficient energy and can not be harmonized with the movement of the clock which regulates our lives — the earth spinning about itself.

'''Two meals can be distributed so as to fit into the natural scheme prescribed by the rotation of the earth. Two meals a day improved my health, sharpened my appetite, and increased the sensitiveness of my palate. I did not know what life was until I eliminated lunch. Today at seventy-eight I enjoy my two meals to the same degree as when I was a boy of sixteen. I do not suffer from dyspepsia or any other aliment. I never find it necessary to take laxatives or other medicaments.

'''If my scheme is adopted universally, it will lengthen man's span of life and improve the health of the human race. It is impossible to distribute three meals to advantage. Two meals a day enables the worker to absorb and digest his meal before he begins to work.'''

“And what is the time which you select for your meals according to your gastro-culinary scheme of existence?”

Tesla is one of our very great men.

This is the inspiring story of what his two-meals-per-day plan and a daily ten-mile walk have done for him. Ten miles of walking and two meals a day of the right food will keep any man still young and strong at Tesla's time of life.

Some of Mr. Tesla's views do not conform to our own in every detail, but are the result of his personal experiences, and our readers are entitled to have the benefit of his views first hand.
— Bernarr Macfadden


'''The time for eating,''' Tesla replied, '''depends upon climate and conditions of the country. We should take breakfast two hours before we start to work, and we should rest two hours afterward. If a man has his breakfast between seven and eight, he should begin work at ten, work continuously for five or six hours, which would mean that his work day ended at three or four; then he should go home, and devote several hours to recreation, rest and exercise, and take his final meal between seven and eight at night. This arrangement fits in with the cosmic law as well as with the new hours of labor, and it puts the worker in fine condition.'''


“What is the fuel which you consider most essential for the human machine?”

'''Every meal should have some protein and fat, the one for building, the other for burning. Protein builds, fat is a fuel — it energizes.

'''In the morning fat should be commended, because fat, taken preferably in the form of butter and oil, is what we need for our work. In the evening I suggest a preponderance of protein to rebuild the cells of the body while it rests.'''

'''I believe with Bernarr Macfadden in the miracle of milk. There are two hundred and sixty grains of protein in one pint of milk. It is easily assimilated. Mr. Ford, unlike Mr. Macfadden, does not believe in milk. He feels it should be artificially manufactured. Unlike Ford, I believe in milk. Ford should take to milk if he wants to turn out more millions of his 'Lizzies.'

'''Another excellent ingredient for food is the white of an egg. There are sixty grains of protein in each white of an egg, and only forty grains in the yolk. I prefer to eat only the white. The yolk contains iron and vitamins which are good, but also uric acid, which I avoid as much as possible. Cheese is the most nourishing of all foods, containing one hundred and forty grains of protein per ounce. The next best protein-containing substances are certain cereals which contain thirty to thirty-five grains per ounce of food. Rice carries the least uric acid and can be assimilated most easily.

'''A large amount of protein is contained in pulses or leguminous products, beans, peas, lentils, etc. But they also contain no small amount of uric acid. Uric acid is responsible for most ailments which impede the metabolistic processes of the body, It causes rheumatic conditions, arthritis, high blood pressure, and many other maladies of civilized life. Primitive man may have been able to eliminate uric acid thoroughly by hard physical labor. The city dweller should be exceedingly cautions before he introduces large amounts into his system.

'''Vegetables are indispensable to any diet, although they contain only six or seven grains of protein per ounce. They do not build and they supply little energy, but they regulate the bowels and counteract uric acid. They also supply the body with the vitamins and essential mineral salts. Moreover, they are convenient carriers for fat. I am fond of a fine, cooked mixture of onions and chopped celery prepared with a great deal of butter. This combination is easily digested. I have in part subsisted on it for many years.

'''Fruit, too, is an essential part of any well-regulated diet. It is indispensable, partly because of its bulk which aids the digestion, and partly because of its alkaline reaction. It is a well-known fact that even citrous fruits, which have an acid reaction at first, change to alkaline in the processes of digestion. The alkaline are the natural enemies of the acids. Sugar in small amounts is not objectionable. There is, however, plenty of sugar in fruit.'''

“Are you a vegetarian or a carnivorous animal?”

Tesla replied, '''I eat meat only at rare intervals, possibly only once or twice a year. It is rich in proteins but also in uric acid. I prefer fowl to beef. Fish is more digestible and almost equally rich in proteins and in fats. The phosphorous it contains is excellent for the nervous system. But phosphorus, while feeding the brain, causes acidity. Both meat and fish give us quick energy. Under certain conditions, for certain workers, they are indispensable. They shorten life by introducing more uric acid into the system than it can conveniently eliminate. But while we live they give us considerable vigor.'''

“And what,” I asked, “is your attitude toward alcohol?”


'''Since prohibition was enacted I have not touched a drop, and long before that I gave up all other stimulants. I gave up alcohol, in spite of the fact that it was beneficial to me, in obedience to the law, and I find that I cannot now return to it. I had previously expected to live 150 years. 🐇 Now that I have given up alcohol, I have reduced my expectancy of life to 135 years. In Yugoslavia, where I was born, alcoholic drinks are taken regularly with meals. That habit rarely leads to drunkenness.

'''Alcohol has helped me a great deal in my life. It has made possible for me to escape from a strain which otherwise might have proved fatal. The man who is not an inventor cannot realize how powerfully the entire system may be affected by the discovery of a new truth. When I first saw my own invention, the induction motor, at work, my heart nearly gave out. Fortunately a bottle of brandy was near at hand of which I partook. This balanced my nervous excitement, and I was able to survey the rotation of the motor with philosophic poise.


'''I was strongly addicted to coffee, with the result that my heart was subjected to a dangerous over-strain. It took me eleven years to vanquish my craving for this pernicious drink. The cure cost me a good deal of money. For eleven years I had the finest coffee prepared for me at my table every day, and never touched a drop. Its presence aroused my powers of resistance. If it had not been there I would have suffered from the craving. I, at least, have found coffee and tea rank poisons.'''

“You have not,” I interrupted, “expressed your opinion on beer.”

'''I have cared less for beer than for wine or brandy. As a young student I drank beer moderately, about sixteen seidels a day, whereas most of my fellow students consumed sixty. Beer gave me a katzenjammer. It is drunk in large quantities because for some reason it is easily absorbed. No one can drink twenty or thirty glasses of water or milk, but it is not difficult to drink thirty or forty glasses of beer. Owing to the large volume he consumes, the beer drinker absorbs more alcohol than the whiskey drinker. Moreover the tremendous amount of liquid which he gulps down enlarges his stomach and increases his girth. Some people seem to thrive on beer but they usually acquire enormous bellies.'''

“And what,” I asked, “is your attitude toward smoking?”

Mr. Tesla's defense of alcohol as against coffee and tea had left me somewhat startled. However, it seems that Tesla is no friend of the weed.


'''I have smoked a good deal, but when I was about twenty I gave a promise to stop, and smoked my last cigar. Smoking stimulates thought on general subjects; but is an enemy to concentration. The most stimulating activity, to my mind, is walking. I walk never less than ten miles a day. This has kept me in good health, but it may in the end lead to my destruction, because I am a confirmed jay-walker.


'''My exercise,''' Tesla continued, '''is not confined to my ten-mile walk. I bathe every day and I exercise in my bath. I have acquired great proficiency in these exercises. I have, in some respects, the agility of a baby. There is hardly a movement I cannot make except I cannot kiss my elbow. I can clamp a piece of paper between my shoulder blades and hold it so firmly that no one can remove it without tearing it off.'''

“It seems curious,” I said, “that you, who are one of the master minds in electricity, do not use it to recharge your own energies.”

'''Why, of course I do,''' Tesla replied.

'''Many years ago I discovered the therapeutic uses of electricity, especially of the high-frequency current. I announced my discovery in this field in 1891.


'''I believe in what may be called a waterless bath, by which 1 mean charging of the body to a very high electric potential. It is a bath of fire that rebuilds, rejuvenates, cleans, and exhilarates. It carries off instantly all dust, impurities and microbes, and stimulates the tips of the nerves. While in the bath the body is surrounded by a halo of light, plainly visible in the dark. I am now working on an apparatus which will make this electric bath safe and economically possible, even for a person of average means.'''

Tesla, unlike Edison and Marconi, is a bachelor. He prefers to be wedded to science. It seemed all the more important to discover his attitude on sex — sex, the most electrifying factor in the lives of most men. Tesla did not evade the question.


'''I recognize the importance that sex plays in the life of man. Nature has made its attraction irresistible to insure the perpetuity of the race. As for myself, I have found that the thinker is confronted with the problem of perpetuating either the species or the mind. It is almost impossible, at least in certain realms of high endeavor, to do both. This has been recognized by the Hindus, whose adepts practice complete sexual abstinence, and by many of the great religions.

'''Before I produced the rotating magnetic field, I concentrated all my powers upon my experiment. The strain would have killed a hundred oxen. I certainly could not have survived it if I had permitted my energies to be diverted into the channels of sex.'''

“You have not,” I remarked, “told me the part played in your life by that great restorer of energy — sleep.” I asked this with malice aforethought, because I remembered that Tesla's great rival, Edison, had always claimed that he was able to get along with only a few hours of sleep.

'''I should say,''' Tesla replied, '''that a man who performs hard physical labor needs seven to eight hours of rest to recuperate, not necessarily eight hours of sleep. I myself sleep only two hours out of twenty-four. This does not mean that I may not assume a recumbent position, but my mind continues to work out its problems. I have often, during such apparent periods of rest, worked out my most difficult problems. In my younger days, I probably slept three to four hours.

'''When I sleep, I sleep profoundly. To sleep deeply, profoundly, is an art like deep breathing that must be learned. It is one of the secrets of the East. I think that I have discovered the secret. After a profound sleep, no matter how short, I feel so much refreshed that even now, when I am near eighty, I must perform gymnastic feats to subdue my new-gained vitality.'''

Edison, I interjected, “declared that he could get along on two or three hours of sleep.”


Tesla's eyes twinkled merrily.


'''People sometimes deceive themselves,''' he said. '''Edison thought that he slept very little. As a matter of fact, I never knew anyone who slept as much as Edison. I have often seen him put his feet on the table in his laboratory and sleep for three or four hours. Then he would get up and work a little, only to take another nap of three or four hours. Naturally he did not have much need for sleep when the day was over.'''


“You would not,” I remarked, “recommend two hours of sleep or the extreme indulgence in brandy to other men.”


'''It is possible,''' Tesla replied, shrugging his shoulders, '''that my scheme of life may not help others unless it is modified in accordance with one's specific requirements, but it has kept in gear for seventy-eight years the machine which is Nikola Tesla.'''
______








🗞️ GERMAN COSMIC RAY THEORY QUESTIONED 🗞️
               
        Nikola Tesla Doubts Link
         Between Rays and Out-
         burst of Nova Herculis

               — — — —

         Inventor Says Light and
         Particles do Not Travel
           at the Same Speed.
      
            by Nikola Tesla

         New York Herald Tribune
    March 3rd, 1935 Page number(s): A6

The Herald Tribune of January 20, 1935, contained a report relating to some observations of cosmic rays made by Dr. Werner Kolhoester, director of the Observatory of Potsdam, in connection with the outburst of Nova Herculis (the "new" star) noted in December of last year. I had intended to offer a few words of comment upon the same at that time, but thought it advisable to read first the original statement published in the Supplement of the "Berliner Tageblatt" of January 20, 1935, which has been forwarded to me through the courtesy of the German Consulate.

    Would Confirm His Theory
This news item has interested me, as the results announced, if valid, would be another confirmation of my theory of cosmic rays advanced in 1896 according to which these radiations can only emanate from such vast and incandescent heavenly bodies as our sun, placed in an almost perfect vacuum and charged to tremendous potentials, sufficient for imparting to minute similarly electrified particles immense speeds and energies by electrostatic repulsion. I have proved this theory rigorously by experiments and deductions, but had I not done so, it would still be established as a scientific truth, for there is no force or effect produced in the universe which, even if amplified millions of times, could account for the cosmic phenomena discovered by me.

Now, a Nova, in its phase of greatest brightness and transcending temperature at the surface, is a generator of cosmic rays incomparably more powerful than our sun. But while this is unquestionably true, the findings of the German radiologist are open to serious objections.

In the first place, calculation conformable to my theory shows that in order to cause an increase in the intensity of the rays of the order found, the surface temperature of the star, assuming its distance 1,200 light years, could not have been much less than 5,000,000 degrees centigrade. Such a high value is extremely improbable although in a Nova, in which radiation of heat from the inside is greatly facilitated by expansion, the difference in the temperatures of the central and peripheral parts may not be very great.

Then, again, the increase recorded, amounting to about 1 percent of the intensity of cosmic rays emitted by our sun, is too small for drawing a reliable conclusion in view of the influence of weather conditions and other disturbing causes. It must also be borne in mind that the coincidence method adopted is far from being accurate.

There exists, however, an element of incertitude which in itself is sufficient to invalidate completely the results obtained and of which Dr. Kolhoerster does not seem to have thought. Light is a wave motion of definite velocity, determined by the elastic force and density of the medium. Cosmic rays are particles of matter, the speed of which depends on the propelling force and mass and may be much smaller or greater than that of light.

    Difference in Speeds
Consequently, there can be no concordance in the phases of the two disturbances at the place of observation. The cosmic rays, generated during the maximum brightness of the star, may reach the place many centuries sooner or later than the light, according to their speed. It thus appears that the results announced cannot have been due to Nova Herculis. Considering further the briefness and small number of star outburts, it is evident that the Novae cannot contribute appreciably to the steady rain of cosmic particles pouring upon the earth from the countless suns of the universe.
______








*** THE NEW ART OF PROJECTING CONCENTRATED NON-DISPERSIVE ENERGY THROUGH NATURAL MEDIA ***

System of Particle Acceleration for Use in National Defense
Circa May 16th, 1935

Briefly Exposed

by NIKOLA TESLA


The advances described are the result of my research carried on for many years with the chief object of transmitting electrical energy to great distances.

----

The first important practical realization of these efforts was the alternating current power system now in universal use.

I then turned my attention to wireless transmission and was fortunate enough to achieve similar success in this fruitful field, my discoveries and inventions being employed throughout the world.

In the course of this work, I mastered the technique of high potentials sufficiently for enabling me to construct and operate, in 1899, a wireless transmitter developing up to twenty million volts.

----

Some time before I contemplated the possibility of transmitting such high tension currents over a narrow beam of radiant energy ionizing the air and rendering it, in measure, conductive. After preliminary laboratory experiments, I made tests on a large scale with the transmitter referred to and a beam of ultra-violet rays of great energy in an attempt to conduct the current to the high rarefied strata of the air and thus create an auroral such as might be utilized for illumination, especially of oceans at night.

I found that there was some virtue in the principal but the results did not justify the hope of important practical applications although, some years later, several inventors claimed to have produced a "death ray" in this manner. While the published reports to this effect were entirely unfounded, I believe that with the new transmitter to be built, this and many other wonders will be achieved.

Much time was devoted by me to the transmission of radiant energy, in various forms, by reflectors and I perfected means for increasing enormously the intensity of the effects, but was baffled in all my efforts to materially reduce dispersion and became fully convinced that this handicap could only be overcome by conveying the power through the medium of small particles projected, at prodigious velocity, from the transmitter.

----

Electro-static repulsion was the only means to this end and apparatus of stupendous force would have to be developed, but granted that sufficient speed and energy could be realized with a single row of minute bodies then there would be no dispersion whatever even at great distance. Since the cross section of the carriers might be reduced to almost microscopic dimensions an immense concentration of energy, irrespective of distance, could be attained.

When I undertook to carry out this plan in practice, the difficulties seemed insurmountable. In the first place, a closed vacuum tube could not be employed as no window could withstand the force of the impact.

This made it absolutely necessary to project the particles in free air which meant that each could hold only an insignificant charge. Thus, no matter how high the potential of the terminal, the force of repulsion would be necessarily too small for the purpose contemplated…


But by the application of my discoveries and inventions it is possible to increase the force of repulsion more than a million times and what was heretofore impossible, is rendered easy of accomplishment. 

----

🐇 The successful carrying out of the plan involves a number of more or less important improvements but the principal among these include the following:

1. A new form of high vacuum tube open to the atmosphere.

2. Provisions for imparting to a minute particle an extremely high charge.

3. A new terminal of relatively small dimensions and enormous potential.

4. An electro-static generator on a new principle and of very great power.

----

Fig. 1
Illustrating open vacuum tube.


These devices and methods of operation will be explained by reference to the attached drawings in which Fig. 1 and Fig. 2 represent forms of the new open tube.


In Fig. 1, the device consists of an inner cylindrical conduit 1,

cemented to a metallic socket 3,

and an outer conduit 2,

which is tightly screwed to the socket by a nut 4,

and has on the open side a taper with a cylindrical end 9,

of the same inside diameter as conduit 1.


The socket 3, is bored out to provide a large chamber around the inner conduit and carries a pipe 7,

through which thoroughly desiccated air or other gas under suitable pressure is supplied.


The open end of the inner and the tapering part of the outer conduit are ground to form an expanding nozzle 8,

through which the air escapes into the atmosphere thereby creating a high vacuum in the inner conduit.


The socket 3 has a small central hole

and is provided with an inside extension 5, and a threaded outside projection 6,

the latter serving for connection to a container supplying automatically suitable particles or material for same

while the former fulfill the purpose of charging them as they emerge from the hole.


The conduit 1 and 2, may be made of fused quartz, pyrex glass or other refractory material

and it is obviously desirable that all the parts of the apparatus have small and nearly equal coefficients of thermal expansion

especially when the working medium, which might also be superheated steam, is at an elevated temperature.

--

It will be observed that in this tube I do away with the solid wall or window indispensable in all types heretofore employed,

producing the high vacuum required and preventing the inrush of the air by a gaseous jet of high velocity.

Evidently, to secure this result, the dynamic pressure of the jet must be at least equal to the external static pressure.


Expressed in symbols:


V²w/2g = P


Assuming equality:


V = √2g P/w


in which equation V is the speed of the jet at its entrance to channel 8 in meters,

g the acceleration of gravity likewise in meters,

P the external pressure in kilograms per square meter

and w the normal weight of the air in kilograms per cubic meter.


Now


g = 9.81 meters

P = 10332.9 kilograms

w = 1.2929 kilograms


These values give


V = 396 meters


Some allowance should be made for the frictional loss in the nozzle and the outlet channel and also for the deflection of the jet.


For most purposes, the velocity need not be much greater,

but as the degree of rarefaction depends on the square of V,

it is desirable to obtain as high a value as practicable.


Usually, vacuums obtained by a mercury vapor pump are considered very high.


In those, the velocity is only 280 meters per second

but the vapor is 6.9 times heavier than air.

Therefore to get the same vacuum in the air jet,

its speed should be 280 x [6.9]1/2 = 735 meters.


With a working medium at high temperature and pressure,

both within practicable limits, this value can be attained and even exceeded.


Thus, a gaseous jet of very high velocity affords a means for closing the end of the tube,

more perfectly than any window that can be made

while at the same time permitting and facilitating the exit of the particles. 

--

Fig. 2
Showing a modified form of open vacuum tube.

Referring to fig. 2., it shows schematically a modified form of my tube intended for various scientific and practical uses when it may be preferable or necessary not to discharge the jet through the open end.

The construction of the device will be easily understood in view of the foregoing description like parts being similarly designated.

A cylindrical conduit 1, is provided as in fig. 1,

but the outer cone is replaced by a block 2, of lava or other insulating material shaped as indicated and firmly cemented to the conduit 1,

which is hermetically joined by a nut 4, to a metallic plug 3, having a central hole, and extensions 3 and 6, serving the purpose stated above.

The working fluid, as compressed desiccated air, is supplied by means of a pipe 7,

to a large annular space around conduit 1, and escapes through an expanding nozzle 8,

formed by the tapering part of the block and the end of the conduit,

into a chamber connected by a pipe 10, to a vacuum pump of large capacity — not shown on the drawing —

for carrying off not only the air issuing from the nozzle

but also that rushing in from the outside through the open end 9.

In order to minimize the volume of the latter,

I avail myself of an invention of mine known as the "valvular conduit" by providing the wall of the open end 9, with recesses as indicated giving rise to whirls and eddies which use up some of the energy of the stream and reduce its velocity.

In this way, a pressure of about 100 millimeters of mercury can be readily maintained in the chamber increasing greatly the expansion ration of the air and its speed through the nozzle.

----

It is hardly necessary to remark that my open vacuum tubes require mechanical power for operation which may range from 10 to 20 h.p., but this drawback is insignificant when considering the important advantages they offer and I anticipate that they will be extensively employed.

----

It remains to be explained how such a tube is utilized for imparting to a particle to be projected a very great charge.


Imagine that the small spherical body be placed in a nearly perfect vacuum and electrically connected to the large sphere forming the high potential terminal of the transmitter.


By virtue of the connection,

the small sphere will then be at the potential of the large one no matter what its distance from the same

but the quantity of electricity stored on the small sphere will vary greatly with the distance

and be proportionate to the difference of its potential and that of the adjacent medium.


If the small sphere is very close to the large one,

this difference will be insignificant and so to the charge;

but if the small sphere is at a great distance from the large one where the potential imparted by the same to the medium approximates zero,

the quantity of electricity stored on the small one will be relatively enormous and equal to Qr/R.


To illustrate, if r = 1/100 e.s. and R = 1000 e.s. and Q = 108 e.s. units, as before assumed,

then Q =1000 e.s. units which is a hundred thousand times more than previously obtainable.


At a distance 2R from the center of the terminal,

at which the difference between the potential of the small sphere and the adjacent medium will be half of the total, or 15,000,000 volts,

Q will be 500 e.s. units

and from theoretical considerations, it appears that the best results will be secured if the particle is charged in high vacuum at that distance.


It can be accomplished all the more easily the smaller the radius of the terminal

and this is one of the reasons why my improvement,

illustrated in Fig. 3, is of great practical importance.


Fig. 3
New terminal for exceedingly high potentials.


As will appear from the inspection of the drawing,

the spherical frame of the terminal is equipped with devices,

one of which is shown in the enlarged view below and comprises a bulb 2,

of glass or other insulating material

and an electrode of thin sheet suitable rounded.

The latter is joined by a supporting wire to a metallic socket adapted for fastening to the frame 1, by means of nut 3.


The bulb is exhausted to the very highest vacuum obtainable

and the electrode can be charged to an immense density.


Thus, it is made possible to raise the potential of the terminal to any value desired,

so to speak, without limit,

and the usual losses are avoided.

I am confident that as much as one hundred million volts will be reached with such a transmitter providing a tool on inestimable value for practical purposes as well as scientific research.


Fig.
Diagram indicating distribution of charges.
----
Fig. 4
Schematic illustration of new high potential generator.


Perhaps the most important of these inventions is the new high potential electro-static generator,

schematically represented in Fig. 4,

which is provided with my improved terminal consisting of a spherical metallic frame 1,

with attachments 2, adapted to be fastened to the former by nuts 3, as above described.


The terminal has a platform 4,

in the interior of the frame intended for supporting machinery, instruments and observers,

and is carried to a suitable elevation on insulating columns omitted from the drawing for the sake of simplicity.


To energize the terminal, air under pressure is driven at high speed through a hermetically closed channel comprising a turbo compressor 5,

with intake and outlet connections,

conduits 7 and 8, special fittings 9 and 10,and a short pipe 11.


The conduits 7 and 8, are preferably composed of pieces of glazed porcelain bolted tightly together, the joints being made airtight by suitable packing and are corrugated on the outside to minimize electrical leakage. The fittings 9 and 10 and pipe 11, may also be of the same kind of material.


The air before entering and after leaving the compressor,

as well as all apparatus within the airtight enclosure 6,

is effectively cooled and maintained at a constant temperature by means as ordinarily employed which was not thought necessary to illustrate.

----

The operation of the machine will be understood most readily by likening the moving column of air to a running belt.

----

When the air, leaving the compressor, reaches the device 12, containing discharge points electrified by a direct current of high tension,

it is ionized and the charge imparted to it is carried upward to the special fitting 9, where it is drawn off by sucking points and charges the terminal.


On the return to the compressor the air passes through special fitting 10, where it receives electricity of the opposite sign conveying it to the device 13, and from there to the ground.


These actions are repeated with great rapidity. The generator can be made self-exciting by suitable connections.

----

For several reasons, I estimate that a machine as described will have an output of many times greater than a belt generator of the same size and, besides, it has several other important construction and operative advantages.

----

Fig. 5
Spherical terminal and an open vacuum tube for projecting particles.


To give an approximate estimate of performance, reference is made to diagram in Fig. 5,

representing a spherical terminal and an open vacuum tube for projecting particles.


Suppose that d be the distance from the center o at which a particle of radius r = 1/100 c.m. is charged in vacuum to the potential of the terminal, as before explained,

and that D is the distance from center O at which the particle leaves the vacuous space,

then,

in passing through the distance D - d it will be accelerated to a velocity

V₁ = √2Qq (D-d) / md D centimeters per second.

----

In its transit from distance 

D to a very much greater distance

an additional velocity of

V₂ = √2Qq' / m D centimeters per second

q' being, theoretically, smaller than q.


But I have found that although the particle in contact with air is neutralized rapidly yet, on account of its small surface, magnitude of the charge and prodigious speed, a very great distance is traversed without material reduction of the charge so that, without appreciable error, q' may be considered equal to q.


Thus, the total velocity attained will be

V = V₁+V₂ = √2Qq (D-d) / md D + √2Qq' / m D centimeters per second

in which expression Q and q are in e.s. units, D and d in centimeters and m the mass of the particle in grams. 


But the calculation may be simplified, for if the charge is virtually constant through a great distance, the velocity finally attained will be

V = √2Qq / md centimeters per second

----

Assume now that the terminal is equivalent to a sphere of radius R = 250 centimeters

which heretofore could only be charged to a potential of 100 x 250 = 25,000 e.s. units or 7,500,000 volts but,

by taking advantage of my improvements, can be readily charged to 2 x 105 e.s. units or 6 x 107 volts

in which case the quantity of electricity stored will be Q = 2 x 105 x 250 = 5 x 107 e.s. units.


If, for best effect, the particle is charged in vacuum at a distance d = 2R = 500 centimeters

where the difference between its potential and adjacent medium is 3 x 107 volts or 105 e.s. units,

then q/r = 105 and q = 105 = 1000 e.s. units.


The particle will have a volume of 4π/3 x 106 cubic centimeters

and if it be tungsten,

it will weigh about 4π x 18/3 x 106 = 7686/1011 gram.


Substituting these values


V = √2 x 5 x 107 x 1000 x 10¹¹ / 1000 x 7686 x 500

= 1,613,000 centimeters or 16,130 meters per second.


This finding may be checked by using the relation between the joule's equivalent and the kinetic energy.


Here the joules are 3 x 10⁷ x 1000 / 3 x 10⁹ = 10

and approximately equal to 106 gram-centimeters.


Consequently,


mV² / 2 = 10⁶
V² = 2 x 10⁶ x 10¹¹ / 7686 and
V = 1,613,000 centimeters or 16,130 meters


as found above by my formula which is always applicable while the latter rule is not.


Since a joule is equivalent to about 10,000 gram-centimeters,

the kinetic energy is equal to 10⁵ gram-centimeters or 1 kilogram-meter.

----

In order to determine the probable trajectory the air resistance encountered by the particle has to be estimated from practical data and theoretical consideration.


Very extensive ballistic tests by French experts have established conclusively

that up to a velocity of 400 meters per second, the resistance increases as the square of the speed

but from there on, to the highest velocities attained, the increase is directly proportional to the speed.


On the other hand, it has been found in tests with rifles that an ordinary bullet,

8 millimeters in diameter and three times as long,

fired at 400 meters per second,

encounters a mean resistance of about 0.02 kilogram and from these facts,

it can be inferred that the average resistance of the particle at the maximum speed V might be of the order of 1/64,000 of a kilogram

and if so, the trajectory should be approximately 64,000 meters or 64 kilometers.


Obviously, resistance data cannot be accurate,

but as the mechanical effects can be increased many times,

there should be no difficulty in securing the practically required range with a transmitter as described.


In all probability, when the technique is perfected, results will be obtained which are thought impossible at present.


Such a particle,

notwithstanding its minute volume of 1/250,000 cubic centimeter,

would be very destructive.


It would pierce the usual protecting covering of aeroplanes,

put machinery out of commission

and ignite fuel and explosives.


To combatants, it would be deadly at any distance well within its full range.


Projected almost simultaneously in great numbers,

the particles would produce intense heating effects.


In action, against aeroplanes, the range would be very much greater on account of the smaller density of the air.

--

Evidently, the smaller the particles, the greater will be their speed.


For instance, if r = 1/10,000 centimeter,

a velocity of 160,000 meters per second will be attained.

An enormous increase in speed and range would be secured with particles of a diameter smaller than 800 times the molecular diameter.

----

It is important to devise a thoroughly practical and simple means for supplying particles

and I have invented two which seem to meet this requirement.

--

One is to feed tungsten or other wire from a spool in a closed container joined hermetically to the projector,

the rotation of the spool being under control of the operator.

Using wire 2/100 centimeters in diameter,

twenty cubic centimeters of the same would provide material for 5,000,000 particles.

--

The other device consists of a closed container fixed to the projector

and filled with mercury which can be expanded by external and controllable application of heat

and forced, under great pressure, through a minute hole in the extreme end of the extension

reaching to the distance d as before illustrated and explained.

-

The droplet torn off and projected would have the hardness of steel owing to the great capillary pressure.

-

If mercury be used for the purpose, this means is ideally simple and cheap.
______








        🗞️ TESLA PREDICTS 🗞️
           SHIPS POWERED
           BY SHORE BEAM
               ————
    Scoffs at Normandie 'Speed,'
     Sees Success for His Plan
     to Use Stratosphere Ray
               ————
     Would Light Sea at Night
               ————
    Says French Liner's System
     Copies His in U.S. Boats
               ————
     New York Herald Tribune
          June 5th, 1935🐇
*(foreword)

Dr. Nikola Tesla, scientist and seer whose discoveries in the fields of polyphase electrical current and wireless place him in the front rank or modern inventors, refused yesterday to be awed by the record speed achievement of the French liner Normandie in crossing the Atlantic in 4 days 11 hours 42 minutes and predicted that enormous ships would cross the ocean at far greater speeds by means of a high-tension current projected from power plants on shore to vessels at sea through the upper reaches of the atmosphere.
In his room at the Hotel New Yorker, dressed in a blue bathrobe, blue socks and red slippers, Dr. Tesla expounded the principles of his fabulous method of power transmission — a method which he has been developing at irregular intervals from as far back as 1897. The virtues of stratosphere transmission, he said, lay not only in its potential increase of a vessel's speed but also in its power to eliminate the dangers of nocturnal navigation.

In short, high-tension currents of electricity passing through the stratosphere would light the sky and to a degree turn night into day. With power plants stationed at intermediate posts such as upon the Azores and Bermuda, vessels could cross the Atlantic, propelled and safeguarded at the same time by electricity generated ashore. There would no longer be danger of boiler explosions nor hazards of collisions at sea. Even on moonless, cloudy nights, there still would gleam overhead the faint rays of surging electrical currents, so strong that pilots would be able to distinguish objects miles away.

Normandie Uses U.S. Cruiser System
Dr. Tesla, a tall, slender man with straight silvery hair, lean features and bright blue eyes that belie his seventy-eight years, prefaced his prophecies by pointing out that the Normandie's system of power generation and application was not new — but one which had been adopted long ago in some of the United States cruisers. The principle is one of his own invention.

'''The Normandie,''' he said, '''employs an 'electric drive' in which turbines drive generators and generators supply the current to independent motors. In this case the turbines are driven by steam, the generators are of the three-phase type and the motors are of the induction type.

'''In many respects the machinery installed on the United States cruisers by former Secretary Josephus Daniels is more remarkable than that in the Normandie on account or the limitations of available space. Moreover, while the Normandie develops only 160,000 horsepower, the cruisers each develop 185,000 horsepower. These cruisers employ the most remarkable engine plants in the world, and I believe that this drive would not have been employed on the Normandie had it not been for the pioneering work done in the United States.

'''In view of the adoption on such a large scale of these inventions of mine, it is interesting to recall that I was violently attacked only a few years ago by a professor of marine engineering at Columbia, who claimed the electrical drive was not feasible and that it was a folly to undertake it.

'''However splendid the machinery in the Normandie might be, the time is not distant when we will have much simpler and better means of propulsion.'''

    Cites His Force Beam as One Way
Here Dr. Tesla recalled the possibilities of his force beam of particles which he announced last year as a potential defensive weapon of great value. One of its aspects is a death ray capable of destroying airplanes and armies. Another is a means of power transmission which could be used to relay immense voltages of power over distances limited only by the curvature of the earth.


The difficulties inherent in using this method as a means of propulsion for oceangoing ships, however, were seen by Dr. Tesla to lie in the necessity of vast outlays of capital and concerted harmonious endeavor by the chief nations of the world. The latter, he said, would be impossible to achieve at the present time. A third difficulty would be the task of keeping a ship at sea constantly in touch with a threadlike beam of particles from ashore.


Dr. Tesla, therefore, suggested that his other scheme, of stratosphere transmission of electricity, would be a far more feasible means of marine propulsion. The principles of the two plans are entirely distinct. The force beam is a thin barrage of tiny particles discharged at tremendous velocities from a kind of electrical gun. The other Invention, which he has not hitherto discussed publicly, is of transmitting high tension currents through the upper air, and receiving them by means of a vertical ionizing beam which would be a sort of invisible electrode. He discussed this yesterday:


    Started New Idea in 1897
'''There is a method of conveying great power to ships at sea which would be able to propel them across oceans at high speed.  This method I conceived between 1897 and 1899, and in Colorado Springs in 1899.  I made experiments along this line on a large scale.


'''The principle is this: A ray of great ionizing power is used to give to the atmosphere great powers of conduction.  A high tension current of 10,000,000 to 12,000,000 volts is then passed along this ray to the upper strata of the air, which strata can be broken down very readily and will conduct electricity very well.

'''A ship would have to have equipment for producing a similar ionizing ray.  The current which has passed through the stratosphere will strike this ray, travel down it and pass into the engines which propel the ship.

    Pet Scheme to Light Ocean
'''I will confess that I was disappointed when I first made tests along this line on a large scale.  They did not yield practical results.  At the time I used about 8,000,000 to 12,000,000 volts of electricity.  As a source of ionizing rays I employed a powerful arc reflected up into the sky.  At the time I was trying only to connect a high tension current and the upper strata of the air, because my pet scheme for years has been to light the ocean at night.[siclol]


'''However, since 1902 I have made many improvements in my method which I know now will assure success.  A power plant upon the Azores, for instance, could send a current up into the stratosphere and illuminate the sky sufficiently for pilots to discern objects upon the ocean at a safe distance.'''

Dr. Tesla said that he was working constantly every day to perfect his force beam, his method of stratosphere transmission of power, and a number of other inventions the nature of which he was not ready to disclose.  When it was called to his attention that he was working pretty hard for a man who would be seventy-nine years old next month, he replied:


  '''Why, I'm young I never think of my age.  Really, you know, I'm just a youngster.🐇'''
______








3 TESLA INVENTIONS
by
New York Sun
July 9th, 1935 Page number(s): ?

Famous Scientist to Tell Them Tomorrow.
______








📷 Four candid photos taken of Tesla on July 10th, 1935 at his seventy-ninth birthday celebration presser at the Hotel New Yorker. 📷








   🗞️ TESLA, 79, PROMISES 🗞️
      TO TRANSMIT FORCE
            ————
Scientist on Birthday Reveals
 Scheme to Send Mechanical
     Energy All Over World.
            ————
  WOULD EVEN GUIDE SHIPS
            ————
  Assails Theory of Relativity
  as Work of Metaphysicians
        and not Scientific.
            ————
          By unkown
      New York Times, The
          July 11th 1935

Nikola Tesla, the man with seven hundred basic patents to his credit, who startled the world on a number of occasions in the past by achieving what others had regarded as impossible, including the large-scale generation and distribution of alternating current, yesterday treated the combined metropolitan press to a personally conducted tour of the labyrinthine laboratory of his fertile mind.

It was his seventy-ninth birthday anniversary, and, in keeping with his custom of past years, he made the day an occasion for revealing some of the latest products of his brain in the line of discovery, a field in which he rivaled and sometimes surpassed Edison during the golden era of electrical invention.

He confined himself yesterday to three of his startling adventures in the realm of theoretical and practical science. One of these, he said, '''would appear almost preposterous.''' The second, he said with true candor, '''would be considered absolutely impossible by any competent electrical engineer.''' 🐇The third would knock the props out from under the theory of relativity, he said, but in this case also he expressed his doubt that the modern generation of scientists would take his challenge seriously🐇.


    Cites Cosmic Ray Proof.
He described relativity as '''a beggar wrapped in purple whom ignorant people take for a king.''' In support of his statement he cited a number of experiments he had conducted, he said, as far back as 1896 on the cosmic ray. He has measured cosmic ray velocities from Antarus, he said, which he found to be fifty times greater than the speed of light, thus demolishing, he contended, one of the basic pillars of the structure of relativity, according to which there can be no speed greater than that of light.


Mr. Tesla treated the press, reporters, camera men, news and sound reel representatives, about thirty in number, to a gourmet's luncheon in a private dining room at the Hotel New Yorker, where he has been making his home during the past two years. Mr. Tesla sat at the head of the table and talked while the reporters and camera men feasted on his bounty. He disdained each and every dish that was brought to him, not even touching his glass of water.

Toward the end of the luncheon he absented himself for a while and came back with a bottle containing a small quantity of pasteurized milk. This he poured in a silver chafing dish and heated to the proper temperature. Then came the surprise of the day — a birthday cake with a lone candle, a token of esteem by the management of the New Yorker to its distinguished bachelor guest.

    His Greatest Achievement.
One of the subjects, which he hoped, he said, will come to be recognized as his '''greatest achievement in the field of engineering.''' was, he said, the perfection by him of '''an apparatus by which mechanical energy can be transmitted to any part of the terrestrial globe.'''
🐇
This apparatus, he said, will have at least four practical possibilities. It will give the world a new means of unfailing communication; it will provide a new and by far the safest means for guiding ships at sea and into port; it will furnish a certain divining rod for locating ore deposits of any kind under the surface of the earth; and finally, it will furnish scientists with a means for laying bare the physical conditions of the earth, and will enable them to determine all of the earth's physical constants.
🐇
He called this discovery '''tele-geodynamics,''' motion of earth-forces at a distance. It is of this, he said, that it would '''appear almost preposterous.''' The apparatus, he added, is '''ideally simple,''' consisting of a stationary part and a cylinder of fine steel '''floating''' in air. He has found means, he said, of '''impressing upon the floating part powerful impulses which react on the stationary part, and through the latter to transmit energy through the earth.''' To do this he has '''found a new amplifier for a known type of energy,''' and the '''purpose is to produce impulses through the earth and then pick them up whenever needed.'''
🐇
The second invention, which, he said, '''will be considered absolutely impossible by any competent electrical engineer,''' was described by him as a new method and apparatus for producing direct current without a commutator, '''something that has been considered impossible since the days of Faraday.''' '''Incredible as it seems,''' he said, '''I have found a solution for this old problem.'''


Cosmic rays, he asserted, he found are produced by the force of '''electrostatic repulsion'''; they consist of powerfully charged positive particles which come to us from the sun and other suns in the universe. He determined, '''after experimentation,''' he added, that the sun is charged '''with an electric potential of approximately 215,000,000,000 volts, while the electric charge stored in the sun amounted to approximately 50,000,000,000,000,000,000 electrostatic units.'''


The theory of relativity he described as '''a mass of error and deceptive ideas violently opposed to the teachings of great men of science of the past and even to common sense.'''

'''The theory,''' he said, '''wraps all these errors and fallacies and clothes them in magnificent mathematical garb which fascinates, dazzles and makes people blind to the underlying errors. The theory is like a beggar clothed in purple whom ignorant people take for a king. Its exponents are very brilliant men, but they are metaphysicists rather than scientists. Not a single one of the relativity propositions has been proved.'''
______








🗞️ Nikola Tesla, at 79, Uses Earth to Transmit Signals; Expects to have $100,000,000 Within Two Years 🗞️
       ————
Could Destroy Empire State Building with Five Pounds of Air Pressure, He Says
       ————
By Earl Sparling
       ————
New York World-Telegram, The
July 11th 1935

Nikola Tesla is 79 years old, and he is one of the true geniuses of this time. Nevertheless, twenty-odd newspapermen came away from his Hotel New Yorker birthday party yesterday, which lasted six hours, feeling hesitantly that something was wrong either with the old man's mind or else with their own, for Dr. Tesla, serene in an old-fashioned Prince Albert and courtly in a way that seems to have gone out of this world, announced that: -

1. He had discovered the so-called cosmic ray in 1896, at least five years before any other scientist took it up and twenty years before it became popular among scientists, and he is now convinced that many of the cosmic particles travel fifty times faster than light, some of them 500 times faster.

    Needs No Commutator
2. He has found a way to produce a direct electric current by induction and without the use of a commutator, which is something the experts in electricity have considered impossible for the past hundred years.

3. 🐇He has invented an '''absolutely impossible''' machine which will impart vibrations to the earth which, with proper receiving apparatus can be picked up anywhere on the earth's surface, and that this mysterious machine will allow scientists to explore the deep interior of the earth, will enable practical geologists to discover gold, coal and petroleum, and at the same time will give ships the means of navigating without compass or sextant🐇.

Dr. Tesla has 600 to 700 patents to his name. He invented the rotary field motor, and is admittedly the seer and father of all modern electrical development. As has been his custom for five years now, he arranged his own birthday party, drank only hot milk as his part of the celebration, and made his announcements with the superb certainty of a man who knew what he was talking about, even if none of his guests did.


    Tells of '''Quake'''


He said, among other things, that he expects to have $100,000,000 within two years, and he revealed that an earthquake which drew police and ambulances to the region of his laboratory at 48 E. Houston St. in 1887 or was the result of a little machine he was experimenting with at that time which '''you could put in your overcoat pocket.'''

The bewildered newspapermen pounced upon this as at least one thing they could understand and '''the father of modern electricity''' told what had happened as follows:

'''I was experimenting with vibrations. I had one of my machines going and I wanted to see if I could get it in tune with the vibration of the building. I put it up notch after notch. There was a peculiar cracking sound.

'''I asked my assistants where did the sound come from. They did not know. I put the machine up a few more notches. There was a louder cracking sound. I knew I was approaching the vibration of the steel building. I pushed the machine a little higher.

'''Suddenly all the heavy machinery in the place was flying around. I grabbed a hammer and broke the machine. The building would have been down about our ears in another few minutes. Outside in the street there was pandemonium. The police and ambulances arrived. I told my assistants to say nothing. We told the police it must have been an earthquake. That's all they ever knew about it.'''


    Watch Out, Mr. Smith


Some shrewd reporter asked Dr. Tesla at this point what he would need to destroy the Empire State Building and the doctor replied: - '''Five pounds of air pressure. 🐇 If I attached the proper oscillating machine on a girder that is all the force I would need, five pounds. Vibration will do anything. It would only be necessary to step up the vibrations of the machine to fit the natural vibration of the building and the building would come crashing down. That's why soldiers always break step crossing a bridge.'''
His early experiments in vibration, he explained, led to his invention of his '''Earth vibrating machine'''. Tall and thin and ascetic face, his eyes sunken but humorous under protruding brows, he was cagey about describing what his new machine is, although he believes it will be '''the chief thing of my many inventions posterity will thank me for.'''








TESLA'S CONTROLLED EARTHQUAKE
by
New York American, The
July 11th 1935 Page number(s):

ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ






🗞️ EXPANDING SUN WILL EXPLODE SOME DAY TESLA PREDICTS 🗞️
by Nikola Tesla
The New York Herald Tribune
August 18th, 1935 Page number(s): ?








NIKOLA TESLA TELLS HOW HE'D DEFEND ETHIOPIA AGAINST ITALIAN INVASION
Detroit Times
by George Sylvester Viereck
September 22nd, 1935 Page number(s): 3

Dense Tropical Growth Will Frustrate Bombs and Gas Hurled from Airplane.

"What would you do, if you were Emporer of Ethiopia?"

This question, addressed to Nikola Tesla, suggested itself to me when I remembered the recent announcement by the discoverer of the rotating electric field, that he had perfected certain inventions by which the weak could protect themselves against the strong.

These inventions, it was claimed, could destroy whole cities and put an attacking fleet of airplanes out of commission at great distance.

Could these means be employed by Ethiopia to hold off Mussolini?

I sought out the inventor in a skyscraper hotel, where he ponders over new scientific devices.

Tesla was deeply absorbed in thought, but his sternness melted and his pale face was illuminated by an understanding smile.

'''Why do you ask me this question? I bear no ill will against Italians; they have brought forth great men in science, literature and art, and supplied workmen and artisans who have advanced humanity.

'''This alleviates their contemplated act of piracy. Other nations have done worse. Nations cannot be judged by the same standards as individuals.

'''If I were the ruler of Ethiopia, I would rigorously utilize every natural advantage of my country to nullify the effectiveness of this superior armament and, above all, to prevent him from staging a sensational air-attack, destructive to the morale of my simple-minded subjects.

    MUST USE THEIR WITS.
'''As a first and absolutely indispensable measure I would order the complete evacuation of Addis Ababa and all other places of importance without a moment's delay.

I believe that Haile Selassie already contemplates some such course.

'''I would leave no civilians behind in dealing with Mussolini. Though a man of genius and culture, the Duce has a strain of ferocity in his make-up, which appears in some of his outbursts. Savagely bent upon avenging the crushing Italian defeat at Adowa, Mussolini would command ruthless destruction.

'''I would scatter my people in the thickly wooded regions and tell them that they must match with cunning what they lack in might to escape annihilation.

'''Italian air fleets will darken the sky to overawe the population, probably. But will they bomb towns and settlements, deserted and stripped of all things of value? That would be a costly sport. It would incur the scorn and ridicule of the world. If my directions were strictly followed, the Italian airman could never find the Ethiopian in the tropical underbrush.'''

'''Knowing that the Ethiopians are hidden there, would the Italians not scatter their bombs over their forests?'''

'''The noise of bombs hurled from airplanes under such conditions would be entirely out of proportion to their destructiveness; they would kill very few people,''' Tesla replied with a laugh.

'''The dense tropical growth is an ideal impediment against gases and bombs and greatly reduces the range of such devices. Remember also that Ethiopia has a surface of 350,000 square miles, and a population of only 10,000,000, or, on the average 25 inhabitants per square mile. Even to clean out an insignificant jungle requires thousands of ordinary bombs.'''

'''But if the Italians resort to poison gas, what then?'''

    POISON GAS CERTAIN TO FAIL.
'''Such attacks must fail. It is a common mistake to disregard the character of the terrain in estimating the military value of modern arms.

'''Weapons that could be used with disastrous results in Europe, will prove futile in Ethiopia. Poison gas is released by bursting bombs or sprinkled from reservoirs. The weight of these gases is insignificant compared with that of the containers and accessories required for their transportation. To provide 1,000 cubic feet of gas, a plane must carry equipment weighing one ton, and 1,000 cubic feet of gas is no more than a drop in a barrel.

'''If I were the King, I would teach my subjects how to render themselves immune to poison gas. To explain the scheme, I must go back to my young days in Yugoslavia. As a boy I was very fond of running against the wind and observed that in the summer there was a steady breeze from the land covered with vegetation to a desolate region, barren of growth and strewn with rocks.

"'Why does the wind always blow that way?''' I asked my mother. 'Because God has willed it so, my boy.' 'But why has God willed it so?' My curiosity was not satisfied until I acquired some knowledge of physics and mechanics.

'''Then I understood that the bleak region exposed to the direct glare of the sun became very hot. The expanded air rose, reducing the static pressure. Then, the cooler and denser air from the surrounding country rushed in, to be in turn heated and caused to rise.

    PREVAILING WINDS DISPEL GASES.
'''In Ethiopia, where the thermometer registers as much as 140 degrees in the shade the exposed regions attain scorching heat and the ensuing air-current is swift and of large volume.

'''Travelers, noting the prevalence of winds, have not attached any significance to them. Yet, here lies the salvation of Ethiopia. These winds are of supreme importance in gas war. They dilute the gases very greatly and quickly and at the same time supply the vivifying oxygen.

'''If I were Haile Selassie, I would station my subjects behind natural or artificial barriers sheltering them from the wind. The gas, released in front of them, will be rendered innocuous, because it will be carried off by the wind from which they are protected. The gas released behind them will be extremely diluted. Stream-ing past the barrier, it will cause little harm.

'''Perhaps my suggesting this remedy in my wholly hypothetical role, I may be rendering a service to both combatants.

'''But the Italians have been preparing long for this war; they may spring surprises. It was reported that their chemists have produced a powder which will burn the feet of the Ethiopians and put them out of combat.

'''That must be the proposition of a practical joker or an ignoramus. it would not be possible to manufacture 1 percent of the powder necessary for this purpose. If a limited quantity were sprinkled on the roads and pathways, the Ethiopians would soon find out and beware.

'''In my opinion the Italians will be wise to abstain from the use of poison in any form. The natives could retaliate by poisoning all wells. This kind of warfare could not fail to prove a calamity; it would bring about a holocaust among the animals. Their putrifying bodies would bring on pestilence. Water would carry the germ-infection far and wide.

'''No, I do not think that the Ethiopians will be in danger from such devices. The airplane will be of value only in open battle and for scouting purposes. It is not a peril to the Ethiopians.

'''Their greatest peril is their own impetuosity. If they permit themselves to be detected and enveloped, if they do not confine themselves entirely to guerrilla tactics, the Italians will smash them.'''

"Have you thought of tanks? How would you meet that menace?"

'''I admit, the task is not easy. The modern tank may be compared to the rhinoceros in the days when no bullet could pierce its hide. The heavy armor of the vehicle protects it from guns of considerable calibre.

    MERCURIC FULMINATE TO PIERCE TANKS.
'''But this would not discourage me, if I were the lion of Judah. Under my guidance and the pressure of necessity my few mechanical and chemical experts would quickly perfect an efficient defense - possibly rifles of large bore, adapted to fire charges of mercuric fulminate.

'''This is an extraordinarily powerful explosive. The extreme suddenness of its detonation is such that, even if unconfined, it will punch a hole in a thick steel plate.

'''The chief difficulty is to prevent premature explosion of the gun barrel. I think this could be overcome by an elastic resistance and slow acceleration, which is practicable as the range can be short.

'''The charges exploding in contact with the tank would put the propelling engines and machine gun equipment out of order. My Ethiopians, sallying forth from ambush, would do the rest.'''

"What will be the outcome of the war - if it comes to pass?"

'''This question is easily answered. The Ethiopians must hide in the day and strike in the dark. In doing so, they can prevent the aggressors from achieving the important military results during the present dry season. When the rain comes again, their battle will be half won.

    ITALIANS ALWAYS POOR COLONIZERS.
'''But we are dealing with a hypothesis. I am still convinced that Mussolini will not dare to embark upon a large-scale invasion of Ethiopia. The price he must pay in equipment and men is too great. He must envisage disastrous consequences to Italy, even in case of victory,

'''Should Ethiopia be conquered, it would prove a cancer eating away the substance of Italy. The Italians have never been successful colonizers.

'''I perceive more and more clearly that Mussolini is making bold gestures to attain valuable concessions through the mediation of the Peace Conference.

'''Holding over the heads of the spineless League of Nations, like a sword of Damocles, the threat of another World War more frightful than the first, he has succeeded in scaring its members, so that they are making ready to deal unfairly with a nation whose only offense is its weakness - a nation that existed before Romulus and Remus were born and maintained its independence for over three thousand years.

'''No matter what compromises may be adopted the Ethiopians will rather die than surrender their independence; hence, whether the issue be peace or war, there is much trouble ahead.'''
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘3️⃣6️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '36

TESLA, 80, REVEALS NEW POWER DEVICE
by unkown
New York Times, The
July 11th, 1936 Page number(s): ?
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘3️⃣7️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '37
__________________


DR. TESLA'S HONORS
————
by
New York Herald Tribune
July 27th, 1937 Page number(s): 147

To the New York Herald Tribune:

I have been a reader of your excellent paper for more than fifty years and feel much obliged to you for the pleasure and enlightenment derived from its perusal. Many of your admirable editorials are on my files. Under these circumstances it is unfortunate that your issue of Sunday, July 11, contained a report very injurious to me.

The particularly damaging statement is: "The decorations made very little impression on Dr. Tesla. 'They mean nothing - take them away,' said Dr. Tesla."

I should say that the expression on my face in the photograph accompanying the report, would be sufficient to disprove the above assertion. When it became necessary to clear the table I was very anxious that the precious objects be placed in safe hands and requested my old friend, George Scherff, auditor of the Union Sulphur Company, who was one of the honored guests, to take care of them. Moreover, as soon as I was free, I cabled His Royal Highness Prince Regent Paul of Yugoslavia and to His Excellency Dr. Eduard Benes, President of Czechoslovakia, expressing my profound gratitude for the rare distinctions conferred upon me and my great pride of possessing them. It was desireable to show in the photograph the Yugoslav Minister handing me the order of the White Eagie but His Excellency Konstantin Fotitch, besides being a master in diplomacy, is a man of commanding stature in other respects, and he did not insist. However, a more charming dignitary than Dr. Vladimir Hurban, Minister of Czechoslovakia, could not be imagined.


*photocopy of original here

__________________







___
*** Sometime in 1937

Professor Felix Ehrenhaft (Director of the Physics Institute at the University of Vienna; who also operated a visiting Research Lab at Columbia), who had been one of those to nominate Albert Einstein for the Nobel Prize in 1921, submits a proposal to the Nobel Prize Committee with the explication for the nomination of Nikola Tesla for the prize in physics, for the discovery of high-frequency currents and the rotating magnetic field. Tesla receives 1 out 🐇 of 38 votes.
___








🗞️ — A MACHINE TO END WAR — 🗞️
A Famous Inventor, Picturing Life 100 Years from Now, Reveals an Astounding Scientific
Venture Which He Believes Will Change the Course of History

by Nikola Tesla
as told to George Sylvester Viereck
Liberty
February 9th, 1937 Page number(s): 5-7


Tesla. '''It seems,''' he says, '''that I have always been ahead of my time.'''


Editor's Note: Nikola Tesla, now in his seventy-eighth year, has been called the father of radio, television, power transmission, the induction motor, and the robot, and the discoverer of the cosmic ray. Recently he has announced a heretofore unknown source of energy present everywhere in unlimited amounts, and he is now working upon a device which he believes will make war impracticable.

Tesla and Edison have often been represented as rivals. They were rivals, to a certain extent, in the battle between the alternating and direct current in which Tesla championed the former. He won; the great power plants at Niagara Falls and elsewhere are founded on the Tesla system. Otherwise the two men were merely opposites. Edison had a genius for practical inventions immediately applicable. Tesla, whose inventions were far ahead of the time, aroused antagonisms which delayed the fruition of his ideas for years.

However, great physicists like Kelvin and Crookes spoke of his inventions as marvelous. "Tesla," said Professor A. E. Kennelly of Harvard University when the Edison medal was presented to the inventor, "set wheels going round all over the world. . . . What he showed was a revelation to science and art unto ail time."

"Were we," remarks B. A. Behrend, distinguished author and engineer, "to seize and to eliminate the results of Mr. Tesla's work, the wheels of industry would cease to turn, our electric cars and trains would stop, our towns would be dark, our mills would be dead and idle."


'''Forecasting is perilous. No man can look very far into the future. Progress and invention evolve in directions other than those anticipated. Such has been my experience, although I may flatter myself that many of the developments which I forecast have been verified by events in the first third of the twentieth century.


It seems that I have always been ahead of my time. I had to wait nineteen years before Niagara was harnessed by my system, fifteen years before the basic inventions for wireless which I gave to the world in 1893 were applied universally. I announced the cosmic ray and my theory of radio activity in 1896. One of my most important discoveries —terrestrial resonance— which is the foundation of wireless power transmission and which I announced in 1899, is not understood even today. Nearly two years after I had flashed an electric current around the globe, Edison, Steinmetz, Marconi, and others declared that it would not be possible to transmit even signals by wireless across the Atlantic. Having anticipated so many important developments, it is not without assurance that I attempt to predict what life is likely to be in the twenty-first century.


Life is and will ever remain an equation incapable of solution, but it contains certain known factors. We may definitely say that it is a movement even if we do not fully understand its nature. Movement implies a body which is being moved and a force which propels it against resistance. Man, in the large, is a mass urged on by a force. Hence the general laws governing movement in the realm of mechanics are applicable to humanity.

There are three ways by which the energy which determines human progress can be increased: First, we may increase the mass. This, in the case of humanity, would mean the improvement of living conditions, health, eugenics, etc. Second, we may reduce the frictional forces which impede progress, such as ignorance, insanity, and religious fanaticism. Third, we may multiply the energy of the human mass by enchaining the forces of the universe, like those of the sun, the ocean, the winds and tides.

The first method increases food and well-being. The second tends to bring peace. The third enhances our ability to work and to achieve. There can be no progress that is not constantly directed toward increasing well-being, peace, and achievement. Here the mechanistic conception of life is one with the teachings of Buddha and the Sermon on the Mount.


While I am not a believer in the orthodox sense, I commend religion, first, because every individual should have some ideal — religious, artistic, scientific, or humanitarian — to give significance to his life. Second, because all the great religions contain wise prescriptions relating to the conduct of life, which hold good now as they did when they were promulgated.
🐇
There is no conflict between the ideal of religion and the ideal of science, but science is opposed to theological dogmas because science is founded on fact. To me, the universe is simply a great machine which never came into being and never will end. The human being is no exception to the natural order. Man, like the universe, is a machine. Nothing enters our minds or determines our actions which is not directly or indirectly a response to stimuli beating upon our sense organs from without. Owing to the similarity of our construction and the sameness of our environment, we respond in like manner to similar stimuli, and from the concordance of our reactions, understanding is barn. In the course of ages, mechanisms of infinite complexity are developed, but what we call '''soul''' or '''spirit,''' is nothing more than the sum of the functionings of the body. When this functioning ceases, the '''soul''' or the '''spirit''' ceases likewise.


I expressed these ideas long before the behaviorists, led by Pavlov in Russia and by Watson in the United States, proclaimed their new psychology. This apparently mechanistic conception is not antagonistic to an ethical conception of life. The acceptance by mankind at large of these tenets will not destroy religious ideals. Today Buddhism and Christianity are the greatest religions both in number of disciples and in importance. I believe that the essence of both will be the religion of the human race in the twenty-first century.


🐇 The year 2100 will see xxx universally established. In past ages, the xxx governing the xxx of the xxx roughly xxx out the less xxx xxx. Then xxx's new sense of xxx began to interfere with the xxx workings of xxx. As a result, xxx continue to keep xxx and to xxx the xxx. The only xxx compatible with xxx notions of xxx and the xxx is to prevent the xxx of the xxx by xxx and the xxx guidance of the xxx instinct, Several xxx countries and a xxx of states of the xxx Union xxx the xxx and the xxx. This is not xxx. The trend of xxx among xxx is that xxx must make xxx more xxx. Certainly no xxx who is not a desirable xxx should be permitted to produce xxx. A xxx from now it will no more xxx to a normal xxx to xxx with a xxx xxx xxx than to xxx a habitual xxx.


Hygiene, physical culture will be recognized branches of education and government. The Secretary of Hygiene or Physical Culture will be far more important in the cabinet of the President of the United States who holds office in the year 2035 than the Secretary of War. The pollution of our beaches such as exists today around New York City will seem as unthinkable to our children and grandchildren as life without plumbing seems to us. Our water supply will be far more carefully supervised, and only a lunatic will drink unsterilized water.


More people die or grow sick from polluted water than from coffee, tea, tobacco, and other stimulants. I myself eschew all stimulants. I also practically abstain from meat. I am convinced that within a century coffee, tea, and tobacco will be no longer in vogue. Alcohol, however, will still be used. It is not a stimulant but a veritable elixir of life. The abolition of stimulants will not come about forcibly. It will simply be no longer fashionable to poison the system with harmful ingredients. Bernarr Macfadden has shown how it is possible to provide palatable food based upon natural products such as milk, honey, and wheat. I believe that the food which is served today in his penny restaurants will be the basis of epicurean meals in the smartest banquet halls of the twenty-first century.

There will be enough wheat and wheat products to feed the entire world, including the teeming millions of China and India, now chronically on the verge of starvation. The earth is bountiful, and where her bounty fails, nitrogen drawn from the air will refertilize her womb. I developed a process for this purpose in 1900. It was perfected fourteen years later under the stress of war by German chemists.

Long before the next century dawns, systematic reforestation and the scientific management of natural resources will have made an end of all devastating droughts, forest fires, and floods. The universal utilization of water power and its long-distance transmission will supply every household with cheap power and will dispense with the necessity of burning fuel. The struggle for existence being lessened, there should be development along ideal rather than material lines.


🐇 Today the most civilized countries of the world spend a maximum of their income on war and a minimum on education. The twenty-first century will reverse this order. It will be more glorious to fight against ignorance than to die on the field of battle. The discovery of a new scientific truth will be more important than the squabbles of diplomats. Even the newspapers of our own day are beginning to treat scientific discoveries and the creation of fresh philosophical concepts as news. The newspapers of the twenty-first century will give a mere '''stick''' in the back pages to accounts of crime or political controversies, but will headline on the front pages the proclamation of a new scientific hypothesis.'''

'''It will be possible to destroy anything approaching within 200 miles. My invention will provide a wall of power,''' declares Tesla.

🐇 '''Progress along such lines will be impossible while nations persist in the savage practice of killing each other off. I inherited from my father, an erudite man who labored hard for peace, an ineradicable hatred of war. Like other inventors, I believed at one time that war could he stopped by making it more destructive. But I found that I was mistaken. I underestimated man's combative instinct, which it will take more than a century to breed out. We cannot abolish war by outlawing it. We cannot end it by disarming the strong. War can be stopped, not by making the strong weak but by making every nation, weak or strong, able to defend itself.

Hitherto all devices that could be used for defense could also be utilized to serve for aggression. This nullified the value of the improvement for purposes of peace. But I was fortunate enough to evolve a new idea and to perfect means which can be used chiefly for defense. If it is adopted, it will revolutionize the relations between nations. It will make any country, large or small, impregnable against armies, airplanes, and other means for attack. My invention requires a large plant, but once it is established it will be possible to destroy anything, men or machines, approaching within a radius of 200 miles. It will, so to speak, provide a wall of power offering an insuperable obstacle against any effective aggression.

If no country can be attacked successfully, there can be no purpose in war. My discovery ends the menace of airplanes or submarines, but it insures the supremacy of the battleship, because battleships may be provided with some of the required equipment. There might still be war at sea, but no warship could successfully attack the shore line, as the coast equipment will be superior to the armament of any battleship.


🐇 I want to state explicitly that this invention of mine does not contemplate the use of any so-called '''death rays.''' Rays are not applicable because they cannot be produced in requisite quantities and diminish rapidly in intensity with distance. All the energy of New York City (approximately two million horsepower) transformed into rays and projected twenty miles, could not kill a human being, because, according to a well known law of physics, it would disperse to such an extent as to be ineffectual.


My apparatus projects particles which may be relatively large or of microscopic dimensions, enabling us to convey to a small area at a great distance trillions of times more energy than is possible with rays of any kind. Many thousands of horsepower can thus be transmitted by a stream thinner than a hair, so that nothing can resist. This wonderful feature will make it possible, among other things, to achieve undreamed-of results in television, for there will be almost no limit to the intensity of illumination, the size of the picture, or distance of projection.

I do not say that there may not be several destructive wars before the world accepts my gift. I may not live to see its acceptance. But I am convinced that a century from now every nation will render itself immune from attack by my device or by a device based upon a similar principle.


At present we suffer from the derangement of our civilization because we have not yet completely adjusted ourselves to the machine age. The solution of our problems does not lie in destroying but in mastering the machine.


Innumerable activities still performed by human hands today will be performed by automatons. At this very moment scientists working in the laboratories of American universities are attempting to create what has been described as a '''thinking machine.''' I anticipated this development.


I actually constructed '''robots.''' Today the robot is an accepted fact, but the principle has not been pushed far enough. In the twenty-first century the robot will take the place which slave labor occupied in ancient civilization. There is no reason at all why most of this should not come to pass in less than a century, treeing mankind to pursue its higher aspirations.


🐇 And unless mankind's attention is too violently diverted by external wars and internal revolutions, there is no reason why the electric millennium should not begin in a few decades.'''
______








       🗞️ TESLA IS PROVIDER 🗞️
         OF PIGEON RELIEF 🐇
               ———
    Inventor Revealed as Person
     Who Hires Messenger Boy
    to Feed 3 Flocks in City
               ———
      FORMERLY DID IT HIMSELF
               ———
    Nearing 81, He Now Finds It
     More Convenient to Engage
        Proxy for the Task
               ———
            by unknown
          New York Times
          May 1st, 1937

A red-headed boy in a Western Union uniform walked along the promenade in front of the Public Library on Fifth Avenue at Forty-second Street yesterday afternoon carrying a good-sized paper bag about which a flock of pigeons fluttered. He was doing a mission for Nikola Tesla, the famous inventor.

Mr. Tesla, at his apartment in the Hotel New Yorker, was reluctant to talk about the pigeons. Asked if it was he who had paid to have the boy feed them twice a day since last Fall, he replied:

'''Yes, I take care of them all the time.'''

He has been Interested in pigeons for seventy-five years, since he was a small boy in his native village in Austrian Croatia. He will celebrate his eighty-first birthday on July 10.

The messenger, John Lucan, has become well known to the pigeons, and they fly to meet him as he walks to the feeding place in front of the south fountain, about 10 A. M. and 3:30 P. M. every day. He looks out for any that fall ill, and sees to it that they have their share of the five pounds of corn he distributes at a feeding. Mr. Tesla used to do this himself, but lately he has found it more convenient to send the boy.

During the Winter, and until the water in the fountains is turned on, Johnny has kept a small bath for the pigeons. Sometimes he has had to break ice off it, but it has always been there, in the south fountain, where the birds came to expect it. Johnny also feeds pigeons at St. Patrick's Cathedral, and in Bryant Park, back of the library.

Mr. Tesla's commission is only one of many novel sorts carried out by the boys of the telegraph companies. For example, some of the boys have developed a technique for rice-throwing at weddings. When a couple having only few friends in the city gets married, messengers with the proper experience may be hired to throw the rice at the right velocity to lend a sentimental touch while avoiding injury to the participants.

For several months a boy called every morning to chat with an elderly woman who felt that she needed some one to stimulate her interest in current events. He managed to find enough topics of conversation to keep the assignment going for a considerable time.

Other boys have taken children to theaters, demonstrated new articles to shopkeepers, climbed trees to rescue pet cats or birds, and minded offices while their proprietors went to lunch.
______








*** PREPARED STATEMENT BY NIKOLA TESLA ***
(Prior to interviews with the press on his 81st birthday observance.)
July 10, 1937 

'''At the close of 1889,
 having worked one year in the shops of George Westinghouse, Pittsburgh, I experienced so great a longing for resuming my interrupted investigations that, notwithstanding a very tempting proposition by him, I left for New York to take up my laboratory work, But owing to pressing demands by several foreign scientific societies I made a trip to Europe where I lectured before the Institution of Electrical Engineers and Royal Institution of London and the Societe de Physique in Paris. After this and a brief visit to my home in Yugoslavia I returned to this country in 1892 eager to devote myself to the subject of predilection on my thoughts: the study of the universe.


During the succeeding two years of intense concentration
I was fortunate enough to make two far-reaching discoveries. The first was a dynamic theory of gravity, which I have worked out in all details and hope to give to the world very soon. It explains the causes of this force and the motions of heavenly bodies under its influence so satisfactorily that it will put an end to idle speculations and false conceptions, as that of curved space. According to the relativists, space has a tendency to curvature owing to an inherent property or presence of celestial bodies. Granting a semblance of reality to this fantastic idea, it is still self-contradictory. Every action is accompanied by an equivalent reaction and the effects of the latter are directly opposite to those of the former. Supposing that the bodies act upon the surrounding space causing curvature of the same, it appears to my simple mind that the curved spaces must react on the bodies and, producing the opposite effects, straighten out the curves. Since action and reaction are coexistent, it follows that the supposed curvature of space is entirely impossible. But even if it existed it would not explain the motions of the bodies as observed. Only the existence of a field of force can account for them and its assumption dispenses with space curvature. All literature on this subject is futile and destined to oblivion. So are also all attempts to explain the workings of the universe without recognizing the existence of the ether and the indispensable function it plays in the phenomena.


My second discovery was a physical truth of the greatest importance.
🐇 As I have searched the scientific records in  more than half dozen languages for a long time without finding the least anticipation, I consider myself the original discoverer of this truth, which can be expressed by the statement: There is no energy in matter other than that received from the environment. On my 79th birthday I made a brief reference to it, but its meaning and significance have become clearer to me since then. I applies rigorously to molecules and atoms as well as the largest heav-enly bodies, and to all matter in the universe in any phase of its existence from it: very formation to its ultimate disintegration.


Being perfectly satisfied that all energy in matter is drawn from the environment,
it was quite natural that when radioactivity was discovered in 1896, I immediately started a search for the external agent which caused it. The existence of radioactivity was positive proof of the existence of external rays. I had previously investigated various terrestrial disturbances affecting wireless circuits but none of them or any others emanating from the earth could produce a steady sustained action and I was driven to the conclusion that the activating rays were of cosmic origin. This fact I announced in my papers on Roentgen rays and Radiations contributed to the Electrical Review of New York, in 1897. However, as radioactivity was observed equally well in other widely separated parts of the world, it was obvious that the rays must be impinging on the earth from all directions. Now, of all bodies in the Cosmos, our sun was most likely to furnish a clue as to their origin and character. Before the electron theory was advanced, I had established that radioactive rays consisted of particles of primary matter not further decomposable, and the first question to answer was whether the sun is charged to a sufficiently high potential to produce the effects noted. This called for a prolonged investigation which culminated in my finding that the sun's potential was 216 billions of volts and that all such large and hot heavenly bodies emit cosmic rays. Through further solar research and observation of Novae this has been proved conclusively, and to deny it would be like denying the light and heat of the sun. Nevertheless, there are still some doubters who prefer to shroud the cosmic rays in deep mystery. I am sure that this is not true for there is no place where such a process occurs in this or any other universe beyond our ken.


A few words will be sufficient in support of this contention.
The kinetic and potential energy of a body is the result of motion and determined by the product of its mass and the square of velocity. Let the mass be reduced, the energy is diminished in the same proportion. If it be reduced to zero the energy is likewise zero for any finite velocity. In other words, it is absolutely impossible to convert mass into energy. It would be different if there were forces in nature capable of imparting to a mass infinite velocity. Then the product of zero mass with the square of infinite velocity would represent infinite energy. But we know that there are no such forces and the idea that mass is convertible into energy is rank nonsense.


While the origin and character of the rays observed near the earth's surface are sufficiently well ascertained, the so-called cosmic rays observed at great altitudes presented a riddle for more than 26 years, chiefly because it was found that they increased with altitude at a rapid rate. My investigations have brought out the astonishing fact that the effects at high altitudes are of an entirely different nature, having no relation whatever to cosmic rays. These are particles of matter projected from celestial bodies at very high temperature and charged to enormous electrical potentials. The effects at great elevations, on the other hand, are due to waves of extremely small lengths produced by the sun in a certain region in the atmosphere. This is the discovery which I wish to make known. The process involved in the generation of the waves is the following: The sun projects charged particles constituting an electric current which passes through a conducting stratum of the atmosphere approximately 10 kilometers thick enveloping the earth. This is a transmission of energy exactly as I illustrated in my experimental lectures in which one end of a wire is connected to an electric generator of high potential, its other end being free. In this case the generator is represented by the sun and the wire by the conducting air. The passage of the solar current involves the transference of electric charges from particle to particle with the speed of light, thus resulting in the production of extremely short and penetrating waves. As the air stratum mentioned is the source of the waves it follows that the so-called cosmic rays observed at great altitudes must increase as this stratum is approached.

My researches and calculations have brought to light the following facts in this connection:


(1) the intensity of the so-called cosmic rays must be greatest in the 🐇zenithal portion of atmosphere;


(2) the intensity should increase more and more rapidly up to an elevation of about 20 kilometers where the conducting air stratum begins;

(3) from there on the intensity should fall, first slowly and then more rapidly, to an insignificant value at an altitude of about 30 kilometers;


(4) the display of high potential must occur on the free end of the terrestrial wire, that is to say, on the side turned away from the sun. The current from the latter is supplied at a pressure of about 216 billion volts and there is a difference of 2 billion volts between the illuminated and the dark side of the globe. The energy of this current is so great that it readily accounts for the aurora and other phenomena observed in the atmosphere and at the earth's surface.


For the time being I must content myself with the announcement of the salient facts, but in due course I expect to be able to give more or less accurate technical data relating to all particulars of this discovery.

To go to another subject, I have devoted much of my time during the year to the perfecting of a new small and compact apparatus by which energy in considerable amounts can now be flashed through interstellar space to any distance without the slightest dispersion, I had in mind to confer with my friend George E. Hale, the great astronomer and solar expert, regarding the possible use of this invention in connection with his own researches. In the meantime, however, I am expecting to put before the Institute of France an accurate description of the devices with data and calculations and claim the Pierre Guzman Prize of 100,000 francs for means of communication with other worlds, feeling perfectly sure that it will be awarded to me. The money, of course, is a trifling consideration, but for the great historical honor of being the first to achieve this miracle I would be almost willing to give my life.

My most important invention from a practical point of view is a new form of tube with apparatus for its operation. In 1896 I brought out a high potential targetless tube which I operated successfully with potentials up to 4 million volts from '96 to '98. This device was adopted by many imitators and with slight modifications it is employed even now in all research laboratories and scientific institutions here and in other countries, and virtually all atomic investigations are carried on with it. At a later period I managed to produce very much higher potentials up to 18 million volts, and then I encountered unsurmountable difficulties which convinced me that it was necessary to invent an entirely different form of tube in order to carry out successfully certain ideas I had conceived. This task I found far more difficult than I had expected, not so much in the construction as in the operation of the tube. For many years I was baffled in my efforts, although I made a steady slow progress. Finally though, I was rewarded with complete success and I produced a tube which it will be hard to improve further. It is of ideal simplicity, not subject to wear and can be operated at any potential, however high, that can be produced. It will carry heavy currents, transform any amount of energy within practical limits, and it permits easy control and regulation of the same. I expect that this invention, when it becomes known, will be universally adopted in preference to other forms of tubes, and that it will be the means of obtaining results undreamed of before. Among others, it will enable the production of cheap radium substitutes in any desired quantity and will be, in general, immensely more effective in the smashing of atoms and the transmutation of matter. I am hopeful that it will be possible by its use to carry out a process in which there should be no misses whatever, but only hits. However, this tube will not open up a way to utilize atomic or subatomic energy for power purposes. According to the physical truth I have discovered there is no available energy in atomic structure, and even if there were any, the input will always greatly exceed the output, precluding profitable, practical use of the liberated energy.

Some papers have reported that I had promised to give a full description of my tube and its accessories on the present occasion. This has caused me a considerable annoyance-as, owing to some obligations I have undertaken regarding the application of the tube for important purposes, I am unable to make a complete disclosure now. But as soon as I am relieved of these obligations a technical description of the device and of all the apparatus will be given to scientific institutions.


There is one more discovery which I want to announce at this time, consisting of a new method and apparatus for the obtainment of vacua exceeding many times the highest heretofore realized. I think that as much as one-billionth of a micron can be attained. What may be accomplished by means of such vacua is a matter of conjecture, but it is obvious that they will make possible the production of much more intense effects in electron tubes. My ideas regarding the electron are at variance with those generally entertained. I hold that it is a relatively large body carrying a surface charge and not an elementary unit. When such an electron leaves an electrode of extremely high potential and in very high vacuum, it carries an electrostatic charge many times greater than the normal. This may astonish some of those who think that the particle has the same charge in the tube and outside of it in the air. A beautiful and instructive experiment has been contrived by me showing that such is not the case, for as soon as the particle gets out into the atmosphere it becomes a blazing star owing to the escape of the excess charge. The great quantity of electricity stored on the particle is responsible for the difficulties encountered in the operation of certain tubes and the rapid deterioration of the same.


Nikola Tesla'''
______








🗞️ TESLA IS 80 TODAY 🗞️
by Nikola Tesla
New York Sun, The
July 10th, 1937 Page number(s): ?
______








🗞️ SENDING OF MESSAGES TO PLANETS PREDICTED BY DR. TESLA ON BIRTHDAY 🗞️
New York Times, The
July 11th, 1937 Page number(s): 13

Inventor, 81, Talks of Key to Interstellar Transmission and Tube to Produce Radium Copiously and Cheaply — Decorated by Yugoslavia and Czechoslovakia

Fig.

Nikola Tesla, at left, receiving the Order of the White Lion from Vladimir Hurban, Minister from Czechoslovakia at the luncheon for the former yesterday.

Reports of discoveries by which it will be possible to communicate with the planets and to produce radium in unlimited quantity for $1 a pound were announced by Dr. Nikola Tesla yesterday at a luncheon on his eighty-first birthday at which he wee[sic?] honored with high orders from the Yugoslav and Czechoslovak Governments.


Dr. Tesla, whose discoveries in electrical science have won for him recognition as the father of modern methods of generating and distributing electrical energy, asserted his '''absolute''' belief that he would win the Pierre Guzman prize of the Institute of France for his discovery relating to the interstellar transmission of energy.


Following his annual custom, Dr. Tesla played host to a group of newspaper men at his birthday luncheon at the Hotel New Yorker and issued the announcement of his discoveries of the last year. No apparatus or sketches were shown, but Dr. Tesla said in announcing perfection of the principle of a new tube, which he said would make it possible to smash the atom and produce cheap radium, that he would be able to give a demonstration in '''only a little time.'''


Guests at Dr. Tesla's luncheon included Constantin Fotitch, Minister from Yugoslavia Vladimir Hurban, Minister from Czechoslovakia; R. Petrovich, first secretary of the Yugoslav delevation; B. P. Stoyanovitch, Yugoslav Consul General in New York; Dr. J. Nemeck, Counselor of the Czechoslav Legation, and J. Hajny, Acting Consul General in New York for Czechoslovakia.

Presenting to Dr. Tesla the Grand Cordon of the White Eagle, highest order of Yugoslavia, Mr. Fotitch announced it was the first time the order had been granted to an American for civil accomplishments. The honor was bestowed by order of Ring Peter through the Regent, Prince Paul.

    Dr. Tesla Predicts Linking Planets
Dr. Tesla's career has been an inspiration to the youth of his native country, the Minister said. Evidently referring to Dr. Tesla's report several years ago of inventing a '''death beam''' for use as a defense weapon, the Minister said:


“All your efforts are directed to find a way, by means of some new magic invention of yours, by which you will check and render futile as much as possible all those inventions which men have invented to destroy mutually one another. You feel, as we all feel in your old country, that the world has seen enough of horror and that after so many examples of heroism displayed in the Great War, humanity has found a better way only in peace.”


Mr. Hurban, presenting the Grand Gordon of the White Lion, which has been granted to such other distinguished Americans as Secretary Kellogg, Elihu Root and Dr. Nicholas Murray Butler, said “our Czechoslovak nation's brotherly feeling toward you as a son of Yugoslavia made it a duty, not a privilege, to give you this decoration in the name of the President of our nation. Dr. Edward Benes.” He also presented a diploma certifying Dr. Tesla's honorary degree as a doctor of the University of Prague.

    Outlines His Discoveries
Dr. Tesla, in responding, said he considered Czechoslovakia '''one of the most enlightened countries in the world.'''


In a ten-page typewritten statement outlining his discoveries, Dr. Tesla gave a resume of his work in the fields of gravity and cosmic rays. Asserting that '''the so-called cosmic rays observed at great altitudes presented a riddle for more than twenty-six years chiefly because it was found that they increased with altitude at a rapid rate.''' Dr. Tesla said he had discovered '''the astonishing fact that the effects at high altitudes are of an entirely different nature, having no relation whatever to cosmic rays.'''


He gave a detailed technical description of his conclusions from research and calculations concerning the cosmic ray, and continued:

'''For the time being, I must content myself with the announcement of the salient facts, but in due course I expect to be able to give more or less accurate technical data relating to all particulars of this discovery.'''


    Digressing from his prepared statement, he said:

'''I am proud of these discoveries, because many have denied that I am the original discoverer of the cosmic ray. I was fifteen years ahead of other fellows who were asleep. Now no one can take away from me the credit of being the first discoverer of the cosmic ray on earth.'''


Dr. Tesla's audience stirred as he took up the next phase of his discoveries.

'''I have devoted much of my time during the year past,''' he said, '''to the perfecting of a new small and compact apparatus by which energy in considerable amounts can now be flashed through interstellar space to any distance without the slightest dispersion.'''


    To Claim French Award
Explaining that he did not refer to his '''universal peace discovery,''' Dr. Tesla continued:

'''I am expecting to put before the Institute of France an accurate description of the devices with data and calculations and claim the Pierre Guzman prize of 100,000 francs for means of communication with other worlds, feeling perfectly sure that it will be awarded to me. The money, of course, is a trifling consideration, but for the great historical honor of being the first to achieve this miracle I would be almost willing to give my life.

'''I am just as sure that prize will be awarded to me as if I already had it in my pocket. They have got to do it. It means it will be possible to convey several thousand units of horsepower to other planets, regardless of the distance. This discovery of mine will be remembered when everything else I have done, is covered with 🐇dust.'''

Reporters questioned Dr. Tesla closely on his report of an interplanetary communication system. He said he had been working in several laboratories, but refused to disclose where they were. Asked if he had a working model of the apparatus, he said, '''it employs more than three dozen of my inventions; it is a complex apparatus, an agglomeration of parts.'''


'''It is absolutely developed,''' he declared. '''I wouldn't be any surer that I can transmit energy 100 miles that I am of the fact that I can transmit energy 1,000,000 miles 🐇up.'''


A 🐇 different kind of energy than is commonly employed must be used, however, he said, explaining further that '''you must realize it travels through a channel of less than one-half of one-millionth of a centimeter.'''


'''I could undertake a contract to manufacture the apparatus,''' he asserted.

Dr. Tesla declared that '''life on other planets is an infinite probability, a certitude.''' A difficulty in using his apparatus, he said, would lie in hitting other moving planets with '''the needle-point of tremendous energy,''' but astronomers could help solve this problem.

The point of energy could be aimed at the moon and '''we very easily could see the effects, see the splash and the volatilization of matter.''' He also pictured the possibility of advanced thinkers living on other planets and also experimenting in this field, but mistaking the Tesla energy rays 🐇 for some form of cosmic rays.


    Dr. Tesla provoked a new stir with his next announcement.
'''My most important invention from a practical point of view,''' he said, '''is a new form of tube with apparatus for its operation.'''

    Reports Tube of New Type
Recalling experiments with other tubes, he said he had been '''rewarded with complete success''' and had '''produced a tube which it will be hard to improve further.'''


'''It is of ideal simplicity,''' he said, '''not subject to wear and can be operated at any potential, however high — even 100,000,000 volts — that can be produced. It will carry heavy currents, transform any amount of energy within practical limits and it permits easy control and regulation of the same.

'''I expect that this invention, when it becomes known, will be universally adopted in preference to other form of tubes and that it will be the means of obtaining results undreamed of before.


'''Among others, it will enable the production of cheap radium substitutes in any desired quantity and will be, in general, immediately more effective in the smashing of atoms and the transmutation of matter. However, this tube will not open up a way to utilize atomic or subatomic energy for power purposes.'''

'''It will cheapen radium so,''' Dr. Tesla added, '''that it will be just a cheap — well, it will get down to $1 a pound, in any quantity.'''


Expressing '''annoyance''' that some newspapers had indicated he would '''give a full description''' of his atom-smashing tube at yesterday's luncheon, Dr. Tesla said he was bound by financial obligations '''involving vast sums of money''' against releasing this information.

'''But it is not an experiment,''' he declared. '''I have built, demonstrated and used it. Only a little time will pass before I can give it to the world.'''


A final discovery announced by Dr. Tesla involved a new method and apparatus for further perfection of vacuum tubes.

'''What may be accomplished by means of such vacua is a matter of conjecture, but it is obvious that they will make possible the production of much more intense effects in electron tubes.''' he said.


Before and during the luncheon, Dr. Tesla entertained his guests with colorful personal reminiscences and observations including his opinions on dieting and immortality.
______




🗞️ TESLA HAS PLANS TO SIGNAL MARS 🗞️
by Nikola Tesla
New York Sun, The
July 12th, 1937 Page number(s): ?

Figuratively, at least, they are still smacking their lips today over the food and wines and speculating about what may come from the discoveries the scientist announced, his quest for the French Academy prize for interplanetary communication, the perfection of a tube to carry immense electrical voltages, and some of the more abstract observations regarding cosmic rays and what makes this universe of ours expand and contract, oscillating instead of always expanding as some physicists hold.

🐇

Considering his years and the fact that recently he was the victim of an automobile accident which shook his system seriously, Dr. Tesla is exceedingly vigorous. His thinning hair, although predominantly white, still has considerable black. His eyes are as keen and penetrating as ever. He speaks distinctly although, of course, with a bit of the accent he has always had. But he picked up questions quickly and answered them in a manner that showed a tremendous grasp of all the latest theories of the astronomers, physicists and other scientists.
______
ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ ㅤ







     🗞️ DR. TESLA'S HONORS 🗞️
  To the New York Herald Tribune:
         by Nikola Tesla
     New York Herald Tribune
July 27th, 1937 Page number(s): 147

I have been a reader of your excellent paper for more than fifty years and feel much obliged to you for the pleasure and enlightenment derived from its perusal. Many of your admirable editorials are on my files. Under these circumstances it is unfortunate that your issue of Sunday, July 11, contained a report very injurious to me.

The particularly damaging statement is: "The decorations made very little impression on Dr. Tesla. '''They mean nothing — take them away,''' said Dr. Tesla."

I should say that the expression on my face in the photograph accompanying the report, would be sufficient to disprove the above assertion. When it became necessary to clear the table I was very anxious that the precious objects be placed in safe hands and requested my old friend, George Scherff, auditor of the Union Sulphur Company, who was one of the honored guests, to take care of them. Moreover, as soon as I was free, I cabled His Royal Highness Prince Regent Paul of Yugoslavia and to His Excellency Dr. Eduard Benes, President of Czechoslovakia, expressing my profound gratitude for the rare distinctions conferred upon me and my great pride of possessing them. It was desirable to show in the photograph the Yugoslav Minister handing me the order of the White Eagle but His Excellency Konstantin Fotitch, besides being a master in diplomacy, is a man of commanding stature in other respects, and he did not insist. However, a more charming dignitary than Dr. Vladimir Hurban, Minister of Czechoslovakia, could not be imagined.
______








🗞️ IN THE REALM OF SCIENCE: TESLA, WHO PREDICTED RADIO, NOW LOOKS FORWARD TO SENDING WAVES TO THE MOON 🗞️
by John J. O'Neill
New York Herald Tribune
August 22nd, 1937

The failure of forecasters to predict the results of scientific discoveries, particularly with respect to their social and economic significance, was emphasized in the recent report on technical trends and their social implications submitted to President Roosevelt by the National Resources Committee. One of the outstanding oversights was radio broadcasting. None of the previewers of coming events saw this development of radio communication.

With this as justification, some attention might be given to the recent announcement by Nikola Tesla, the inventor, whose mind has given us a great many of the major developments forming the foundation of our electrical age. Dr. Tesla seldom writes for publication, but back in 1900 he wrote an article for the June issue of “The Century Magazine,” which contained predictions that seemed at that time very fantastic. Those who may read it now will be amazed to find how many of the author's prophecies have proved true.

    Advance Seen Fantastic
Some of the advances described by him during the last few years as the result of his investigations may appear equally fantastic today, but one has only to know of Dr. Tesla's past performances in order to have faith that given time and money they could be made realities. Forty years ago he was playing with electrical discharges of many millions of volts, while today scientists have difficulty in developing a fraction of those potentials for their atom-smashing and x-ray experiments. Long before the days of Marconi, Tesla girdled the earth with giant electrical waves from his high voltage generators, and on the basis of this work predicted both the “transmission of intelligence without wires” and the “wireless transmission of power.” He controlled a vessel at a distance by wireless power forty years before the advent of our present-day manless aerial torpedoes.

🐇 '''They laughed at me in 1897 when I told them about the cosmic ray,” he said in a recent interview. “Fifty years ago they attempted to discredit my discovery of the rotating magnetic field and my system of power transmission by alternating currents. They called me crazy when I predicted the radio and when I sent the first impulse around the world they said it couldn't be done.'''

So with Tesla's latest discoveries and inventions. There may be many who are skeptical, but the world is moving forward rapidly and man is constantly doing things a short time before considered impossible. Forty years ago Tesla was predicting world-wide radio communications. Today this accomplishment is history. Now he is predicting interplanetary communication.

    Jovian Bolts His Aim
Dr. Tesla gave assurance that he did not mean just sending weak signals, but veritable Jovian bolts carrying energy of several thousand horsepower which would be able to produce tremendous effects at the receiving end, even though it be infinitely remote. A test of this invention could be made most advantageously on our nearest heavenly neighbor, the moon. Sufficient energy, he said, could be transmitted to render a small spot on its surface incandescent so that it could be easily observed from the earth.

This is a further extension of the announcement previously made by Dr. Tesla that he would be able to transmit over a beam of not more than one hundred thousandths of a square centimeter in cross section adequate amounts of energy for operating all kinds of machinery at distances limited only by the earth's curvature. Such a beam, he pointed out, could be used not only for constructive but also destructive purposes as annihilating military forces or aerial fleets.

While Dr. Tesla is keeping a deep secret of the mechanism by which he plans to provide unlimited energy, it is apparent he is bent on using natural forces that operate on a vast scale. To be specific, it seems that the energy is coming to us in the form of cosmic rays, but Tesla's theory of these rays is different from those of Dr. Robert A. Millikan or Dr. Karl T. Compton.

He formulated his theory in 1897 when he sought to explain the production of the phenomena of radio activity by some other means than atomic explosions. 🐇 He held that all energy an atom exhibits is received from its environment and does not come from itself. Accordingly, he explained radio activity as a result of the shattering of atoms by sub-atomic cosmic particles. Whence did they come? was the question.

'''Now, of all bodies in the cosmos,''' states Dr. Tesla, '''our sun was the most likely to furnish a clue as to their origin and character. Before the electron theory was advanced, I had established that radio-active rays consisted of particles of primary matter not further decomposable, and the first thing to find out was whether the sun is charged to a sufficiently high potential to produce the effects noted. This called for a prolonged investigation which culminated in my discovery that the sun's potential was 216,000,000,000 volts and that all such large and hot bodies emit cosmic rays.'''

    Puzzle of Mystery Rays
'''While the origin and character of the rays observed near the earth's surface had thus been sufficiently well ascertained, the so-called cosmic rays observed at great altitudes presented a riddle for more than twenty-six years, chiefly because it was found they increased with the height at a rapid rate. My investigations brought out the astonishing fact that the effects at high altitude are of an entirely different nature, having no relation whatever to cosmic rays. These are particles from celestial bodies at very high temperatures and charged to enormous electrical potentials.'''

🐇 It might be remarked parenthetically that Dr. Tesla does not accept the concept of the electron presented by physicists as an elementary unit and carrying a unit charge of electricity. He holds that the electron in a well-exhausted tube operated at high potential carries many multiples of this unit charge. The ignorance of this fact is responsible for many errors and fallacies in various scientific investigations.

'''The effects at great elevations,''' Dr. Tesla continued, '''are due to waves of extremely small lengths produced by the sun in a certain region of the atmosphere. This is the discovery I wish to make known. The process involved in the generation of the waves is the following: The sun projects charged particles constituting an electric current which passes through a conducting stratum of the atmosphere approximately ten kilometers (six miles) thick enveloping the earth. This is a transmission of electrical energy exactly as I illustrated in my experimental lecture in which one end of a wire is connected to an electric generator of high potential, its other end being free. In this case the generator is represented by the sun and the wire by the conducting air.'''

    Production of the Waves
'''The passage of solar current involves the transference of electric charges from particle to particle with the speed of light, resulting in the production of extremely short and penetrating waves. As the air stratum mentioned is the source of the waves it follows that the so-called cosmic rays observed at great altitude must increase as this stratum is approached.'''

Another of the Tesla inventions is a radically new tube which is indestructible and can handle heavy currents up to any voltage that can be produced, even 100,000,000 volts. It will be useful, he promises, in the production of cheap radium substitutes and in the transformation of matter. Still another invention consists in means for the production of a practically perfect vacuum of the order of 1,000,000,000th of a micron.

While Dr. Tesla does not say so, it is assumed that these latter inventions are parts of the system which he would use in the transmission of energy to the moon or other planets. Such an application would be spectacular, but the inventions when described and made public would have applications of more immediate practical value 🐇 in industrial operations.

He was honored on his birthday by the bestowal of the highest distinctions within the power of Yugoslavia and Czechoslovakia, which recognition touched him deeply all the more as Konstantin Fotitch and Vladimir Hurban, ministers of these countries, came from Washington especially for the occasion. Dr. Tesla is now eighty-one and works continuously at his investigations. He has not been halted even by a recent accident in which he was knocked down by a taxicab. It merely caused the customary bruises and upset the digestion a bit, he said.
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘3️⃣8️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '38

📷 Fig. 1,2,3,4: Tesla at Westinghouse Electric & Manufacturing Companies May 10th, 1938 induction motor 50th anniversary celebration.








*** INSTITUTE OF IMMIGRANT WELFARE SPEECH ***
by Nikola Tesla, read in absentia
Hotel Baltimore, New York City NY
May 11th, 1938

'''Mr. Chairman, Members of the Institute of Immigrant Welfare, Ladies and Gentlemen:

I can not find words to express adequately my keen regret for being unable to receive, in person, the high distinction which the Institute of Immigrant Welfare has conferred upon me. Although my recovery from injuries sustained in an automobile accident six months ago is almost complete, I do not feel equal to the task of appearing in public and meeting the obligations which this would impose upon me.

My coming to this country was a great adventure - every detail of which is still vivid in my memory.
Early in 1884, while employed by a French Company in Paris, I made important improvements in dynamos and motors and was engaged by the Edison interests in New York to design and construct similar machines for them.
It had been the height of my ambition and my most ardent wish to come in contact with Edison and see America.


🐇 Accordingly, I undertook the voyage and after losing my money and tickets and passing through a series of mishaps, including a mutiny in which I nearly lost my life, I landed on these blessed shores with four cents in my pocket.


My first intention was to look up a close American friend before going to the Edison establishment.

On my way uptown I came to a small machine shop in which the foreman was trying to repair an electric machine of European make.
He had just given up the task as hopeless and I undertook to put it in order without a thought of compensation.
It was not easy but I finally had it in perfect running condition.
I was astonished when he gave me twenty dollars and wished that I had come to America years before.


The next day I was thrilled to the marrow by meeting Edison who began my American education right then and there.
I wanted to have my shoes shined, something I considered below my dignity.
🐇 Edison said: "Tesla, you will shine the shoes yourself and like it."
He impressed me tremendously. I shined my shoes and liked it.


I began the work for which I was engaged immediately and after nine months of strenuous effort I fulfilled my contract rigorously.
The manager had promised me fifty thousand dollars but when I demanded payment, he merely laughed.


🐇 "You are still a Parisian," remarked Edison, "when you become a full-fledged American you will appreciate an American joke."


I felt deeply hurt as I had expected to use the money in the development of my alternating system and when some people proposed to form a company under my name, I accepted eagerly.
Here was the opportunity I had vainly sought for years but my new friends were adamant in their resolve not to have anything to do with the worthless alternating currents which Edison condemned as deadly.

They desired an arc light system and I had to comply with their request though the delay of my cherished plans was agonizing.
In one year of day and night application, I managed to perfect the system which was adopted for lighting the city and some factories in the neighborhood.

Then came the hardest blow I ever received. Through some local influences, I was forced out of the company losing not only all my interest but also my reputation as engineer and inventor.
After that I lived through a year of terrible heartaches and bitter tears, my suffering being intensified by material want. Very often I was compelled to work as a laborer and my high education in various branches of science, mechanics and literature seemed to me like a mockery.

Finally, I had the good fortune of meeting two capable and honest men who listened to me and came to my assistance. They organized a company, provided a laboratory and gave me a modest but sure financial support.
I perfected my motors quickly having nothing else to do except to carry out plans I had formed years before.

Pty inventions proved a success and attracted the attention of George Westinghouse. He was, in my opinion; the only man on this globe who could take my alternating system under the circumstances then existing and win the battle against prejudice and money power.
He was a pioneer of imposing stature, one of the world's true noblemen of whom America may well be proud and to whom humanity owes an immense debt of gratitude.


I have to add that in all my troubles I did not neglect to declare my intention of becoming a citizen of this glorious country and in due course I secured my papers making me a proud and happy man.


Nikola Tesla'''
______








🗞️ IMMIGRANT SOCIETY MAKES 3 AWARDS; FRANKFURTER, MARTINELLI AND TESLA SIGNALIZED FOR THEIR CONTRIBUTIONS TO U.S. 🗞️
New York Times, The
May 12, 1938

Felix Frankfurter of the Harvard Law School, Giovanni Martinelli, Metropolitan Opera tenor, and Nikola Tesla, electrical scientist, received scrolls of honor last night from the-National Institute of Immigrant Welfare as "distinguished citizens of foreign birth who have made significant contributions to American life."
______








🗞️ DR. TESLA, 82 TODAY, POSTPONES PARTY 🗞️
New York Times, The
July 10th, 1938


Wants to Finish Therapeutic Device Which He Calls Boon for Newspaper Offices


For the first time in a number of years, Dr. Nikola Tesla, scientist and inventor, who is 82 years old today, is postponing his annual birthday party for the press so he may complete a mechanical therapeutic device for public demonstration.

Dr. Tesla said yesterday he hopes to have his apparatus completed within two weeks, and then will give a demonstration to the press.

For the last forty years Dr. Tesla has been the storm center of scientific controversy. Recognized in the early part of his career as the father of modern methods of generating and distributing electrical energy, and pre-dating even Marconi in his experiments with wireless, Dr. Tesla has been decorated by many governments for his accomplishments. In recent years, however, it has been his custom to announce at his annual parties the perfection of inventions which some scientists have challenged as fantastic.

The therapeutic device, Dr. Tesla said yesterday, is an improvement of an invention he perfected many years ago before his famous laboratory burned, about 1895. He said it will cure many internal disorders. He used it to advantage on his friend, Mark Twain, Dr. Tesla said.


🐇 '''One of these devices in every newspaper office and the proverbial 'editorial grouch' will be gone,''' the inventor predicted.


He also expects to announce this year the perfection of another invention — outside of the field of electricity — that '''will benefit the $1,000,000,000-a-year poultry industry,''' Dr. Tesla said. It will improve the size, quality and quantity of eggs and chickens, he stated.


Dr. Tesla lives on the thirty-third floor of Hotel New Yorker, where, in one large room crowded with plans, boxes and technical references, he conducts his experiments and research.
______








             🗞️ The 🗞️
             HUMAN SIDE
               OF THE
                NEWS
           BY EDWIN C. HILL
                ———————
      The Lethbridge Weekly Herald
     July 16th, 1938 Page number(s): ?
             ——————————————
Greatest Living American Inventor Working On
Invention of Death Ray, With Which He
Hopes to Be Able to Put a Stop to Wars
______








📰 REFERENCE TO COMPASS IN 13TH CENTURY POEM 📰
by Nikola Tesla
Science News Letter
October 8th, 1938 Page number(s): 238

Among the oldest references to the mariner's compass is a passage in a poem by a little known French writer, Guyot de Provins, who wrote early in the thirteenth century. I first came upon this reference many years ago, during a period of omnivorous reading while I was convalescing from a nearly fatal attack of cholera morbus.

Among the many books I received there was a large volume of citations, gems of literature of all nations in a dozen languages, which aroused my special interest. Most of the excerpts from famous works, in verse or prose, collected by the author, impressed me so strongly by their beauty of thought and expression that even now I can recite many of them without a miss.

It was in this volume that I found the reference to the compass mentioned in the introduction. It was credited to Guyot de Provins, a French poet of the twelfth and thirteenth centuries, and, if my memory serves me well, worded as follows:

“Quand la mer est obscure et brune
Qu'on ne voit ni etoile ni lune
Donc font l'aiguille allumer,
Puis n'ont garde de s'egarer
Contre l'etoile va la pointe.”

I translate freely:

'''When gloomy darkness hides the sea
And one no star and moon can see
They turn on the needle the light,
Then from the straying they have no fright
For the needle points to the star.'''

🐇 As a rule, medieval records do not commend themselves for clarity; in fact, not a few are of very small value to the searcher. It is therefore remarkable that this ancient reference to the compass should be so strikingly clear and explicit.

After reading Guyot's verses one is impelled by the wish to know something more about him. With this intention I tried to obtain information from the New York Public Library but his name was not mentioned in any of the catalogues. I then made a thorough examination of the General Index, which was equally unsuccessful, but found a brief notice in the Grande Encyclopedie Francaise.

This item being of unusual interest I have an English translation:

Guyot de Provins, French poet, towards 1200. Undoubtedly, after being a minstrel and going, perhaps to Jerusalem, he became a Benedictine in Clairvaux and later in Cluny. He composed between 1203 and 1208, in a style lively and original, but harsh and hard, a satirical work consisting of 2691 octosyllabic verses, which he entitled “Bible,” probably to indicate that he intended to say only what is true, and in which he passed in review almost the whole contemporary society. Especially noteworthy is his criticism of the Pope, expressed with great independence, and that of the high clergy and physicians, and a number of passages in which he argues that the compass was known in his time.
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘3️⃣9️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '39

        HOTEL NEW YORKER
             1939
*** A STORY OF YOUTH TOLD BY AGE ***
  Dedicated to Miss Pola Fotitch
          BY ITS AUTHOR
          NIKOLA TESLA

'''My dear Miss Fotitch:

Fig.1 
Illustration of Nikola Tesla with Macak, his cat, outside his childhood home.

I am forwarding to you the "Calendar of Yugoslavia" of 1939 showing the house and community in which I had many joyful and sad experiences and odd adventures and in which also, by a coincidence bizarre, I was born. As you may see from the photograph on the sheet for June, the old-fashioned building is located at the foot of a wooded hill called Bogdanic. Adjoining it is a church and behind it a little further up a graveyard. Our nearest neighbors were two miles away and in the winter, when the snow was six or seven feet deep, our isolation was complete.

My mother was indefatigable and worked regularly from four o'clock in the morning till eleven in the evening. From four to breakfast time, 6 A.M., while others slumbered, I never closed my eyes but watched my mother with intense pleasure as she attended quickly — sometimes running — to her many self-imposed duties. She directed the servants to take care of all domestic animals, milked the cows, performed all sorts of labor unassisted, set the table, prepared breakfast for the whole household and only when it was ready to be served did the rest of the family get up. After breakfast everybody followed by mother's inspiring example. All did their work diligently, liked it and so achieved a measure of contentment. But I was the happiest of them, the fountain of my enjoyment being our magnificent Mačak - the finest of all cats in the world. I wish that I could give you an adequate idea of the depth of affection which existed between me and him. You would look vainly in the mythological and historical records for such a case. We simply lived one for the other. Wherever I went Mačak followed primarily owing to our mutual love and then again moved by the desire to protect me. When such a necessity presented itself he would rise to twice his normal height, buckle his back and with the tail as rigid as a metal bar and whiskers like steel wires he would give vent to his rage by explosive puffs Pfftt! Pfftt! It was a terrifying sight and whatever provoked him, human being or animal, beat a hasty retreat.

Fig. 2
Illustration of Nikola Tesla's mother working in the kitchen.

In the evening we went through our usual program. I would run from the house along the church and he would rush after me and grab me by the trousers. He tried hard to make me believe that he would bite, but the instant his needle sharp incisors penetrated the clothing the pressure ceased and their contact with my skin was as gentle and tender as that of a butterfly alighting on a petal. He liked best to roll on the grass with me. While we were doing this he bit and clawed and purred in rapturous pleasure. He fascinated me so completely that I too bit and clawed and purred. We just could not stop and rolled and rolled and rolled and rolled in a delirium[sic?] of delight. We indulged in this enchanting sport day by day except on rainy weather. In respect to water Mačak was very fastidious. He would jump six feet to avoid wetting his paws. On such occasions we went into the house and, selecting a nice cosy[sic?] place, abandoned ourselves for each other in affectionate embracement. Mačak was scrupulously clean, had no fleas or bugs whatever, shed no hair and showed none of the objectionable traits and habits of cats as I knew them later. He was touchingly delicate in signifying his wish to be let out at night and scratched the door gently for readmittance.

Now I must tell you of a strange and unforgettable experience which bore fruit in my later life. Our home is about eighteen hundred feet above sea level and in the winter we had dry weather as a rule, but sometimes it happened that a warm wind from the Adriatic would blow persistently for a long time, melting rapidly the snow, flooding the land and causing great loss of property and life. We would then witness the terrifying spectacle of a mighty seething river carrying wreckage and tearing down everything moveable in its way. Since I often visualize the events of my youth to find relief from great and dangerous mental strain and when I think of the scene the roar of the waters fills my ears and I see as vividly as then, their tumultuous flow and the mad dance of the wreckage. This leaves me, for a while, sad and depressed. But always agreeable are my recollections of winter with its dry cold and snow of immaculate white.

Fig. 3
Illustration of Nikola Tesla with his cat, Mačak.

It happened that on the day of my experience we had a cold drier than ever observed before. People walking in the snow left a luminous trail behind them and a snowball thrown against an obstacle gave a flare of light like a loaf of sugar hit with a knife. It was dusk of the evening and I felt impelled to stroke Mačak's back. Mačak's back was a sheet of light and my hand produced a shower of sparks loud enough to be heard all over the place. My father was a very learned man, he had an answer for every question. But this phenomenon was new even to him. Well, he finally remarked, this is nothing but electricity, the same thing you see on the trees in a storm. My mother seemed alarmed. Stop playing with the cat, she said, he might start a fire. I was thinking abstractedly. Is nature a gigantic cat? If so, who strokes its back? It can only be God, I concluded. You may know that Pascal was an extraordinarily precocious child who attracted attention before he reached the age of six years. But here I was, only three years old, and already philosophizing!

I can not exaggerate the effect of this marvellous sight on my childish imagination. Day after day I asked myself what is electricity and found no answer. Eighty years have gone by since and I still ask the same question, unable to answer it. Some pseudo scientist of whom there are only too many may tell you that he can, but do not believe him. If any of them knew what it is I would also know and the chances are better than any of them for my laboratory and practical experiences are more extensive and my life covers three generations of scientific research.

Fig. 4
Illustration of Nikola Tesla and his cat, Mačak, watching a lightning storm.

My childhood in Mačak's delightful company and undying friendship would have passed blissfully if I did not have a powerful enemy, relentless and irreconcilable. This was our gander, a monstrous ugly brute, with a neck of an ostrich, mouth of a crocodile and a pair of cunning eyes radiating intelligence and understanding like the human. I aroused his ire by throwing pebbles at him, a most foolish and reckless act which I bitterly regretted afterwards. I liked to feed our pigeons, chickens, and other fowl, take one or the other under my arm and hug and pet it. But the brute would not let me. The moment I entered the poultry yard he would attack me and as I fled grab me by the seat of my trousers and shake me viciously. When I finally managed to free myself and run away he would flap his huge wings in glee and raise an unholy chatter in which all the geese joined. When I grew up two aunts of mine used to tell me how I answered certain questions they asked. One was Aunt Veva who had two protruding teeth like the tusks of an elephant. She loved me passionately and buried them deep in my cheek in kissing me. I cried out from pain but she thought it was from pleasure and dug them in still deeper. Nevertheless I preferred her to the other aunt whose name has slipped from my memory and she used to glue her lips to mine and suck and suck until by frantic efforts I managed to free myself gasping for breath. These two aunts amused themselves by asking me all sorts of questions of which I remember a few. Are you afraid of Luka Bogic? No! Luka always carried a gun and threatened to shoot. He robbed other boys of pennies and gave them to me. Are you afraid of the cow? No !' That was one of our cows and very nice until one day I slid from a fence on her back for a ride when she made off with me bellowing and threw me. I was none the worse for the experience. Are you afraid of the bad wolf? No! No! This was the wolf I met in the woods near the church. He was looking at me fixedly and approaching slowly. I shouted as usual when a wolf is around and he trotted away slowly. My present visualization of this scene is astonishingly sharp and clear. After a number of such questions one of the aunts asked me; Are you afraid of the gander? Yes! Yes! I replied emphatically, I am afraid of the gander! I had good reason to be. One summer day my mother had given me a rather cold bath and put me out for a sun warming in Adam's attire. When she stepped in the house the gander espied me and charged. The brute knew where it would hurt most and seized me by the nape almost pulling out the remnant of my umbilical cord. My mother, who came in time to prevent further injury, said to me: "You must know that you can not make peace with a gander or a cock whom you have taunted. 🐇 They will fight you as long as they live." But now and then I would play in the poultry yard to my heart's content for on certain days our geese, led by the gander, rose high in the air and flew down to the meadow and brook where they sported like swans in the water and probably found some food. I would then feed and pet the pigeons, the poultry and our grand resplendent[sic?] cock who liked me. In the evening the gander brought back his flock who made a few turns above the house and then came down with a deafening noise. The sight of the flying geese was a joy and inspiration to see.'''

(Ex post facto illustrations by Radomir Perica)
______








# CONCERNING THE EXISTENCE OF ALKALINE EARTH METALS RESULTING FROM NEUTRON IRRADIATION OF URANIUM #
by O. Hahn and F. Strassmann
Die Naturwissenschaften
January 1939 (27) Pages: 11-15
[Translation in American Journal of Physics, January 1964, Pages 9-15]

..."As chemists we really ought to revise the decay scheme given above and insert the symbols Ba, La, Ce, in place of Ra, Ac, Th. However as "nuclear chemists," working very close to the field of physics, we cannot bring ourselves yet to take such a drastic step which goes against all previous experience in nuclear physics. There could perhaps be a series of unusual coincidences which has given us false indications.

It is intended to carry out further tracer experiments with the new radioactive decay products. In particular a combined fractionation will be attempted, using the radium isotope resulting from fast neutron irradiation of thorium (investigated by Meitner, Strassmann, and Hahn) together with our alkaline earth metals resulting from uranium. At places where strong neutron sources are available, this project could actually be carried out much more easily."
______








      # New York Times, The #
        January 31st, 1939
           —————
         Vast Energy Freed
          by Uranium Atom
           —————
   Split, It Produces 2 `Cannon
   balls', Each of 🐇 100,000,000
             Electron Volts
            —————
 HAILED AS EPOCH MAKING
            —————
 New Process, Announced at
Columbia, Uses Only 1-🐇30 Volt
     to Liberate Big Force

“The splitting of a uranium atom into two parts, each consisting of a gigantic atomic 'cannonball' of the tremendous energy of 100,000,000 electron-volts, the greatest amount of atomic energy so far liberated by man on earth, was announced here yesterday by the Columbia University Department of Physics.”…
______








# PRODUCTS OF THE FISSION OF THE URANIUM NUCLEUS #
by Lise Meitner & O. R. Frisch
Nature
March 18, 1939 (143) Pages: 471-472

"Over the Christmas holiday, Meitner had a visit from her nephew, Otto Frisch, a physicist who worked in Copenhagen at Niels Bohr's institute. Meitner shared Hahn's letter with Frisch. They knew that Hahn was a good chemist and had not made a mistake, but the results didn't make sense. They went for a walk in the snow to talk about the matter, Frisch on skis, Meitner keeping up on foot. They stopped at a tree stump to do some calculations. Meitner suggested they view the nucleus like a liquid drop, following a model that had been proposed earlier by the Russian physicist George Gamow and then further promoted by Bohr. Frisch, who was better at visualizing things, drew diagrams showing how after being hit with a neutron, the uranium nucleus might, like a water drop, become elongated, then start to pinch in the middle, and finally split into two drops.

After the split, the two drops would be driven apart by their mutual electric repulsion at high energy, about 200 MeV, Frisch and Meitner figured. Where would the energy come from? Meitner determined that the two daughter nuclei together would be less massive than the original uranium nucleus by about one-fifth the mass of a proton, which, when plugged into Einstein's famous formula, E=mc2, works out to 200 MeV. Everything fit.

Frisch left Sweden after Christmas dinner. Having made the initial breakthrough, he and Meitner collaborated by long-distance telephone. Frisch talked briefly with Bohr, who then carried the news of the discovery of fission to America, where it met with immediate interest.

Meitner and Frisch sent their paper to Nature in January. Frisch named the new nuclear process "fission" after learning that the term "binary fission" was used by biologists to describe cell division. Hahn and Strassmann published their finding separately, and did not acknowledge Meitner's role in the discovery."
______








🗞️ THE SOVIET SACRIFICE FOR SPAIN 🗞️
New York Herald, The
by Nikola Tesla
July 26, 1939

An Estimate That Republic Received Billion and a Half Dollars

'''To the New York Herald Tribune:

Your issue of July 9, 1939, contains an article relating to the seizure of Spanish gold by the Soviet government. Another one, dealing with the same subject, appeared in "The Saturday Evening Post" of April 15, 1939. Without entering into a discussion of the merits of these comments upon the question raised, I may remark that, for obvious reasons, any expression of opinion concerning this matter by Americans is likely to be very unfavorable to the Soviet government, and in the interest of common justice it should be weighed without prejudice. What I wish to bring to the attention of fair-minded readers is that the articles referred to do not give the slightest hint in regard to the chief fact to be ascertained, which had a profound bearing on the course decided upon by the Soviets -namely, the sacrifice their struggle on behalf of the oppressed party in Spain involved. They fought vigorously for a cause considered rightful by a large portion of the population, and the ownership of gold and other property was undecided until the termination of the conflict.

Everybody knows that modern warfare is desperately expensive, but few will realize how costly it must have been for the Soviet government, under the disadvantages, obstacles and handicaps confronting it. I was desirous of making an approximate estimate of the cost, and with this object in view I gathered all the available data. Considering carefully the actual outlays in money, the loss of men, of airplanes, guns and other implements of war, ships and munitions, and the supply of food, oil and all kinds of provisions transported from great distance, etc., I have satisfied myself that the Soviet government must have spent, at the very least $1,500,000,000. If this estimate is reasonably accurate, the Spanish gold appropriated amounted to about one-third of the cost. Any government would have acted so under similar circumstances. England, France, Germany and Italy are on record with deeds not at all commendable. What the Soviet government did was perfectly legitimate, in view of the preceding events.

The idea that the boxes brought from Spain were sufficient to cover Red Square is absurd. It would mean not five but something like one hundred times that amount of gold. The metal always is shipped in ounces and its value determined from the prevailing market quotations.

Through the attitude of England and France the Soviet government found itself isolated, and Stalin then made a proposal for non-interference. But Italy and Germany paid no attention to it and poured tens of thousands of men into Spain to Franco's assistance. Even then Russia was ready to carry on the war. She could swallow Italy in a gulp and not suffer dyspepsia, and if Hitler dared to attack her he would have been badly defeated and Germany would have become again an empire under the Hohenzollern dynasty, probably with the restoration of the status quo ante Hitler regime and recreated free Czechoslovakia. England and France being emphatically against Russian influence in Spain, Stalin had to withdraw, but in so doing he certainly did not "knife" the Spanish republic.'''
______








# THE EINSTEIN LETTER THAT STARTED IT ALL; A MESSAGE TO PRESIDENT ROOSEVELT 25 YEARS AGO LAUNCHED THE ATOM BOMB AND THE ATOMIC AGE. #
New York Times, The
Aug. 2, 1964

"ON Aug. 2, 1939, Albert Einstein scrawled his signature on a twopage letter that changed the course of history. The letter began:

F. D. Roosevelt,
President of the United States,
White House
Washington, D. C.

Sir:

Some recent work by E. Fermi and L. Szilard, which has been communicated to me in manuscript, leads me to expect that the element uranium may be turned into a new and important source of energy in the immediate future. Certain aspects of the situation which has arisen seem to call for watchfulness and, if necessary, quick action on the part of the Administration. I believe therefore it is my duty to bring to your attention the following facts and recommendations.

In the course of the last four months it has been made probable through the work of Joliot in France as well as Fermi and Szilard in America that it may become possible to set up a nuclear chain reaction in a large mass of uranium, by which vast amounts of power and large quantities of new radium‐like elements would be generated. Now it appears almost certain that this could be achieved in the immediate future.

A third paragaph contained the prophetic words: “… it is conceivable —though much less certain—that extremely powerful bombs of a new type may thus be constructed.” Two more paragraphs outlined steps to be taken to accelerate uranium research and the letter ended with a warning that uranium sales had been stopped in Czechoslovakia and secret German research was under way. The letter concluded: “Yours very truly, A. Einstein.”

POFESSOR EINSTEIN had never expected he would write such a letter. Apart from the fact that he was an avowed pacifist, he did not 🐇 believe that the atom's energy would be released. Even after the neutron had been discovered in 1932 (it proved to be the magic bullet in atom‐smashing) he had declared: “There is not the slightest indication that energy will ever be obtainable. It would mean that the atom would have to be shattered at will.”"
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘4️⃣0️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '40

   # New York Times, The #
         May 5, 1940
            —————
     VAST POWER SOURCE
       IN ATOMIC ENERGY
       OPENED BY SCIENCE
            —————
  Relative of Uranium Found to
  Yield Force 5 Million Times
      As Potent as Coal
           —————
     GERMANY IS SEEKING IT
           —————
Scientists Ordered to Devote
 All Time to Research—Tests
     Made at Columbia

   By WILLIAM L. LAURENCE

“A natural substance found abundantly in many parts of the earth, now separated for the first time in pure form, has been found in pioneer experiments at the Physics Department of Columbia University to be capable of yielding such energy that one pound of it is equal in power output to 5,000,000 pounds of coal or 3,000,000 pounds of gasoline, it became known yesterday.”…
______








🗞️ AERIAL DEFENSE 'DEATH-BEAM' OFFERED TO U. S. BY TESLA 🗞️
Noted Inventor Says His Ray Will Melt Plane Motors at 250 Mile Range
by unkown writer interviewing Nikola Tesla
Baltimore Sun
July 12th, 1940

Noted Inventor Says His Ray Will Melt Plane Motors at 250 Mile Range

New York, July 11 - Nikola Tesla, one of the greatest electrical inventors of the century, who reached 84 yesterday, said today he was ready to divulge to the United States Government the secret of a '''death beam''' that would melt airplane motors at a distance of 250 miles and thus would build an invisible wall of defense around the country against attempted attack by an air force, no matter how large.

Dr. Tesla first described his '''death beam''' six years ago on the day he reached

Dr. Tesla, who spent this birthday at work on his inventions, offered his services to the Government in reply to a question over the telephone whether his death beam had reached the stage of practical application.

    At Service of U. S.
'''All my inventions,''' he said, '''are at the service of the United States, Government.'''

The death beam, he said, is '''based on an entirely new principle of physics that no one has ever dreamed about.''' The principle, he added, was different from those relating to the transmission of electrical power by wireless, as announced by him several years ago.

The beam, he said, would be only one hundred-millionth of a square centimeter in diameter and could be generated from a special plant that would cost no more than $2,000,000 and would take only about three months to construct. A dozen such plants, located at strategic positions along the coast, he said, would be enough to defend the country against all possible aerial attack.

    Would Melt Any Engine
The beam would melt any engine, whether Diesel or gasoline driven, and would also ignite any explosives aboard. No possible defense against it could be devised, as it would be all-penetrating, he declared.

Should the Government decide to take up his offer, he said, he would go to work at once and keep on working '''until I collapse.''' However, he added, '''I would have to insist on one condition - I would not suffer interference from any experts. They would have to trust me.''' He was in good health, he said, and felt confident he could undertake the task.

    The beam, he said, involved four new inventions:
A method and apparatus for producing rays and other manifestations of energy in free air, eliminating the necessity for high vacuums.

A method and process for producing '''very great electrical force.''' A method for amplifying this force.

A new method for producing '''a tremendous electrical repelling force.'''

    Voltage 50,000,000
This would be the projector, or gun, of the system. The voltages for propelling the death beam to its objective, he stated, will attain a potential of 50,000,000 volts.

With this enormous voltage, he said, microscopic electrified particles of matter will be catapulted on their mission of defensive destruction.

Dr. Tesla added he was convinced that '''the battleship is doomed''' and that '''what happens to the armored knight will also happen to the armored vessel.''' The Germans, he said, are not planning to invade England, but will attack its fleet.

For this reason, he said, he was convinced that money spent on battleships would be wasted. The money planned for battleships, he said, should be '''directed in channels that will improve the welfare of the country.'''
______








🗞️ "DEATH RAY" FOR PLANES 🗞️
by unkown writer interviewing Nikola Tesla
New York Times, The
September 22nd, 1940

Nikola Tesla, one of the truly great inventors who celebrated his eighty-fourth birthday on July 10, tells the writer that he stands ready to divulge to the United States Government the secret of his '''teleforce,''' with which, he said, airplane motors would be melted at a distance of 250 miles, so that an invisible Chinese Wall of Defense would be built around the country against any attempted attack by an enemy air force, no matter how large.

This '''teleforce,''' he said is based on an entirely new principle of physics that '''no one has ever dreamed about,''' different from the principle embodied in his inventions relating to the transmission of electrical power from a distance, for which he has received a number of basic patents. This new type of force, Mr. Tesla said, would operate through a beam one one-hundred-millionth of a square centimeter in diameter, and could be generated from a special plant that would cost no more than $2,000,000 and would take only about three months to construct.

A dozen such plants, located at strategic points along the coast, according to Mr. Tesla, would be enough to defend the country against all possible aerial attack. The beam would melt any engine, whether Diesel or gasoline driven, and would also ignite the explosives aboard any bomber. No possible defense against it could be devised, he asserts, as the beam would be all-penetrating.

    High Vacuum Eliminated
The beam, he states, involves four new inventions, two of which already have been tested. One of these is a method and apparatus for producing rays '''and other manifestations of energy''' in free air, eliminating the necessity for a high vacuum; a second is a method and process for producing '''very great electrical force'''; the third is a method for amplifying this force, and the fourth is a new method for producing '''a tremendous electrical repelling force.''' This would be the projector, or gun, of the system. The voltage for propelling the beam to its objective, according to the inventor, will attain a potential of 50,000,000 volts.

With this enormous voltage, he said, microscopic electrical particles of matter will be catapulted on their mission of defensive destruction. He has been working on this invention, he added, for many years and has recently made a number of improvements in it.

Mr. Tesla makes one important stipulation. Should the government decide to take up his offer he would go to work at once, but they would have to trust him. He would suffer '''no interference from experts.'''

In ordinary times such a condition would very likely interpose an insuperable obstacle. But times being what they are, and with the nation getting ready to spend billions for national defense, at the same time taking in consideration the reputation of Mr. Tesla as an inventor who always was many years ahead of his time, the question arises whether it may not be advisable to take Mr. Tesla at his word and commission him to go ahead with the construction of his teleforce plant.

    Such a Device “Invaluable”
After all, $2,000,000 would be relatively a very small sum compared with what is at stake. If Mr. Tesla really fulfills his promise the result achieved would be truly staggering. Not only would it save billions now planned for air defense, by making the country impregnable against any air attack, but it would also save many more billions in property that would otherwise be surely destroyed no matter how strong the defenses are as witness current events in England.

Take, for example, the Panama Canal. No matter how strong the defenses, a suicide squadron of dive bombers, according to some experts, might succeed in getting through and cause such damage that would make the Canal unusable, in which case our Navy might find itself bottled up.

Considering the probabilities in the case even if the chances were 🐇 100,000 to 1 against Mr. Tesla the odds would still be largely in favor of taking a chance on spending $2,000,000. In the opinion of the writer, who has known Mr. Tesla for many years and can testify that he still retains full intellectual vigor, the authorities in charge of building the national defense should at once look into the matter. The sum is insignificant compared with the magnitude of the stake.
______








~~~ DECLASSIFIED DOCUMENT ~~~
EWT:ZM   October, 1940 (Unclassified July 2nd, 1980)
100-2237-1

REDACTED
Weehawken, New Jersey

Dear REDACTED

    I wish to acknowledge receipt of your letter dated September 24, 1940, together with its enclosure.

    Your courtesy and interest in brining this information to my attention are indeed appreciated, and you may be assured your letter will receive appropriate consideration.

    Sincerely yours,

    John Edgar Hoover
        Director
______








🗞️ PROPOSING THE 'DEATH RAY' FOR DEFENSE 🗞️
'''The beam would melt enemy airplane motors before they approached our coasts and blow up hostile bombers.'''
by unkown writer interviewing Nikola Tesla
Philadelphia Inquirer
October 20th, 1940

'''The beam would melt enemy airplane motors before they approached our coasts and blow up hostile bombers.'''

The man was old, but the fervor in his eyes was ageless. Deep-set, they looked out beneath the bushes of his brows.


🐇 '''If only they will let me try out my new teleforce,''' exclaimed Nikola Tesla, who has been called one of the greatest electrical inventors since Benjamin Franklin flew his kite. '''If only they will let me show how this Nation can be made invulnerable to air attack!.'''


Thus, just the other day, spoke the man who years ago helped to harness Niagara Falls, through his discovery of the principle of the rotary magnetic field. The man who is known as the father of modern methods of generating and distributing electrical energy. Who in 1904 predicted that the human voice one day would girdle the globe, and whose famed Tesla coil helped to make that prediction of radio come true.

Today, at 83, Nikola Tesla lives in a New York hotel and dreams of making America one vast, impregnable fortress. He says that he can do this.

Tesla is used to skeptics who, he says, laughed at him back in the old days when he worked at Orange, New Jersey, with Thomas A. Edison. Tesla helped Edison design motors and generators. Then of course there was a great deal of laughing in 1904 over Tesla's idea that the human voice would one day wing around the world.

TODAY, trembling with excitement, this slim old man tells how his newest invention (he holds 700 patents) can melt airplane motors at a distance of 250 miles away from the American coastline, so that invading aviators would drop into the sea.


For years Tesla worked on the problem of transmitting electrical power from a distance, without bringing this dream out of the laboratory into the workaday world. But he was not alone in his belief that it eventually will be done. The great Marconi, shortly before his death, predicted that the day would come when power would be directed through the air with little loss. And like Tesla, Marconi was reported to have been working on a war-ray. His, it was said, would when perfected be able to stop airplane and other motors many miles before invading forces could reach their goals.

    For Us Alone
Marconi said little about his mysterious ray, nor will Tesla discuss the details of his. It is his secret and he will not reveal it, he says, except to the United States Government, for he is afraid that it might be stolen by enemies of America, within and without. But of what it will do, he speaks freely.


'''This new type of force,''' he said the other day, '''would operate through a beam one one-hundred-millionth of a centimeter in diameter. It could be generated from a special plant that would cost no more than two million dollars and would take only about three months to construct.


'''A dozen such plants, located at strategic points along the coast, would be enough to defend this country against all possible aerial attack. This beam would melt any engine, whether Diesel or gasoline-driven.''' (Marconi's partly - perfected beam was said to be ineffective against Diesel engines). '''It would also ignite any explosives aboard any bomber. No possible defense against it could be devised, as the beam would be all-penetrating.'''


Four recent inventions, Tesla says, are used in the generation of the ray. Two of them already have been tested, it is said. One of these is an apparatus for producing rays '''and other manifestations of energy''' in free air, instead of in a vacuum.

The second is a process for producing '''A very great electrical force..''' Next is a method for amplifying this force and finally there is a new method for producing '''A tremendous electrical repelling force..''' This, Tesla declares, would be the projector, or gun, of the teleforce system. It would operate on a potential of 50,000,000 volts.

Dramatically, Tesla describes how this titanic voltage would hurl into space billions of microscopic electrical particles of matter that would bring down invading airplanes as insects are dropped by a spray gun.


All this, Tesla says, he is offering to the United States, the land which welcomed him as an immigrant boy from Austria-Hungary in 1884. But there must be no '''red tape,” if he is to go to work setting up the first power plant. There must be no '''interference from experts.”


Offers like this have been made before, and tests have proved many so-called '''death rays” useless. But some authorities, remembering the great achievements of Nikola Tesla, believe his claims should be investigated. Why, they ask, should such a ray be considered impossible in a world where radio is a commonplace? They recall the case of Henry Fleur, who was prosecuted in San Francisco by disgruntled investors who claimed he had bamboozled them with a death-ray machine intended to kill insects.


In the courtroom, Fleur turned his machine on a couple of termites. They died in seconds. A lizard and a snake also were killed by the ray, though it look longer. 🐇 Fleur was released. He said that he never would experiment with his apparatus to make it a man-killer.


    Inventor's Offer
Then there is Dr. Antonio Longoria, who says that he destroyed a death ray machine which he invented in 1933, because it was too dangerous. Of this machine, Albert Burns, president of the Inventors' Congress in 1934, 🐇 said that he had seen it kill pigeons, rabbits, dogs and cats at considerable distances. Now Dr. Longoria said that he is willing to re-assemble his apparatus in the event that the United States is subjected to an unwarranted attack. He claims that it worked by changing the red corpuscles of its victims' blood to white. And he says that it might be adapted to stall the motors of airplane engines in flight.


If such things are possible, some authorities ask: why not give Nikola Tesla the chance he asks to try out his defensive death ray? True, he has been called the greatest dreamer among the inventors who created the present electrical era. But many of his dreams came true. Perhaps, they say, this one might come true, too - and build a wall mightier than any in the world around America's borders.
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘4️⃣1️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '41


*** WESTERN UNION TELEGRAM ***
from Nikola Tesla
New York, N.Y.
to Sava Kosanovic
March 1, 1941

'''I thank Dr. Macek and you for the happy news.


It is important that you know the following: Eight years I developed a new title using 50 of my patents of which one third are not applied. In the system there are no electrons. Energy goes into the same direction without any distribution and the same on all sides of distance. It contains neutrons. The air is equal to a diameter of hydrogen. It can destroy the largest ships afloat. There is unlimited distance of travel. The same is for airplanes.

One will need nine stations: for Serbia; three for Croatia and two for Slovenia and everyone needs 200 KW which can defend our dear homeland against any type of attack.

The contents of one bomb can be exploded in the air. I add that in the station one must have a small generator or battery of 🐇 30 volts for activation.

Express my deepest respect to Dr. Macek and accept the warmest greetings and thanks.

Your uncle, Nikola Tesla'''
______
*








Great Falls Tribune
🗞️ Today's Profile By UNITED PRESS 🗞️
Sunday Morning, March 2nd, 1941

''''Nikola Tesla, approaching his 84th birthday, has been spending almost all of his time in his apartment, so much of it, in fact, that he has had to hire messenger boys to go into the parks to feed the pigeons. Tesla, the 🐇 fabulous electrical wizard, used to feed the pigeons religiously himself, 🐇 but age and mysterious experiments with sound 🐇 waves purportedly for the army have combined to confine him to his rooms.


Tesla, a lean Czech, was one of the celebrated engineers with whom George Westinghouse surrounded himself at the turn of the century. Tesla at that time was responsible for some of the inventions that hastened the modern day of scientific miracles. He produced the telephone repeater in 1881, an arc lighting system in 1886, a system of alternating current transmission in 1888, a number of alternating current motors and various wireless inventions between 1893 and 1902.

His birthday interviews for the last decade or so have been amazing affairs, with Tesla calmly announcing earth-shaking projects of astounding inventions. To the wide eyed group assembled in his suite at the Hotel New Yorker he has discussed a death ray capable of destroying 1,000,000 men, based on production of 50,000,000 million volts. He has spoken of wireless telephones to Mars; that he had perfected a plan for harnessing the sun's rays.

Despite his age, Tesla is intensely interested in world affairs and has delivered to him 🐇 all the editions of all the New York papers and all the news magazines. He lives alone, and some attached of his hotel have worked there for years without seeing him leave his rooms. Recently he astounded the staff by coming down to dinner with his guest—Fritzie Zivic, the boxing champion. Tesla revealed then that he had become a boxing fan and had extended his interest from the news to the sports section of the newspapers. The fact that Zivic is also a Czech may account for his interest.

Tesla has more than 700 inventions to his credit. But he gets the most satisfaction out of turbines used at Niagara falls. When he was a boy of 9 he used to boast that some day he would harness the falls, he said, and fulfillment of that dream still represents the peak of his life.'''
______








*** WESTERN UNION TELEGRAM ***
from Nikola Tesla
New York, N.Y.
to Sava Kosanovic
March 4th, 1941

'''As though I am poor with words.


I still didn't explain it enough what would be necessary to increase up to twelve stations: eight in Croatia, each of the same construction like at Wardenclyffe and only 20 meters high - a ball five meters in diameter - the station would be using diesel oil for energy with mechanical action - my air turbines, steam powered, electrically or other manners of transforming into alternating electrical current with sixty billion volts pressure without danger. I am waiting for Governor Subasic to select one station on top of Mt. Lovcen. There will not be any light, electrical energy will deliver particles through space with the speed of 118,837,370,000 centimeters per second.


This is 3[sic]94,579 the speed of light. As I said about airplanes it can be used for tanks, trucks, automobiles and various machines in factories, with hydroelectrical wheels and unlimited other machines. The particles can be larger than that of the diameter of an Hydrogen atom with metals of all kinds of materials and sent to all distances and good results in war and bring about peace. Particles are practical with neutrons, because, they are 3,723[sic?] times lighter than electricity or electrons that cannot penetrate space for great distances.

🐇

In my attempts with an effective 20 million volts, electrons carried 40 times more electricity than normally and penetrated two meters in depth and terrible damage in a moment each.'''


I have to finish because that I give you a fresh view.
______
*








🗞️ Dr. Tesla 85 Years Old Today 🗞️
New York Times, The
July 10th, 1941

Dr. Nikola Tesla, inventor, will be 85 years old today. However, at his room in the Hotel New Yorker he said yesterday he had decided to postpone the celebration—and the interview  that  traditionally accompanied it—until

'''later'''. 🐇
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘4️⃣2️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '42

*** A King's Heritage ***
July 8th, 1942

In his diaries "A King's Heritage," the young Peter II writes: "I visited Dr Nikola Tesla, in his apartment in the Hotel New Yorker. After I had greeted him the aged scientist said:
'''It is my greatest honor. I am glad you are in your youth, and I am content that you will be a great ruler. I believe I will live until you come back to a free Yugoslavia. From your father you have received his last words: "Guard Yugoslavia.” I am proud to be a Serbian and a Yugoslav. Our people cannot perish. Preserve the unity of all Yugoslavs – the Serbs, the Croats and Slovenes.''''
______








---
this excerpt w/o permission might get me sued
---
One of the strangest luncheon parties Tesla ever staged was that given by him to a prize fighter, Fritzie Zivic. It was served in one of the private dining rooms of the Hotel New Yorker in 1940. Fritzie Zivic was scheduled to take part in a prize fight at Madison Square Garden for the welterweight championship, and the luncheon was held at noon on the day of the battle.

Fritzie was one of six brothers, all of whom were either professional prize fighters or wrestlers. They lived at Pittsburgh where their father conducted a beer saloon. They were all born in Pittsburgh, but were the sons of parents, natives of Yugoslavia, whose difficult-to-pronounce Slavonic name was shortened to Zivic by the brothers for their professional activities.

Tesla had all six of the brothers as his guests. The only other guests were William L. Laurence, science writer of the New York Times, and the author.

Three very different types of individuals were gathered around the table. The six fighting brothers were all fine physical specimens. They averaged medium height but their powerful, chunky bodies, deep chests and broad shoulders made them seem rather short. All were clear eyed, had clear complexions and clean-cut features, were conservatively dressed in sack suits, and wore white linen collars. The two newspapermen presented an appearance in strong contrast with the fighters, and in contrast with all the others was Tesla. Laurence, with his great mop of jet black hair combed straight back, looked more like a musician.

Tesla was seated at the head of the table. At his right sat Fritzie and next to him ranged three of his brothers. Opposite them sat two other brothers and Mr. Laurence. The author sat at the far end of the table.

Tesla did not arrange one of his famous duck dinners for this occasion-he had other plans. As soon as the party was seated, Tesla stood up. The broad, stocky Fritzie looked like a pygmy by comparison. Tesla was attired in a light-weight, tight-fitting, black, single-breasted sack suit which made him look more slender than usual. He had lost considerable weight in the preceding year, and this accentuated the sharp, bony contour which his face had taken on in his latter years. His face, of the ascetic type, now was crowned with thinning locks of silvery white hair. His long slender hands, delicately shaped, started to wave over the seated prize fighter, who smiled up at the strange figure towering above him.

'''I am ordering for you a nice thick beefsteak, two inches thick, so that you will have plenty of strength tonight to win the championship by a . . . '''

The fighter had both hands up, trying to interrupt the gesticulating figure of the scientist.

"No,'' protested Fritzie, "I am in training and I cannot eat a steak today.''

'''You listen to me,''' shouted the insistent voice of Tesla, whose swinging arms and swaying body made him appear to be going through the antics of a cheer leader at a football game. '''I'll tell you how to train.

You will train on beefsteak. I am going to get you a beefsteak two inches thick and dripping with blood so that you will be able to . . .'''

The Five brothers now joined Fritzie in his protest.

"He can't eat beefsteak today. He would lose the fight, Dr. Tesla,'' they chorused.

"No, he won't lose the fight,'' shot back Tesla. "You must think of the heroes of our national Serbian poetry. They were redblooded men and mighty fighters. You too must fight for the glory of Serbia, and you need beefsteak dripping in blood to do it!''

Tesla had worked himself into a fine frenzy and was waving his arms and punching his palms as if he were at the ringside at an exciting moment in the battle. His frenzy was lost on Fritzie and his brother pugilists. They were unmoved. Fritzie replied:

"I will win, Dr. Tesla. I will fight for the glory of Yugoslavia and when the referee gives me the decision and I speak into the microphone I will also say I fought for Dr. Tesla-but no beefsteak today, Dr. Tesla, please.''

'''All right, Fritzie, you can have whatever you want,''' Tesla agreed, '''but your brothers will have their beefsteak.'''

"No, Dr. Tesla,'' replied the eldest brother, "if Fritzie cannot have beefsteak neither will we. We will eat whatever he eats.''

Fritzie ordered scrambled eggs on toast, with bacon, and a glass of milk. The Five brothers gave duplicate orders and the two newspapermen did likewise.

Tesla laughed heartily. '''So that is what you do your fighting on today,''' he said between chuckles.

For himself, the blood-thirsty 83-year-old scientist ordered '''A dish of hot milk'''; and on this diet he managed to summon a tremendous amount of energy during the meal which he directed toward urging Fritzie to give his opponent '''everything you've got''' and '''make it a knockout in the First round.'''

It was a strange dinner. Despite the greatly outnumbering pugilists with their hard set faces and chunky powerful bodies, the thin, bony faced, sharp featured, almost emaciated scientist with his sunken eyes, and his thin, silky silver hair, easily dominated the scene. Everyone was at ease despite the brothers' anticipation of Fritzie's impending battle and Tesla's enthusiasm. Yet, in spite of the fact that everyone was relaxed, there was an eerie kind of tenseness linking the peculiar assemblage. Once I became conscious of the situation, I watched developments with interest. I had experienced such conditions previously but never under such circumstances as these.

Mr. Laurence, of the Times, was seated at my right. He began to act a bit restless while only halfway through the meal. Several times he looked under the table. He in turn rubbed his ankle, his knee, his calf. He shifted his position. He rubbed his elbow and later his forearm. I managed to catch his eye.

"Anything bothering you, Bill?'' I asked, knowing full well what was happening.

"There is something strange going on here,'' he replied.

A couple of minutes later he again reached, and looked under the table.

"Feel anything?'' 🐇 I asked.

"Yes,'' he replied, seemingly a bit worried. "Something hot is touching me at different spots. I can feel the heat but I can't see anything that is doing it. 😅 Do you feel it, too?'' he asked.

"Don't worry about it,'' I assured him. "I know what it is, and will tell you all about it later. Just make as close observations as you can now.''
The phenomenon continued until the party broke up. On our way back to our offices, I explained to Mr. Laurence.

"You have often laughed at me for my gullibility in accepting the reality of the so-called psychic experiences,'' I said. "Now you have had one. As soon as that luncheon got well under way, after Dr. Tesla's Wery outburst had quieted down, I sensed a peculiar tenseness in the air around me. At times the atmosphere seemed webby to my face and hands, so I suspected something unusual might happen.

"That gathering was a perfect set-up for a psychic séance, and if it was held in the dark there is no telling what we might have observed. Here were six powerfully built men, closely in rapport with each other, all filled to the bursting point with vital energy waiting for an event that would release an emotional outburst. In addition, we had Dr. Tesla staging an emotional outburst the like of which he probably never before exhibited throughout his life. He was supercharged with a different kind of vital energy. Just visualize Dr. Tesla as a medium acting as a co-ordinator, in some unknown way, to release these pent-up stores of vital energy which, again in an unknown manner, organized channels of conduction through which this energy was transferred from levels of high potential to levels of lower potential.

"In this case we were the levels of lower potential, for I had exactly the same experiences you had, with these energy-transfer channels in space making contact with various parts of my body and producing areas in which I, too, experienced a sensation of intense heat.

"You have read reports of séances in which the sitters reported that they experienced cool breezes. In these situations the action is the reverse of what we experienced, for in the séances energy was being drawn from the sitters to be organized by the so-called medium for the production of phenomena

"Some kind of highly attenuated energy 🤣 -bearing fluid was, in our experience today, drawn from the bodies of the fighters and fed into our bodies-and in the séances it is drawn from the bodies of the sitters and fed into that of the medium, or to a central collecting point. In a report which I have written on my séance observations, I have called this substance psynovial fluid, which is merely a convenient abbreviation for new psychic fluid.

"Now that you have had today's experience, you will understand why a few years ago I risked having Dr. Tesla figuratively massacre me when I told him he was using his meat-machine philosophy of human life to cover up a lot of strange experiences he has had, and about which he was afraid to talk. . . .''

---
One of the companies that were given contract by U.S. government to build magnetrons was Raytheon an one of the engineers that worked for Raytheon was self-taught engineer from Howland, Maine - Percy Spencer. He was at that time one of the world's leading experts in radar tube design. In 1945, he was working on powered radar set when he 🐇 noticed that a chocolate bar that he had in his pocket was melting. He wasn't the first one to notice such a phenomenon but was the first one to become intrigued by it. He exposed popcorns to microwaves and they popped, he tried the whole egg and it exploded.
---

---
I have been feeding pigeons, thousands of them, for years; thousands of them, 🐇 for who can tell—
Nikola Tesla -1922
---

I recalled those occasions when I had happened to meet him on deserted Fifth Avenue and, when I spoke to him, he replied, '''You will now leave me.😢''' He told his story simply, briefly and without embellishments🤥, but there was still a surging of emotion in his voice.
“But there was one pigeon, a beautiful bird, pure white with light gray tips on its wings; that one was different. It was a female. I would know that pigeon anywhere."

'''No matter where I was, that pigeon would find me; when I wanted her I had only to wish and call her and she would come flying to me. She understood me and I understood her.'''

'''I loved that pigeon.'''

'''Yes,''' he replied to an unasked question. '''Yes, I loved that pigeon, I loved her as a man loves a woman, and she loved me. When she was ill, I knew, and understood; she came to my room and I stayed beside her for days. I nursed her back to health. That pigeon was the joy of my life. If she needed me, nothing else mattered. As long as I had her, there was a purpose in my life.'''

'''Then one night as I was lying in my bed in the dark, solving problems, as usual, she flew in through the open window and stood on my desk. I knew she wanted me; she wanted to tell me something important so I got up and went to her.'''
'''As I looked at her I knew she wanted to tell me—she was dying. And then, as I got her message, there came a light from her eyes—powerful beams of light.'''

---
'''This would be of inestimable consequence on all human relations but the idea can not be realized until some way is found to lay bare the retina🙃. Continued reflections on this subject led me to evolve apparatus for transmitting instantaneously true vision without any moving devices, and in 1900 I had already solved three of the problems which confronted me, namely: to individualize and isolate a very great number of channels or “nerves”; to convey to the receiving apparatus energy in sufficient amount, and, to make the vision of the moving images independent of distance. Eventually also I hope to overcome the shortcomings of the solar panel by a different device.''' 🙃
---

'''Yes,''' he continued, again answering an unasked question, '''it was a real light, a powerful, dazzling, blinding light, a light more intense than I had ever produced by the most powerful lamps in my laboratory.'''
🐇
'''When that pigeon died, something went out of my life. Up to that time I knew with a certainty that I would complete my work, no matter how ambitious my program, but when that something went out of my life I knew my life's work was finished.'''


There was nothing more to say. We parted in silence. The talk took place in a corner of the mezzanine in the Hotel New Yorker. I was accompanied by William L. Laurence, science writer of the New York Times. We walked several blocks on Seventh Avenue before we spoke. 

???No longer was there any mystery??? to the midnight pilgrimages when he called the pigeons from their niches in the Gothic tracery of the Cathedral, or from under the eaves of the Greek temple that houses the Library--pursuing, among the thousands of them . . . '''For after all, who can tell . . .?
-
Secondhand account -Late 1930s/ early 1940s








In one of the periods of his life Tesla was completely broke and his bill at the hotel had been unpaid for a long time. One afternoon a deputy sheriff arrived at his office and began seizing his furnishings to satisfy a judgement against them. Tesla managed to persuade the officer to grant him an extension. When he had gone, there remained the matter of his secretaries, who had received no salaries in more than two weeks. All that was left was the gold Edison Medal.
"It is worth about one hundred dollars," – said Tesla to the young women - "I want to divide it into two and give half to each."

The two secretaries declined in one voice. They offered instead to share with him the small sums of money in their own purses. A few weeks later, when Tesla was able to pay them, he placed an additional two weeks' salary in each envelope. Yet on the very day when he offered to divide up the Edison Medal, there had in fact been a little money in the office – five dollars in petty cash. 🐇 But this he claimed at once for his pigeons, saying he was out of bird seed. He had asked Dorothy (one of his secretaries) to go out and to buy fresh food for pigeons.
-
Another secondhand account

---

Curiously, in 1917, Tesla grudgingly condescended to accept the Edison Medal from the American Institute of Electrical Engineers, but not without some indifference - just prior to the award ceremony he was found to be missing.  He was discovered in New York's Plaza Library festooned with pigeons who had come to eat the bird-seed that Tesla always bought for them.  Later, short of money, Tesla pawned the solid gold Edison Medal to pay his secretaries and to buy bird seed ⁹⁵
-
A hundredth hand account








Another strange supernormal experience came to Tesla a few days before he died, but he was probably totally unaware that the situation had any unusual aspects.

Early one morning he called his favorite messenger boy, Kerrigan, gave him a sealed envelope, and ordered him to deliver it as quickly as possible. It was addressed to "Mr. Samuel Clemens, 35 South Fifth Ave., New York City."

Kerrigan returned in a short time with the statement that he could not deliver the message because the address was incorrect. There is no such street as South Fifth Ave., the boy reported; and in the neighborhood of that number on Fifth Ave. no one by the name of Clemens could be located.

Tesla became annoyed. He told Kerrigan: '''Mr. Clemens is a very famous author who writes under the name Mark Twain, and you should have no trouble locating him at the address I gave you. He lives there.'''

Kerrigan reported to the manager of his office and told him of his difficulty. The manager told him: "Of course you couldn't find South Fifth Avenue. Its name was changed to West Broadway years ago, and you won't be able to deliver a message to Mark Twain because he has been dead for twenty-five years."

Armed with this information, Kerrigan returned to Tesla, and the reception accorded his announcements left him still further confused.

'''Don't you dare to tell me that Mark Twain is dead,''' said Tesla. '''He was in my room, here, last night. He sat in that chair and talked to me for an hour. He is having financial difficulties and needs my help. So you go right back to that address and deliver that envelope-and don't come back until you have done so.''' (The address to which he sent the messenger was that of Tesla's First laboratory!)

Kerrigan returned to his office. The envelope, not too well sealed, was opened in the hope it would give some clue as to how the message could be delivered, The envelope contained a 🐇 blank sheet of paper wrapped around twenty $5 bills! When Kerrigan tried to return the money, Tesla told him, with great annoyance, either to deliver the money or keep it.
-
Another secondhand account








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘4️⃣3️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '43
___
Sometime on 7 January 1943, at the age of 86, Tesla died of heart failure in Room 3327 of the Hotel New Yorker. He was later found wearing nothing but a pair of socks by maid Alice Monaghan. ⁹⁷
___







___
'''Nikola Tesla, Stop in New York but heart is at Niagara.'''
___








New York Times, The   January 8th, 1943

🗞️ NIKOLA TESLA DIES; PROLIFIC INVENTOR 🗞️
               —————
     Alternating Power Current's
       Developer Found Dead in
          Hotel Suite Here
               —————
        CLAIMED A 'DEATH BEAM'
               —————
       He Insisted the Invention
       Could Annihilate an Army
         of 1,000,000 at Once

“Nikola Tesla, one of the word's greatest electrical inventors and designers, was found dead last night in his suite at the Hotel New Yorker.”…
______








*** Tribute to Nikola Tesla, by Lewis Adaleigh, read over the radio by the then Mayor of NYC, Fiorello LaGuardia. ***
January 10th, 1943
www.youtube.com/watch?v=RAgevN9iseM








~~~ DECLASSIFIED DOCUMENT ~~~
January 12th, 1943

[illegible handprint]
FBI NYC    1-12-43    11-06 PM    WHS
DIRECTOR
VEST
UNSUBS --- EQUIPMENT, EXPERIMENTS AND RESEARCH OF NIKOLA TESLA, DECEASED, redactedX ESPIONAGE – M.   RETEL UNDER ABOVE HEADING TO THE BUREAU FROM THIS OFFICE DATED JAN NINE LAST.   INQUIRY DEVELOPS THAT TESLA DIED JAN EIGHT, RATHER THAN THURSDAY, JAN SEVEN, AS sREDACTEDx  STATED IN REFERENCE TELETYPE.   ON THE NIGHT OF JAN EIGHT, SAVxKOSANOVICH, GEORGE CLARK, AND KENNETH SWEEZY VISITED TESLA-S HOTEL WITH A REPRESENTATIVE OF SHAW WALKER CO. IN ORDER TO OPEN THE SAFE IN THE ROOM OF TESLA.  KOSANOVICH LATER REPORTED TO WALTER GORUCH, OFFICE OF ALIEN PROPERTY CUSTODIAN, NYC, THAT HE WENT INTO THE ROOM IN ORDER TO SEARCH FOR A WILL OF TESLA.   KOSANOVICH AND THE OTHERS MADE THE SEARCH OF THE SAFE IN THE PRESENCE OF THREE ASST MANAGERS OF HOTEL NEW YORKER AS WELL AS REPRESENTATIVES OF THE YUGOSLAVIAN CONSULATE, IDENTITIES OF LATTER NOT YET KNOWN.   AFTER THE SAFE WAS OPENED, SEEZEY, TOOK FROM THE SAFE A BOOK CONTAINING TESTIMONIALS SENT TO TESLA ON THE OCCASION OF HIS SEVENTY FIFTH BIRTHDAY.   THIS BOOK WAS ARRANGED FOR TESLA ON THE OCCASION OF HIS SEVENTY FIFTH BIRTHDAY.   THIS BOOK WAS ARRANGED FOR TESLA BY SWEEZEY.   KOSANOVICH TOOK FROM THE ROOM THREE PICTURES OF TESLA, TWO BEING ENLARGED NEWSPAPER PICTUREX[sic].   ACCORDING TO MANAGERS OF HOTEL AND KOSANOVICH HIMSELF, NOTHING ELSE WAS REMOVED FROM THE ROOM OR SAFE.   THE SAFE WAS THEN CLOSED UNDER A NEW COMBINATION, WHICH COMBINATION IS NOW IN POSSESSION OredactedX KOSANOVICH.   ON SATURDAY AFTERNOON, JAN NINE, x GORSUCH AND redactedX FTIZGERALD[sic] OF ALIEN PROPERTY CONTROL WENT TO THE MANHATTAN STORAGE AND WAREHOUSE CO. NY, WHERE THEY ARE NOW LOCATED.  AT THAT redacted TIME THERE WERE ALSO IN THIS WAREHOUSE APPROXIMATELY THIRTY BARRELS AND BUNDLES BELONGING TO TESLA WHICH HAD BEEN THERE SINCE ABOUT NINETEEN THIRTY FOUR.   THESE HAVE ALSO redactedX BEEN SEALED AND ARE NOW UNDER ORDERES OF ALIEN PROPERTYCUSTODIAN[sic].   IN VIEW OF FACT TESLA IS A US NATURALIZED CITIZEN, ALIEN PROPERTY FEELS THAT ITS JURISDICTION OVERY PROPERTY IS DOUBTFUL BUT redactedX FEELS THAT NO OTHER AGENCY WILL BE ABLE TO GET redactedX TO THIS PROPERTY FOR AT LEAST TWO DAYS.

COPIES DESTROYED 3/10/58 #4

[illegible handprint name] 12:15am 1-13-43

COPY IN FILE 77 FEB5 1943

X00-2237-2 JAN 13 1943 [illegible handprint name]

ALL INFORMATION CONTAINED
HEREIN IS UNCLASSIFIED
DATE 7.13.83 BY [illegible handprint name]

REDACTIONS ON THIS PAGE ARE NOT FOIA DELETIONS 


PAGE TWO
AFTER THAT TIME IT IS POSSIBLE THAT A PUBLIC ADMINISTRATOR WILL BE APPOINTED FOR THE PROPERTY WHO MAY TAKE THE PROPERTYINTO[sic] HIS CUSTODY.   TESLA ALSO HAD SOME PROPERTY, redactedX ALLEGED BY INFORMANT FITZGERALD IN THIS CASE, TO BE A WORKING MODEL OF AN INVENTION IN A SAFE DEPOSIT BOX IN GOVERNOR CLINTON HOTEL IN NY.   INQUIRY SHOWS THAT THIS WAS PLACED HERE BY TESLA IN NINETEEN THIRTY TWO AS SECURITY FOR FOUR HUNDRED DOLLARS OWED HOTEL.   THIS BILL IS STILL OWED AND HOTEL APPEARS UNWILLING TO RELEASE THIS PROPERTY TO ANYONE AT LEAST UNTIL redactedX DEBT IS PAID, BUT THIS OFFICE WILL BE ADVISED IF ANYONE ATTEMPTS TO PAY BILL AND OBTAIN PROPERTY,   CONCERNING TESLA HOTEL MANAGERS REPORT HE WAS redactedX VERY ECCENTRIC IF NOT redactedX MENTALLY DERANGED DURING PAST TEN YEARS AND IT IS DOUBTFUL IF HE HAS CREATED ANYTHING OF VALUE DURING THAT TIME, ALTHOPRIOR[sic]  TO THAT HE PROBABLY WAS A VERY BRILLIANT INVENTOR.   THEREFORE, ANY NOTES OF VALUE WERE PROBABLY THOSE MADE PRIOR TO THAT TIME.   KOSANOVICH IS A NEPHEW OF TESLA WHO DESCRIBED HIMSELF AS FORMERLY QUOTE YUGOSLAV MINISTER OF STATE UNQUOTE AND NOW REPRESENTING YUGOSLAVIA, CZECHOSLOVAKIA, POLAND AND GREECE, UNQUOTE.   SWEEZEY IS A WRITER FOR POPULAR MECHANICS AND OTHER PUBLICATIONS WHO IS redactedX DESIROUS OF PUBLISHING A BIOGRAPHY OF TESLA AND THEREFORE WOULD LIKE TO OBTAIN CONTROL OF HIS NOTES FOR THIS WORK.   CLARK IS EMPLOYED BY RCA AND WOULD ALSO PROVIDE STORAGE ROOM FOR TESLAS EFFECTS IN ORDER TO USE THEM IN WRITING A BIOGRAPHY.   TESLA AT ONE TIME REPORTED TO BE WORKING ON EXPERIMENTS FOR YUGOSLAVIAN GOVERNMENT IN EXILE.   IT IS DESIRED THAT BUREAU ADVISE IMMEDIATELY WHETER IT IS INTERESTED FURTHER IN THIS PROPERTY FOR PURPOSES OF TAKING CONTROL OF IT.   SUGGEST THAT, IN VIEW OF FACT THAT THE NOTES AND OTHER MATERIAL WOULD BE HIGHLY TECHNICAL IN CHARACTER AND FOR THAT REASON redactedX COULD NOT BE REVIEWED redacted - redacted EXCEPT BY A TRAINED PERSON THE OFFICE OF SCIENTIFIC RESEARCH DEVEL-

OPMENT MIGHT BE INTERESTED.
FOXWORTH
END NYC S2 WHS
HOLD WA R 2 RSG

REDACTIONS ON THIS PAGE ARE NOT FOIA DELETIONS
______








*** MARCONI WIRELESS T. CO. OF AMERICA v. US, 320 U.S. 1 ***
United States Supreme Court
No. 369
Argued April 9th, 12th, 1943
Decided June 21, 1943
Rehearing Denied Oct 11th, 1943

Transcript
www.amazon.com/Wireless-Telegraph-Transcript-Supporting-Pleadings/dp/1270339257 [paywall]

Syllabus, the Courts (5x Justices) opinion, and 3x Justices dissents.
www.tile.loc.gov/storage-services/service/ll/usrep/usrep320/usrep320001/usrep320001.pdf
..."Tesla's specifications disclosed an arrangement of four circuits, an open antenna circuit coupled, through a transformer, to a closed charging circuit at the transmitter, and an open antenna circuit at the receiver similarly coupled to a closed detector circuit. His patent also instructed those skilled in the art that the open and closed circuits in the transmitting system and in the receiving system should be in electrical resonance with each other. His specifications state that the "primary and secondary circuits in the transmitting apparatus" are "carefully synchronized." They describe the method of achieving this by adjusting the length of wire in the secondary winding of the oscillation transformer in the transmitter, and similarly in the receiver, so that "the points of highest potential are made to coincide with the elevated terminals" of the antenna, i. e., so that the antenna circuit will be resonant to the frequency developed in he charging circuit of the transmitter. The specifications further state that "the results were particularly satisfactory when the primary coil or system A' with its secondary C' [of the receiver] was carefully adjusted, so as to vibrate in synchronism with the transmitting coil or system AC." Tesla thus anticipated the following features of the Marconi patent: A charging circuit in the transmitter for causing oscillations of the desired frequency, coupled, through a transformer, with the open antenna circuit, and the synchronization of the two circuits by the proper disposition of the inductance in either the closed or the antenna circuit or both. By this and the added disclosure of the two-circuit arrangement in the receiver with similar adjustment, he anticipated the four-circuit tuned structed those skilled in the art that the open and closed circuits in the transmitting system and in the receiving system should be in electrical resonance with each other. His specifications state that the "primary and secondary circuits in the transmitting apparatus" are "carefully synchronized." They describe the method of achieving this by adjusting the length of wire in the secondary winding of the oscillation transformer in the transmitter, and similarly in the receiver, so that "the points of highest potential are made to coincide with the elevated terminals" of the antenna, i. e., so that the antenna circuit will be resonant to the frequency developed in he charging circuit of the transmitter. The specifications further state that "the results were particularly satisfactory when the primary coil or system A' with its secondary C' [of the receiver] was carefully adjusted, so as to vibrate in synchronism with the transmitting coil or system AC." Tesla thus anticipated the following features of the Marconi patent: A charging circuit in the transmitter for causing oscillations of the desired frequency, coupled, through a transformer, with the open antenna circuit, and the synchronization of the two circuits by the proper disposition of the inductance in either the closed or the antenna circuit or both. By this and the added disclosure of the two-circuit arrangement in the receiver with similar adjustment, he anticipated the four-circuit tuned combination of Marconi. A feature of the Marconi combination not shown by Tesla was the use of a variable inductance as a means of adjusting the tuning of the antenna circuit of transmitter and receiver. This was developed by Lodge after Tesla's patent but before the Marconi patent in suit.
______








By the time the war began in 1939, Tesla's health had deteriorated. He was deathly skinny and prone to fainting. By early 1943 he was living in a room on the 33rd floor of the New Yorker Hotel near Penn Station, a do not disturb sign permanently fixed to his door. On January 8 a maid ignored the sign, walked into the room, and found the old man dead—reportedly naked except for his socks. He was 86 years old. And with the fate of his d̷e̷a̷t̷h̷ ̷r̷a̷y peace beam unclear, a massive scramble began.

Again, no one knew whether the d̷e̷a̷t̷h̷ ̷r̷a̷y peace beam was real, but it might be the breakthrough the Allies needed to win the war. At the very least, American officials were terrified of Nazi Germany getting the weapon first, so they decided to seize Tesla's papers. But someone beat them to the punch.

The Yugoslavian ambassador to the United States was actually Tesla's nephew, Sava Kosanović, who had ridden his uncle's coattails to his current post. Kosanović happened to be stationed in New York in 1943, and when he heard of his uncle's passing he rushed over to the hotel.

While hotel managers looked on, Kosanović instructed a locksmith to crack open a safe in Tesla's room. Inside, he found some honorary degrees, a gold medal, and a memorial book from Tesla's 75th birthday. Kosanović took the memorial book, changed the safe combination, and left. All in all, it was a fairly innocent act—Tesla's rightful heir inspecting his uncle's things. But to paranoid types in the U.S. government, the visit didn't seem innocent at all. They feared Kosanović was a spy. The FBI even considered arresting Kosanović for burglary.








*** Muzar Correspondance ***

Charlotte Muzar
(secretary and assistant to Nikola Tesla's nephew Ambassador Sava N. Kosanovic)
1981 testimonial concerning events around and after Teslas death

www.teslasociety.com/teslapaper1.jpg
www.teslasociety.com/teslapaper2.jpg
www.teslasociety.com/teslapaper3.jpg
www.teslasociety.com/teslapaper4.jpg
www.teslasociety.com/teslapaper5.jpg
www.teslasociety.com/muzardoc.jpg
______








February 4th, 1963 letter from Charlotte Muzar to Kenneth Sweezey
www.teslauniverse.com/sites/default/files/styles/default_large/public/images/2023-01/letters_0040_01.jpg?itok=Uuu1mdm3
www.teslauniverse.com/sites/default/files/styles/default_large/public/images/2023-01/letters_0040_02.jpg?itok=BngMI9D0
______








Two days later another government agency, the Office of Alien Property, seized all of Tesla's belongings and impounded them in a storage unit in Midtown Manhattan. (Tesla was a naturalized U.S. citizen, not an alien, so the agency probably didn't have jurisdiction, but they weren't about to let legal niceties interfere with national security.) The government then summoned an expert on high-voltage physics [Dr. John G. Trump] from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology to go through Tesla's papers and see whether the old inventor had actually harnessed the bolt of Thor.

The physicist arrived in New York on January 26 and spent two days going through the papers. He was not impressed. He said t̷h̷e̷ ̷r̷a̷y Tesla's work was mainly “speculative, philosophical, and promotional” in nature and included no “sound, workable principles or methods.” In short, a half-baked fantasy.

Tesla proposed a number of frightening weapons during the latter half of his life. This illustration, from the February 1922 issue of Science and Invention, depicts his vision of future wars—waged by crewless s̷h̷i̷p̷s̷ ̷a̷n̷d̷ ̷a̷i̷r̷c̷r̷a̷f̷t̷s which would be controlled and powered by r̷a̷d̷i̷o̷ ̷w̷a̷v̷e̷s̷.

But then came word from another hotel a few blocks away, where Tesla had lived before. He had left a mysterious package in the vault there—a supposed prototype of his d̷e̷a̷t̷h̷ ̷r̷a̷y peace beam.

While the physicist and a few others looked on, the hotel manager opened the vault, bracing for an explosion. Inside stood a small cabinet covered in brown parcel paper. It was the physicist's job to open it and determine what was inside.

But before he could, the hotel manager handed him a note penned by Tesla. It claimed the prototype inside was worth $10,000. More ominously, it said the box would detonate if opened incorrectly.

At this point the hotel staff scampered away—no doubt feeling lucky to escape with their lives. This left the physicist to face Tesla's box. Despite himself, he was scared. What if Tesla really had come up with something? Or what if he’d booby-trapped the box, out of sheer paranoia?

After collecting his thoughts, the physicist steeled himself and began tearing off the brown paper. He must have lol'd at what he saw underneath: a Wheatstone bridge, a tool for measuring electrical resistance. It was a common, mundane device—some old junk, really. It was certainly not a death ray, not even close. ⁹⁹
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘4️⃣4️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '44

New York Times, The   January 16th, 1944

      # Proof Offered of Existence
         Of Pure Magnetic Current #
                  —————
Discovery by Prof. Felix Ehrenhaft, if Con-
 firmed, Expected to Rank With Faraday
       Finding of Dynamo Principle
                  —————
MAGNETIC CURRENT DECLARED TO EXIST

“Prof. Felix Ehrenhaft, noted Vienna physicist, who fled after the Nazi occupation of Austria, presented yesterday before the American Physical Society, meeting at Columbia University, a set of his latest experiments, carried out in his laboratory in New York, which he said provided for the first time experimental proof of the existence of pure magnetic current.”…
______








New York Times, The   February 27th, 1944
     # Is There a Magnetic Current? #

"Last January Prof. Felix Ehrenhaft, an Austrian refugee who used to be director of the Physics Institute of the University of Vienna and who was highly regarded in pre-Hitler Europe, lectured before a local section of the American Physical Society and described some experiments which to him proved that magnetism flows in a current like electricity."…
______








New York Times, The   April 29th, 1944
           —————
   # OFFERS NEW TESTS
    ON MAGNETIC FLOW #
         —————
 Dr. Ehrenhaft Supports Idea
Such Currents Cover Universe,
     but He Is Challenged
         —————

“PITTSBURGH, April 28 -- Further experimental tests offered as evidence in support of his hypothesis that "not only electric currents but also magnetic currents flow through the universe" were described here today at the meeting of the American Physical Society, at the Mellon Institute, by Dr. Felix Ehrenhaft, Professor of Physics at the University of Vienna in the pre-Nazi era.”…
______








New York Times, The   June 25th, 1944
            —————
       # MAGNETIC MOTOR
         TAPS 'THIRD FORCE' #
            —————
 Prof. Ehrenhaft Demonstrates
    First Operation by Current
    From Permanent Magnet
            —————

“ROCHESTER, June 24 -- What was said to be the first magnetic motor, operating purely on magnetic current supplied by a permanent magnet, was demonstrated here today before the meeting of the American Physical Society at the University of Rochester by Prof. Felix Ehrenhaft, who recently startled the scientific world with experiments which, he maintains, provide proof for the existence of pure magnetic current.”…
______








   New York Times, The   July 30th, 1944

           SCIENCE IN REVIEW
                —————
# A Physicist Supports His Hypothesis That
Magnetic Currents Flow Through Universe #
                —————
“Physicists attending the recent meeting of the American Physical Society at the University of Rochester (N. Y.) watched Prof. Felix Ehrenhaft present the most dramatic evidence so far in support of his hypothesis that "not only electric currents but also magnetic currents flow through the universe.”…
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘4️⃣8️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ '48

📰 NIKOLA TESLA 📰
by Kenneth M. Swezey
Science
May 16th, 1948 Page number(s): 1147 - 1159
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘5️⃣3️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

New York Times, The   March 6th, 1952
         # C. SHERRINGTON, 94,
           WON NOBEL PRIZE #
             —————
  British Neuro-Physiologist Got
  Award in '32 With E. D. Adrian
     for Nerve Cell Discoveries
             —————
______









New York Times, The   March 6th, 1952
      
   # FELIX EHRENHAFT, 73,
      PHYSICIST, PROFESSOR #
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘5️⃣5️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

~~~ DECLASSIFIED DOCUMENT ~~~
June 25th, 1955

[Illegible] INFORMATION CONTAINED                 
[illegible] IS UNCLASSIFIED
DATE 7-2-80 BY [illegible handprint name]

163 Milton Street
Brooklynn 22, N.Y.
    June 25, 1955

Dear Mr. Hoover:                       [illegible handprint]

    Back in 1943, the local Alien Property Custodian searched through the belongings of the late electrical inventor, NikolaOTesla[sic handprint O & underline], stored in the Manhattan Storage Warehouse in New York City.   Tesla had been a naturalized American for more than fifty years, so I believe that the search was made on the grounds that the property was to be sent to Yugoslavia, through Tesla's nephew and heir, Mr. Sava Kosanaović (Mr. Kosanaović had been Minister of State under the King's government, later became Ambassador to the United States from the present government, and is now a Minister serving in Belgrade).

    According to the attorney who handled the Tesla estate, Mr. PhilipxWittenberg[sic handprint X & underline], the Alien Property Custodian assured him that nothing had been held.   I have a letter from the Office of Alien Property, dated March 15, 1955, which confirms this statement.

    In gathering material to help in a nation-wide commemoration of Tesla's hundredth birthday next year---which will be participated in by leading scientific and engineering societies, museums, and universities---I have just discovered, however, that Tesla's solid gold Edison Medal somehow vanished during that search.

    As a friend who had known Tesla well during his last twenty years, I was with Mr. Kosanaović in Tesla's room in the hotel New Yorker on the day he died.   A safe expert was called in to unlock Tesla's safe.   Among its contents were several honorary degrees, a volume of greetings which I had gathered for him on his seventy-fifth birthday, a bunch of keys, and the Edison Medal.   We kept out the book of greetings (I mentioned this at the time to the assistant manager of the hotel and later to a Mr. Gorsuch of the Alien Property Custodian's office), but everything else, including the medal and the keys, was replaced and the safe was locked.

    Except when it was inspected by the Alien Property Custodian, the safe was never reopened until it

[page two]
arrived in Belgrade (where Tesla's property was to be installed in a special Tesla museum) and was there opened by Mr. Kosanaović. According to his former secretary, both the bunch of keys and the medal were missing.   The keys were later found in a tin box outside the safe; the medal was never found.

    I learned of the disappearance of the medal only by accident.   Mr. Kosanaović had asked his former secretary to get permission from the American Institute of Electrical Engineers (who gave Tesla the Medal) to have it duplicated.   This was given, but the cost, it turned out, would be about four hundred dollars.   In the meantime, the Tesla Museum, in Yugoslavia, is quietly trying to raise the money to pay for it.

    The irony of this situating is more disturbing than the money involved.   By giving us a system which made electric power universally available, Tesla---probably more than any other one man---helped put America on top of the world.   At the time he died, his gold Edison Medal was the only material evidence left of this country's appreciation.   That this last token should have disappeared overseas for whom he had done nothing---seems a tragic denouement.

[handprint  -illegible-   -illegible-   -illegible-]

    JohnXO'Neill{six handprint X, no underline], in his biography of Tesla, states that the FBI broke into Tesla's safe on the day he died, and an article in the current (June) Coronet repeats this.   I know this isn't true.   I did hear however, that the FBI somehow lent a hand to the Alien Property Custodian during the latter's search in the warehouse.

    If that is so, I thought that perhaps some of your men might remember the conditions under which the search was made and therefore might have a suggestion as to what could have happened to the medal.   After this long time, I have no hope that the medal can actually be restored, and I am already trying to interest Americans in making a replacement[sic] But future biographers might be spared a lot of wild guessin, and wrong blaming if some hint could be obtained as to whether the original got lost, strayed, or stolen---and who might have been responsible.

    With best regards and sincere appreciation for any help you can give,
        Sincerely, 
          [K.M.S. handprint signature]
      Kenneth M.XSweezey[sic handprint X]
P.S.: I am enclosing and editorial from last month's POWER magazine which outlines Tesla's contribution to the electric power industry.  [handprint]K.M.S.
______








    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘5️⃣6️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡


---

---
You know (this is also a copyright infringement), it's a very good thing that the Institute is honoring Tesla in this way—it will go a long way toward diminishing his reputation for voyeurism which was embarrassing to the older members. The stories of Tesla's sexual episodes were at one time the talk of the Institute, and we didn't know how to deal with it if the matter should somehow become publicized. You must be aware, of course, that he never went out with women. . . . Anyway, the older members of the Institute are dying off so those stories will also die out eventually.
______

May Cline
Katherine Johnson
Anne Morgan
Sarah Bernhardt
Marguerite Merrington
Milka Trnina
Elsie Ferguson
Frances Warwick
Flora Dodge
Catherine Moth
Pola Fotitch
Jelena Lenka Dunđerski
______




My Love Nikola Tesla 
by Ana Atanaskovic
Published January 1st, 2022
______













While listening on my cosmic phone
I caught words from the Olympus blown.
A newcomer was shown around;
That much I could guess, aided by sound.

'''There's Archimedes with his lever
Still busy on problems as ever.
Says: matter and force are transmutable
And wrong the laws you thought immutable.'''

'''Below, on Earth, they work at full blast
And news are coming in thick and fast.
The latest tells of a cosmic gun.
To be pelted is very poor fun.
We are wary with so much at stake,
Those beggars are a pest—no mistake.'''

'''Too bad, Sir Isaac, they dimmed your renown
And turned your great science upside down.
Now a long haired crank, Einstein by name,
Puts on your high teaching all the blame.
Says: matter and force are transmutable
And wrong the laws you thought immutable.'''

'''I am much too ignorant, my son,
For grasping schemes so finely spun.
My followers are of stronger mind
And I am content to stay behind,
Perhaps I failed, but I did my best,
These masters of mine may do the rest.
Come, Kelvin, I have finished my cup.
When is your friend Tesla coming up.'''

'''Oh, quoth Kelvin, he is always late,
It would be useless to remonstrate.'''

Then silence—shuffle of soft slippered feet—
I knock and—the bedlam of the street.

Nikola Tesla, Novice
______
*














____ ____ *BOUNTY FOR____ ____
www.youtube.com/watch?v=UdHZSlXC9M8


🐇
www.369.com and 135 years pre paid hosting

I would call your attention to the fact that while my specification, above mentioned, shows the automatic mechanism as controlled through a simple tuned circuit, I have used individualized control; that is, one based on the co-operation of several circuits of different periods of vibration, a principle which I had already developed at that time and which was subsequently described in my patents #725,188 ?and? 723,189 of March, 1903. The machine was in this form when I made demonstrations with it

*also: ungranted patents

239,481
251,659
251,660
293,058
.
.
.

A copy of the note penned by Tesla provided to Trump by the hotel staff and/or the d̷e̷a̷t̷h̷ ̷b̷e̷a̷m wheatstone bridge Tesla paid his overdue hotel bill with.

Tesla's large caliber Peace Beam componentry from several of Teslas labs.

Tesla's Peace Beam papers from his safe.

Tesla's Peace Beam papers sent to Dayton AFB (later reported lost after FOIAd) .

Gold Edison Medal from Tesla's safe.
🐇

Explanation as to how the keys made it from inside Tesla's safe to inside one of Tesla's trunks when the Edison Medal went missing.

Copy of, or transcript of any of Tesla's replies to May Cline

Tesla Portrait 48x53" by Princess Vilma Lwoff-Parlaghy (TIME 75th Birthday Cover).

Tesla's apparatus for experimentally confirming his explanation of the moons rotation.

Copy of, or transcript of Tesla and Westinghouses contract concerning the purchase of Tesla's patents and Tesla's ! $2.5 per horsepower transmitted ! royalties.

Source for the story and or any documents concerning Tesla 'tearing up' the Westinghouse contract.

Any audio or video recording of Tesla, Teslas pressers or Teslas funeral.

Source of third party claim of Tesla wanting buried with the headstone “Are you happy now?”

Someone at "Tesla Universe" to add (or takeaway) the final line "The present is theirs, the future, for which I really worked, is mine." To their version(s) of "THE TRANSMISSION OF ELECTRICAL ENERGY WITHOUT WIRES AS A MEANS FOR FURTHERING PEACE"

S̶o̶m̶e̶o̶n̶e̶ ̶a̶t̶ ̶“̶T̶e̶s̶l̶a̶ ̶U̶n̶i̶v̶e̶r̶s̶e̶”̶ ̶t̶o̶ ̶a̶d̶d̶ ̶“̶M̶y̶ ̶I̶n̶v̶e̶n̶t̶i̶o̶n̶s̶ ̶V̶I̶”̶…̶ ̶T̶h̶e̶ ̶'̶E̶l̶e̶c̶t̶r̶i̶c̶a̶l̶ ̶E̶x̶p̶e̶r̶i̶m̶e̶n̶t̶e̶r̶'̶ ̶m̶a̶g̶a̶z̶i̶n̶e̶ ̶v̶e̶r̶s̶i̶o̶n̶ ̶a̶n̶d̶ ̶w̶i̶t̶h̶ ̶t̶h̶e̶ ̶m̶p̶h̶ ̶t̶y̶p̶o̶ ̶I̶ ̶g̶u̶e̶s̶s̶.̶.̶

S̶o̶m̶e̶o̶n̶e̶ ̶a̶t̶ ̶“̶T̶e̶s̶l̶a̶ ̶U̶n̶i̶v̶e̶r̶s̶e̶”̶ ̶t̶o̶ ̶a̶d̶d̶ ̶T̶e̶s̶l̶a̶'̶s̶ ̶A̶l̶b̶a̶n̶y̶ ̶T̶e̶l̶e̶g̶r̶a̶m̶ ̶n̶e̶w̶s̶p̶a̶p̶e̶r̶ ̶a̶r̶t̶i̶c̶l̶e̶ ̶“̶A̶ ̶G̶i̶a̶n̶t̶ ̶E̶y̶e̶ ̶t̶o̶ ̶S̶e̶e̶ ̶A̶r̶o̶u̶n̶d̶ ̶t̶h̶e̶ ̶W̶o̶r̶l̶d̶”̶

Someone at "Tesla Universe" to fix the 'unverified' "NIKOLA TESLA QUOTE #41" "T̶h̶e̶ ̶l̶a̶s̶t̶ ̶2̶9̶ ̶d̶a̶y̶s̶ ̶o̶f̶ ̶t̶h̶e̶ ̶m̶o̶n̶t̶h̶ ̶a̶r̶e̶ ̶t̶h̶e̶ ̶h̶a̶r̶d̶e̶s̶t̶.̶" "The last 29 days of the month are the toughest!" -MIIV

A source for PBS.ORGs VTOL claim 'According to the inventor, the device would weigh eight-hundred pounds. It would rise from a garage, a roof, or a window as desired, and would sell at $1,000 for both military and consumer uses.'
www.pbs.org/tesla/ll/ll_poevis.html

Copy of or source for Tesla's poem Fragments of Olympian Gossip'.

A source for PBS.ORGs 'weapon to end war' photo.
www.tineye.com/search/b12d55027c8c8b452f1e8607cd35a0dffc0f85ec?sort=score&order=desc&page=1
www.pbs.org/tesla/ll/index.html

EARTH ELECTRICITY TO KILL MONOPOLY, The World Sunday Magazine, March 8, 1896 authors name and/ or a copy of the "statement of the facts and results of the experiment" 'written and attested' before a notary public as a matter of scientific record.

Any any written reference by Tesla to the "Abandon hope all ye who enter here." sign on his Colorado Springs lab.

Any written reference by Tesla or articles of the day making reference to Tesla passing millions of volts thru himself in front of a large crowd in St. Louis.

Any Tesla patents (granted, ungranted & unsubmitted) besides those listed in this document.

Any Tesla patent unsubmitted or ungranted having the title or to do with a "filings tube".

Tesla article wherein he speaks on the justice system of the future becoming as swift as the postal system.

Tesla article wherein he speaks on the homogeneity of the universe. 

Tesla article wherein he compares finding the origin of dirt to finding the origin of life itself

Tesla article wherein he speaks on the life of crystals.

Tesla article wherein he speaks on the etymology of the word antenna.

Tesla article wherein he speaks on the etymology of the word radio.

Tesla article wherein he speaks on having engineered a version of Wardenclyffe down to the size of a small cabin.

Photocopy of original May 16th, 1935 THE NEW ART OF PROJECTING CONCENTRATED NON-DISPERSIVE ENERGY THROUGH NATURAL MEDIA.

Photocopy of original March 1, 1941 Tesla WESTERN UNION TELEGRAM.

Photocopy of original March 4, 1941 Tesla WESTERN UNION TELEGRAM.

Copy of KRAFTÜBERTRAGUNG MITTELS WECHSELSTRÖMEN VON VERSCHIEDENER PHASE (Drehstrom) in German or English














____ ____ Fake and or Unsourced Quotes ____ ____

"If you only knew the magnificence of the 3 6 and 9 then you would have a key to the universe"

“If you want to find the secrets of the universe, think in terms of energy, frequency and vibration”

“All these years that I had spent in the service of mankind brought me nothing but insults and humiliation”

“If your hate could be turned into electricity, it would light up the whole world.”

“What one man calls God, another calls the laws of physics”

“My brain is only a receiver; in the Universe, there is a core from which we obtain knowledge, strength, and inspiration. I have not penetrated into the secrets of this core, but I know that it exists”

“Earth is a realm, it is not a planet. It is not an object, therefore, it has no edge. Earth would be more easily defined as a system environment. Earth is also a machine, it is a Tesla coil. The sun and moon are powered wirelessly with the electromagnetic field (the Aether). This field also suspends the celestial spheres with electo-magnetic levitation. Electromagnetic levitation disproves gravity because the only force you need to counter is the electromagnetic force, not gravity. The stars are attached to the firmament”

“I don't care that they stole my idea  I care that they don't have any of their own”

“No free energy device will ever be allowed to reach the market”

“Bury your findings until humanity is ready”

“Fake quotes will ruin the internet.”

“You may live to see man-made horrors beyond your comprehension.”

'Everything is Light' The Incredible interview with Nikola Tesla in 1899
("Tesla or Customize of Angels" a play written by Stevan Pesic)



'The Strange Life of Nikola Tesla'
www.croatianhistory.net/etf/teslas.html
www.tfcbooks.com/special/mi_link.htm
This text has been entered by John R.H. Penner from a small booklet found in a used bookstore for $2.5 
It seems that some of the sentences, appearing in The Strange Life of Nikola Tesla, have been left out from My Inventions IIIIII. And vice versa, some of the sentences have been added to My Inventions IV
      In the interest of making this important text avalilable to the wider public, he has retyped 
  the entire text word-for-word as it originally appears into this electronic format.
            He has exactly maintained page numbers as they appear in the original – including the 
        somewhat odd artifact of Chapter 11 starting on page 12.
but was indeed the work of divine power At this time, as at many other times in the past, my thoughts turned towards my Mother's teaching. The gift of mental power comes from God, Divine Being, and if we concentrate our minds on that truth, we become in tune with this great power. My Mother had taught me to seek all truth in the Bible; therefore I devoted the next few months to the study of this work. after a short visit to my friends in Watford. At this time I made a further careful study of the Bible, and discovered the key in Revelation. 🐇 100,000,000 volts — one hundred million volts —over 100,000,000 1,000,000 4,000,000 because few indeed, will admit the reality – that God made man in His image – in which case all earth men are alike. There is in fact but one race, of many colours. Christ is but one person, yet he is of all people, so why do some people think themselves better than some other people? aggrandisement aggravatedtho (he missed the ✳️s tho!)
✳️devoid of sustaining planes, ailerons, propellers, and other external✳️
✳️entirely by ✳️reaction✳️
✳️project a missile of this kind into the air and drop it✳️





    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘4️⃣5️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘4️⃣6️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘4️⃣7️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘4️⃣9️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘5️⃣0️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘5️⃣1️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘5️⃣2️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘5️⃣4️⃣ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
https://www.theverge.com/2015/9/10/9300115/elon-musk-stephen-colbert-interviews-super-villain
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
https://www.nytimes.com/2017/12/16/us/politics/unidentified-flying-object-navy.html
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
https://www.space.com/elon-musk-nuke-mars-terraforming.html
https://www.foxnews.com/tech/us-anti-gravity-research-70-years
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡

    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ‘      ⚡ ⚡ ⚡ ⚡
    ⚡

    FAMOUS SCIENTIFIC ILLUSIONS
     OF/ON THE MOON'S ROTATION
             PART III 
 8(4) ACCOUNT'S FROM 4(8) OBSERVERS
    





———————————————————————————
 🚧 </until next time> 🚧
———————————————————————————
